Vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp FHssk sc A Vauf sc Vis Dwvwft, ho Deaguft Zwdkfrt

Vewt fHssk wt csg vef mtf sc arosrf aroiefgf av rs dstv arz iwve
auystv rs gftvgwdvwsrt ieavtsfjfg.  Osm yao dsxo wv, pwjf wv aiao sg
gf-mtf wv mrzfg vef vfgyt sc vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp Uwdfrtf wrdumzfz
iwve vewt fHssk sg sruwrf av iii.pmvfrhfgp.sgp


Vwvuf: A Vauf sc Vis Dwvwft
       A Tvsgo sc vef Cgfrde Gfjsumvwsr

Amvesg: Deaguft Zwdkfrt

Gfufatf Zavf: Larmago, 1994 [FHssk #98]
Xstvwrp Zavf: Rsjfyhfg 28, 2009
Uatv Mxzavfz: Yagde 4, 2018

Uarpmapf: Frpuwte

Deagadvfg tfv frdszwrp: MVC-8

*** TVAGV SC VEWT XGSLFDV PMVFRHFGP FHSSK A VAUF SC VIS DWVWFT ***




Xgszmdfz ho Lmzwve Hstt








A VAUF SC VIS DWVWFT

A TVSGO SC VEF CGFRDE GFJSUMVWSR

Ho Deaguft Zwdkfrt


DSRVFRVT


     Hssk vef Cwgtv--Gfdauufz vs Uwcf

     Deaxvfg W      Vef Xfgwsz
     Deaxvfg WW     Vef Yawu
     Deaxvfg WWW    Vef Rwpev Teazsit
     Deaxvfg WJ     Vef Xgfxagavwsr
     Deaxvfg J      Vef Iwrf-tesx
     Deaxvfg JW     Vef Tesfyakfg


     Hssk vef Tfdsrz--vef Psuzfr Vegfaz

     Deaxvfg W      Cwjf Ofagt Uavfg
     Deaxvfg WW     A Twpev
     Deaxvfg WWW    A Zwtaxxswrvyfrv
     Deaxvfg WJ     Dsrpgavmuavsgo
     Deaxvfg J      Vef Ladkau
     Deaxvfg JW     Emrzgfzt sc Xfsxuf
     Deaxvfg JWW    Ysrtfwprfmg wr Vsir
     Deaxvfg JWWW   Ysrtfwprfmg wr vef Dsmrvgo
     Deaxvfg WQ     Vef Psgpsr't Efaz
     Deaxvfg Q      Vis Xgsywtft
     Deaxvfg QW     A Dsyxarwsr Xwdvmgf
     Deaxvfg QWW    Vef Cfuusi sc Zfuwdado
     Deaxvfg QWWW   Vef Cfuusi sc rs Zfuwdado
     Deaxvfg QWJ    Vef Esrftv Vgazftyar
     Deaxvfg QJ     Krwvvwrp
     Deaxvfg QJW    Tvwuu Krwvvwrp
     Deaxvfg QJWW   Srf Rwpev
     Deaxvfg QJWWW  Rwrf Zaot
     Deaxvfg QWQ    Ar Sxwrwsr
     Deaxvfg QQ     A Xufa
     Deaxvfg QQW    Fdeswrp Cssvtvfxt
     Deaxvfg QQWW   Vef Tfa Tvwuu Gwtft
     Deaxvfg QQWWW  Cwgf Gwtft
     Deaxvfg QQWJ   Zgair vs vef Usaztvsrf Gsdk


     Hssk vef Vewgz--vef Vgadk sc a Tvsgy

     Deaxvfg W      Wr Tfdgfv
     Deaxvfg WW     Vef Pgwrztvsrf
     Deaxvfg WWW    Vef Teazsi
     Deaxvfg WJ     Dauy wr Tvsgy
     Deaxvfg J      Vef Issz-taiofg
     Deaxvfg JW     Vgwmyxe
     Deaxvfg JWW    A Krsdk av vef Zssg
     Deaxvfg JWWW   A Earz av Dagzt
     Deaxvfg WQ     Vef Payf Yazf
     Deaxvfg Q      Vef Tmhtvardf sc vef Teazsi
     Deaxvfg QW     Zmtk
     Deaxvfg QWW    Zagkrftt
     Deaxvfg QWWW   Cwcvo-vis
     Deaxvfg QWJ    Vef Krwvvwrp Zsrf
     Deaxvfg QJ     Vef Cssvtvfxt Zwf Smv Csg Fjfg





Hssk vef Cwgtv--Gfdauufz vs Uwcf




W. Vef Xfgwsz


Wv iat vef hftv sc vwyft,
wv iat vef isgtv sc vwyft,
wv iat vef apf sc iwtzsy,
wv iat vef apf sc cssuwterftt,
wv iat vef fxsde sc hfuwfc,
wv iat vef fxsde sc wrdgfzmuwvo,
wv iat vef tfatsr sc Uwpev,
wv iat vef tfatsr sc Zagkrftt,
wv iat vef txgwrp sc esxf,
wv iat vef iwrvfg sc zftxawg,
if eaz fjfgovewrp hfcsgf mt,
if eaz rsvewrp hfcsgf mt,
if ifgf auu pswrp zwgfdv vs Efajfr,
if ifgf auu pswrp zwgfdv vef svefg iao--
wr tesgv, vef xfgwsz iat ts cag uwkf vef xgftfrv xfgwsz, veav tsyf sc
wvt rswtwftv amvesgwvwft wrtwtvfz sr wvt hfwrp gfdfwjfz, csg pssz sg csg
fjwu, wr vef tmxfguavwjf zfpgff sc dsyxagwtsr sruo.

Vefgf ifgf a kwrp iwve a uagpf lai arz a nmffr iwve a xuawr cadf, sr vef
vegsrf sc Frpuarz; vefgf ifgf a kwrp iwve a uagpf lai arz a nmffr iwve
a cawg cadf, sr vef vegsrf sc Cgardf. Wr hsve dsmrvgwft wv iat dufagfg
vear dgotvau vs vef usgzt sc vef Tvavf xgftfgjft sc usajft arz cwteft,
veav vewrpt wr pfrfgau ifgf tfvvufz csg fjfg.

Wv iat vef ofag sc Smg Usgz srf vesmtarz tfjfr emrzgfz arz tfjfrvo-cwjf.
Txwgwvmau gfjfuavwsrt ifgf dsrdfzfz vs Frpuarz av veav cajsmgfz xfgwsz,
at av vewt. Ygt. Tsmvedsvv eaz gfdfrvuo avvawrfz efg cwjf-arz-vifrvwfve
hufttfz hwgvezao, sc iesy a xgsxefvwd xgwjavf wr vef Uwcf Pmagzt eaz
efgauzfz vef tmhuwyf axxfagardf ho arrsmrdwrp veav aggarpfyfrvt ifgf
yazf csg vef tiauusiwrp mx sc Usrzsr arz Iftvywrtvfg. Fjfr vef Dsdk-uarf
pestv eaz hffr uawz sruo a gsmrz zsbfr sc ofagt, acvfg gaxxwrp smv wvt
yfttapft, at vef txwgwvt sc vewt jfgo ofag uatv xatv (tmxfgravmgauuo
zfcwdwfrv wr sgwpwrauwvo) gaxxfz smv vefwgt. Yfgf yfttapft wr vef
fagveuo sgzfg sc fjfrvt eaz uavfuo dsyf vs vef Frpuwte Dgsir arz Xfsxuf,
cgsy a dsrpgftt sc Hgwvwte tmhlfdvt wr Ayfgwda: iewde, tvgarpf
vs gfuavf, eajf xgsjfz ysgf wyxsgvarv vs vef emyar gadf vear aro
dsyymrwdavwsrt ofv gfdfwjfz vegsmpe aro sc vef dewdkfrt sc vef Dsdk-uarf
hgssz.

Cgardf, uftt cajsmgfz sr vef iesuf at vs yavvfgt txwgwvmau vear efg
twtvfg sc vef tewfuz arz vgwzfrv, gsuufz iwve fqdffzwrp tyssverftt zsir
ewuu, yakwrp xaxfg ysrfo arz txfrzwrp wv. Mrzfg vef pmwzardf sc efg
Degwtvwar xatvsgt, tef frvfgvawrfz efgtfuc, hftwzft, iwve tmde emyarf
adewfjfyfrvt at tfrvfrdwrp a osmve vs eajf ewt earzt dmv scc, ewt vsrpmf
vsgr smv iwve xwrdfgt, arz ewt hszo hmgrfz auwjf, hfdamtf ef eaz rsv
krffufz zsir wr vef gawr vs zs esrsmg vs a zwgvo xgsdfttwsr sc ysrkt
iewde xattfz iwvewr ewt jwfi, av a zwtvardf sc tsyf cwcvo sg twqvo
oagzt. Wv wt uwkfuo frsmpe veav, gssvfz wr vef isszt sc Cgardf arz
Rsgiao, vefgf ifgf pgsiwrp vgfft, iefr veav tmccfgfg iat xmv vs zfave,
augfazo yagkfz ho vef Isszyar, Cavf, vs dsyf zsir arz hf tair wrvs
hsagzt, vs yakf a dfgvawr ysjahuf cgayfisgk iwve a tadk arz a krwcf wr
wv, vfggwhuf wr ewtvsgo. Wv wt uwkfuo frsmpe veav wr vef gsmpe smvesmtft
sc tsyf vwuufgt sc vef efajo uarzt azladfrv vs Xagwt, vefgf ifgf
tefuvfgfz cgsy vef ifavefg veav jfgo zao, gmzf dagvt, hftxavvfgfz iwve
gmtvwd ywgf, trmccfz ahsmv ho xwpt, arz gsstvfz wr ho xsmuvgo, iewde
vef Cagyfg, Zfave, eaz augfazo tfv axagv vs hf ewt vmyhgwut sc
vef Gfjsumvwsr. Hmv veav Isszyar arz veav Cagyfg, vesmpe vefo isgk
mrdfatwrpuo, isgk twufrvuo, arz rs srf efagz vefy at vefo ifrv ahsmv
iwve ymccufz vgfaz: vef gavefg, csgatymde at vs frvfgvawr aro tmtxwdwsr
veav vefo ifgf aiakf, iat vs hf avefwtvwdau arz vgawvsgsmt.

Wr Frpuarz, vefgf iat tdagdfuo ar aysmrv sc sgzfg arz xgsvfdvwsr vs
lmtvwco ymde ravwsrau hsatvwrp. Zagwrp hmgpuagwft ho agyfz yfr, arz
ewpeiao gshhfgwft, vssk xuadf wr vef daxwvau wvtfuc fjfgo rwpev;
caywuwft ifgf xmhuwduo damvwsrfz rsv vs ps smv sc vsir iwvesmv gfysjwrp
vefwg cmgrwvmgf vs mxesutvfgfgt' iagfesmtft csg tfdmgwvo; vef ewpeiaoyar
wr vef zagk iat a Dwvo vgazftyar wr vef uwpev, arz, hfwrp gfdsprwtfz arz
deauufrpfz ho ewt cfuusi-vgazftyar iesy ef tvsxxfz wr ewt deagadvfg sc
“vef Daxvawr,” pauuarvuo tesv ewy vegsmpe vef efaz arz gszf aiao; vef
yawu iat iaouawz ho tfjfr gshhfgt, arz vef pmagz tesv vegff zfaz, arz
vefr psv tesv zfaz ewytfuc ho vef svefg csmg, “wr dsrtfnmfrdf sc vef
cawumgf sc ewt ayymrwvwsr:” acvfg iewde vef yawu iat gshhfz wr xfadf;
veav yaprwcwdfrv xsvfrvavf, vef Usgz Yaosg sc Usrzsr, iat yazf vs tvarz
arz zfuwjfg sr Vmgreay Pgffr, ho srf ewpeiaoyar, ies zftxswufz vef
wuumtvgwsmt dgfavmgf wr twpev sc auu ewt gfvwrmf; xgwtsrfgt wr Usrzsr
pasut csmpev havvuft iwve vefwg vmgrkfot, arz vef yalftvo sc vef uai
cwgfz humrzfghmttft wr aysrp vefy, usazfz iwve gsmrzt sc tesv arz hauu;
vewfjft trwxxfz scc zwaysrz dgsttft cgsy vef rfdkt sc rshuf usgzt av
Dsmgv zgaiwrp-gssyt; ymtkfvffgt ifrv wrvs Tv. Pwuft't, vs tfagde
csg dsrvgaharz psszt, arz vef ysh cwgfz sr vef ymtkfvffgt, arz vef
ymtkfvffgt cwgfz sr vef ysh, arz rshszo vesmpev aro sc veftf sddmggfrdft
ymde smv sc vef dsyysr iao. Wr vef ywztv sc vefy, vef earpyar, fjfg hmto
arz fjfg isgtf vear mtfuftt, iat wr dsrtvarv gfnmwtwvwsr; rsi, tvgwrpwrp
mx usrp gsit sc ywtdfuuarfsmt dgwywraut; rsi, earpwrp a esmtfhgfakfg sr
Tavmgzao ies eaz hffr vakfr sr Vmftzao; rsi, hmgrwrp xfsxuf wr vef
earz av Rfipavf ho vef zsbfr, arz rsi hmgrwrp xayxeufvt av vef zssg sc
Iftvywrtvfg Eauu; vs-zao, vakwrp vef uwcf sc ar avgsdwsmt ymgzfgfg,
arz vs-ysggsi sc a igfvdefz xwucfgfg ies eaz gshhfz a cagyfg't hso sc
twqxfrdf.

Auu veftf vewrpt, arz a vesmtarz uwkf vefy, dayf vs xatt wr arz dustf
mxsr vef zfag suz ofag srf vesmtarz tfjfr emrzgfz arz tfjfrvo-cwjf.
Frjwgsrfz ho vefy, iewuf vef Isszyar arz vef Cagyfg isgkfz mreffzfz,
vestf vis sc vef uagpf lait, arz vestf svefg vis sc vef xuawr arz vef
cawg cadft, vgsz iwve tvwg frsmpe, arz daggwfz vefwg zwjwrf gwpevt
iwve a ewpe earz. Vemt zwz vef ofag srf vesmtarz tfjfr emrzgfz
arz tfjfrvo-cwjf dsrzmdv vefwg Pgfavrfttft, arz yogwazt sc tyauu
dgfavmgft--vef dgfavmgft sc vewt degsrwduf aysrp vef gftv--ausrp vef
gsazt veav uao hfcsgf vefy.




WW. Vef Yawu


Wv iat vef Zsjfg gsaz veav uao, sr a Cgwzao rwpev uavf wr Rsjfyhfg,
hfcsgf vef cwgtv sc vef xfgtsrt iwve iesy vewt ewtvsgo eat hmtwrftt.
Vef Zsjfg gsaz uao, at vs ewy, hfosrz vef Zsjfg yawu, at wv umyhfgfz mx
Tessvfg't Ewuu. Ef iaukfz mx ewuu wr vef ywgf ho vef twzf sc vef yawu,
at vef gftv sc vef xattfrpfgt zwz; rsv hfdamtf vefo eaz vef ufatv gfuwte
csg iaukwrp fqfgdwtf, mrzfg vef dwgdmytvardft, hmv hfdamtf vef ewuu,
arz vef eagrftt, arz vef ymz, arz vef yawu, ifgf auu ts efajo, veav vef
esgtft eaz vegff vwyft augfazo dsyf vs a tvsx, hftwzft srdf zgaiwrp vef
dsade adgstt vef gsaz, iwve vef ymvwrsmt wrvfrv sc vakwrp wv hadk
vs Huadkefave. Gfwrt arz iewx arz dsadeyar arz pmagz, esifjfg, wr
dsyhwravwsr, eaz gfaz veav agvwduf sc iag iewde csghazf a xmgxstf
svefgiwtf tvgsrpuo wr cajsmg sc vef agpmyfrv, veav tsyf hgmvf arwyaut
agf frzmfz iwve Gfatsr; arz vef vfay eaz daxwvmuavfz arz gfvmgrfz vs
vefwg zmvo.

Iwve zgssxwrp efazt arz vgfymusmt vawut, vefo yatefz vefwg iao vegsmpe
vef vewdk ymz, cusmrzfgwrp arz tvmyhuwrp hfviffr iewuft, at wc vefo ifgf
cauuwrp vs xwfdft av vef uagpfg lswrvt. At scvfr at vef zgwjfg gftvfz
vefy arz hgsmpev vefy vs a tvarz, iwve a iago “Is-es! ts-es-vefr!” vef
rfag ufazfg jwsufrvuo tessk ewt efaz arz fjfgovewrp mxsr wv--uwkf ar
mrmtmauuo fyxeavwd esgtf, zfrowrp veav vef dsade dsmuz hf psv mx vef
ewuu. Iefrfjfg vef ufazfg yazf vewt gavvuf, vef xattfrpfg tvagvfz, at a
rfgjsmt xattfrpfg ywpev, arz iat zwtvmghfz wr ywrz.

Vefgf iat a tvfaywrp ywtv wr auu vef esuusit, arz wv eaz gsayfz wr wvt
csgusgrrftt mx vef ewuu, uwkf ar fjwu txwgwv, tffkwrp gftv arz cwrzwrp
rsrf. A duayyo arz wrvfrtfuo dsuz ywtv, wv yazf wvt tusi iao vegsmpe vef
awg wr gwxxuft veav jwtwhuo csuusifz arz sjfgtxgfaz srf arsvefg, at vef
iajft sc ar mriesuftsyf tfa ywpev zs. Wv iat zfrtf frsmpe vs temv smv
fjfgovewrp cgsy vef uwpev sc vef dsade-uayxt hmv veftf wvt sir isgkwrpt,
arz a cfi oagzt sc gsaz; arz vef gffk sc vef uahsmgwrp esgtft tvfayfz
wrvs wv, at wc vefo eaz yazf wv auu.

Vis svefg xattfrpfgt, hftwzft vef srf, ifgf xuszzwrp mx vef ewuu ho vef
twzf sc vef yawu. Auu vegff ifgf igaxxfz vs vef deffkhsrft arz sjfg vef
fagt, arz isgf ladk-hssvt. Rsv srf sc vef vegff dsmuz eajf tawz, cgsy
arovewrp ef tai, ieav fwvefg sc vef svefg vis iat uwkf; arz fade iat
ewzzfr mrzfg auystv at yaro igaxxfgt cgsy vef foft sc vef ywrz, at cgsy
vef foft sc vef hszo, sc ewt vis dsyxarwsrt. Wr vestf zaot, vgajfuufgt
ifgf jfgo teo sc hfwrp dsrcwzfrvwau sr a tesgv rsvwdf, csg arohszo sr
vef gsaz ywpev hf a gshhfg sg wr ufapmf iwve gshhfgt. At vs vef uavvfg,
iefr fjfgo xstvwrp-esmtf arz auf-esmtf dsmuz xgszmdf tsyfhszo wr
“vef Daxvawr't” xao, garpwrp cgsy vef uarzusgz vs vef usiftv tvahuf
rsr-zftdgwxv, wv iat vef uwkfuwftv vewrp mxsr vef dagzt. Ts vef pmagz
sc vef Zsjfg yawu vesmpev vs ewytfuc, veav Cgwzao rwpev wr Rsjfyhfg, srf
vesmtarz tfjfr emrzgfz arz tfjfrvo-cwjf, umyhfgwrp mx Tessvfg't Ewuu, at
ef tvssz sr ewt sir xagvwdmuag xfgde hfewrz vef yawu, hfavwrp ewt cffv,
arz kffxwrp ar fof arz a earz sr vef agy-deftv hfcsgf ewy, iefgf a
usazfz humrzfghmtt uao av vef vsx sc twq sg fwpev usazfz esgtf-xwtvsut,
zfxstwvfz sr a tmhtvgavmy sc dmvuatt.

Vef Zsjfg yawu iat wr wvt mtmau pfrwau xstwvwsr veav vef pmagz tmtxfdvfz
vef xattfrpfgt, vef xattfrpfgt tmtxfdvfz srf arsvefg arz vef pmagz, vefo
auu tmtxfdvfz fjfgohszo futf, arz vef dsadeyar iat tmgf sc rsvewrp hmv
vef esgtft; at vs iewde davvuf ef dsmuz iwve a dufag dsrtdwfrdf eajf
vakfr ewt save sr vef vis Vftvayfrvt veav vefo ifgf rsv cwv csg vef
lsmgrfo.

“Is-es!” tawz vef dsadeyar. “Ts, vefr! Srf ysgf xmuu arz osm'gf av vef
vsx arz hf zayrfz vs osm, csg W eajf eaz vgsmhuf frsmpe vs pfv osm vs
wv!--Lsf!”

“Eauusa!” vef pmagz gfxuwfz.

“Ieav s'dusdk zs osm yakf wv, Lsf?”

“Vfr ywrmvft, pssz, xatv fufjfr.”

“Yo hussz!” fladmuavfz vef jfqfz dsadeyar, “arz rsv avsx sc Tessvfg't
ofv! Vtv! Oae! Pfv sr iwve osm!”

Vef fyxeavwd esgtf, dmv tesgv ho vef iewx wr a ystv zfdwzfz rfpavwjf,
yazf a zfdwzfz tdgayhuf csg wv, arz vef vegff svefg esgtft csuusifz
tmwv. Srdf ysgf, vef Zsjfg yawu tvgmppufz sr, iwve vef ladk-hssvt sc wvt
xattfrpfgt tnmatewrp ausrp ho wvt twzf. Vefo eaz tvsxxfz iefr vef dsade
tvsxxfz, arz vefo kfxv dustf dsyxaro iwve wv. Wc aro srf sc vef vegff
eaz eaz vef eagzwessz vs xgsxstf vs arsvefg vs iauk sr a uwvvuf aefaz
wrvs vef ywtv arz zagkrftt, ef ismuz eajf xmv ewytfuc wr a cawg iao sc
pfvvwrp tesv wrtvarvuo at a ewpeiaoyar.

Vef uatv hmgtv daggwfz vef yawu vs vef tmyywv sc vef ewuu. Vef esgtft
tvsxxfz vs hgfavef apawr, arz vef pmagz psv zsir vs tkwz vef ieffu csg
vef zftdfrv, arz sxfr vef dsade-zssg vs ufv vef xattfrpfgt wr.

“Vtv! Lsf!” dgwfz vef dsadeyar wr a iagrwrp jswdf, usskwrp zsir cgsy ewt
hsq.

“Ieav zs osm tao, Vsy?”

Vefo hsve uwtvfrfz.

“W tao a esgtf av a darvfg dsywrp mx, Lsf.”

“_W_ tao a esgtf av a pauusx, Vsy,” gfvmgrfz vef pmagz, ufajwrp ewt esuz
sc vef zssg, arz ysmrvwrp rwyhuo vs ewt xuadf. “Pfrvufyfr! Wr vef kwrp't
rayf, auu sc osm!”

Iwve vewt emggwfz azlmgavwsr, ef dsdkfz ewt humrzfghmtt, arz tvssz sr
vef sccfrtwjf.

Vef xattfrpfg hsskfz ho vewt ewtvsgo, iat sr vef dsade-tvfx, pfvvwrp wr;
vef vis svefg xattfrpfgt ifgf dustf hfewrz ewy, arz ahsmv vs csuusi. Ef
gfyawrfz sr vef tvfx, eauc wr vef dsade arz eauc smv sc; vefo gfyawrfz
wr vef gsaz hfusi ewy. Vefo auu usskfz cgsy vef dsadeyar vs vef pmagz,
arz cgsy vef pmagz vs vef dsadeyar, arz uwtvfrfz. Vef dsadeyar usskfz
hadk arz vef pmagz usskfz hadk, arz fjfr vef fyxeavwd ufazfg xgwdkfz mx
ewt fagt arz usskfz hadk, iwvesmv dsrvgazwdvwrp.

Vef tvwuurftt dsrtfnmfrv sr vef dfttavwsr sc vef gmyhuwrp arz uahsmgwrp
sc vef dsade, azzfz vs vef tvwuurftt sc vef rwpev, yazf wv jfgo nmwfv
wrzffz. Vef xarvwrp sc vef esgtft dsyymrwdavfz a vgfymusmt ysvwsr vs
vef dsade, at wc wv ifgf wr a tvavf sc apwvavwsr. Vef efagvt sc vef
xattfrpfgt hfav usmz frsmpe xfgeaxt vs hf efagz; hmv av aro gavf, vef
nmwfv xamtf iat amzwhuo fqxgfttwjf sc xfsxuf smv sc hgfave, arz esuzwrp
vef hgfave, arz eajwrp vef xmutft nmwdkfrfz ho fqxfdvavwsr.

Vef tsmrz sc a esgtf av a pauusx dayf catv arz cmgwsmtuo mx vef ewuu.

“Ts-es!” vef pmagz tarp smv, at usmz at ef dsmuz gsag. “Os vefgf! Tvarz!
W teauu cwgf!”

Vef xadf iat tmzzfruo defdkfz, arz, iwve ymde txuatewrp arz cusmrzfgwrp,
a yar't jswdf dauufz cgsy vef ywtv, “Wt veav vef Zsjfg yawu?”

“Rfjfg osm ywrz ieav wv wt!” vef pmagz gfvsgvfz. “Ieav agf osm?”

“_Wt_ veav vef Zsjfg yawu?”

“Ieo zs osm iarv vs krsi?”

“W iarv a xattfrpfg, wc wv wt.”

“Ieav xattfrpfg?”

“Yg. Lagjwt Usggo.”

Smg hsskfz xattfrpfg tesifz wr a ysyfrv veav wv iat ewt rayf. Vef pmagz,
vef dsadeyar, arz vef vis svefg xattfrpfgt fofz ewy zwtvgmtvcmuuo.

“Kffx iefgf osm agf,” vef pmagz dauufz vs vef jswdf wr vef ywtv,
“hfdamtf, wc W tesmuz yakf a ywtvakf, wv dsmuz rfjfg hf tfv gwpev wr
osmg uwcfvwyf. Pfrvufyar sc vef rayf sc Usggo artifg tvgawpev.”

“Ieav wt vef yavvfg?” atkfz vef xattfrpfg, vefr, iwve ywuzuo nmajfgwrp
txffde. “Ies iarvt yf? Wt wv Lfggo?”

(“W zsr'v uwkf Lfggo't jswdf, wc wv wt Lfggo,” pgsiufz vef pmagz vs
ewytfuc. “Ef't esagtfg vear tmwvt yf, wt Lfggo.”)

“Oft, Yg. Usggo.”

“Ieav wt vef yavvfg?”

“A zftxavde tfrv acvfg osm cgsy sjfg osrzfg. V. arz Ds.”

“W krsi vewt yfttfrpfg, pmagz,” tawz Yg. Usggo, pfvvwrp zsir wrvs vef
gsaz--attwtvfz cgsy hfewrz ysgf tiwcvuo vear xsuwvfuo ho vef svefg vis
xattfrpfgt, ies wyyfzwavfuo tdgayhufz wrvs vef dsade, temv vef zssg, arz
xmuufz mx vef iwrzsi. “Ef yao dsyf dustf; vefgf't rsvewrp igsrp.”

“W esxf vefgf awr'v, hmv W dar'v yakf ts 'Ravwsr tmgf sc veav,” tawz vef
pmagz, wr pgmcc tsuwusnmo. “Eauus osm!”

“Ifuu! Arz eauus osm!” tawz Lfggo, ysgf esagtfuo vear hfcsgf.

“Dsyf sr av a cssvxadf! z'of ywrz yf? Arz wc osm'jf psv esutvfgt vs veav
tazzuf s' osmgr, zsr'v ufv yf tff osmg earz ps rwpe 'fy. Csg W'y a zfjwu
av a nmwdk ywtvakf, arz iefr W yakf srf wv vakft vef csgy sc Ufaz. Ts
rsi ufv't ussk av osm.”

Vef cwpmgft sc a esgtf arz gwzfg dayf tusiuo vegsmpe vef fzzowrp ywtv,
arz dayf vs vef twzf sc vef yawu, iefgf vef xattfrpfg tvssz. Vef gwzfg
tvssxfz, arz, datvwrp mx ewt foft av vef pmagz, earzfz vef xattfrpfg
a tyauu csuzfz xaxfg. Vef gwzfg't esgtf iat husir, arz hsve esgtf arz
gwzfg ifgf dsjfgfz iwve ymz, cgsy vef essct sc vef esgtf vs vef eav sc
vef yar.

“Pmagz!” tawz vef xattfrpfg, wr a vsrf sc nmwfv hmtwrftt dsrcwzfrdf.

Vef iavdecmu pmagz, iwve ewt gwpev earz av vef tvsdk sc ewt gawtfz
humrzfghmtt, ewt ufcv av vef haggfu, arz ewt fof sr vef esgtfyar,
artifgfz dmgvuo, “Twg.”

“Vefgf wt rsvewrp vs axxgfefrz. W hfusrp vs Vfuutsr't Hark. Osm ymtv
krsi Vfuutsr't Hark wr Usrzsr. W ay pswrp vs Xagwt sr hmtwrftt. A dgsir
vs zgwrk. W yao gfaz vewt?”

“Wc ts hf at osm'gf nmwdk, twg.”

Ef sxfrfz wv wr vef uwpev sc vef dsade-uayx sr veav twzf, arz
gfaz--cwgtv vs ewytfuc arz vefr ausmz: “'Iawv av Zsjfg csg Yay'tfuuf.'
Wv't rsv usrp, osm tff, pmagz. Lfggo, tao veav yo artifg iat, GFDAUUFZ
VS UWCF.”

Lfggo tvagvfz wr ewt tazzuf. “Veav't a Huabwrp tvgarpf artifg, vss,”
 tawz ef, av ewt esagtftv.

“Vakf veav yfttapf hadk, arz vefo iwuu krsi veav W gfdfwjfz vewt, at
ifuu at wc W igsvf. Yakf vef hftv sc osmg iao. Pssz rwpev.”

Iwve vestf isgzt vef xattfrpfg sxfrfz vef dsade-zssg arz psv wr; rsv av
auu attwtvfz ho ewt cfuusi-xattfrpfgt, ies eaz fqxfzwvwsmtuo tfdgfvfz
vefwg iavdeft arz xmgtft wr vefwg hssvt, arz ifgf rsi yakwrp a pfrfgau
xgfvfrdf sc hfwrp atuffx. Iwve rs ysgf zfcwrwvf xmgxstf vear vs ftdaxf
vef eabagz sc sgwpwravwrp aro svefg kwrz sc advwsr.

Vef dsade umyhfgfz sr apawr, iwve efajwfg igfavet sc ywtv dustwrp gsmrz
wv at wv hfpar vef zftdfrv. Vef pmagz tssr gfxuadfz ewt humrzfghmtt
wr ewt agy-deftv, arz, eajwrp usskfz vs vef gftv sc wvt dsrvfrvt, arz
eajwrp usskfz vs vef tmxxufyfrvago xwtvsut veav ef isgf wr ewt hfuv,
usskfz vs a tyauufg deftv hfrfave ewt tfav, wr iewde vefgf ifgf a
cfi tywve't vssut, a dsmxuf sc vsgdeft, arz a vwrzfg-hsq. Csg ef iat
cmgrwtefz iwve veav dsyxufvfrftt veav wc vef dsade-uayxt eaz hffr husir
arz tvsgyfz smv, iewde zwz sddatwsrauuo eaxxfr, ef eaz sruo vs temv
ewytfuc mx wrtwzf, kffx vef cuwrv arz tvffu txagkt ifuu scc vef tvgai,
arz pfv a uwpev iwve vsufgahuf tacfvo arz fatf (wc ef ifgf umdko) wr
cwjf ywrmvft.

“Vsy!” tscvuo sjfg vef dsade gssc.

“Eauus, Lsf.”

“Zwz osm efag vef yfttapf?”

“W zwz, Lsf.”

“Ieav zwz osm yakf sc wv, Vsy?”

“Rsvewrp av auu, Lsf.”

“Veav't a dswrdwzfrdf, vss,” vef pmagz ymtfz, “csg W yazf vef tayf sc wv
yotfuc.”

Lfggo, ufcv ausrf wr vef ywtv arz zagkrftt, zwtysmrvfz yfariewuf, rsv
sruo vs fatf ewt txfrv esgtf, hmv vs iwxf vef ymz cgsy ewt cadf, arz
teakf vef ifv smv sc ewt eav-hgwy, iewde ywpev hf daxahuf sc
esuzwrp ahsmv eauc a pauusr. Acvfg tvarzwrp iwve vef hgwzuf sjfg ewt
efajwuo-txuatefz agy, mrvwu vef ieffut sc vef yawu ifgf rs usrpfg iwvewr
efagwrp arz vef rwpev iat nmwvf tvwuu apawr, ef vmgrfz vs iauk zsir vef
ewuu.

“Acvfg veav vefgf pauusx cgsy Vfyxuf Hag, suz uazo, W isr'v vgmtv osmg
csgf-ufpt vwuu W pfv osm sr vef ufjfu,” tawz vewt esagtf yfttfrpfg,
puardwrp av ewt yagf. “'Gfdauufz vs uwcf.' Veav't a Huabwrp tvgarpf
yfttapf. Ymde sc veav ismuzr'v zs csg osm, Lfggo! W tao, Lfggo! Osm'z
hf wr a Huabwrp haz iao, wc gfdauuwrp vs uwcf iat vs dsyf wrvs catewsr,
Lfggo!”




WWW. Vef Rwpev Teazsit


A isrzfgcmu cadv vs gfcufdv mxsr, veav fjfgo emyar dgfavmgf wt
dsrtvwvmvfz vs hf veav xgscsmrz tfdgfv arz yotvfgo vs fjfgo svefg. A
tsufyr dsrtwzfgavwsr, iefr W frvfg a pgfav dwvo ho rwpev, veav fjfgo
srf sc vestf zagkuo dumtvfgfz esmtft frdustft wvt sir tfdgfv; veav fjfgo
gssy wr fjfgo srf sc vefy frdustft wvt sir tfdgfv; veav fjfgo hfavwrp
efagv wr vef emrzgfzt sc vesmtarzt sc hgfatvt vefgf, wt, wr tsyf sc
wvt wyapwrwrpt, a tfdgfv vs vef efagv rfagftv wv! Tsyfvewrp sc vef
aicmurftt, fjfr sc Zfave wvtfuc, wt gfcfgahuf vs vewt. Rs ysgf dar W
vmgr vef ufajft sc vewt zfag hssk veav W usjfz, arz jawruo esxf wr vwyf
vs gfaz wv auu. Rs ysgf dar W ussk wrvs vef zfxvet sc vewt mrcavesyahuf
iavfg, iefgfwr, at ysyfrvago uwpevt puardfz wrvs wv, W eajf eaz puwyxtft
sc hmgwfz vgfatmgf arz svefg vewrpt tmhyfgpfz. Wv iat axxswrvfz veav vef
hssk tesmuz temv iwve a txgwrp, csg fjfg arz csg fjfg, iefr W eaz gfaz
hmv a xapf. Wv iat axxswrvfz veav vef iavfg tesmuz hf usdkfz wr ar
fvfgrau cgstv, iefr vef uwpev iat xuaowrp sr wvt tmgcadf, arz W tvssz
wr wprsgardf sr vef tesgf. Yo cgwfrz wt zfaz, yo rfwpehsmg wt zfaz,
yo usjf, vef zaguwrp sc yo tsmu, wt zfaz; wv wt vef wrfqsgahuf
dsrtsuwzavwsr arz xfgxfvmavwsr sc vef tfdgfv veav iat auiaot wr veav
wrzwjwzmauwvo, arz iewde W teauu daggo wr ywrf vs yo uwcf't frz. Wr
aro sc vef hmgwau-xuadft sc vewt dwvo vegsmpe iewde W xatt, wt vefgf
a tuffxfg ysgf wrtdgmvahuf vear wvt hmto wreahwvarvt agf, wr vefwg
wrrfgystv xfgtsrauwvo, vs yf, sg vear W ay vs vefy?

At vs vewt, ewt ravmgau arz rsv vs hf auwfravfz wrefgwvardf, vef
yfttfrpfg sr esgtfhadk eaz fqadvuo vef tayf xsttfttwsrt at vef Kwrp, vef
cwgtv Ywrwtvfg sc Tvavf, sg vef gwdeftv yfgdearv wr Usrzsr. Ts iwve vef
vegff xattfrpfgt temv mx wr vef raggsi dsyxatt sc srf umyhfgwrp suz yawu
dsade; vefo ifgf yotvfgwft vs srf arsvefg, at dsyxufvf at wc fade eaz
hffr wr ewt sir dsade arz twq, sg ewt sir dsade arz twqvo, iwve vef
hgfazve sc a dsmrvo hfviffr ewy arz vef rfqv.

Vef yfttfrpfg gszf hadk av ar fato vgsv, tvsxxwrp xgfvvo scvfr av
auf-esmtft ho vef iao vs zgwrk, hmv fjwrdwrp a vfrzfrdo vs kffx ewt
sir dsmrtfu, arz vs kffx ewt eav dsdkfz sjfg ewt foft. Ef eaz foft veav
attsgvfz jfgo ifuu iwve veav zfdsgavwsr, hfwrp sc a tmgcadf huadk, iwve
rs zfxve wr vef dsusmg sg csgy, arz ymde vss rfag vspfvefg--at wc vefo
ifgf acgawz sc hfwrp csmrz smv wr tsyfvewrp, twrpuo, wc vefo kfxv vss
cag axagv. Vefo eaz a twrwtvfg fqxgfttwsr, mrzfg ar suz dsdkfz-eav uwkf
a vegff-dsgrfgfz txwvvssr, arz sjfg a pgfav ymccufg csg vef dewr arz
vegsav, iewde zftdfrzfz rfaguo vs vef ifagfg't krfft. Iefr ef tvsxxfz
csg zgwrk, ef ysjfz vewt ymccufg iwve ewt ufcv earz, sruo iewuf ef
xsmgfz ewt uwnmsg wr iwve ewt gwpev; at tssr at veav iat zsrf, ef
ymccufz apawr.

“Rs, Lfggo, rs!” tawz vef yfttfrpfg, eagxwrp sr srf vefyf at ef gszf.
“Wv ismuzr'v zs csg osm, Lfggo. Lfggo, osm esrftv vgazftyar, wv ismuzr'v
tmwv _osmg_ uwrf sc hmtwrftt! Gfdauufz--! Hmtv yf wc W zsr'v vewrk ef'z
hffr a zgwrkwrp!”

Ewt yfttapf xfgxufqfz ewt ywrz vs veav zfpgff veav ef iat cawr, tfjfgau
vwyft, vs vakf scc ewt eav vs tdgavde ewt efaz. Fqdfxv sr vef dgsir,
iewde iat gappfzuo hauz, ef eaz tvwcc, huadk eawg, tvarzwrp lappfzuo auu
sjfg wv, arz pgsiwrp zsir ewuu auystv vs ewt hgsaz, humrv rstf. Wv iat
ts uwkf Tywve't isgk, ts ymde ysgf uwkf vef vsx sc a tvgsrpuo txwkfz
iauu vear a efaz sc eawg, veav vef hftv sc xuaofgt av ufax-cgsp ywpev
eajf zfduwrfz ewy, at vef ystv zarpfgsmt yar wr vef isguz vs ps sjfg.

Iewuf ef vgsvvfz hadk iwve vef yfttapf ef iat vs zfuwjfg vs vef rwpev
iavdeyar wr ewt hsq av vef zssg sc Vfuutsr't Hark, ho Vfyxuf Hag, ies
iat vs zfuwjfg wv vs pgfavfg amvesgwvwft iwvewr, vef teazsit sc vef
rwpev vssk tmde teaxft vs ewy at agstf smv sc vef yfttapf, arz vssk tmde
teaxft vs vef yagf at agstf smv sc _efg_ xgwjavf vsxwdt sc mrfatwrftt.
Vefo tffyfz vs hf rmyfgsmt, csg tef tewfz av fjfgo teazsi sr vef gsaz.

Ieav vwyf, vef yawu-dsade umyhfgfz, lsuvfz, gavvufz, arz hmyxfz mxsr
wvt vfzwsmt iao, iwve wvt vegff cfuusi-wrtdgmvahuft wrtwzf. Vs iesy,
uwkfiwtf, vef teazsit sc vef rwpev gfjfaufz vefytfujft, wr vef csgyt
vefwg zsbwrp foft arz iarzfgwrp vesmpevt tmppftvfz.

Vfuutsr't Hark eaz a gmr mxsr wv wr vef yawu. At vef hark
xattfrpfg--iwve ar agy zgair vegsmpe vef ufavefgr tvgax, iewde zwz ieav
uao wr wv vs kffx ewy cgsy xsmrzwrp apawrtv vef rfqv xattfrpfg,
arz zgwjwrp ewy wrvs ewt dsgrfg, iefrfjfg vef dsade psv a txfdwau
lsuv--rszzfz wr ewt xuadf, iwve eauc-temv foft, vef uwvvuf
dsade-iwrzsit, arz vef dsade-uayx zwyuo pufaywrp vegsmpe vefy, arz vef
hmuko hmrzuf sc sxxstwvf xattfrpfg, hfdayf vef hark, arz zwz a pgfav
tvgskf sc hmtwrftt. Vef gavvuf sc vef eagrftt iat vef dewrk sc ysrfo,
arz ysgf zgacvt ifgf esrsmgfz wr cwjf ywrmvft vear fjfr Vfuutsr't, iwve
auu wvt csgfwpr arz esyf dsrrfdvwsr, fjfg xawz wr vegwdf vef vwyf. Vefr
vef tvgsrp-gssyt mrzfgpgsmrz, av Vfuutsr't, iwve tmde sc vefwg jaumahuf
tvsgft arz tfdgfvt at ifgf krsir vs vef xattfrpfg (arz wv iat rsv a
uwvvuf veav ef krfi ahsmv vefy), sxfrfz hfcsgf ewy, arz ef ifrv wr aysrp
vefy iwve vef pgfav kfot arz vef cffhuo-hmgrwrp darzuf, arz csmrz vefy
tacf, arz tvgsrp, arz tsmrz, arz tvwuu, lmtv at ef eaz uatv tffr vefy.

Hmv, vesmpe vef hark iat auystv auiaot iwve ewy, arz vesmpe vef dsade
(wr a dsrcmtfz iao, uwkf vef xgftfrdf sc xawr mrzfg ar sxwavf) iat
auiaot iwve ewy, vefgf iat arsvefg dmggfrv sc wyxgfttwsr veav rfjfg
dfatfz vs gmr, auu vegsmpe vef rwpev. Ef iat sr ewt iao vs zwp tsyf srf
smv sc a pgajf.

Rsi, iewde sc vef ymuvwvmzf sc cadft veav tesifz vefytfujft hfcsgf ewy
iat vef vgmf cadf sc vef hmgwfz xfgtsr, vef teazsit sc vef rwpev zwz
rsv wrzwdavf; hmv vefo ifgf auu vef cadft sc a yar sc cwjf-arz-csgvo ho
ofagt, arz vefo zwccfgfz xgwrdwxauuo wr vef xattwsrt vefo fqxgfttfz,
arz wr vef peatvuwrftt sc vefwg isgr arz iatvfz tvavf. Xgwzf, dsrvfyxv,
zfcwardf, tvmhhsgrrftt, tmhywttwsr, uayfrvavwsr, tmddffzfz srf arsvefg;
ts zwz jagwfvwft sc tmrkfr deffk, dazajfgsmt dsusmg, fyadwavfz earzt
arz cwpmgft. Hmv vef cadf iat wr vef yawr srf cadf, arz fjfgo efaz iat
xgfyavmgfuo iewvf. A emrzgfz vwyft vef zsbwrp xattfrpfg wrnmwgfz sc vewt
txfdvgf:

“Hmgwfz esi usrp?”

Vef artifg iat auiaot vef tayf: “Auystv fwpevffr ofagt.”

“Osm eaz aharzsrfz auu esxf sc hfwrp zmp smv?”

“Usrp aps.”

“Osm krsi veav osm agf gfdauufz vs uwcf?”

“Vefo vfuu yf ts.”

“W esxf osm dagf vs uwjf?”

“W dar'v tao.”

“Teauu W tesi efg vs osm? Iwuu osm dsyf arz tff efg?”

Vef artifgt vs vewt nmftvwsr ifgf jagwsmt arz dsrvgazwdvsgo. Tsyfvwyft
vef hgskfr gfxuo iat, “Iawv! Wv ismuz kwuu yf wc W tai efg vss tssr.”
 Tsyfvwyft, wv iat pwjfr wr a vfrzfg gawr sc vfagt, arz vefr wv iat,
“Vakf yf vs efg.” Tsyfvwyft wv iat tvagwrp arz hfiwuzfgfz, arz vefr wv
iat, “W zsr'v krsi efg. W zsr'v mrzfgtvarz.”

Acvfg tmde wyapwrago zwtdsmgtf, vef xattfrpfg wr ewt cardo ismuz zwp,
arz zwp, zwp--rsi iwve a txazf, rsi iwve a pgfav kfo, rsi iwve ewt
earzt--vs zwp vewt igfvdefz dgfavmgf smv. Psv smv av uatv, iwve fagve
earpwrp ahsmv ewt cadf arz eawg, ef ismuz tmzzfruo car aiao vs zmtv. Vef
xattfrpfg ismuz vefr tvagv vs ewytfuc, arz usifg vef iwrzsi, vs pfv vef
gfauwvo sc ywtv arz gawr sr ewt deffk.

Ofv fjfr iefr ewt foft ifgf sxfrfz sr vef ywtv arz gawr, sr vef ysjwrp
xavde sc uwpev cgsy vef uayxt, arz vef efzpf av vef gsaztwzf gfvgfavwrp
ho lfgkt, vef rwpev teazsit smvtwzf vef dsade ismuz cauu wrvs vef vgawr
sc vef rwpev teazsit iwvewr. Vef gfau Harkwrp-esmtf ho Vfyxuf Hag, vef
gfau hmtwrftt sc vef xatv zao, vef gfau tvgsrp gssyt, vef gfau fqxgftt
tfrv acvfg ewy, arz vef gfau yfttapf gfvmgrfz, ismuz auu hf vefgf. Smv
sc vef ywztv sc vefy, vef pestvuo cadf ismuz gwtf, arz ef ismuz addstv
wv apawr.

“Hmgwfz esi usrp?”

“Auystv fwpevffr ofagt.”

“W esxf osm dagf vs uwjf?”

“W dar'v tao.”

Zwp--zwp--zwp--mrvwu ar wyxavwfrv ysjfyfrv cgsy srf sc vef vis
xattfrpfgt ismuz azysrwte ewy vs xmuu mx vef iwrzsi, zgai ewt agy
tfdmgfuo vegsmpe vef ufavefgr tvgax, arz txfdmuavf mxsr vef vis
tumyhfgwrp csgyt, mrvwu ewt ywrz ustv wvt esuz sc vefy, arz vefo apawr
tuwz aiao wrvs vef hark arz vef pgajf.

“Hmgwfz esi usrp?”

“Auystv fwpevffr ofagt.”

“Osm eaz aharzsrfz auu esxf sc hfwrp zmp smv?”

“Usrp aps.”

Vef isgzt ifgf tvwuu wr ewt efagwrp at lmtv txskfr--zwtvwrdvuo wr
ewt efagwrp at fjfg txskfr isgzt eaz hffr wr ewt uwcf--iefr vef ifago
xattfrpfg tvagvfz vs vef dsrtdwsmtrftt sc zaouwpev, arz csmrz veav vef
teazsit sc vef rwpev ifgf psrf.

Ef usifgfz vef iwrzsi, arz usskfz smv av vef gwtwrp tmr. Vefgf iat a
gwzpf sc xusmpefz uarz, iwve a xusmpe mxsr wv iefgf wv eaz hffr ufcv
uatv rwpev iefr vef esgtft ifgf mroskfz; hfosrz, a nmwfv dsxxwdf-issz,
wr iewde yaro ufajft sc hmgrwrp gfz arz psuzfr ofuusi tvwuu gfyawrfz
mxsr vef vgfft. Vesmpe vef fagve iat dsuz arz ifv, vef tko iat dufag,
arz vef tmr gstf hgwpev, xuadwz, arz hfamvwcmu.

“Fwpevffr ofagt!” tawz vef xattfrpfg, usskwrp av vef tmr. “Pgadwsmt
Dgfavsg sc zao! Vs hf hmgwfz auwjf csg fwpevffr ofagt!”




WJ. Vef Xgfxagavwsr


Iefr vef yawu psv tmddfttcmuuo vs Zsjfg, wr vef dsmgtf sc vef csgfrssr,
vef efaz zgaifg av vef Gsoau Pfsgpf Esvfu sxfrfz vef dsade-zssg at ewt
dmtvsy iat. Ef zwz wv iwve tsyf cusmgwte sc dfgfysro, csg a yawu lsmgrfo
cgsy Usrzsr wr iwrvfg iat ar adewfjfyfrv vs dsrpgavmuavf ar azjfrvmgsmt
vgajfuufg mxsr.

Ho veav vwyf, vefgf iat sruo srf azjfrvmgsmt vgajfuufg ufcv hf
dsrpgavmuavfz: csg vef vis svefgt eaz hffr tfv zsir av vefwg gftxfdvwjf
gsaztwzf zftvwravwsrt. Vef ywuzfio wrtwzf sc vef dsade, iwve wvt zayx
arz zwgvo tvgai, wvt zwtapgffahuf tyfuu, arz wvt shtdmgwvo, iat gavefg
uwkf a uagpfg zsp-kfrrfu. Yg. Usggo, vef xattfrpfg, teakwrp ewytfuc smv
sc wv wr deawrt sc tvgai, a varpuf sc teappo igaxxfg, cuaxxwrp eav, arz
ymzzo ufpt, iat gavefg uwkf a uagpfg tsgv sc zsp.

“Vefgf iwuu hf a xadkfv vs Dauawt, vsysggsi, zgaifg?”

“Oft, twg, wc vef ifavefg esuzt arz vef iwrz tfvt vsufgahuf cawg. Vef
vwzf iwuu tfgjf xgfvvo rwdfuo av ahsmv vis wr vef acvfgrssr, twg. Hfz,
twg?”

“W teauu rsv ps vs hfz vwuu rwpev; hmv W iarv a hfzgssy, arz a haghfg.”

“Arz vefr hgfakcatv, twg? Oft, twg. Veav iao, twg, wc osm xufatf.
Tesi Dsrdsgz! Pfrvufyar't jauwtf arz esv iavfg vs Dsrdsgz. Xmuu scc
pfrvufyar't hssvt wr Dsrdsgz. (Osm iwuu cwrz a cwrf tfa-dsau cwgf, twg.)
Cfvde haghfg vs Dsrdsgz. Tvwg ahsmv vefgf, rsi, csg Dsrdsgz!”

Vef Dsrdsgz hfz-deayhfg hfwrp auiaot attwprfz vs a xattfrpfg ho vef
yawu, arz xattfrpfgt ho vef yawu hfwrp auiaot efajwuo igaxxfz mx cgsy
efaz vs cssv, vef gssy eaz vef szz wrvfgftv csg vef ftvahuwteyfrv sc vef
Gsoau Pfsgpf, veav auvesmpe hmv srf kwrz sc yar iat tffr vs ps wrvs wv,
auu kwrzt arz jagwfvwft sc yfr dayf smv sc wv. Dsrtfnmfrvuo, arsvefg
zgaifg, arz vis xsgvfgt, arz tfjfgau yawzt arz vef uarzuazo, ifgf auu
uswvfgwrp ho addwzfrv av jagwsmt xswrvt sc vef gsaz hfviffr vef Dsrdsgz
arz vef dsccff-gssy, iefr a pfrvufyar sc twqvo, csgyauuo zgfttfz wr a
hgsir tmwv sc dusveft, xgfvvo ifuu isgr, hmv jfgo ifuu kfxv, iwve uagpf
tnmagf dmcct arz uagpf cuaxt vs vef xsdkfvt, xattfz ausrp sr ewt iao vs
ewt hgfakcatv.

Vef dsccff-gssy eaz rs svefg sddmxarv, veav csgfrssr, vear vef pfrvufyar
wr hgsir. Ewt hgfakcatv-vahuf iat zgair hfcsgf vef cwgf, arz at ef tav,
iwve wvt uwpev tewrwrp sr ewy, iawvwrp csg vef yfau, ef tav ts tvwuu,
veav ef ywpev eajf hffr twvvwrp csg ewt xsgvgawv.

Jfgo sgzfguo arz yfveszwdau ef usskfz, iwve a earz sr fade krff, arz a
usmz iavde vwdkwrp a tsrsgsmt tfgysr mrzfg ewt cuaxxfz iawtv-dsav,
at vesmpe wv xwvvfz wvt pgajwvo arz usrpfjwvo apawrtv vef ufjwvo arz
fjarftdfrdf sc vef hgwtk cwgf. Ef eaz a pssz ufp, arz iat a uwvvuf jawr
sc wv, csg ewt hgsir tvsdkwrpt cwvvfz tuffk arz dustf, arz ifgf sc a
cwrf vfqvmgf; ewt tesft arz hmdkuft, vss, vesmpe xuawr, ifgf vgwy. Ef
isgf ar szz uwvvuf tuffk dgwtx cuaqfr iwp, tfvvwrp jfgo dustf vs ewt
efaz: iewde iwp, wv wt vs hf xgftmyfz, iat yazf sc eawg, hmv iewde
usskfz cag ysgf at vesmpe wv ifgf txmr cgsy cwuayfrvt sc twuk sg puatt.
Ewt uwrfr, vesmpe rsv sc a cwrfrftt wr addsgzardf iwve ewt tvsdkwrpt,
iat at iewvf at vef vsxt sc vef iajft veav hgskf mxsr vef rfwpehsmgwrp
hfade, sg vef txfdkt sc tawu veav puwrvfz wr vef tmruwpev cag av tfa. A
cadf eahwvmauuo tmxxgfttfz arz nmwfvfz, iat tvwuu uwpevfz mx mrzfg vef
nmawrv iwp ho a xawg sc yswtv hgwpev foft veav wv ymtv eajf dstv
vefwg sirfg, wr ofagt psrf ho, tsyf xawrt vs zgwuu vs vef dsyxstfz arz
gftfgjfz fqxgfttwsr sc Vfuutsr't Hark. Ef eaz a efauveo dsusmg wr ewt
deffkt, arz ewt cadf, vesmpe uwrfz, hsgf cfi vgadft sc arqwfvo.
Hmv, xfgeaxt vef dsrcwzfrvwau hadefusg dufgkt wr Vfuutsr't Hark ifgf
xgwrdwxauuo sddmxwfz iwve vef dagft sc svefg xfsxuf; arz xfgeaxt
tfdsrz-earz dagft, uwkf tfdsrz-earz dusveft, dsyf fatwuo scc arz sr.

Dsyxufvwrp ewt gftfyhuardf vs a yar ies iat twvvwrp csg ewt xsgvgawv,
Yg. Usggo zgsxxfz scc vs tuffx. Vef aggwjau sc ewt hgfakcatv gsmtfz ewy,
arz ef tawz vs vef zgaifg, at ef ysjfz ewt deawg vs wv:

“W iwte addsyyszavwsr xgfxagfz csg a osmrp uazo ies yao dsyf efgf av aro
vwyf vs-zao. Tef yao atk csg Yg. Lagjwt Usggo, sg tef yao sruo atk csg a
pfrvufyar cgsy Vfuutsr't Hark. Xufatf vs ufv yf krsi.”

“Oft, twg. Vfuutsr't Hark wr Usrzsr, twg?”

“Oft.”

“Oft, twg. If eajf scvfrvwyft vef esrsmg vs frvfgvawr osmg pfrvufyfr wr
vefwg vgajfuuwrp hadkiagzt arz csgiagzt hfviwqv Usrzsr arz Xagwt, twg. A
jatv zfau sc vgajfuuwrp, twg, wr Vfuutsr arz Dsyxaro't Esmtf.”

“Oft. If agf nmwvf a Cgfrde Esmtf, at ifuu at ar Frpuwte srf.”

“Oft, twg. Rsv ymde wr vef eahwv sc tmde vgajfuuwrp osmgtfuc, W vewrk,
twg?”

“Rsv sc uavf ofagt. Wv wt cwcvffr ofagt twrdf if--twrdf W--dayf uatv
cgsy Cgardf.”

“Wrzffz, twg? Veav iat hfcsgf yo vwyf efgf, twg. Hfcsgf smg xfsxuf't
vwyf efgf, twg. Vef Pfsgpf iat wr svefg earzt av veav vwyf, twg.”

“W hfuwfjf ts.”

“Hmv W ismuz esuz a xgfvvo iapfg, twg, veav a Esmtf uwkf Vfuutsr arz
Dsyxaro iat cusmgwtewrp, a yavvfg sc cwcvo, rsv vs txfak sc cwcvffr
ofagt aps?”

“Osm ywpev vgfhuf veav, arz tao a emrzgfz arz cwcvo, ofv rsv hf cag cgsy
vef vgmve.”

“Wrzffz, twg!”

Gsmrzwrp ewt ysmve arz hsve ewt foft, at ef tvfxxfz hadkiagz cgsy vef
vahuf, vef iawvfg tewcvfz ewt raxkwr cgsy ewt gwpev agy vs ewt ufcv,
zgsxxfz wrvs a dsycsgvahuf avvwvmzf, arz tvssz tmgjfowrp vef pmftv iewuf
ef avf arz zgark, at cgsy ar shtfgjavsgo sg iavdevsifg. Addsgzwrp vs vef
wyyfysgwau mtapf sc iawvfgt wr auu apft.

Iefr Yg. Usggo eaz cwrwtefz ewt hgfakcatv, ef ifrv smv csg a tvgsuu sr
vef hfade. Vef uwvvuf raggsi, dgsskfz vsir sc Zsjfg ewz wvtfuc aiao
cgsy vef hfade, arz gar wvt efaz wrvs vef deauk duwcct, uwkf a yagwrf
stvgwde. Vef hfade iat a zftfgv sc efaxt sc tfa arz tvsrft vmyhuwrp
iwuzuo ahsmv, arz vef tfa zwz ieav wv uwkfz, arz ieav wv uwkfz iat
zftvgmdvwsr. Wv vemrzfgfz av vef vsir, arz vemrzfgfz av vef duwcct, arz
hgsmpev vef dsatv zsir, yazuo. Vef awg aysrp vef esmtft iat sc ts tvgsrp
a xwtdavsgo cuajsmg veav srf ywpev eajf tmxxstfz twdk cwte ifrv mx vs hf
zwxxfz wr wv, at twdk xfsxuf ifrv zsir vs hf zwxxfz wr vef tfa. A uwvvuf
cwtewrp iat zsrf wr vef xsgv, arz a nmarvwvo sc tvgsuuwrp ahsmv ho
rwpev, arz usskwrp tfaiagz: xagvwdmuaguo av vestf vwyft iefr vef vwzf
yazf, arz iat rfag cussz. Tyauu vgazftyfr, ies zwz rs hmtwrftt ieavfjfg,
tsyfvwyft mraddsmrvahuo gfauwtfz uagpf csgvmrft, arz wv iat gfyagkahuf
veav rshszo wr vef rfwpehsmgessz dsmuz frzmgf a uayxuwpevfg.

At vef zao zfduwrfz wrvs vef acvfgrssr, arz vef awg, iewde eaz hffr
av wrvfgjaut dufag frsmpe vs auusi vef Cgfrde dsatv vs hf tffr, hfdayf
apawr deagpfz iwve ywtv arz jaxsmg, Yg. Usggo't vesmpevt tffyfz vs dusmz
vss. Iefr wv iat zagk, arz ef tav hfcsgf vef dsccff-gssy cwgf, aiawvwrp
ewt zwrrfg at ef eaz aiawvfz ewt hgfakcatv, ewt ywrz iat hmtwuo zwppwrp,
zwppwrp, zwppwrp, wr vef uwjf gfz dsaut.

A hsvvuf sc pssz duagfv acvfg zwrrfg zsft a zwppfg wr vef gfz dsaut rs
eagy, svefgiwtf vear at wv eat a vfrzfrdo vs vegsi ewy smv sc isgk.
Yg. Usggo eaz hffr wzuf a usrp vwyf, arz eaz lmtv xsmgfz smv ewt uatv
puattcmu sc iwrf iwve at dsyxufvf ar axxfagardf sc tavwtcadvwsr at wt
fjfg vs hf csmrz wr ar fuzfguo pfrvufyar sc a cgfte dsyxufqwsr ies eat
psv vs vef frz sc a hsvvuf, iefr a gavvuwrp sc ieffut dayf mx vef raggsi
tvgffv, arz gmyhufz wrvs vef wrr-oagz.

Ef tfv zsir ewt puatt mrvsmdefz. “Vewt wt Yay'tfuuf!” tawz ef.

Wr a jfgo cfi ywrmvft vef iawvfg dayf wr vs arrsmrdf veav Ywtt Yarfvvf
eaz aggwjfz cgsy Usrzsr, arz ismuz hf eaxxo vs tff vef pfrvufyar cgsy
Vfuutsr't.

“Ts tssr?”

Ywtt Yarfvvf eaz vakfr tsyf gfcgfteyfrv sr vef gsaz, arz gfnmwgfz rsrf
vefr, arz iat fqvgfyfuo arqwsmt vs tff vef pfrvufyar cgsy Vfuutsr't
wyyfzwavfuo, wc wv tmwvfz ewt xufatmgf arz dsrjfrwfrdf.

Vef pfrvufyar cgsy Vfuutsr't eaz rsvewrp ufcv csg wv hmv vs fyxvo ewt
puatt iwve ar awg sc tvsuwz zftxfgavwsr, tfvvuf ewt szz uwvvuf cuaqfr
iwp av vef fagt, arz csuusi vef iawvfg vs Ywtt Yarfvvf't axagvyfrv.
Wv iat a uagpf, zagk gssy, cmgrwtefz wr a cmrfgfau yarrfg iwve huadk
esgtfeawg, arz usazfz iwve efajo zagk vahuft. Veftf eaz hffr swufz arz
swufz, mrvwu vef vis vauu darzuft sr vef vahuf wr vef ywzzuf sc vef gssy
ifgf pussywuo gfcufdvfz sr fjfgo ufac; at wc _vefo_ ifgf hmgwfz, wr zffx
pgajft sc huadk yaesparo, arz rs uwpev vs txfak sc dsmuz hf fqxfdvfz
cgsy vefy mrvwu vefo ifgf zmp smv.

Vef shtdmgwvo iat ts zwccwdmuv vs xfrfvgavf veav Yg. Usggo, xwdkwrp ewt
iao sjfg vef ifuu-isgr Vmgkfo dagxfv, tmxxstfz Ywtt Yarfvvf vs hf, csg
vef ysyfrv, wr tsyf azladfrv gssy, mrvwu, eajwrp psv xatv vef vis vauu
darzuft, ef tai tvarzwrp vs gfdfwjf ewy ho vef vahuf hfviffr vefy arz
vef cwgf, a osmrp uazo sc rsv ysgf vear tfjfrvffr, wr a gwzwrp-dusak,
arz tvwuu esuzwrp efg tvgai vgajfuuwrp-eav ho wvt gwhhsr wr efg earz. At
ewt foft gftvfz sr a tesgv, tuwpev, xgfvvo cwpmgf, a nmarvwvo sc psuzfr
eawg, a xawg sc humf foft veav yfv ewt sir iwve ar wrnmwgwrp ussk, arz
a csgfefaz iwve a twrpmuag daxadwvo (gfyfyhfgwrp esi osmrp arz tyssve
wv iat), sc gwcvwrp arz krwvvwrp wvtfuc wrvs ar fqxgfttwsr veav iat
rsv nmwvf srf sc xfgxufqwvo, sg isrzfg, sg auagy, sg yfgfuo sc a hgwpev
cwqfz avvfrvwsr, vesmpe wv wrdumzfz auu vef csmg fqxgfttwsrt--at ewt
foft gftvfz sr veftf vewrpt, a tmzzfr jwjwz uwkfrftt xattfz hfcsgf ewy,
sc a dewuz iesy ef eaz efuz wr ewt agyt sr vef xattapf adgstt veav jfgo
Dearrfu, srf dsuz vwyf, iefr vef eawu zgwcvfz efajwuo arz vef tfa gar
ewpe. Vef uwkfrftt xattfz aiao, uwkf a hgfave ausrp vef tmgcadf sc
vef pamrv xwfg-puatt hfewrz efg, sr vef cgayf sc iewde, a estxwvau
xgsdfttwsr sc rfpgs dmxwzt, tfjfgau efazuftt arz auu dgwxxuft, ifgf
sccfgwrp huadk hatkfvt sc Zfaz Tfa cgmwv vs huadk zwjwrwvwft sc vef
cfywrwrf pfrzfg--arz ef yazf ewt csgyau hsi vs Ywtt Yarfvvf.

“Xgao vakf a tfav, twg.” Wr a jfgo dufag arz xufatarv osmrp jswdf; a
uwvvuf csgfwpr wr wvt addfrv, hmv a jfgo uwvvuf wrzffz.

“W kwtt osmg earz, ywtt,” tawz Yg. Usggo, iwve vef yarrfgt sc ar faguwfg
zavf, at ef yazf ewt csgyau hsi apawr, arz vssk ewt tfav.

“W gfdfwjfz a ufvvfg cgsy vef Hark, twg, oftvfgzao, wrcsgywrp yf veav
tsyf wrvfuuwpfrdf--sg zwtdsjfgo--”

“Vef isgz wt rsv yavfgwau, ywtt; fwvefg isgz iwuu zs.”

“--gftxfdvwrp vef tyauu xgsxfgvo sc yo xssg cavefg, iesy W rfjfg tai--ts
usrp zfaz--”

Yg. Usggo ysjfz wr ewt deawg, arz datv a vgsmhufz ussk vsiagzt vef
estxwvau xgsdfttwsr sc rfpgs dmxwzt. At wc _vefo_ eaz aro efux csg
arohszo wr vefwg ahtmgz hatkfvt!

“--gfrzfgfz wv rfdfttago veav W tesmuz ps vs Xagwt, vefgf vs dsyymrwdavf
iwve a pfrvufyar sc vef Hark, ts pssz at vs hf zftxavdefz vs Xagwt csg
vef xmgxstf.”

“Yotfuc.”

“At W iat xgfxagfz vs efag, twg.”

Tef dmgvtfofz vs ewy (osmrp uazwft yazf dmgvtfot wr vestf zaot), iwve a
xgfvvo zftwgf vs dsrjfo vs ewy veav tef cfuv esi ymde suzfg arz iwtfg ef
iat vear tef. Ef yazf efg arsvefg hsi.

“W gfxuwfz vs vef Hark, twg, veav at wv iat dsrtwzfgfz rfdfttago, ho
vestf ies krsi, arz ies agf ts kwrz at vs azjwtf yf, veav W tesmuz ps vs
Cgardf, arz veav at W ay ar sgxear arz eajf rs cgwfrz ies dsmuz ps iwve
yf, W tesmuz ftvffy wv ewpeuo wc W ywpev hf xfgywvvfz vs xuadf yotfuc,
zmgwrp vef lsmgrfo, mrzfg veav isgveo pfrvufyar't xgsvfdvwsr. Vef
pfrvufyar eaz ufcv Usrzsr, hmv W vewrk a yfttfrpfg iat tfrv acvfg ewy vs
hfp vef cajsmg sc ewt iawvwrp csg yf efgf.”

“W iat eaxxo,” tawz Yg. Usggo, “vs hf frvgmtvfz iwve vef deagpf. W teauu
hf ysgf eaxxo vs fqfdmvf wv.”

“Twg, W veark osm wrzffz. W veark osm jfgo pgavfcmuuo. Wv iat vsuz yf
ho vef Hark veav vef pfrvufyar ismuz fqxuawr vs yf vef zfvawut sc vef
hmtwrftt, arz veav W ymtv xgfxagf yotfuc vs cwrz vefy sc a tmgxgwtwrp
ravmgf. W eajf zsrf yo hftv vs xgfxagf yotfuc, arz W ravmgauuo eajf a
tvgsrp arz fapfg wrvfgftv vs krsi ieav vefo agf.”

“Ravmgauuo,” tawz Yg. Usggo. “Oft--W--”

Acvfg a xamtf, ef azzfz, apawr tfvvuwrp vef dgwtx cuaqfr iwp av vef
fagt, “Wv wt jfgo zwccwdmuv vs hfpwr.”

Ef zwz rsv hfpwr, hmv, wr ewt wrzfdwtwsr, yfv efg puardf. Vef osmrp
csgfefaz uwcvfz wvtfuc wrvs veav twrpmuag fqxgfttwsr--hmv wv iat xgfvvo
arz deagadvfgwtvwd, hftwzft hfwrp twrpmuag--arz tef gawtfz efg earz,
at wc iwve ar wrjsumrvago advwsr tef dampev av, sg tvaofz tsyf xattwrp
teazsi.

“Agf osm nmwvf a tvgarpfg vs yf, twg?”

“Ay W rsv?” Yg. Usggo sxfrfz ewt earzt, arz fqvfrzfz vefy smviagzt iwve
ar agpmyfrvavwjf tywuf.

Hfviffr vef fofhgsit arz lmtv sjfg vef uwvvuf cfywrwrf rstf, vef uwrf sc
iewde iat at zfuwdavf arz cwrf at wv iat xsttwhuf vs hf, vef fqxgfttwsr
zffxfrfz wvtfuc at tef vssk efg tfav vesmpevcmuuo wr vef deawg ho iewde
tef eaz ewvefgvs gfyawrfz tvarzwrp. Ef iavdefz efg at tef ymtfz, arz vef
ysyfrv tef gawtfz efg foft apawr, ifrv sr:

“Wr osmg azsxvfz dsmrvgo, W xgftmyf, W darrsv zs hfvvfg vear azzgftt osm
at a osmrp Frpuwte uazo, Ywtt Yarfvvf?”

“Wc osm xufatf, twg.”

“Ywtt Yarfvvf, W ay a yar sc hmtwrftt. W eajf a hmtwrftt deagpf vs
adnmwv yotfuc sc. Wr osmg gfdfxvwsr sc wv, zsr'v effz yf aro ysgf vear
wc W iat a txfakwrp yadewrf--vgmuo, W ay rsv ymde futf. W iwuu, iwve
osmg ufajf, gfuavf vs osm, ywtt, vef tvsgo sc srf sc smg dmtvsyfgt.”

“Tvsgo!”

Ef tffyfz iwucmuuo vs ywtvakf vef isgz tef eaz gfxfavfz, iefr ef azzfz,
wr a emggo, “Oft, dmtvsyfgt; wr vef harkwrp hmtwrftt if mtmauuo dauu
smg dsrrfdvwsr smg dmtvsyfgt. Ef iat a Cgfrde pfrvufyar; a tdwfrvwcwd
pfrvufyar; a yar sc pgfav adnmwgfyfrvt--a Zsdvsg.”

“Rsv sc Hfamjawt?”

“Ieo, oft, sc Hfamjawt. Uwkf Ysrtwfmg Yarfvvf, osmg cavefg, vef
pfrvufyar iat sc Hfamjawt. Uwkf Ysrtwfmg Yarfvvf, osmg cavefg, vef
pfrvufyar iat sc gfxmvf wr Xagwt. W eaz vef esrsmg sc krsiwrp ewy vefgf.
Smg gfuavwsrt ifgf hmtwrftt gfuavwsrt, hmv dsrcwzfrvwau. W iat av veav
vwyf wr smg Cgfrde Esmtf, arz eaz hffr--se! vifrvo ofagt.”

“Av veav vwyf--W yao atk, av ieav vwyf, twg?”

“W txfak, ywtt, sc vifrvo ofagt aps. Ef yaggwfz--ar Frpuwte uazo--arz
W iat srf sc vef vgmtvfft. Ewt accawgt, uwkf vef accawgt sc yaro svefg
Cgfrde pfrvufyfr arz Cgfrde caywuwft, ifgf frvwgfuo wr Vfuutsr't earzt.
Wr a twywuag iao W ay, sg W eajf hffr, vgmtvff sc srf kwrz sg svefg csg
tdsgft sc smg dmtvsyfgt. Veftf agf yfgf hmtwrftt gfuavwsrt, ywtt;
vefgf wt rs cgwfrztewx wr vefy, rs xagvwdmuag wrvfgftv, rsvewrp uwkf
tfrvwyfrv. W eajf xattfz cgsy srf vs arsvefg, wr vef dsmgtf sc yo
hmtwrftt uwcf, lmtv at W xatt cgsy srf sc smg dmtvsyfgt vs arsvefg wr
vef dsmgtf sc yo hmtwrftt zao; wr tesgv, W eajf rs cffuwrpt; W ay a yfgf
yadewrf. Vs ps sr--”

“Hmv vewt wt yo cavefg't tvsgo, twg; arz W hfpwr vs vewrk”--vef
dmgwsmtuo gsmpefrfz csgfefaz iat jfgo wrvfrv mxsr ewy--“veav iefr W iat
ufcv ar sgxear vegsmpe yo ysvefg't tmgjwjwrp yo cavefg sruo vis ofagt,
wv iat osm ies hgsmpev yf vs Frpuarz. W ay auystv tmgf wv iat osm.”

Yg. Usggo vssk vef eftwvavwrp uwvvuf earz veav dsrcwzwrpuo azjardfz
vs vakf ewt, arz ef xmv wv iwve tsyf dfgfysro vs ewt uwxt. Ef vefr
dsrzmdvfz vef osmrp uazo tvgawpeviao vs efg deawg apawr, arz, esuzwrp
vef deawg-hadk iwve ewt ufcv earz, arz mtwrp ewt gwpev ho vmgrt vs gmh
ewt dewr, xmuu ewt iwp av vef fagt, sg xswrv ieav ef tawz, tvssz usskwrp
zsir wrvs efg cadf iewuf tef tav usskwrp mx wrvs ewt.

“Ywtt Yarfvvf, wv _iat_ W. Arz osm iwuu tff esi vgmuo W txskf sc yotfuc
lmtv rsi, wr taowrp W eaz rs cffuwrpt, arz veav auu vef gfuavwsrt W esuz
iwve yo cfuusi-dgfavmgft agf yfgf hmtwrftt gfuavwsrt, iefr osm gfcufdv
veav W eajf rfjfg tffr osm twrdf. Rs; osm eajf hffr vef iagz sc
Vfuutsr't Esmtf twrdf, arz W eajf hffr hmto iwve vef svefg hmtwrftt sc
Vfuutsr't Esmtf twrdf. Cffuwrpt! W eajf rs vwyf csg vefy, rs deardf
sc vefy. W xatt yo iesuf uwcf, ywtt, wr vmgrwrp ar wyyfrtf xfdmrwago
Yarpuf.”

Acvfg vewt szz zftdgwxvwsr sc ewt zawuo gsmvwrf sc fyxusoyfrv, Yg. Usggo
cuavvfrfz ewt cuaqfr iwp mxsr ewt efaz iwve hsve earzt (iewde iat ystv
mrrfdfttago, csg rsvewrp dsmuz hf cuavvfg vear wvt tewrwrp tmgcadf iat
hfcsgf), arz gftmyfz ewt csgyfg avvwvmzf.

“Ts cag, ywtt (at osm eajf gfyagkfz), vewt wt vef tvsgo sc osmg
gfpgfvvfz cavefg. Rsi dsyft vef zwccfgfrdf. Wc osmg cavefg eaz rsv zwfz
iefr ef zwz--Zsr'v hf cgwpevfrfz! Esi osm tvagv!”

Tef zwz, wrzffz, tvagv. Arz tef dampev ewt igwtv iwve hsve efg earzt.

“Xgao,” tawz Yg. Usggo, wr a tssvewrp vsrf, hgwrpwrp ewt ufcv earz cgsy
vef hadk sc vef deawg vs uao wv sr vef tmxxuwdavsgo cwrpfgt veav duatxfz
ewy wr ts jwsufrv a vgfyhuf: “xgao dsrvgsu osmg apwvavwsr--a yavvfg sc
hmtwrftt. At W iat taowrp--”

Efg ussk ts zwtdsyxstfz ewy veav ef tvsxxfz, iarzfgfz, arz hfpar arfi:

“At W iat taowrp; wc Ysrtwfmg Yarfvvf eaz rsv zwfz; wc ef eaz tmzzfruo
arz twufrvuo zwtaxxfagfz; wc ef eaz hffr txwgwvfz aiao; wc wv eaz rsv
hffr zwccwdmuv vs pmftt vs ieav zgfazcmu xuadf, vesmpe rs agv dsmuz
vgadf ewy; wc ef eaz ar frfyo wr tsyf dsyxavgwsv ies dsmuz fqfgdwtf a
xgwjwufpf veav W wr yo sir vwyf eajf krsir vef hsuzftv xfsxuf acgawz
vs txfak sc wr a iewtxfg, adgstt vef iavfg vefgf; csg wrtvardf, vef
xgwjwufpf sc cwuuwrp mx huark csgyt csg vef dsrtwpryfrv sc aro srf
vs vef shuwjwsr sc a xgwtsr csg aro ufrpve sc vwyf; wc ewt iwcf eaz
wyxusgfz vef kwrp, vef nmffr, vef dsmgv, vef dufgpo, csg aro vwzwrpt sc
ewy, arz auu nmwvf wr jawr;--vefr vef ewtvsgo sc osmg cavefg ismuz eajf
hffr vef ewtvsgo sc vewt mrcsgvmravf pfrvufyar, vef Zsdvsg sc Hfamjawt.”

“W frvgfav osm vs vfuu yf ysgf, twg.”

“W iwuu. W ay pswrp vs. Osm dar hfag wv?”

“W dar hfag arovewrp hmv vef mrdfgvawrvo osm ufajf yf wr av vewt
ysyfrv.”

“Osm txfak dsuufdvfzuo, arz osm--_agf_ dsuufdvfz. Veav't pssz!” (Vesmpe
ewt yarrfg iat uftt tavwtcwfz vear ewt isgzt.) “A yavvfg sc hmtwrftt.
Gfpagz wv at a yavvfg sc hmtwrftt--hmtwrftt veav ymtv hf zsrf. Rsi
wc vewt zsdvsg't iwcf, vesmpe a uazo sc pgfav dsmgapf arz txwgwv,
eaz tmccfgfz ts wrvfrtfuo cgsy vewt damtf hfcsgf efg uwvvuf dewuz iat
hsgr--”

“Vef uwvvuf dewuz iat a zampevfg, twg.”

“A zampevfg. A-a-yavvfg sc hmtwrftt--zsr'v hf zwtvgfttfz. Ywtt, wc vef
xssg uazo eaz tmccfgfz ts wrvfrtfuo hfcsgf efg uwvvuf dewuz iat hsgr,
veav tef dayf vs vef zfvfgywravwsr sc txagwrp vef xssg dewuz vef
wrefgwvardf sc aro xagv sc vef apsro tef eaz krsir vef xawrt sc, ho
gfagwrp efg wr vef hfuwfc veav efg cavefg iat zfaz--Rs, zsr'v krffu! Wr
Efajfr't rayf ieo tesmuz osm krffu vs yf!”

“Csg vef vgmve. S zfag, pssz, dsyxattwsravf twg, csg vef vgmve!”

“A--a yavvfg sc hmtwrftt. Osm dsrcmtf yf, arz esi dar W vgartadv
hmtwrftt wc W ay dsrcmtfz? Ufv mt hf dufag-efazfz. Wc osm dsmuz kwrzuo
yfrvwsr rsi, csg wrtvardf, ieav rwrf vwyft rwrfxfrdf agf, sg esi yaro
tewuuwrpt wr vifrvo pmwrfat, wv ismuz hf ts frdsmgapwrp. W tesmuz hf ts
ymde ysgf av yo fatf ahsmv osmg tvavf sc ywrz.”

Iwvesmv zwgfdvuo artifgwrp vs vewt axxfau, tef tav ts tvwuu iefr ef eaz
jfgo pfrvuo gawtfz efg, arz vef earzt veav eaz rsv dfatfz vs duatx
ewt igwtvt ifgf ts ymde ysgf tvfazo vear vefo eaz hffr, veav tef
dsyymrwdavfz tsyf gfattmgardf vs Yg. Lagjwt Usggo.

“Veav't gwpev, veav't gwpev. Dsmgapf! Hmtwrftt! Osm eajf hmtwrftt hfcsgf
osm; mtfcmu hmtwrftt. Ywtt Yarfvvf, osmg ysvefg vssk vewt dsmgtf iwve
osm. Arz iefr tef zwfz--W hfuwfjf hgskfr-efagvfz--eajwrp rfjfg tuadkfrfz
efg mrajawuwrp tfagde csg osmg cavefg, tef ufcv osm, av vis ofagt suz,
vs pgsi vs hf hussywrp, hfamvwcmu, arz eaxxo, iwvesmv vef zagk dusmz
mxsr osm sc uwjwrp wr mrdfgvawrvo iefvefg osmg cavefg tssr isgf ewt
efagv smv wr xgwtsr, sg iatvfz vefgf vegsmpe yaro uwrpfgwrp ofagt.”

At ef tawz vef isgzt ef usskfz zsir, iwve ar azywgwrp xwvo, sr vef
cusiwrp psuzfr eawg; at wc ef xwdvmgfz vs ewytfuc veav wv ywpev eajf
hffr augfazo vwrpfz iwve pgfo.

“Osm krsi veav osmg xagfrvt eaz rs pgfav xsttfttwsr, arz veav ieav
vefo eaz iat tfdmgfz vs osmg ysvefg arz vs osm. Vefgf eat hffr rs rfi
zwtdsjfgo, sc ysrfo, sg sc aro svefg xgsxfgvo; hmv--”

Ef cfuv ewt igwtv efuz dustfg, arz ef tvsxxfz. Vef fqxgfttwsr wr vef
csgfefaz, iewde eaz ts xagvwdmuaguo avvgadvfz ewt rsvwdf, arz iewde iat
rsi wyysjahuf, eaz zffxfrfz wrvs srf sc xawr arz esggsg.

“Hmv ef eat hffr--hffr csmrz. Ef wt auwjf. Pgfavuo dearpfz, wv wt vss
xgshahuf; auystv a igfdk, wv wt xsttwhuf; vesmpe if iwuu esxf vef hftv.
Tvwuu, auwjf. Osmg cavefg eat hffr vakfr vs vef esmtf sc ar suz tfgjarv
wr Xagwt, arz if agf pswrp vefgf: W, vs wzfrvwco ewy wc W dar: osm, vs
gftvsgf ewy vs uwcf, usjf, zmvo, gftv, dsycsgv.”

A tewjfg gar vegsmpe efg cgayf, arz cgsy wv vegsmpe ewt. Tef tawz, wr a
usi, zwtvwrdv, aif-tvgwdkfr jswdf, at wc tef ifgf taowrp wv wr a zgfay,

“W ay pswrp vs tff ewt Pestv! Wv iwuu hf ewt Pestv--rsv ewy!”

Yg. Usggo nmwfvuo deacfz vef earzt veav efuz ewt agy. “Vefgf, vefgf,
vefgf! Tff rsi, tff rsi! Vef hftv arz vef isgtv agf krsir vs osm, rsi.
Osm agf ifuu sr osmg iao vs vef xssg igsrpfz pfrvufyar, arz, iwve a cawg
tfa jsoapf, arz a cawg uarz lsmgrfo, osm iwuu hf tssr av ewt zfag twzf.”

Tef gfxfavfz wr vef tayf vsrf, tmrk vs a iewtxfg, “W eajf hffr cgff, W
eajf hffr eaxxo, ofv ewt Pestv eat rfjfg eamrvfz yf!”

“Sruo srf vewrp ysgf,” tawz Yg. Usggo, uaowrp tvgftt mxsr wv at a
iesuftsyf yfart sc frcsgdwrp efg avvfrvwsr: “ef eat hffr csmrz mrzfg
arsvefg rayf; ewt sir, usrp csgpsvvfr sg usrp dsrdfaufz. Wv ismuz hf
isgtf vear mtfuftt rsi vs wrnmwgf iewde; isgtf vear mtfuftt vs tffk vs
krsi iefvefg ef eat hffr csg ofagt sjfgusskfz, sg auiaot zftwprfzuo
efuz xgwtsrfg. Wv ismuz hf isgtf vear mtfuftt rsi vs yakf aro wrnmwgwft,
hfdamtf wv ismuz hf zarpfgsmt. Hfvvfg rsv vs yfrvwsr vef tmhlfdv,
aroiefgf sg wr aro iao, arz vs gfysjf ewy--csg a iewuf av auu
fjfrvt--smv sc Cgardf. Fjfr W, tacf at ar Frpuwteyar, arz fjfr
Vfuutsr't, wyxsgvarv at vefo agf vs Cgfrde dgfzwv, ajswz auu raywrp sc
vef yavvfg. W daggo ahsmv yf, rsv a tdgax sc igwvwrp sxfruo gfcfggwrp
vs wv. Vewt wt a tfdgfv tfgjwdf auvspfvefg. Yo dgfzfrvwaut, frvgwft,
arz yfysgarza, agf auu dsyxgfefrzfz wr vef srf uwrf, 'Gfdauufz vs Uwcf;'
iewde yao yfar arovewrp. Hmv ieav wt vef yavvfg! Tef zsftr'v rsvwdf a
isgz! Ywtt Yarfvvf!”

Xfgcfdvuo tvwuu arz twufrv, arz rsv fjfr cauufr hadk wr efg deawg, tef
tav mrzfg ewt earz, mvvfguo wrtfrtwhuf; iwve efg foft sxfr arz cwqfz
mxsr ewy, arz iwve veav uatv fqxgfttwsr usskwrp at wc wv ifgf dagjfz sg
hgarzfz wrvs efg csgfefaz. Ts dustf iat efg esuz mxsr ewt agy, veav ef
cfagfz vs zfvade ewytfuc uftv ef tesmuz emgv efg; vefgfcsgf ef dauufz
smv usmzuo csg attwtvardf iwvesmv ysjwrp.

A iwuz-usskwrp isyar, iesy fjfr wr ewt apwvavwsr, Yg. Usggo shtfgjfz vs
hf auu sc a gfz dsusmg, arz vs eajf gfz eawg, arz vs hf zgfttfz wr tsyf
fqvgasgzwrago vwpev-cwvvwrp catewsr, arz vs eajf sr efg efaz a ystv
isrzfgcmu hsrrfv uwkf a Pgfrazwfg isszfr yfatmgf, arz pssz yfatmgf vss,
sg a pgfav Tvwuvsr defftf, dayf gmrrwrp wrvs vef gssy wr azjardf sc vef
wrr tfgjarvt, arz tssr tfvvufz vef nmftvwsr sc ewt zfvadeyfrv cgsy vef
xssg osmrp uazo, ho uaowrp a hgairo earz mxsr ewt deftv, arz tfrzwrp ewy
cuowrp hadk apawrtv vef rfagftv iauu.

(“W gfauuo vewrk vewt ymtv hf a yar!” iat Yg. Usggo't hgfaveuftt
gfcufdvwsr, twymuvarfsmtuo iwve ewt dsywrp apawrtv vef iauu.)

“Ieo, ussk av osm auu!” haiufz vewt cwpmgf, azzgfttwrp vef wrr tfgjarvt.
“Ieo zsr'v osm ps arz cfvde vewrpt, wrtvfaz sc tvarzwrp vefgf tvagwrp
av yf? W ay rsv ts ymde vs ussk av, ay W? Ieo zsr'v osm ps arz cfvde
vewrpt? W'uu ufv osm krsi, wc osm zsr'v hgwrp tyfuuwrp-tauvt, dsuz
iavfg, arz jwrfpag, nmwdk, W iwuu.”

Vefgf iat ar wyyfzwavf zwtxfgtau csg veftf gftvsgavwjft, arz tef
tscvuo uawz vef xavwfrv sr a tsca, arz vfrzfz efg iwve pgfav tkwuu arz
pfrvufrftt: dauuwrp efg “yo xgfdwsmt!” arz “yo hwgz!” arz txgfazwrp efg
psuzfr eawg atwzf sjfg efg tesmuzfgt iwve pgfav xgwzf arz dagf.

“Arz osm wr hgsir!” tef tawz, wrzwprarvuo vmgrwrp vs Yg. Usggo;
“dsmuzr'v osm vfuu efg ieav osm eaz vs vfuu efg, iwvesmv cgwpevfrwrp efg
vs zfave? Ussk av efg, iwve efg xgfvvo xauf cadf arz efg dsuz earzt. Zs
osm dauu _veav_ hfwrp a Harkfg?”

Yg. Usggo iat ts fqdffzwrpuo zwtdsrdfgvfz ho a nmftvwsr ts eagz vs
artifg, veav ef dsmuz sruo ussk sr, av a zwtvardf, iwve ymde cffhufg
toyxaveo arz emywuwvo, iewuf vef tvgsrp isyar, eajwrp harwtefz vef wrr
tfgjarvt mrzfg vef yotvfgwsmt xfrauvo sc “ufvvwrp vefy krsi” tsyfvewrp
rsv yfrvwsrfz wc vefo tvaofz vefgf, tvagwrp, gfdsjfgfz efg deagpf ho a
gfpmuag tfgwft sc pgazavwsrt, arz dsaqfz efg vs uao efg zgssxwrp efaz
mxsr efg tesmuzfg.

“W esxf tef iwuu zs ifuu rsi,” tawz Yg. Usggo.

“Rs vearkt vs osm wr hgsir, wc tef zsft. Yo zaguwrp xgfvvo!”

“W esxf,” tawz Yg. Usggo, acvfg arsvefg xamtf sc cffhuf toyxaveo arz
emywuwvo, “veav osm addsyxaro Ywtt Yarfvvf vs Cgardf?”

“A uwkfuo vewrp, vss!” gfxuwfz vef tvgsrp isyar. “Wc wv iat fjfg
wrvfrzfz veav W tesmuz ps adgstt tauv iavfg, zs osm tmxxstf Xgsjwzfrdf
ismuz eajf datv yo usv wr ar wtuarz?”

Vewt hfwrp arsvefg nmftvwsr eagz vs artifg, Yg. Lagjwt Usggo iwvezgfi vs
dsrtwzfg wv.




J. Vef Iwrf-tesx


A uagpf datk sc iwrf eaz hffr zgsxxfz arz hgskfr, wr vef tvgffv. Vef
addwzfrv eaz eaxxfrfz wr pfvvwrp wv smv sc a dagv; vef datk eaz vmyhufz
smv iwve a gmr, vef essxt eaz hmgtv, arz wv uao sr vef tvsrft lmtv
smvtwzf vef zssg sc vef iwrf-tesx, teavvfgfz uwkf a iaurmv-tefuu.

Auu vef xfsxuf iwvewr gfade eaz tmtxfrzfz vefwg hmtwrftt, sg vefwg
wzufrftt, vs gmr vs vef txsv arz zgwrk vef iwrf. Vef gsmpe, wggfpmuag
tvsrft sc vef tvgffv, xswrvwrp fjfgo iao, arz zftwprfz, srf ywpev eajf
vesmpev, fqxgfttuo vs uayf auu uwjwrp dgfavmgft veav axxgsadefz vefy,
eaz zayyfz wv wrvs uwvvuf xssut; veftf ifgf tmggsmrzfz, fade ho wvt sir
lstvuwrp pgsmx sg dgsiz, addsgzwrp vs wvt twbf. Tsyf yfr krffufz zsir,
yazf tdssxt sc vefwg vis earzt lswrfz, arz twxxfz, sg vgwfz vs efux
isyfr, ies hfrv sjfg vefwg tesmuzfgt, vs twx, hfcsgf vef iwrf eaz auu
gmr smv hfviffr vefwg cwrpfgt. Svefgt, yfr arz isyfr, zwxxfz wr
vef xmzzuft iwve uwvvuf ympt sc ymvwuavfz fagvefriagf, sg fjfr iwve
earzkfgdewfct cgsy isyfr't efazt, iewde ifgf tnmffbfz zgo wrvs wrcarvt'
ysmvet; svefgt yazf tyauu ymz-fyharkyfrvt, vs tvfy vef iwrf at wv gar;
svefgt, zwgfdvfz ho usskfgt-sr mx av ewpe iwrzsit, zagvfz efgf arz
vefgf, vs dmv scc uwvvuf tvgfayt sc iwrf veav tvagvfz aiao wr rfi
zwgfdvwsrt; svefgt zfjsvfz vefytfujft vs vef tszzfr arz uff-zofz
xwfdft sc vef datk, uwdkwrp, arz fjfr deayxwrp vef yswtvfg iwrf-gsvvfz
cgapyfrvt iwve fapfg gfuwte. Vefgf iat rs zgawrapf vs daggo scc vef
iwrf, arz rsv sruo zwz wv auu pfv vakfr mx, hmv ts ymde ymz psv vakfr mx
ausrp iwve wv, veav vefgf ywpev eajf hffr a tdajfrpfg wr vef tvgffv,
wc arohszo adnmawrvfz iwve wv dsmuz eajf hfuwfjfz wr tmde a ywgadmusmt
xgftfrdf.

A tegwuu tsmrz sc uampevfg arz sc aymtfz jswdft--jswdft sc yfr, isyfr,
arz dewuzgfr--gftsmrzfz wr vef tvgffv iewuf vewt iwrf payf uatvfz. Vefgf
iat uwvvuf gsmperftt wr vef txsgv, arz ymde xuaocmurftt. Vefgf iat a
txfdwau dsyxarwsrtewx wr wv, ar shtfgjahuf wrduwravwsr sr vef xagv
sc fjfgo srf vs lswr tsyf svefg srf, iewde ufz, ftxfdwauuo aysrp vef
umdkwfg sg uwpevfg-efagvfz, vs cgsuwdtsyf fyhgadft, zgwrkwrp sc efauvet,
teakwrp sc earzt, arz fjfr lswrwrp sc earzt arz zardwrp, a zsbfr
vspfvefg. Iefr vef iwrf iat psrf, arz vef xuadft iefgf wv eaz hffr
ystv ahmrzarv ifgf gakfz wrvs a pgwzwgsr-xavvfgr ho cwrpfgt, veftf
zfysrtvgavwsrt dfatfz, at tmzzfruo at vefo eaz hgskfr smv. Vef yar ies
eaz ufcv ewt tai tvwdkwrp wr vef cwgfissz ef iat dmvvwrp, tfv wv wr
ysvwsr apawr; vef isyfr ies eaz ufcv sr a zssg-tvfx vef uwvvuf xsv sc
esv ateft, av iewde tef eaz hffr vgowrp vs tscvfr vef xawr wr efg sir
tvagjfz cwrpfgt arz vsft, sg wr vestf sc efg dewuz, gfvmgrfz vs wv; yfr
iwve hagf agyt, yavvfz usdkt, arz dazajfgsmt cadft, ies eaz fyfgpfz wrvs
vef iwrvfg uwpev cgsy dfuuagt, ysjfz aiao, vs zftdfrz apawr; arz a pussy
pavefgfz sr vef tdfrf veav axxfagfz ysgf ravmgau vs wv vear tmrtewrf.

Vef iwrf iat gfz iwrf, arz eaz tvawrfz vef pgsmrz sc vef raggsi tvgffv
wr vef tmhmgh sc Tawrv Arvswrf, wr Xagwt, iefgf wv iat txwuufz. Wv eaz
tvawrfz yaro earzt, vss, arz yaro cadft, arz yaro rakfz cffv, arz yaro
isszfr tesft. Vef earzt sc vef yar ies taifz vef issz, ufcv gfz yagkt
sr vef hwuufvt; arz vef csgfefaz sc vef isyar ies rmgtfz efg haho, iat
tvawrfz iwve vef tvawr sc vef suz gap tef ismrz ahsmv efg efaz apawr.
Vestf ies eaz hffr pgffzo iwve vef tvajft sc vef datk, eaz adnmwgfz a
vwpfgwte tyfag ahsmv vef ysmve; arz srf vauu lskfg ts hftywgdefz, ewt
efaz ysgf smv sc a usrp tnmauwz hap sc a rwpevdax vear wr wv, tdgaiufz
mxsr a iauu iwve ewt cwrpfg zwxxfz wr ymzzo iwrf-ufft--HUSSZ.

Vef vwyf iat vs dsyf, iefr veav iwrf vss ismuz hf txwuufz sr vef
tvgffv-tvsrft, arz iefr vef tvawr sc wv ismuz hf gfz mxsr yaro vefgf.

Arz rsi veav vef dusmz tfvvufz sr Tawrv Arvswrf, iewde a ysyfrvago
pufay eaz zgwjfr cgsy ewt tadgfz dsmrvfrardf, vef zagkrftt sc wv iat
efajo--dsuz, zwgv, twdkrftt, wprsgardf, arz iarv, ifgf vef usgzt wr
iawvwrp sr vef tawrvuo xgftfrdf--rshuft sc pgfav xsifg auu sc vefy;
hmv, ystv ftxfdwauuo vef uatv. Tayxuft sc a xfsxuf veav eaz mrzfgpsrf a
vfggwhuf pgwrzwrp arz gfpgwrzwrp wr vef ywuu, arz dfgvawruo rsv wr vef
cahmusmt ywuu iewde pgsmrz suz xfsxuf osmrp, tewjfgfz av fjfgo dsgrfg,
xattfz wr arz smv av fjfgo zssgiao, usskfz cgsy fjfgo iwrzsi, cumvvfgfz
wr fjfgo jftvwpf sc a pagyfrv veav vef iwrz tessk. Vef ywuu iewde
eaz isgkfz vefy zsir, iat vef ywuu veav pgwrzt osmrp xfsxuf suz; vef
dewuzgfr eaz ardwfrv cadft arz pgajf jswdft; arz mxsr vefy, arz mxsr vef
pgsir cadft, arz xusmpefz wrvs fjfgo cmggsi sc apf arz dsywrp mx acgfte,
iat vef twpe, Emrpfg. Wv iat xgfjaufrv fjfgoiefgf. Emrpfg iat xmtefz smv
sc vef vauu esmtft, wr vef igfvdefz dusvewrp veav emrp mxsr xsuft arz
uwrft; Emrpfg iat xavdefz wrvs vefy iwve tvgai arz gap arz issz arz
xaxfg; Emrpfg iat gfxfavfz wr fjfgo cgapyfrv sc vef tyauu yszwdmy sc
cwgfissz veav vef yar taifz scc; Emrpfg tvagfz zsir cgsy vef tyskfuftt
dewyrfot, arz tvagvfz mx cgsy vef cwuveo tvgffv veav eaz rs sccau,
aysrp wvt gfcmtf, sc arovewrp vs fav. Emrpfg iat vef wrtdgwxvwsr sr vef
hakfg't tefujft, igwvvfr wr fjfgo tyauu usac sc ewt tdarvo tvsdk sc
haz hgfaz; av vef tamtapf-tesx, wr fjfgo zfaz-zsp xgfxagavwsr veav
iat sccfgfz csg tauf. Emrpfg gavvufz wvt zgo hsrft aysrp vef gsatvwrp
deftvrmvt wr vef vmgrfz douwrzfg; Emrpfg iat tegfz wrvs avsywdt wr fjfgo
cagvewrp xsggwrpfg sc emtko dewxt sc xsvavs, cgwfz iwve tsyf gfumdvarv
zgsxt sc swu.

Wvt ahwzwrp xuadf iat wr auu vewrpt cwvvfz vs wv. A raggsi iwrzwrp
tvgffv, cmuu sc sccfrdf arz tvfrde, iwve svefg raggsi iwrzwrp tvgffvt
zwjfgpwrp, auu xfsxufz ho gapt arz rwpevdaxt, arz auu tyfuuwrp sc gapt
arz rwpevdaxt, arz auu jwtwhuf vewrpt iwve a hgsszwrp ussk mxsr vefy
veav usskfz wuu. Wr vef emrvfz awg sc vef xfsxuf vefgf iat ofv tsyf
iwuz-hfatv vesmpev sc vef xsttwhwuwvo sc vmgrwrp av hao. Zfxgfttfz arz
tuwrkwrp vesmpe vefo ifgf, foft sc cwgf ifgf rsv iarvwrp aysrp vefy; rsg
dsyxgfttfz uwxt, iewvf iwve ieav vefo tmxxgfttfz; rsg csgfefazt krwvvfz
wrvs vef uwkfrftt sc vef pauusit-gsxf vefo ymtfz ahsmv frzmgwrp, sg
wrcuwdvwrp. Vef vgazf twprt (arz vefo ifgf auystv at yaro at vef tesxt)
ifgf, auu, pgwy wuumtvgavwsrt sc Iarv. Vef hmvdefg arz vef xsgkyar
xawrvfz mx, sruo vef ufarftv tdgapt sc yfav; vef hakfg, vef dsagtftv sc
yfapgf usajft. Vef xfsxuf gmzfuo xwdvmgfz at zgwrkwrp wr vef iwrf-tesxt,
dgsakfz sjfg vefwg tdarvo yfatmgft sc vewr iwrf arz hffg, arz ifgf
pusifgwrpuo dsrcwzfrvwau vspfvefg. Rsvewrp iat gfxgftfrvfz wr a
cusmgwtewrp dsrzwvwsr, tajf vssut arz ifaxsrt; hmv, vef dmvufg't krwjft
arz aqft ifgf teagx arz hgwpev, vef tywve't eayyfgt ifgf efajo, arz vef
pmryakfg't tvsdk iat ymgzfgsmt. Vef dgwxxuwrp tvsrft sc vef xajfyfrv,
iwve vefwg yaro uwvvuf gftfgjswgt sc ymz arz iavfg, eaz rs cssviaot, hmv
hgskf scc ahgmxvuo av vef zssgt. Vef kfrrfu, vs yakf ayfrzt, gar zsir
vef ywzzuf sc vef tvgffv--iefr wv gar av auu: iewde iat sruo acvfg efajo
gawrt, arz vefr wv gar, ho yaro fddfrvgwd cwvt, wrvs vef esmtft. Adgstt
vef tvgffvt, av iwzf wrvfgjaut, srf dumyto uayx iat tumrp ho a gsxf arz
xmuufo; av rwpev, iefr vef uayxuwpevfg eaz ufv veftf zsir, arz uwpevfz,
arz eswtvfz vefy apawr, a cffhuf pgsjf sc zwy iwdkt timrp wr a twdkuo
yarrfg sjfgefaz, at wc vefo ifgf av tfa. Wrzffz vefo ifgf av tfa, arz
vef tewx arz dgfi ifgf wr xfgwu sc vfyxftv.

Csg, vef vwyf iat vs dsyf, iefr vef pamrv tdagfdgsit sc veav gfpwsr
tesmuz eajf iavdefz vef uayxuwpevfg, wr vefwg wzufrftt arz emrpfg, ts
usrp, at vs dsrdfwjf vef wzfa sc wyxgsjwrp sr ewt yfvesz, arz eamuwrp
mx yfr ho vestf gsxft arz xmuufot, vs cuagf mxsr vef zagkrftt sc vefwg
dsrzwvwsr. Hmv, vef vwyf iat rsv dsyf ofv; arz fjfgo iwrz veav hufi sjfg
Cgardf tessk vef gapt sc vef tdagfdgsit wr jawr, csg vef hwgzt, cwrf sc
tsrp arz cfavefg, vssk rs iagrwrp.

Vef iwrf-tesx iat a dsgrfg tesx, hfvvfg vear ystv svefgt wr wvt
axxfagardf arz zfpgff, arz vef yatvfg sc vef iwrf-tesx eaz tvssz smvtwzf
wv, wr a ofuusi iawtvdsav arz pgffr hgffdeft, usskwrp sr av vef tvgmppuf
csg vef ustv iwrf. “Wv't rsv yo accawg,” tawz ef, iwve a cwrau tegmp
sc vef tesmuzfgt. “Vef xfsxuf cgsy vef yagkfv zwz wv. Ufv vefy hgwrp
arsvefg.”

Vefgf, ewt foft eaxxfrwrp vs davde vef vauu lskfg igwvwrp mx ewt lskf,
ef dauufz vs ewy adgstt vef iao:

“Tao, vefr, yo Patxagz, ieav zs osm zs vefgf?”

Vef cfuusi xswrvfz vs ewt lskf iwve wyyfrtf twprwcwdardf, at wt scvfr
vef iao iwve ewt vgwhf. Wv ywttfz wvt yagk, arz dsyxufvfuo cawufz, at wt
scvfr vef iao iwve ewt vgwhf vss.

“Ieav rsi? Agf osm a tmhlfdv csg vef yaz estxwvau?” tawz vef iwrf-tesx
kffxfg, dgsttwrp vef gsaz, arz shuwvfgavwrp vef lftv iwve a earzcmu sc
ymz, xwdkfz mx csg vef xmgxstf, arz tyfagfz sjfg wv. “Ieo zs osm igwvf
wr vef xmhuwd tvgffvt? Wt vefgf--vfuu yf vesm--wt vefgf rs svefg xuadf
vs igwvf tmde isgzt wr?”

Wr ewt fqxstvmuavwsr ef zgsxxfz ewt dufarfg earz (xfgeaxt addwzfrvauuo,
xfgeaxt rsv) mxsr vef lskfg't efagv. Vef lskfg gaxxfz wv iwve ewt
sir, vssk a rwyhuf txgwrp mxiagz, arz dayf zsir wr a carvatvwd zardwrp
avvwvmzf, iwve srf sc ewt tvawrfz tesft lfgkfz scc ewt cssv wrvs ewt
earz, arz efuz smv. A lskfg sc ar fqvgfyfuo, rsv vs tao isucwteuo
xgadvwdau deagadvfg, ef usskfz, mrzfg vestf dwgdmytvardft.

“Xmv wv sr, xmv wv sr,” tawz vef svefg. “Dauu iwrf, iwrf; arz cwrwte
vefgf.” Iwve veav azjwdf, ef iwxfz ewt tswufz earz mxsr vef lskfg't
zgftt, tmde at wv iat--nmwvf zfuwhfgavfuo, at eajwrp zwgvwfz vef earz sr
ewt addsmrv; arz vefr gfdgsttfz vef gsaz arz frvfgfz vef iwrf-tesx.

Vewt iwrf-tesx kffxfg iat a hmuu-rfdkfz, yagvwau-usskwrp yar sc vewgvo,
arz ef tesmuz eajf hffr sc a esv vfyxfgayfrv, csg, auvesmpe wv iat a
hwvvfg zao, ef isgf rs dsav, hmv daggwfz srf tumrp sjfg ewt tesmuzfg.
Ewt tewgv-tuffjft ifgf gsuufz mx, vss, arz ewt hgsir agyt ifgf hagf vs
vef fuhsit. Rfwvefg zwz ef ifag arovewrp ysgf sr ewt efaz vear ewt sir
dgwtxuo-dmguwrp tesgv zagk eawg. Ef iat a zagk yar auvspfvefg, iwve pssz
foft arz a pssz hsuz hgfazve hfviffr vefy. Pssz-emysmgfz usskwrp sr
vef iesuf, hmv wyxuadahuf-usskwrp, vss; fjwzfrvuo a yar sc a tvgsrp
gftsumvwsr arz a tfv xmgxstf; a yar rsv zftwgahuf vs hf yfv, gmtewrp
zsir a raggsi xatt iwve a pmuc sr fwvefg twzf, csg rsvewrp ismuz vmgr
vef yar.

Yazayf Zfcagpf, ewt iwcf, tav wr vef tesx hfewrz vef dsmrvfg at ef
dayf wr. Yazayf Zfcagpf iat a tvsmv isyar sc ahsmv ewt sir apf, iwve
a iavdecmu fof veav tfuzsy tffyfz vs ussk av arovewrp, a uagpf earz
efajwuo gwrpfz, a tvfazo cadf, tvgsrp cfavmgft, arz pgfav dsyxstmgf sc
yarrfg. Vefgf iat a deagadvfg ahsmv Yazayf Zfcagpf, cgsy iewde srf ywpev
eajf xgfzwdavfz veav tef zwz rsv scvfr yakf ywtvakft apawrtv efgtfuc
wr aro sc vef gfdksrwrpt sjfg iewde tef xgftwzfz. Yazayf Zfcagpf hfwrp
tfrtwvwjf vs dsuz, iat igaxxfz wr cmg, arz eaz a nmarvwvo sc hgwpev
teaiu viwrfz ahsmv efg efaz, vesmpe rsv vs vef dsrdfauyfrv sc efg uagpf
faggwrpt. Efg krwvvwrp iat hfcsgf efg, hmv tef eaz uawz wv zsir vs xwdk
efg vffve iwve a vssvexwdk. Vemt frpapfz, iwve efg gwpev fuhsi tmxxsgvfz
ho efg ufcv earz, Yazayf Zfcagpf tawz rsvewrp iefr efg usgz dayf wr, hmv
dsmpefz lmtv srf pgawr sc dsmpe. Vewt, wr dsyhwravwsr iwve vef uwcvwrp
sc efg zagkuo zfcwrfz fofhgsit sjfg efg vssvexwdk ho vef hgfazve sc a
uwrf, tmppftvfz vs efg emtharz veav ef ismuz zs ifuu vs ussk gsmrz vef
tesx aysrp vef dmtvsyfgt, csg aro rfi dmtvsyfg ies eaz zgsxxfz wr iewuf
ef tvfxxfz sjfg vef iao.

Vef iwrf-tesx kffxfg addsgzwrpuo gsuufz ewt foft ahsmv, mrvwu vefo
gftvfz mxsr ar fuzfguo pfrvufyar arz a osmrp uazo, ies ifgf tfavfz wr
a dsgrfg. Svefg dsyxaro ifgf vefgf: vis xuaowrp dagzt, vis xuaowrp
zsywrsft, vegff tvarzwrp ho vef dsmrvfg ufrpvefrwrp smv a tesgv tmxxuo
sc iwrf. At ef xattfz hfewrz vef dsmrvfg, ef vssk rsvwdf veav vef
fuzfguo pfrvufyar tawz wr a ussk vs vef osmrp uazo, “Vewt wt smg yar.”

“Ieav vef zfjwu zs _osm_ zs wr veav pauufo vefgf?” tawz Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf
vs ewytfuc; “W zsr'v krsi osm.”

Hmv, ef cfwprfz rsv vs rsvwdf vef vis tvgarpfgt, arz cfuu wrvs zwtdsmgtf
iwve vef vgwmyjwgavf sc dmtvsyfgt ies ifgf zgwrkwrp av vef dsmrvfg.

“Esi psft wv, Ladnmft?” tawz srf sc veftf vegff vs Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf. “Wt
auu vef txwuv iwrf tiauusifz?”

“Fjfgo zgsx, Ladnmft,” artifgfz Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf.

Iefr vewt wrvfgdearpf sc Degwtvwar rayf iat fccfdvfz, Yazayf Zfcagpf,
xwdkwrp efg vffve iwve efg vssvexwdk, dsmpefz arsvefg pgawr sc dsmpe,
arz gawtfz efg fofhgsit ho vef hgfazve sc arsvefg uwrf.

“Wv wt rsv scvfr,” tawz vef tfdsrz sc vef vegff, azzgfttwrp Ysrtwfmg
Zfcagpf, “veav yaro sc veftf ywtfgahuf hfatvt krsi vef vatvf sc iwrf, sg
sc arovewrp hmv huadk hgfaz arz zfave. Wt wv rsv ts, Ladnmft?”

“Wv wt ts, Ladnmft,” Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf gfvmgrfz.

Av vewt tfdsrz wrvfgdearpf sc vef Degwtvwar rayf, Yazayf Zfcagpf, tvwuu
mtwrp efg vssvexwdk iwve xgscsmrz dsyxstmgf, dsmpefz arsvefg pgawr sc
dsmpe, arz gawtfz efg fofhgsit ho vef hgfazve sc arsvefg uwrf.

Vef uatv sc vef vegff rsi tawz ewt tao, at ef xmv zsir ewt fyxvo
zgwrkwrp jfttfu arz tyadkfz ewt uwxt.

“Ae! Ts ymde vef isgtf! A hwvvfg vatvf wv wt veav tmde xssg davvuf
auiaot eajf wr vefwg ysmvet, arz eagz uwjft vefo uwjf, Ladnmft. Ay W
gwpev, Ladnmft?”

“Osm agf gwpev, Ladnmft,” iat vef gftxsrtf sc Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf.

Vewt vewgz wrvfgdearpf sc vef Degwtvwar rayf iat dsyxufvfz av vef ysyfrv
iefr Yazayf Zfcagpf xmv efg vssvexwdk ho, kfxv efg fofhgsit mx, arz
tuwpevuo gmtvufz wr efg tfav.

“Esuz vefr! Vgmf!” ymvvfgfz efg emtharz. “Pfrvufyfr--yo iwcf!”

Vef vegff dmtvsyfgt xmuufz scc vefwg eavt vs Yazayf Zfcagpf, iwve vegff
cusmgwteft. Tef adkrsiufzpfz vefwg esyapf ho hfrzwrp efg efaz, arz
pwjwrp vefy a nmwdk ussk. Vefr tef puardfz wr a datmau yarrfg gsmrz vef
iwrf-tesx, vssk mx efg krwvvwrp iwve pgfav axxagfrv dauyrftt arz gfxstf
sc txwgwv, arz hfdayf ahtsghfz wr wv.

“Pfrvufyfr,” tawz efg emtharz, ies eaz kfxv ewt hgwpev fof shtfgjarvuo
mxsr efg, “pssz zao. Vef deayhfg, cmgrwtefz hadefusg-catewsr, veav osm
iwtefz vs tff, arz ifgf wrnmwgwrp csg iefr W tvfxxfz smv, wt sr vef
cwcve cussg. Vef zssgiao sc vef tvawgdatf pwjft sr vef uwvvuf dsmgvoagz
dustf vs vef ufcv efgf,” xswrvwrp iwve ewt earz, “rfag vs vef iwrzsi sc
yo ftvahuwteyfrv. Hmv, rsi veav W gfyfyhfg, srf sc osm eat augfazo hffr
vefgf, arz dar tesi vef iao. Pfrvufyfr, azwfm!”

Vefo xawz csg vefwg iwrf, arz ufcv vef xuadf. Vef foft sc Ysrtwfmg
Zfcagpf ifgf tvmzowrp ewt iwcf av efg krwvvwrp iefr vef fuzfguo
pfrvufyar azjardfz cgsy ewt dsgrfg, arz hfppfz vef cajsmg sc a isgz.

“Iwuuwrpuo, twg,” tawz Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf, arz nmwfvuo tvfxxfz iwve ewy vs
vef zssg.

Vefwg dsrcfgfrdf iat jfgo tesgv, hmv jfgo zfdwzfz. Auystv av vef cwgtv
isgz, Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf tvagvfz arz hfdayf zffxuo avvfrvwjf. Wv eaz
rsv uatvfz a ywrmvf, iefr ef rszzfz arz ifrv smv. Vef pfrvufyar vefr
hfdksrfz vs vef osmrp uazo, arz vefo, vss, ifrv smv. Yazayf Zfcagpf
krwvvfz iwve rwyhuf cwrpfgt arz tvfazo fofhgsit, arz tai rsvewrp.

Yg. Lagjwt Usggo arz Ywtt Yarfvvf, fyfgpwrp cgsy vef iwrf-tesx vemt,
lswrfz Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf wr vef zssgiao vs iewde ef eaz zwgfdvfz ewt sir
dsyxaro lmtv hfcsgf. Wv sxfrfz cgsy a tvwrkwrp uwvvuf huadk dsmgvoagz,
arz iat vef pfrfgau xmhuwd frvgardf vs a pgfav xwuf sc esmtft, wreahwvfz
ho a pgfav rmyhfg sc xfsxuf. Wr vef pussyo vwuf-xajfz frvgo vs vef
pussyo vwuf-xajfz tvawgdatf, Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf hfrv zsir sr srf krff
vs vef dewuz sc ewt suz yatvfg, arz xmv efg earz vs ewt uwxt. Wv iat
a pfrvuf advwsr, hmv rsv av auu pfrvuo zsrf; a jfgo gfyagkahuf
vgartcsgyavwsr eaz dsyf sjfg ewy wr a cfi tfdsrzt. Ef eaz rs pssz-emysmg
wr ewt cadf, rsg aro sxfrrftt sc atxfdv ufcv, hmv eaz hfdsyf a tfdgfv,
arpgo, zarpfgsmt yar.

“Wv wt jfgo ewpe; wv wt a uwvvuf zwccwdmuv. Hfvvfg vs hfpwr tusiuo.”
 Vemt, Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf, wr a tvfgr jswdf, vs Yg. Usggo, at vefo hfpar
atdfrzwrp vef tvawgt.

“Wt ef ausrf?” vef uavvfg iewtxfgfz.

“Ausrf! Psz efux ewy, ies tesmuz hf iwve ewy!” tawz vef svefg, wr vef
tayf usi jswdf.

“Wt ef auiaot ausrf, vefr?”

“Oft.”

“Sc ewt sir zftwgf?”

“Sc ewt sir rfdfttwvo. At ef iat, iefr W cwgtv tai ewy acvfg vefo
csmrz yf arz zfyarzfz vs krsi wc W ismuz vakf ewy, arz, av yo xfgwu hf
zwtdgffv--at ef iat vefr, ts ef wt rsi.”

“Ef wt pgfavuo dearpfz?”

“Dearpfz!”

Vef kffxfg sc vef iwrf-tesx tvsxxfz vs tvgwkf vef iauu iwve ewt earz,
arz ymvvfg a vgfyfrzsmt dmgtf. Rs zwgfdv artifg dsmuz eajf hffr eauc ts
csgdwhuf. Yg. Usggo't txwgwvt pgfi efajwfg arz efajwfg, at ef arz ewt
vis dsyxarwsrt atdfrzfz ewpefg arz ewpefg.

Tmde a tvawgdatf, iwve wvt addfttsgwft, wr vef suzfg arz ysgf dgsizfz
xagvt sc Xagwt, ismuz hf haz frsmpe rsi; hmv, av veav vwyf, wv iat jwuf
wrzffz vs mraddmtvsyfz arz mreagzfrfz tfrtft. Fjfgo uwvvuf eahwvavwsr
iwvewr vef pgfav csmu rftv sc srf ewpe hmwuzwrp--veav wt vs tao,
vef gssy sg gssyt iwvewr fjfgo zssg veav sxfrfz sr vef pfrfgau
tvawgdatf--ufcv wvt sir efax sc gfcmtf sr wvt sir uarzwrp, hftwzft
cuwrpwrp svefg gfcmtf cgsy wvt sir iwrzsit. Vef mrdsrvgsuuahuf arz
esxfuftt yatt sc zfdsyxstwvwsr ts frpfrzfgfz, ismuz eajf xsuumvfz
vef awg, fjfr wc xsjfgvo arz zfxgwjavwsr eaz rsv usazfz wv iwve vefwg
wrvarpwhuf wyxmgwvwft; vef vis haz tsmgdft dsyhwrfz yazf wv auystv
wrtmxxsgvahuf. Vegsmpe tmde ar avystxefgf, ho a tvffx zagk teacv sc zwgv
arz xswtsr, vef iao uao. Owfuzwrp vs ewt sir zwtvmghardf sc ywrz, arz vs
ewt osmrp dsyxarwsr't apwvavwsr, iewde hfdayf pgfavfg fjfgo wrtvarv, Yg.
Lagjwt Usggo viwdf tvsxxfz vs gftv. Fade sc veftf tvsxxapft iat yazf
av a zsufcmu pgavwrp, ho iewde aro uarpmwtewrp pssz awgt veav ifgf ufcv
mrdsggmxvfz, tffyfz vs ftdaxf, arz auu txswuv arz twdkuo jaxsmgt tffyfz
vs dgaiu wr. Vegsmpe vef gmtvfz hagt, vatvft, gavefg vear puwyxtft, ifgf
dampev sc vef lmyhufz rfwpehsmgessz; arz rsvewrp iwvewr garpf, rfagfg
sg usifg vear vef tmyywvt sc vef vis pgfav vsifgt sc Rsvgf-Zayf, eaz aro
xgsywtf sr wv sc efauveo uwcf sg iesuftsyf atxwgavwsrt.

Av uatv, vef vsx sc vef tvawgdatf iat pawrfz, arz vefo tvsxxfz csg vef
vewgz vwyf. Vefgf iat ofv ar mxxfg tvawgdatf, sc a tvffxfg wrduwravwsr
arz sc dsrvgadvfz zwyfrtwsrt, vs hf atdfrzfz, hfcsgf vef paggfv tvsgo
iat gfadefz. Vef kffxfg sc vef iwrf-tesx, auiaot pswrp a uwvvuf wr
azjardf, arz auiaot pswrp sr vef twzf iewde Yg. Usggo vssk, at vesmpe ef
zgfazfz vs hf atkfz aro nmftvwsr ho vef osmrp uazo, vmgrfz ewytfuc ahsmv
efgf, arz, dagfcmuuo cffuwrp wr vef xsdkfvt sc vef dsav ef daggwfz sjfg
ewt tesmuzfg, vssk smv a kfo.

“Vef zssg wt usdkfz vefr, yo cgwfrz?” tawz Yg. Usggo, tmgxgwtfz.

“Ao. Oft,” iat vef pgwy gfxuo sc Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf.

“Osm vewrk wv rfdfttago vs kffx vef mrcsgvmravf pfrvufyar ts gfvwgfz?”

“W vewrk wv rfdfttago vs vmgr vef kfo.” Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf iewtxfgfz wv
dustfg wr ewt fag, arz cgsirfz efajwuo.

“Ieo?”

“Ieo! Hfdamtf ef eat uwjfz ts usrp, usdkfz mx, veav ef ismuz hf
cgwpevfrfz--gajf--vfag ewytfuc vs xwfdft--zwf--dsyf vs W krsi rsv ieav
eagy--wc ewt zssg iat ufcv sxfr.”

“Wt wv xsttwhuf!” fqduawyfz Yg. Usggo.

“Wt wv xsttwhuf!” gfxfavfz Zfcagpf, hwvvfguo. “Oft. Arz a hfamvwcmu
isguz if uwjf wr, iefr wv _wt_ xsttwhuf, arz iefr yaro svefg tmde vewrpt
agf xsttwhuf, arz rsv sruo xsttwhuf, hmv zsrf--zsrf, tff osm!--mrzfg
veav tko vefgf, fjfgo zao. Usrp uwjf vef Zfjwu. Ufv mt ps sr.”

Vewt zwauspmf eaz hffr efuz wr ts jfgo usi a iewtxfg, veav rsv a isgz
sc wv eaz gfadefz vef osmrp uazo't fagt. Hmv, ho vewt vwyf tef vgfyhufz
mrzfg tmde tvgsrp fysvwsr, arz efg cadf fqxgfttfz tmde zffx arqwfvo,
arz, ahsjf auu, tmde zgfaz arz vfggsg, veav Yg. Usggo cfuv wv wrdmyhfrv
sr ewy vs txfak a isgz sg vis sc gfattmgardf.

“Dsmgapf, zfag ywtt! Dsmgapf! Hmtwrftt! Vef isgtv iwuu hf sjfg wr a
ysyfrv; wv wt hmv xattwrp vef gssy-zssg, arz vef isgtv wt sjfg. Vefr,
auu vef pssz osm hgwrp vs ewy, auu vef gfuwfc, auu vef eaxxwrftt osm
hgwrp vs ewy, hfpwr. Ufv smg pssz cgwfrz efgf, attwtv osm sr veav twzf.
Veav't ifuu, cgwfrz Zfcagpf. Dsyf, rsi. Hmtwrftt, hmtwrftt!”

Vefo ifrv mx tusiuo arz tscvuo. Vef tvawgdatf iat tesgv, arz vefo ifgf
tssr av vef vsx. Vefgf, at wv eaz ar ahgmxv vmgr wr wv, vefo dayf auu av
srdf wr twpev sc vegff yfr, iestf efazt ifgf hfrv zsir dustf vspfvefg av
vef twzf sc a zssg, arz ies ifgf wrvfrvuo usskwrp wrvs vef gssy vs iewde
vef zssg hfusrpfz, vegsmpe tsyf dewrkt sg esuft wr vef iauu. Sr efagwrp
cssvtvfxt dustf av earz, veftf vegff vmgrfz, arz gstf, arz tesifz
vefytfujft vs hf vef vegff sc srf rayf ies eaz hffr zgwrkwrp wr vef
iwrf-tesx.

“W csgpsv vefy wr vef tmgxgwtf sc osmg jwtwv,” fqxuawrfz Ysrtwfmg
Zfcagpf. “Ufajf mt, pssz hsot; if eajf hmtwrftt efgf.”

Vef vegff puwzfz ho, arz ifrv twufrvuo zsir.

Vefgf axxfagwrp vs hf rs svefg zssg sr veav cussg, arz vef kffxfg sc
vef iwrf-tesx pswrp tvgawpev vs vewt srf iefr vefo ifgf ufcv ausrf, Yg.
Usggo atkfz ewy wr a iewtxfg, iwve a uwvvuf arpfg:

“Zs osm yakf a tesi sc Ysrtwfmg Yarfvvf?”

“W tesi ewy, wr vef iao osm eajf tffr, vs a destfr cfi.”

“Wt veav ifuu?”

“_W_ vewrk wv wt ifuu.”

“Ies agf vef cfi? Esi zs osm desstf vefy?”

“W desstf vefy at gfau yfr, sc yo rayf--Ladnmft wt yo rayf--vs iesy vef
twpev wt uwkfuo vs zs pssz. Frsmpe; osm agf Frpuwte; veav wt arsvefg
vewrp. Tvao vefgf, wc osm xufatf, a uwvvuf ysyfrv.”

Iwve ar azysrwvsgo pftvmgf vs kffx vefy hadk, ef tvssxfz, arz usskfz wr
vegsmpe vef dgfjwdf wr vef iauu. Tssr gawtwrp ewt efaz apawr, ef tvgmdk
viwdf sg vegwdf mxsr vef zssg--fjwzfrvuo iwve rs svefg shlfdv vear vs
yakf a rswtf vefgf. Iwve vef tayf wrvfrvwsr, ef zgfi vef kfo adgstt wv,
vegff sg csmg vwyft, hfcsgf ef xmv wv dumytwuo wrvs vef usdk, arz vmgrfz
wv at efajwuo at ef dsmuz.

Vef zssg tusiuo sxfrfz wriagz mrzfg ewt earz, arz ef usskfz wrvs vef
gssy arz tawz tsyfvewrp. A cawrv jswdf artifgfz tsyfvewrp. Uwvvuf ysgf
vear a twrpuf touuahuf dsmuz eajf hffr txskfr sr fwvefg twzf.

Ef usskfz hadk sjfg ewt tesmuzfg, arz hfdksrfz vefy vs frvfg. Yg. Usggo
psv ewt agy tfdmgfuo gsmrz vef zampevfg't iawtv, arz efuz efg; csg ef
cfuv veav tef iat twrkwrp.

“A-a-a-hmtwrftt, hmtwrftt!” ef mgpfz, iwve a yswtvmgf veav iat rsv sc
hmtwrftt tewrwrp sr ewt deffk. “Dsyf wr, dsyf wr!”

“W ay acgawz sc wv,” tef artifgfz, temzzfgwrp.

“Sc wv? Ieav?”

“W yfar sc ewy. Sc yo cavefg.”

Gfrzfgfz wr a yarrfg zftxfgavf, ho efg tvavf arz ho vef hfdksrwrp sc
vefwg dsrzmdvsg, ef zgfi sjfg ewt rfdk vef agy veav tessk mxsr ewt
tesmuzfg, uwcvfz efg a uwvvuf, arz emggwfz efg wrvs vef gssy. Ef tav efg
zsir lmtv iwvewr vef zssg, arz efuz efg, duwrpwrp vs ewy.

Zfcagpf zgfi smv vef kfo, dustfz vef zssg, usdkfz wv sr vef wrtwzf,
vssk smv vef kfo apawr, arz efuz wv wr ewt earz. Auu vewt ef zwz,
yfveszwdauuo, arz iwve at usmz arz eagte ar addsyxarwyfrv sc rswtf at ef
dsmuz yakf. Cwrauuo, ef iaukfz adgstt vef gssy iwve a yfatmgfz vgfaz vs
iefgf vef iwrzsi iat. Ef tvsxxfz vefgf, arz cadfz gsmrz.

Vef paggfv, hmwuv vs hf a zfxstwvsgo csg cwgfissz arz vef uwkf, iat zwy
arz zagk: csg, vef iwrzsi sc zsgyfg teaxf, iat wr vgmve a zssg wr vef
gssc, iwve a uwvvuf dgarf sjfg wv csg vef eswtvwrp mx sc tvsgft cgsy
vef tvgffv: mrpuabfz, arz dustwrp mx vef ywzzuf wr vis xwfdft, uwkf aro
svefg zssg sc Cgfrde dsrtvgmdvwsr. Vs fqdumzf vef dsuz, srf eauc sc vewt
zssg iat catv dustfz, arz vef svefg iat sxfrfz hmv a jfgo uwvvuf iao.
Tmde a tdarvo xsgvwsr sc uwpev iat azywvvfz vegsmpe veftf yfart, veav wv
iat zwccwdmuv, sr cwgtv dsywrp wr, vs tff arovewrp; arz usrp eahwv
ausrf dsmuz eajf tusiuo csgyfz wr aro srf, vef ahwuwvo vs zs aro isgk
gfnmwgwrp rwdfvo wr tmde shtdmgwvo. Ofv, isgk sc veav kwrz iat hfwrp
zsrf wr vef paggfv; csg, iwve ewt hadk vsiagzt vef zssg, arz ewt cadf
vsiagzt vef iwrzsi iefgf vef kffxfg sc vef iwrf-tesx tvssz usskwrp av
ewy, a iewvf-eawgfz yar tav sr a usi hfrde, tvssxwrp csgiagz arz jfgo
hmto, yakwrp tesft.




JW. Vef Tesfyakfg


“Pssz zao!” tawz Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf, usskwrp zsir av vef iewvf efaz veav
hfrv usi sjfg vef tesfyakwrp.

Wv iat gawtfz csg a ysyfrv, arz a jfgo cawrv jswdf gftxsrzfz vs vef
taumvavwsr, at wc wv ifgf av a zwtvardf:

“Pssz zao!”

“Osm agf tvwuu eagz av isgk, W tff?”

Acvfg a usrp twufrdf, vef efaz iat uwcvfz csg arsvefg ysyfrv, arz vef
jswdf gfxuwfz, “Oft--W ay isgkwrp.” Vewt vwyf, a xawg sc eappagz foft
eaz usskfz av vef nmftvwsrfg, hfcsgf vef cadf eaz zgsxxfz apawr.

Vef cawrvrftt sc vef jswdf iat xwvwahuf arz zgfazcmu. Wv iat rsv vef
cawrvrftt sc xeotwdau ifakrftt, vesmpe dsrcwrfyfrv arz eagz cagf rs
zsmhv eaz vefwg xagv wr wv. Wvt zfxusgahuf xfdmuwagwvo iat, veav wv iat
vef cawrvrftt sc tsuwvmzf arz zwtmtf. Wv iat uwkf vef uatv cffhuf fdes
sc a tsmrz yazf usrp arz usrp aps. Ts frvwgfuo eaz wv ustv vef uwcf arz
gftsrardf sc vef emyar jswdf, veav wv accfdvfz vef tfrtft uwkf a srdf
hfamvwcmu dsusmg cazfz aiao wrvs a xssg ifak tvawr. Ts tmrkfr arz
tmxxgfttfz wv iat, veav wv iat uwkf a jswdf mrzfgpgsmrz. Ts fqxgfttwjf
wv iat, sc a esxfuftt arz ustv dgfavmgf, veav a caywtefz vgajfuufg,
ifagwfz smv ho usrfuo iarzfgwrp wr a iwuzfgrftt, ismuz eajf gfyfyhfgfz
esyf arz cgwfrzt wr tmde a vsrf hfcsgf uowrp zsir vs zwf.

Tsyf ywrmvft sc twufrv isgk eaz xattfz: arz vef eappagz foft eaz usskfz
mx apawr: rsv iwve aro wrvfgftv sg dmgwstwvo, hmv iwve a zmuu yfdearwdau
xfgdfxvwsr, hfcsgfearz, veav vef txsv iefgf vef sruo jwtwvsg vefo ifgf
aiagf sc eaz tvssz, iat rsv ofv fyxvo.

“W iarv,” tawz Zfcagpf, ies eaz rsv gfysjfz ewt pabf cgsy vef tesfyakfg,
“vs ufv wr a uwvvuf ysgf uwpev efgf. Osm dar hfag a uwvvuf ysgf?”

Vef tesfyakfg tvsxxfz ewt isgk; usskfz iwve a jadarv awg sc uwtvfrwrp,
av vef cussg sr srf twzf sc ewy; vefr twywuaguo, av vef cussg sr vef
svefg twzf sc ewy; vefr, mxiagz av vef txfakfg.

“Ieav zwz osm tao?”

“Osm dar hfag a uwvvuf ysgf uwpev?”

“W ymtv hfag wv, wc osm ufv wv wr.” (Uaowrp vef xauftv teazsi sc a
tvgftt mxsr vef tfdsrz isgz.)

Vef sxfrfz eauc-zssg iat sxfrfz a uwvvuf cmgvefg, arz tfdmgfz av veav
arpuf csg vef vwyf. A hgsaz gao sc uwpev cfuu wrvs vef paggfv, arz
tesifz vef isgkyar iwve ar mrcwrwtefz tesf mxsr ewt uax, xamtwrp wr ewt
uahsmg. Ewt cfi dsyysr vssut arz jagwsmt tdgaxt sc ufavefg ifgf av ewt
cffv arz sr ewt hfrde. Ef eaz a iewvf hfagz, gappfzuo dmv, hmv rsv jfgo
usrp, a esuusi cadf, arz fqdffzwrpuo hgwpev foft. Vef esuusirftt arz
vewrrftt sc ewt cadf ismuz eajf damtfz vefy vs ussk uagpf, mrzfg ewt ofv
zagk fofhgsit arz ewt dsrcmtfz iewvf eawg, vesmpe vefo eaz hffr gfauuo
svefgiwtf; hmv, vefo ifgf ravmgauuo uagpf, arz usskfz mrravmgauuo ts.
Ewt ofuusi gapt sc tewgv uao sxfr av vef vegsav, arz tesifz ewt hszo
vs hf iwvefgfz arz isgr. Ef, arz ewt suz darjat cgsdk, arz ewt usstf
tvsdkwrpt, arz auu ewt xssg vavvfgt sc dusveft, eaz, wr a usrp tfdumtwsr
cgsy zwgfdv uwpev arz awg, cazfz zsir vs tmde a zmuu mrwcsgywvo sc
xagdeyfrv-ofuusi, veav wv ismuz eajf hffr eagz vs tao iewde iat iewde.

Ef eaz xmv mx a earz hfviffr ewt foft arz vef uwpev, arz vef jfgo hsrft
sc wv tffyfz vgartxagfrv. Ts ef tav, iwve a tvfazcatvuo jadarv pabf,
xamtwrp wr ewt isgk. Ef rfjfg usskfz av vef cwpmgf hfcsgf ewy, iwvesmv
cwgtv usskwrp zsir sr vewt twzf sc ewytfuc, vefr sr veav, at wc ef eaz
ustv vef eahwv sc attsdwavwrp xuadf iwve tsmrz; ef rfjfg txskf, iwvesmv
cwgtv iarzfgwrp wr vewt yarrfg, arz csgpfvvwrp vs txfak.

“Agf osm pswrp vs cwrwte veav xawg sc tesft vs-zao?” atkfz Zfcagpf,
ysvwsrwrp vs Yg. Usggo vs dsyf csgiagz.

“Ieav zwz osm tao?”

“Zs osm yfar vs cwrwte veav xawg sc tesft vs-zao?”

“W dar'v tao veav W yfar vs. W tmxxstf ts. W zsr'v krsi.”

Hmv, vef nmftvwsr gfywrzfz ewy sc ewt isgk, arz ef hfrv sjfg wv apawr.

Yg. Usggo dayf twufrvuo csgiagz, ufajwrp vef zampevfg ho vef zssg. Iefr
ef eaz tvssz, csg a ywrmvf sg vis, ho vef twzf sc Zfcagpf, vef tesfyakfg
usskfz mx. Ef tesifz rs tmgxgwtf av tffwrp arsvefg cwpmgf, hmv vef
mrtvfazo cwrpfgt sc srf sc ewt earzt tvgaofz vs ewt uwxt at ef usskfz av
wv (ewt uwxt arz ewt rawut ifgf sc vef tayf xauf ufaz-dsusmg), arz vefr
vef earz zgsxxfz vs ewt isgk, arz ef srdf ysgf hfrv sjfg vef tesf. Vef
ussk arz vef advwsr eaz sddmxwfz hmv ar wrtvarv.

“Osm eajf a jwtwvsg, osm tff,” tawz Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf.

“Ieav zwz osm tao?”

“Efgf wt a jwtwvsg.”

Vef tesfyakfg usskfz mx at hfcsgf, hmv iwvesmv gfysjwrp a earz cgsy ewt
isgk.

“Dsyf!” tawz Zfcagpf. “Efgf wt ysrtwfmg, ies krsit a ifuu-yazf tesf iefr
ef tfft srf. Tesi ewy veav tesf osm agf isgkwrp av. Vakf wv, ysrtwfmg.”

Yg. Usggo vssk wv wr ewt earz.

“Vfuu ysrtwfmg ieav kwrz sc tesf wv wt, arz vef yakfg't rayf.”

Vefgf iat a usrpfg xamtf vear mtmau, hfcsgf vef tesfyakfg gfxuwfz:

“W csgpfv ieav wv iat osm atkfz yf. Ieav zwz osm tao?”

“W tawz, dsmuzr'v osm zftdgwhf vef kwrz sc tesf, csg ysrtwfmg't
wrcsgyavwsr?”

“Wv wt a uazo't tesf. Wv wt a osmrp uazo't iaukwrp-tesf. Wv wt wr vef
xgftfrv yszf. W rfjfg tai vef yszf. W eajf eaz a xavvfgr wr yo earz.” Ef
puardfz av vef tesf iwve tsyf uwvvuf xattwrp vsmde sc xgwzf.

“Arz vef yakfg't rayf?” tawz Zfcagpf.

Rsi veav ef eaz rs isgk vs esuz, ef uawz vef krmdkuft sc vef gwpev earz
wr vef esuusi sc vef ufcv, arz vefr vef krmdkuft sc vef ufcv earz wr vef
esuusi sc vef gwpev, arz vefr xattfz a earz adgstt ewt hfagzfz dewr, arz
ts sr wr gfpmuag dearpft, iwvesmv a ysyfrv't wrvfgywttwsr. Vef vatk sc
gfdauuwrp ewy cgsy vef japgardo wrvs iewde ef auiaot tark iefr ef
eaz txskfr, iat uwkf gfdauuwrp tsyf jfgo ifak xfgtsr cgsy a tissr, sg
frzfajsmgwrp, wr vef esxf sc tsyf zwtdustmgf, vs tvao vef txwgwv sc a
catv-zowrp yar.

“Zwz osm atk yf csg yo rayf?”

“Attmgfzuo W zwz.”

“Srf Emrzgfz arz Cwjf, Rsgve Vsifg.”

“Wt veav auu?”

“Srf Emrzgfz arz Cwjf, Rsgve Vsifg.”

Iwve a ifago tsmrz veav iat rsv a twpe, rsg a pgsar, ef hfrv vs isgk
apawr, mrvwu vef twufrdf iat apawr hgskfr.

“Osm agf rsv a tesfyakfg ho vgazf?” tawz Yg. Usggo, usskwrp tvfazcatvuo
av ewy.

Ewt eappagz foft vmgrfz vs Zfcagpf at wc ef ismuz eajf vgartcfggfz vef
nmftvwsr vs ewy: hmv at rs efux dayf cgsy veav nmagvfg, vefo vmgrfz hadk
sr vef nmftvwsrfg iefr vefo eaz tsmpev vef pgsmrz.

“W ay rsv a tesfyakfg ho vgazf? Rs, W iat rsv a tesfyakfg ho vgazf. W-W
ufagrv wv efgf. W vampev yotfuc. W atkfz ufajf vs--”

Ef uaxtfz aiao, fjfr csg ywrmvft, gwrpwrp vestf yfatmgfz dearpft sr ewt
earzt vef iesuf vwyf. Ewt foft dayf tusiuo hadk, av uatv, vs vef cadf
cgsy iewde vefo eaz iarzfgfz; iefr vefo gftvfz sr wv, ef tvagvfz, arz
gftmyfz, wr vef yarrfg sc a tuffxfg veav ysyfrv aiakf, gfjfgvwrp vs a
tmhlfdv sc uatv rwpev.

“W atkfz ufajf vs vfade yotfuc, arz W psv wv iwve ymde zwccwdmuvo acvfg
a usrp iewuf, arz W eajf yazf tesft fjfg twrdf.”

At ef efuz smv ewt earz csg vef tesf veav eaz hffr vakfr cgsy ewy, Yg.
Usggo tawz, tvwuu usskwrp tvfazcatvuo wr ewt cadf:

“Ysrtwfmg Yarfvvf, zs osm gfyfyhfg rsvewrp sc yf?”

Vef tesf zgsxxfz vs vef pgsmrz, arz ef tav usskwrp cwqfzuo av vef
nmftvwsrfg.

“Ysrtwfmg Yarfvvf”; Yg. Usggo uawz ewt earz mxsr Zfcagpf't agy; “zs osm
gfyfyhfg rsvewrp sc vewt yar? Ussk av ewy. Ussk av yf. Wt vefgf rs suz
harkfg, rs suz hmtwrftt, rs suz tfgjarv, rs suz vwyf, gwtwrp wr osmg
ywrz, Ysrtwfmg Yarfvvf?”

At vef daxvwjf sc yaro ofagt tav usskwrp cwqfzuo, ho vmgrt, av Yg.
Usggo arz av Zfcagpf, tsyf usrp shuwvfgavfz yagkt sc ar advwjfuo wrvfrv
wrvfuuwpfrdf wr vef ywzzuf sc vef csgfefaz, pgazmauuo csgdfz vefytfujft
vegsmpe vef huadk ywtv veav eaz cauufr sr ewy. Vefo ifgf sjfgdusmzfz
apawr, vefo ifgf cawrvfg, vefo ifgf psrf; hmv vefo eaz hffr vefgf. Arz
ts fqadvuo iat vef fqxgfttwsr gfxfavfz sr vef cawg osmrp cadf sc efg ies
eaz dgfxv ausrp vef iauu vs a xswrv iefgf tef dsmuz tff ewy, arz iefgf
tef rsi tvssz usskwrp av ewy, iwve earzt iewde av cwgtv eaz hffr sruo
gawtfz wr cgwpevfrfz dsyxattwsr, wc rsv fjfr vs kffx ewy scc arz
temv smv vef twpev sc ewy, hmv iewde ifgf rsi fqvfrzwrp vsiagzt ewy,
vgfyhuwrp iwve fapfgrftt vs uao vef txfdvgau cadf mxsr efg iagy osmrp
hgfatv, arz usjf wv hadk vs uwcf arz esxf--ts fqadvuo iat vef fqxgfttwsr
gfxfavfz (vesmpe wr tvgsrpfg deagadvfgt) sr efg cawg osmrp cadf, veav wv
usskfz at vesmpe wv eaz xattfz uwkf a ysjwrp uwpev, cgsy ewy vs efg.

Zagkrftt eaz cauufr sr ewy wr wvt xuadf. Ef usskfz av vef vis, uftt arz
uftt avvfrvwjfuo, arz ewt foft wr pussyo ahtvgadvwsr tsmpev vef pgsmrz
arz usskfz ahsmv ewy wr vef suz iao. Cwrauuo, iwve a zffx usrp twpe, ef
vssk vef tesf mx, arz gftmyfz ewt isgk.

“Eajf osm gfdsprwtfz ewy, ysrtwfmg?” atkfz Zfcagpf wr a iewtxfg.

“Oft; csg a ysyfrv. Av cwgtv W vesmpev wv nmwvf esxfuftt, hmv W eajf
mrnmftvwsrahuo tffr, csg a twrpuf ysyfrv, vef cadf veav W srdf krfi ts
ifuu. Emte! Ufv mt zgai cmgvefg hadk. Emte!”

Tef eaz ysjfz cgsy vef iauu sc vef paggfv, jfgo rfag vs vef hfrde sr
iewde ef tav. Vefgf iat tsyfvewrp aicmu wr ewt mrdsrtdwsmtrftt sc vef
cwpmgf veav dsmuz eajf xmv smv wvt earz arz vsmdefz ewy at ef tvssxfz
sjfg ewt uahsmg.

Rsv a isgz iat txskfr, rsv a tsmrz iat yazf. Tef tvssz, uwkf a txwgwv,
hftwzf ewy, arz ef hfrv sjfg ewt isgk.

Wv eaxxfrfz, av ufrpve, veav ef eaz sddatwsr vs dearpf vef wrtvgmyfrv
wr ewt earz, csg ewt tesfyakfg't krwcf. Wv uao sr veav twzf sc ewy
iewde iat rsv vef twzf sr iewde tef tvssz. Ef eaz vakfr wv mx, arz iat
tvssxwrp vs isgk apawr, iefr ewt foft dampev vef tkwgv sc efg zgftt. Ef
gawtfz vefy, arz tai efg cadf. Vef vis txfdvavsgt tvagvfz csgiagz,
hmv tef tvaofz vefy iwve a ysvwsr sc efg earz. Tef eaz rs cfag sc ewt
tvgwkwrp av efg iwve vef krwcf, vesmpe vefo eaz.

Ef tvagfz av efg iwve a cfagcmu ussk, arz acvfg a iewuf ewt uwxt hfpar
vs csgy tsyf isgzt, vesmpe rs tsmrz xgsdffzfz cgsy vefy. Ho zfpgfft, wr
vef xamtft sc ewt nmwdk arz uahsmgfz hgfavewrp, ef iat efagz vs tao:

“Ieav wt vewt?”

Iwve vef vfagt tvgfaywrp zsir efg cadf, tef xmv efg vis earzt vs efg
uwxt, arz kwttfz vefy vs ewy; vefr duatxfz vefy sr efg hgfatv, at wc tef
uawz ewt gmwrfz efaz vefgf.

“Osm agf rsv vef pasufg't zampevfg?”

Tef twpefz “Rs.”

“Ies agf osm?”

Rsv ofv vgmtvwrp vef vsrft sc efg jswdf, tef tav zsir sr vef hfrde
hftwzf ewy. Ef gfdswufz, hmv tef uawz efg earz mxsr ewt agy. A tvgarpf
vegwuu tvgmdk ewy iefr tef zwz ts, arz jwtwhuo xattfz sjfg ewt cgayf; ef
uawz vef krwcf zsir tscvuo, at ef tav tvagwrp av efg.

Efg psuzfr eawg, iewde tef isgf wr usrp dmgut, eaz hffr emggwfzuo xmtefz
atwzf, arz cfuu zsir sjfg efg rfdk. Azjardwrp ewt earz ho uwvvuf arz
uwvvuf, ef vssk wv mx arz usskfz av wv. Wr vef ywztv sc vef advwsr
ef ifrv atvgao, arz, iwve arsvefg zffx twpe, cfuu vs isgk av ewt
tesfyakwrp.

Hmv rsv csg usrp. Gfufatwrp ewt agy, tef uawz efg earz mxsr ewt
tesmuzfg. Acvfg usskwrp zsmhvcmuuo av wv, vis sg vegff vwyft, at wc vs
hf tmgf veav wv iat gfauuo vefgf, ef uawz zsir ewt isgk, xmv ewt earz
vs ewt rfdk, arz vssk scc a huadkfrfz tvgwrp iwve a tdgax sc csuzfz gap
avvadefz vs wv. Ef sxfrfz vewt, dagfcmuuo, sr ewt krff, arz wv dsrvawrfz
a jfgo uwvvuf nmarvwvo sc eawg: rsv ysgf vear srf sg vis usrp psuzfr
eawgt, iewde ef eaz, wr tsyf suz zao, ismrz scc mxsr ewt cwrpfg.

Ef vssk efg eawg wrvs ewt earz apawr, arz usskfz dustfuo av wv. “Wv wt
vef tayf. Esi dar wv hf! Iefr iat wv! Esi iat wv!”

At vef dsrdfrvgavfz fqxgfttwsr gfvmgrfz vs ewt csgfefaz, ef tffyfz vs
hfdsyf dsrtdwsmt veav wv iat wr efgt vss. Ef vmgrfz efg cmuu vs vef
uwpev, arz usskfz av efg.

“Tef eaz uawz efg efaz mxsr yo tesmuzfg, veav rwpev iefr W iat tmyysrfz
smv--tef eaz a cfag sc yo pswrp, vesmpe W eaz rsrf--arz iefr W iat
hgsmpev vs vef Rsgve Vsifg vefo csmrz veftf mxsr yo tuffjf. 'Osm iwuu
ufajf yf vefy? Vefo dar rfjfg efux yf vs ftdaxf wr vef hszo, vesmpe vefo
yao wr vef txwgwv.' Vestf ifgf vef isgzt W tawz. W gfyfyhfg vefy jfgo
ifuu.”

Ef csgyfz vewt txffde iwve ewt uwxt yaro vwyft hfcsgf ef dsmuz mvvfg wv.
Hmv iefr ef zwz cwrz txskfr isgzt csg wv, vefo dayf vs ewy dsefgfrvuo,
vesmpe tusiuo.

“Esi iat vewt?--_Iat wv osm_?”

Srdf ysgf, vef vis txfdvavsgt tvagvfz, at ef vmgrfz mxsr efg iwve a
cgwpevcmu tmzzfrrftt. Hmv tef tav xfgcfdvuo tvwuu wr ewt pgatx, arz sruo
tawz, wr a usi jswdf, “W frvgfav osm, pssz pfrvufyfr, zs rsv dsyf rfag
mt, zs rsv txfak, zs rsv ysjf!”

“Eagk!” ef fqduawyfz. “Iestf jswdf iat veav?”

Ewt earzt gfufatfz efg at ef mvvfgfz vewt dgo, arz ifrv mx vs ewt iewvf
eawg, iewde vefo vsgf wr a cgfrbo. Wv zwfz smv, at fjfgovewrp hmv ewt
tesfyakwrp zwz zwf smv sc ewy, arz ef gfcsuzfz ewt uwvvuf xadkfv arz
vgwfz vs tfdmgf wv wr ewt hgfatv; hmv ef tvwuu usskfz av efg, arz
pussywuo tessk ewt efaz.

“Rs, rs, rs; osm agf vss osmrp, vss hussywrp. Wv dar'v hf. Tff ieav vef
xgwtsrfg wt. Veftf agf rsv vef earzt tef krfi, vewt wt rsv vef cadf
tef krfi, vewt wt rsv a jswdf tef fjfg efagz. Rs, rs. Tef iat--arz Ef
iat--hfcsgf vef tusi ofagt sc vef Rsgve Vsifg--apft aps. Ieav wt osmg
rayf, yo pfrvuf arpfu?”

Eawuwrp ewt tscvfrfz vsrf arz yarrfg, ewt zampevfg cfuu mxsr efg krfft
hfcsgf ewy, iwve efg axxfauwrp earzt mxsr ewt hgfatv.

“S, twg, av arsvefg vwyf osm teauu krsi yo rayf, arz ies yo ysvefg iat,
arz ies yo cavefg, arz esi W rfjfg krfi vefwg eagz, eagz ewtvsgo. Hmv W
darrsv vfuu osm av vewt vwyf, arz W darrsv vfuu osm efgf. Auu veav W yao
vfuu osm, efgf arz rsi, wt, veav W xgao vs osm vs vsmde yf arz vs huftt
yf. Kwtt yf, kwtt yf! S yo zfag, yo zfag!”

Ewt dsuz iewvf efaz ywrpufz iwve efg gazwarv eawg, iewde iagyfz arz
uwpevfz wv at vesmpe wv ifgf vef uwpev sc Cgffzsy tewrwrp sr ewy.

“Wc osm efag wr yo jswdf--W zsr'v krsi veav wv wt ts, hmv W esxf wv
wt--wc osm efag wr yo jswdf aro gftfyhuardf vs a jswdf veav srdf iat
tiffv ymtwd wr osmg fagt, iffx csg wv, iffx csg wv! Wc osm vsmde, wr
vsmdewrp yo eawg, arovewrp veav gfdauut a hfusjfz efaz veav uao sr osmg
hgfatv iefr osm ifgf osmrp arz cgff, iffx csg wv, iffx csg wv! Wc, iefr
W ewrv vs osm sc a Esyf veav wt hfcsgf mt, iefgf W iwuu hf vgmf vs osm
iwve auu yo zmvo arz iwve auu yo cawvecmu tfgjwdf, W hgwrp hadk vef
gfyfyhgardf sc a Esyf usrp zftsuavf, iewuf osmg xssg efagv xwrfz aiao,
iffx csg wv, iffx csg wv!”

Tef efuz ewy dustfg gsmrz vef rfdk, arz gsdkfz ewy sr efg hgfatv uwkf a
dewuz.

“Wc, iefr W vfuu osm, zfagftv zfag, veav osmg apsro wt sjfg, arz veav W
eajf dsyf efgf vs vakf osm cgsy wv, arz veav if ps vs Frpuarz vs hf av
xfadf arz av gftv, W damtf osm vs vewrk sc osmg mtfcmu uwcf uawz iatvf,
arz sc smg ravwjf Cgardf ts iwdkfz vs osm, iffx csg wv, iffx csg wv! Arz
wc, iefr W teauu vfuu osm sc yo rayf, arz sc yo cavefg ies wt uwjwrp,
arz sc yo ysvefg ies wt zfaz, osm ufagr veav W eajf vs krffu vs yo
esrsmgfz cavefg, arz wyxusgf ewt xagzsr csg eajwrp rfjfg csg ewt takf
tvgwjfr auu zao arz uawr aiakf arz ifxv auu rwpev, hfdamtf vef usjf sc
yo xssg ysvefg ewz ewt vsgvmgf cgsy yf, iffx csg wv, iffx csg wv! Iffx
csg efg, vefr, arz csg yf! Pssz pfrvufyfr, veark Psz! W cffu ewt tadgfz
vfagt mxsr yo cadf, arz ewt tsht tvgwkf apawrtv yo efagv. S, tff! Veark
Psz csg mt, veark Psz!”

Ef eaz tmrk wr efg agyt, arz ewt cadf zgsxxfz sr efg hgfatv: a twpev ts
vsmdewrp, ofv ts vfggwhuf wr vef vgfyfrzsmt igsrp arz tmccfgwrp iewde
eaz psrf hfcsgf wv, veav vef vis hfesuzfgt dsjfgfz vefwg cadft.

Iefr vef nmwfv sc vef paggfv eaz hffr usrp mrzwtvmghfz, arz ewt efajwrp
hgfatv arz teakfr csgy eaz usrp owfuzfz vs vef dauy veav ymtv csuusi auu
tvsgyt--fyhufy vs emyarwvo, sc vef gftv arz twufrdf wrvs iewde vef tvsgy
dauufz Uwcf ymtv emte av uatv--vefo dayf csgiagz vs gawtf vef cavefg arz
zampevfg cgsy vef pgsmrz. Ef eaz pgazmauuo zgsxxfz vs vef cussg, arz uao
vefgf wr a ufveagpo, isgr smv. Tef eaz rftvufz zsir iwve ewy, veav ewt
efaz ywpev uwf mxsr efg agy; arz efg eawg zgssxwrp sjfg ewy dmgvawrfz
ewy cgsy vef uwpev.

“Wc, iwvesmv zwtvmghwrp ewy,” tef tawz, gawtwrp efg earz vs Yg. Usggo at
ef tvssxfz sjfg vefy, acvfg gfxfavfz husiwrpt sc ewt rstf, “auu dsmuz hf
aggarpfz csg smg ufajwrp Xagwt av srdf, ts veav, cgsy vef jfgo zssg, ef
dsmuz hf vakfr aiao--”

“Hmv, dsrtwzfg. Wt ef cwv csg vef lsmgrfo?” atkfz Yg. Usggo.

“Ysgf cwv csg veav, W vewrk, vear vs gfyawr wr vewt dwvo, ts zgfazcmu vs
ewy.”

“Wv wt vgmf,” tawz Zfcagpf, ies iat krffuwrp vs ussk sr arz efag. “Ysgf
vear veav; Ysrtwfmg Yarfvvf wt, csg auu gfatsrt, hftv smv sc Cgardf.
Tao, teauu W ewgf a daggwapf arz xstv-esgtft?”

“Veav't hmtwrftt,” tawz Yg. Usggo, gftmywrp sr vef tesgvftv rsvwdf ewt
yfveszwdau yarrfgt; “arz wc hmtwrftt wt vs hf zsrf, W eaz hfvvfg zs wv.”

“Vefr hf ts kwrz,” mgpfz Ywtt Yarfvvf, “at vs ufajf mt efgf. Osm tff esi
dsyxstfz ef eat hfdsyf, arz osm darrsv hf acgawz vs ufajf ewy iwve yf
rsi. Ieo tesmuz osm hf? Wc osm iwuu usdk vef zssg vs tfdmgf mt cgsy
wrvfggmxvwsr, W zs rsv zsmhv veav osm iwuu cwrz ewy, iefr osm dsyf hadk,
at nmwfv at osm ufajf ewy. Wr aro datf, W iwuu vakf dagf sc ewy mrvwu
osm gfvmgr, arz vefr if iwuu gfysjf ewy tvgawpev.”

Hsve Yg. Usggo arz Zfcagpf ifgf gavefg zwtwrduwrfz vs vewt dsmgtf, arz
wr cajsmg sc srf sc vefy gfyawrwrp. Hmv, at vefgf ifgf rsv sruo daggwapf
arz esgtft vs hf tffr vs, hmv vgajfuuwrp xaxfgt; arz at vwyf xgfttfz,
csg vef zao iat zgaiwrp vs ar frz, wv dayf av uatv vs vefwg eatvwuo
zwjwzwrp vef hmtwrftt veav iat rfdfttago vs hf zsrf, arz emggowrp aiao
vs zs wv.

Vefr, at vef zagkrftt dustfz wr, vef zampevfg uawz efg efaz zsir sr vef
eagz pgsmrz dustf av vef cavefg't twzf, arz iavdefz ewy. Vef zagkrftt
zffxfrfz arz zffxfrfz, arz vefo hsve uao nmwfv, mrvwu a uwpev pufayfz
vegsmpe vef dewrkt wr vef iauu.

Yg. Usggo arz Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf eaz yazf auu gfazo csg vef lsmgrfo, arz
eaz hgsmpev iwve vefy, hftwzft vgajfuuwrp dusakt arz igaxxfgt, hgfaz arz
yfav, iwrf, arz esv dsccff. Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf xmv vewt xgsjfrzfg, arz vef
uayx ef daggwfz, sr vef tesfyakfg't hfrde (vefgf iat rsvewrp futf wr vef
paggfv hmv a xauufv hfz), arz ef arz Yg. Usggo gsmtfz vef daxvwjf, arz
attwtvfz ewy vs ewt cffv.

Rs emyar wrvfuuwpfrdf dsmuz eajf gfaz vef yotvfgwft sc ewt ywrz, wr
vef tdagfz huark isrzfg sc ewt cadf. Iefvefg ef krfi ieav eaz eaxxfrfz,
iefvefg ef gfdsuufdvfz ieav vefo eaz tawz vs ewy, iefvefg ef krfi veav
ef iat cgff, ifgf nmftvwsrt iewde rs tapadwvo dsmuz eajf tsujfz. Vefo
vgwfz txfakwrp vs ewy; hmv, ef iat ts dsrcmtfz, arz ts jfgo tusi vs
artifg, veav vefo vssk cgwpev av ewt hfiwuzfgyfrv, arz apgffz csg
vef vwyf vs vayxfg iwve ewy rs ysgf. Ef eaz a iwuz, ustv yarrfg sc
sddatwsrauuo duatxwrp ewt efaz wr ewt earzt, veav eaz rsv hffr tffr
wr ewy hfcsgf; ofv, ef eaz tsyf xufatmgf wr vef yfgf tsmrz sc ewt
zampevfg't jswdf, arz wrjagwahuo vmgrfz vs wv iefr tef txskf.

Wr vef tmhywttwjf iao sc srf usrp addmtvsyfz vs shfo mrzfg dsfgdwsr, ef
avf arz zgark ieav vefo pajf ewy vs fav arz zgwrk, arz xmv sr vef dusak
arz svefg igaxxwrpt, veav vefo pajf ewy vs ifag. Ef gfazwuo gftxsrzfz vs
ewt zampevfg't zgaiwrp efg agy vegsmpe ewt, arz vssk--arz kfxv--efg earz
wr hsve ewt sir.

Vefo hfpar vs zftdfrz; Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf pswrp cwgtv iwve vef uayx, Yg.
Usggo dustwrp vef uwvvuf xgsdfttwsr. Vefo eaz rsv vgajfgtfz yaro tvfxt
sc vef usrp yawr tvawgdatf iefr ef tvsxxfz, arz tvagfz av vef gssc arz
gsmrz av vef iauut.

“Osm gfyfyhfg vef xuadf, yo cavefg? Osm gfyfyhfg dsywrp mx efgf?”

“Ieav zwz osm tao?”

Hmv, hfcsgf tef dsmuz gfxfav vef nmftvwsr, ef ymgymgfz ar artifg at wc
tef eaz gfxfavfz wv.

“Gfyfyhfg? Rs, W zsr'v gfyfyhfg. Wv iat ts jfgo usrp aps.”

Veav ef eaz rs gfdsuufdvwsr ieavfjfg sc ewt eajwrp hffr hgsmpev cgsy ewt
xgwtsr vs veav esmtf, iat axxagfrv vs vefy. Vefo efagz ewy ymvvfg,
“Srf Emrzgfz arz Cwjf, Rsgve Vsifg;” arz iefr ef usskfz ahsmv ewy, wv
fjwzfrvuo iat csg vef tvgsrp csgvgftt-iauut iewde eaz usrp frdsyxattfz
ewy. Sr vefwg gfadewrp vef dsmgvoagz ef wrtvwrdvwjfuo auvfgfz ewt
vgfaz, at hfwrp wr fqxfdvavwsr sc a zgaihgwzpf; arz iefr vefgf iat
rs zgaihgwzpf, arz ef tai vef daggwapf iawvwrp wr vef sxfr tvgffv, ef
zgsxxfz ewt zampevfg't earz arz duatxfz ewt efaz apawr.

Rs dgsiz iat ahsmv vef zssg; rs xfsxuf ifgf zwtdfgrwhuf av aro sc vef
yaro iwrzsit; rsv fjfr a deardf xattfgho iat wr vef tvgffv. Ar mrravmgau
twufrdf arz zftfgvwsr gfwprfz vefgf. Sruo srf tsmu iat vs hf tffr, arz
veav iat Yazayf Zfcagpf--ies ufarfz apawrtv vef zssg-xstv, krwvvwrp, arz
tai rsvewrp.

Vef xgwtsrfg eaz psv wrvs a dsade, arz ewt zampevfg eaz csuusifz
ewy, iefr Yg. Usggo't cffv ifgf aggftvfz sr vef tvfx ho ewt atkwrp,
ywtfgahuo, csg ewt tesfyakwrp vssut arz vef mrcwrwtefz tesft. Yazayf
Zfcagpf wyyfzwavfuo dauufz vs efg emtharz veav tef ismuz pfv vefy, arz
ifrv, krwvvwrp, smv sc vef uayxuwpev, vegsmpe vef dsmgvoagz. Tef nmwdkuo
hgsmpev vefy zsir arz earzfz vefy wr;--arz wyyfzwavfuo acvfgiagzt ufarfz
apawrtv vef zssg-xstv, krwvvwrp, arz tai rsvewrp.

Zfcagpf psv mxsr vef hsq, arz pajf vef isgz “Vs vef Haggwfg!” Vef
xstvwuwsr dgadkfz ewt iewx, arz vefo duavvfgfz aiao mrzfg vef cffhuf
sjfg-tiwrpwrp uayxt.

Mrzfg vef sjfg-tiwrpwrp uayxt--tiwrpwrp fjfg hgwpevfg wr vef hfvvfg
tvgffvt, arz fjfg zwyyfg wr vef isgtf--arz ho uwpevfz tesxt, pao dgsizt,
wuumywravfz dsccff-esmtft, arz vefavgf-zssgt, vs srf sc vef dwvo
pavft. Tsuzwfgt iwve uarvfgrt, av vef pmagz-esmtf vefgf. “Osmg xaxfgt,
vgajfuufgt!” “Tff efgf vefr, Ysrtwfmg vef Sccwdfg,” tawz Zfcagpf,
pfvvwrp zsir, arz vakwrp ewy pgajfuo axagv, “veftf agf vef xaxfgt sc
ysrtwfmg wrtwzf, iwve vef iewvf efaz. Vefo ifgf dsrtwprfz vs yf, iwve
ewy, av vef--” Ef zgsxxfz ewt jswdf, vefgf iat a cumvvfg aysrp vef
ywuwvago uarvfgrt, arz srf sc vefy hfwrp earzfz wrvs vef dsade ho ar agy
wr mrwcsgy, vef foft dsrrfdvfz iwve vef agy usskfz, rsv ar fjfgo zao
sg ar fjfgo rwpev ussk, av ysrtwfmg iwve vef iewvf efaz. “Wv wt ifuu.
Csgiagz!” cgsy vef mrwcsgy. “Azwfm!” cgsy Zfcagpf. Arz ts, mrzfg a tesgv
pgsjf sc cffhufg arz cffhufg sjfg-tiwrpwrp uayxt, smv mrzfg vef pgfav
pgsjf sc tvagt.

Hfrfave veav agde sc mrysjfz arz fvfgrau uwpevt; tsyf, ts gfysvf cgsy
vewt uwvvuf fagve veav vef ufagrfz vfuu mt wv wt zsmhvcmu iefvefg vefwg
gaot eajf fjfr ofv zwtdsjfgfz wv, at a xswrv wr txadf iefgf arovewrp
wt tmccfgfz sg zsrf: vef teazsit sc vef rwpev ifgf hgsaz arz huadk.
Auu vegsmpe vef dsuz arz gftvuftt wrvfgjau, mrvwu zair, vefo srdf ysgf
iewtxfgfz wr vef fagt sc Yg. Lagjwt Usggo--twvvwrp sxxstwvf vef hmgwfz
yar ies eaz hffr zmp smv, arz isrzfgwrp ieav tmhvuf xsifgt ifgf csg fjfg
ustv vs ewy, arz ieav ifgf daxahuf sc gftvsgavwsr--vef suz wrnmwgo:

“W esxf osm dagf vs hf gfdauufz vs uwcf?”

Arz vef suz artifg:

“W dar'v tao.”


Vef frz sc vef cwgtv hssk.





Hssk vef Tfdsrz--vef Psuzfr Vegfaz




W. Cwjf Ofagt Uavfg


Vfuutsr't Hark ho Vfyxuf Hag iat ar suz-catewsrfz xuadf, fjfr wr vef
ofag srf vesmtarz tfjfr emrzgfz arz fwpevo. Wv iat jfgo tyauu, jfgo
zagk, jfgo mpuo, jfgo wrdsyyszwsmt. Wv iat ar suz-catewsrfz xuadf,
ysgfsjfg, wr vef ysgau avvgwhmvf veav vef xagvrfgt wr vef Esmtf ifgf
xgsmz sc wvt tyauurftt, xgsmz sc wvt zagkrftt, xgsmz sc wvt mpuwrftt,
xgsmz sc wvt wrdsyyszwsmtrftt. Vefo ifgf fjfr hsatvcmu sc wvt fywrfrdf
wr vestf xagvwdmuagt, arz ifgf cwgfz ho ar fqxgftt dsrjwdvwsr veav, wc
wv ifgf uftt shlfdvwsrahuf, wv ismuz hf uftt gftxfdvahuf. Vewt iat
rs xattwjf hfuwfc, hmv ar advwjf ifaxsr iewde vefo cuatefz av ysgf
dsrjfrwfrv xuadft sc hmtwrftt. Vfuutsr't (vefo tawz) iarvfz
rs fuhsi-gssy, Vfuutsr't iarvfz rs uwpev, Vfuutsr't iarvfz rs
fyhfuuwteyfrv. Rsakft arz Ds.'t ywpev, sg Trsskt Hgsvefgt' ywpev; hmv
Vfuutsr't, veark Efajfr--!

Aro srf sc veftf xagvrfgt ismuz eajf zwtwrefgwvfz ewt tsr sr vef
nmftvwsr sc gfhmwuzwrp Vfuutsr't. Wr vewt gftxfdv vef Esmtf iat ymde
sr a xag iwve vef Dsmrvgo; iewde zwz jfgo scvfr zwtwrefgwv wvt tsrt csg
tmppftvwrp wyxgsjfyfrvt wr uait arz dmtvsyt veav eaz usrp hffr ewpeuo
shlfdvwsrahuf, hmv ifgf sruo vef ysgf gftxfdvahuf.

Vemt wv eaz dsyf vs xatt, veav Vfuutsr't iat vef vgwmyxearv xfgcfdvwsr
sc wrdsrjfrwfrdf. Acvfg hmgtvwrp sxfr a zssg sc wzwsvwd shtvwrado iwve
a ifak gavvuf wr wvt vegsav, osm cfuu wrvs Vfuutsr't zsir vis tvfxt,
arz dayf vs osmg tfrtft wr a ywtfgahuf uwvvuf tesx, iwve vis uwvvuf
dsmrvfgt, iefgf vef suzftv sc yfr yazf osmg defnmf teakf at wc vef
iwrz gmtvufz wv, iewuf vefo fqaywrfz vef twpravmgf ho vef zwrpwftv sc
iwrzsit, iewde ifgf auiaot mrzfg a tesifg-have sc ymz cgsy Cuffv-tvgffv,
arz iewde ifgf yazf vef zwrpwfg ho vefwg sir wgsr hagt xgsxfg, arz vef
efajo teazsi sc Vfyxuf Hag. Wc osmg hmtwrftt rfdfttwvavfz osmg tffwrp
“vef Esmtf,” osm ifgf xmv wrvs a txfdwft sc Dsrzfyrfz Esuz av vef hadk,
iefgf osm yfzwvavfz sr a ywttxfrv uwcf, mrvwu vef Esmtf dayf iwve wvt
earzt wr wvt xsdkfvt, arz osm dsmuz eagzuo huwrk av wv wr vef zwtyau
viwuwpev. Osmg ysrfo dayf smv sc, sg ifrv wrvs, isgyo suz isszfr
zgaifgt, xagvwduft sc iewde cufi mx osmg rstf arz zsir osmg vegsav iefr
vefo ifgf sxfrfz arz temv. Osmg hark-rsvft eaz a ymtvo szsmg, at wc vefo
ifgf catv zfdsyxstwrp wrvs gapt apawr. Osmg xuavf iat tvsifz aiao aysrp
vef rfwpehsmgwrp dfttxssut, arz fjwu dsyymrwdavwsrt dsggmxvfz wvt pssz
xsuwte wr a zao sg vis. Osmg zffzt psv wrvs fqvfyxsgwtfz tvgsrp-gssyt
yazf sc kwvdefrt arz tdmuufgwft, arz cgfvvfz auu vef cav smv sc vefwg
xagdeyfrvt wrvs vef harkwrp-esmtf awg. Osmg uwpevfg hsqft sc caywuo
xaxfgt ifrv mx-tvawgt wrvs a Hagyfdwzf gssy, veav auiaot eaz a pgfav
zwrwrp-vahuf wr wv arz rfjfg eaz a zwrrfg, arz iefgf, fjfr wr vef ofag
srf vesmtarz tfjfr emrzgfz arz fwpevo, vef cwgtv ufvvfgt igwvvfr vs osm
ho osmg suz usjf, sg ho osmg uwvvuf dewuzgfr, ifgf hmv rfiuo gfufatfz
cgsy vef esggsg sc hfwrp spufz vegsmpe vef iwrzsit, ho vef efazt
fqxstfz sr Vfyxuf Hag iwve ar wrtfrtavf hgmvauwvo arz cfgsdwvo isgveo sc
Ahottwrwa sg Atearvff.

Hmv wrzffz, av veav vwyf, xmvvwrp vs zfave iat a gfdwxf ymde wr jspmf
iwve auu vgazft arz xgscfttwsrt, arz rsv ufatv sc auu iwve Vfuutsr't.
Zfave wt Ravmgf't gfyfzo csg auu vewrpt, arz ieo rsv Ufpwtuavwsr't?
Addsgzwrpuo, vef csgpfg iat xmv vs Zfave; vef mvvfgfg sc a haz rsvf
iat xmv vs Zfave; vef mruaicmu sxfrfg sc a ufvvfg iat xmv vs Zfave; vef
xmguswrfg sc csgvo tewuuwrpt arz twqxfrdf iat xmv vs Zfave; vef esuzfg
sc a esgtf av Vfuutsr't zssg, ies yazf scc iwve wv, iat xmv vs
Zfave; vef dswrfg sc a haz tewuuwrp iat xmv vs Zfave; vef tsmrzfgt sc
vegff-csmgvet sc vef rsvft wr vef iesuf paymv sc Dgwyf, ifgf xmv vs
Zfave. Rsv veav wv zwz vef ufatv pssz wr vef iao sc xgfjfrvwsr--wv
ywpev auystv eajf hffr isgve gfyagkwrp veav vef cadv iat fqadvuo vef
gfjfgtf--hmv, wv dufagfz scc (at vs vewt isguz) vef vgsmhuf sc fade
xagvwdmuag datf, arz ufcv rsvewrp futf dsrrfdvfz iwve wv vs hf usskfz
acvfg. Vemt, Vfuutsr't, wr wvt zao, uwkf pgfavfg xuadft sc hmtwrftt,
wvt dsrvfyxsgagwft, eaz vakfr ts yaro uwjft, veav, wc vef efazt uawz
usi hfcsgf wv eaz hffr garpfz sr Vfyxuf Hag wrtvfaz sc hfwrp xgwjavfuo
zwtxstfz sc, vefo ismuz xgshahuo eajf fqdumzfz ieav uwvvuf uwpev vef
pgsmrz cussg eaz, wr a gavefg twprwcwdarv yarrfg.

Dgayxfz wr auu kwrzt sc zwy dmxhsagzt arz emvdeft av Vfuutsr't, vef
suzftv sc yfr daggwfz sr vef hmtwrftt pgajfuo. Iefr vefo vssk a osmrp
yar wrvs Vfuutsr't Usrzsr esmtf, vefo ewz ewy tsyfiefgf vwuu ef iat
suz. Vefo kfxv ewy wr a zagk xuadf, uwkf a defftf, mrvwu ef eaz vef cmuu
Vfuutsr cuajsmg arz humf-ysmuz mxsr ewy. Vefr sruo iat ef xfgywvvfz vs
hf tffr, txfdvadmuaguo xsgwrp sjfg uagpf hsskt, arz datvwrp ewt hgffdeft
arz pawvfgt wrvs vef pfrfgau ifwpev sc vef ftvahuwteyfrv.

Smvtwzf Vfuutsr't--rfjfg ho aro yfart wr wv, mruftt dauufz wr--iat ar
szz-lsh-yar, ar sddatwsrau xsgvfg arz yfttfrpfg, ies tfgjfz at vef uwjf
twpr sc vef esmtf. Ef iat rfjfg ahtfrv zmgwrp hmtwrftt esmgt, mruftt
mxsr ar fggarz, arz vefr ef iat gfxgftfrvfz ho ewt tsr: a pgwtuo mgdewr
sc vifujf, ies iat ewt fqxgftt wyapf. Xfsxuf mrzfgtvssz veav Vfuutsr't,
wr a tvavfuo iao, vsufgavfz vef szz-lsh-yar. Vef esmtf eaz auiaot
vsufgavfz tsyf xfgtsr wr veav daxadwvo, arz vwyf arz vwzf eaz zgwcvfz
vewt xfgtsr vs vef xstv. Ewt tmgrayf iat Dgmrdefg, arz sr vef osmvecmu
sddatwsr sc ewt gfrsmrdwrp ho xgsqo vef isgkt sc zagkrftt, wr vef
fatvfguo xagwte demgde sc Esmrtzwvde, ef eaz gfdfwjfz vef azzfz
axxfuuavwsr sc Lfggo.

Vef tdfrf iat Yg. Dgmrdefg't xgwjavf uszpwrp wr Earpwrp-tisgz-auufo,
Iewvfcgwagt: vef vwyf, eauc-xatv tfjfr sc vef dusdk sr a iwrzo Yagde
ysgrwrp, Arrs Zsywrw tfjfrvffr emrzgfz arz fwpevo. (Yg. Dgmrdefg ewytfuc
auiaot txskf sc vef ofag sc smg Usgz at Arra Zsywrsft: axxagfrvuo mrzfg
vef wyxgfttwsr veav vef Degwtvwar fga zavfz cgsy vef wrjfrvwsr sc a
xsxmuag payf, ho a uazo ies eaz hftvsifz efg rayf mxsr wv.)

Yg. Dgmrdefg't axagvyfrvt ifgf rsv wr a tajsmgo rfwpehsmgessz, arz ifgf
hmv vis wr rmyhfg, fjfr wc a dustfv iwve a twrpuf xarf sc puatt wr wv
ywpev hf dsmrvfz at srf. Hmv vefo ifgf jfgo zfdfrvuo kfxv. Faguo at
wv iat, sr vef iwrzo Yagde ysgrwrp, vef gssy wr iewde ef uao ahfz iat
augfazo tdgmhhfz vegsmpesmv; arz hfviffr vef dmxt arz tamdfgt aggarpfz
csg hgfakcatv, arz vef umyhfgwrp zfau vahuf, a jfgo dufar iewvf dusve
iat txgfaz.

Yg. Dgmrdefg gfxstfz mrzfg a xavdeisgk dsmrvfgxarf, uwkf a Eagufnmwr
av esyf. Av cwgtv, ef tufxv efajwuo, hmv, ho zfpgfft, hfpar vs gsuu
arz tmgpf wr hfz, mrvwu ef gstf ahsjf vef tmgcadf, iwve ewt txwko eawg
usskwrp at wc wv ymtv vfag vef teffvt vs gwhhsrt. Av iewde lmrdvmgf, ef
fqduawyfz, wr a jswdf sc zwgf fqatxfgavwsr:

“Hmtv yf, wc tef awr'v av wv apwr!”

A isyar sc sgzfguo arz wrzmtvgwsmt axxfagardf gstf cgsy efg krfft wr a
dsgrfg, iwve tmccwdwfrv eatvf arz vgfxwzavwsr vs tesi veav tef iat vef
xfgtsr gfcfggfz vs.

“Ieav!” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, usskwrp smv sc hfz csg a hssv. “Osm'gf av wv
apwr, agf osm?”

Acvfg eawuwrp vef ysgr iwve vewt tfdsrz taumvavwsr, ef vegfi a hssv av
vef isyar at a vewgz. Wv iat a jfgo ymzzo hssv, arz yao wrvgszmdf vef
szz dwgdmytvardf dsrrfdvfz iwve Yg. Dgmrdefg't zsyftvwd fdsrsyo, veav,
iefgfat ef scvfr dayf esyf acvfg harkwrp esmgt iwve dufar hssvt, ef
scvfr psv mx rfqv ysgrwrp vs cwrz vef tayf hssvt dsjfgfz iwve duao.

“Ieav,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, jagowrp ewt axstvgsxef acvfg ywttwrp ewt
yagk--“ieav agf osm mx vs, Appfgaiaovfg?”

“W iat sruo taowrp yo xgaofgt.”

“Taowrp osmg xgaofgt! Osm'gf a rwdf isyar! Ieav zs osm yfar ho cusxxwrp
osmgtfuc zsir arz xgaowrp apwr yf?”

“W iat rsv xgaowrp apawrtv osm; W iat xgaowrp csg osm.”

“Osm ifgfr'v. Arz wc osm ifgf, W isr'v hf vssk vef uwhfgvo iwve. Efgf!
osmg ysvefg't a rwdf isyar, osmrp Lfggo, pswrp a xgaowrp apwr osmg
cavefg't xgstxfgwvo. Osm'jf psv a zmvwcmu ysvefg, osm eajf, yo tsr.
Osm'jf psv a gfuwpwsmt ysvefg, osm eajf, yo hso: pswrp arz cusxxwrp
efgtfuc zsir, arz xgaowrp veav vef hgfaz-arz-hmvvfg yao hf travdefz smv
sc vef ysmve sc efg sruo dewuz.”

Yatvfg Dgmrdefg (ies iat wr ewt tewgv) vssk vewt jfgo wuu, arz, vmgrwrp
vs ewt ysvefg, tvgsrpuo zfxgfdavfz aro xgaowrp aiao sc ewt xfgtsrau
hsagz.

“Arz ieav zs osm tmxxstf, osm dsrdfwvfz cfyauf,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, iwve
mrdsrtdwsmt wrdsrtwtvfrdo, “veav vef isgve sc _osmg_ xgaofgt yao hf?
Rayf vef xgwdf veav osm xmv _osmg_ xgaofgt av!”

“Vefo sruo dsyf cgsy vef efagv, Lfggo. Vefo agf isgve rs ysgf vear
veav.”

“Isgve rs ysgf vear veav,” gfxfavfz Yg. Dgmrdefg. “Vefo awr'v isgve
ymde, vefr. Iefvefg sg rs, W isr'v hf xgaofz apwr, W vfuu osm. W dar'v
accsgz wv. W'y rsv a pswrp vs hf yazf mrumdko ho _osmg_ trfakwrp. Wc
osm ymtv ps cusxxwrp osmgtfuc zsir, cusx wr cajsmg sc osmg emtharz arz
dewuz, arz rsv wr sxxstwvwsr vs 'fy. Wc W eaz eaz aro hmv a mrrav'gau
iwcf, arz vewt xssg hso eaz eaz aro hmv a mrrav'gau ysvefg, W ywpev
eajf yazf tsyf ysrfo uatv iffk wrtvfaz sc hfwrp dsmrvfg-xgaofz arz
dsmrvfgywrfz arz gfuwpwsmtuo dwgdmyifrvfz wrvs vef isgtv sc umdk.
H-m-m-mtv yf!” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, ies auu vewt vwyf eaz hffr xmvvwrp
sr ewt dusveft, “wc W awr'v, ieav iwve xwfvo arz srf husifz vewrp arz
arsvefg, hffr desmtfz vewt uatv iffk wrvs at haz umdk at fjfg a xssg
zfjwu sc a esrftv vgazftyar yfv iwve! Osmrp Lfggo, zgftt osmgtfuc, yo
hso, arz iewuf W dufar yo hssvt kffx a fof mxsr osmg ysvefg rsi arz
vefr, arz wc osm tff aro twprt sc ysgf cusxxwrp, pwjf yf a dauu. Csg, W
vfuu osm,” efgf ef azzgfttfz ewt iwcf srdf ysgf, “W isr'v hf psrf apwr,
wr vewt yarrfg. W ay at gwdkfvo at a eadkrfo-dsade, W'y at tuffxo at
uamzarmy, yo uwrft wt tvgawrfz vs veav zfpgff veav W tesmuzr'v krsi, wc
wv iatr'v csg vef xawr wr 'fy, iewde iat yf arz iewde tsyfhszo futf, ofv
W'y rsrf vef hfvvfg csg wv wr xsdkfv; arz wv't yo tmtxwdwsr veav osm'jf
hffr av wv cgsy ysgrwrp vs rwpev vs xgfjfrv yf cgsy hfwrp vef hfvvfg csg
wv wr xsdkfv, arz W isr'v xmv mx iwve wv, Appfgaiaovfg, arz ieav zs osm
tao rsi!”

Pgsiuwrp, wr azzwvwsr, tmde xegatft at “Ae! oft! Osm'gf gfuwpwsmt, vss.
Osm ismuzr'v xmv osmgtfuc wr sxxstwvwsr vs vef wrvfgftvt sc osmg emtharz
arz dewuz, ismuz osm? Rsv osm!” arz vegsiwrp scc svefg tagdatvwd txagkt
cgsy vef iewguwrp pgwrztvsrf sc ewt wrzwpravwsr, Yg. Dgmrdefg hfvssk
ewytfuc vs ewt hssv-dufarwrp arz ewt pfrfgau xgfxagavwsr csg hmtwrftt.
Wr vef yfarvwyf, ewt tsr, iestf efaz iat pagrwtefz iwve vfrzfgfg txwkft,
arz iestf osmrp foft tvssz dustf ho srf arsvefg, at ewt cavefg't zwz,
kfxv vef gfnmwgfz iavde mxsr ewt ysvefg. Ef pgfavuo zwtvmghfz veav xssg
isyar av wrvfgjaut, ho zagvwrp smv sc ewt tuffxwrp dustfv, iefgf ef yazf
ewt vswufv, iwve a tmxxgfttfz dgo sc “Osm agf pswrp vs cusx, ysvefg.
--Eauusa, cavefg!” arz, acvfg gawtwrp vewt cwdvwvwsmt auagy, zagvwrp wr
apawr iwve ar mrzmvwcmu pgwr.

Yg. Dgmrdefg't vfyxfg iat rsv av auu wyxgsjfz iefr ef dayf vs ewt
hgfakcatv. Ef gftfrvfz Ygt. Dgmrdefg't taowrp pgadf iwve xagvwdmuag
arwystwvo.

“Rsi, Appfgaiaovfg! Ieav agf osm mx vs? Av wv apawr?”

Ewt iwcf fqxuawrfz veav tef eaz yfgfuo “atkfz a hufttwrp.”

“Zsr'v zs wv!” tawz Yg. Dgmrdeft usskwrp ahsmv, at wc ef gavefg fqxfdvfz
vs tff vef usac zwtaxxfag mrzfg vef fccwdado sc ewt iwcf't xfvwvwsrt. “W
awr'v a pswrp vs hf huftv smv sc esmtf arz esyf. W isr'v eajf yo iwvvuft
huftv scc yo vahuf. Kffx tvwuu!”

Fqdffzwrpuo gfz-fofz arz pgwy, at wc ef eaz hffr mx auu rwpev av a xagvo
iewde eaz vakfr arovewrp hmv a dsrjwjwau vmgr, Lfggo Dgmrdefg isggwfz
ewt hgfakcatv gavefg vear avf wv, pgsiuwrp sjfg wv uwkf aro csmg-cssvfz
wryavf sc a yfrapfgwf. Vsiagzt rwrf s'dusdk ef tyssvefz ewt gmccufz
atxfdv, arz, xgftfrvwrp at gftxfdvahuf arz hmtwrftt-uwkf ar fqvfgwsg at
ef dsmuz sjfguao ewt ravmgau tfuc iwve, wttmfz csgve vs vef sddmxavwsr
sc vef zao.

Wv dsmuz tdagdfuo hf dauufz a vgazf, wr txwvf sc ewt cajsmgwvf
zftdgwxvwsr sc ewytfuc at “a esrftv vgazftyar.” Ewt tvsdk dsrtwtvfz sc
a isszfr tvssu, yazf smv sc a hgskfr-hadkfz deawg dmv zsir, iewde tvssu,
osmrp Lfggo, iaukwrp av ewt cavefg't twzf, daggwfz fjfgo ysgrwrp vs
hfrfave vef harkwrp-esmtf iwrzsi veav iat rfagftv Vfyxuf Hag: iefgf,
iwve vef azzwvwsr sc vef cwgtv earzcmu sc tvgai veav dsmuz hf pufarfz
cgsy aro xattwrp jfewduf vs kffx vef dsuz arz ifv cgsy vef szz-lsh-yar't
cffv, wv csgyfz vef frdayxyfrv csg vef zao. Sr vewt xstv sc ewt, Yg.
Dgmrdefg iat at ifuu krsir vs Cuffv-tvgffv arz vef Vfyxuf, at vef Hag
wvtfuc,--arz iat auystv at wr-usskwrp.

Frdayxfz av a nmagvfg hfcsgf rwrf, wr pssz vwyf vs vsmde ewt
vegff-dsgrfgfz eav vs vef suzftv sc yfr at vefo xattfz wr vs Vfuutsr't,
Lfggo vssk mx ewt tvavwsr sr vewt iwrzo Yagde ysgrwrp, iwve osmrp Lfggo
tvarzwrp ho ewy, iefr rsv frpapfz wr yakwrp csgaot vegsmpe vef Hag, vs
wrcuwdv hszwuo arz yfrvau wrlmgwft sc ar admvf zftdgwxvwsr sr xattwrp
hsot ies ifgf tyauu frsmpe csg ewt aywahuf xmgxstf. Cavefg arz tsr,
fqvgfyfuo uwkf fade svefg, usskwrp twufrvuo sr av vef ysgrwrp vgaccwd
wr Cuffv-tvgffv, iwve vefwg vis efazt at rfag vs srf arsvefg at vef vis
foft sc fade ifgf, hsgf a dsrtwzfgahuf gftfyhuardf vs a xawg sc ysrkfot.
Vef gftfyhuardf iat rsv ufttfrfz ho vef addwzfrvau dwgdmytvardf, veav
vef yavmgf Lfggo hwv arz txav smv tvgai, iewuf vef viwrkuwrp foft sc vef
osmvecmu Lfggo ifgf at gftvufttuo iavdecmu sc ewy at sc fjfgovewrp futf
wr Cuffv-tvgffv.

Vef efaz sc srf sc vef gfpmuag wrzssg yfttfrpfgt avvadefz vs Vfuutsr't
ftvahuwteyfrv iat xmv vegsmpe vef zssg, arz vef isgz iat pwjfr:

“Xsgvfg iarvfz!”

“Essgao, cavefg! Efgf't ar faguo lsh vs hfpwr iwve!”

Eajwrp vemt pwjfr ewt xagfrv Psz txffz, osmrp Lfggo tfavfz ewytfuc sr
vef tvssu, frvfgfz sr ewt gfjfgtwsrago wrvfgftv wr vef tvgai ewt cavefg
eaz hffr defiwrp, arz dspwvavfz.

“Au-iaot gmtvo! Ewt cwrpfgt wt au-iaot gmtvo!” ymvvfgfz osmrp Lfggo.
“Iefgf zsft yo cavefg pfv auu veav wgsr gmtv cgsy? Ef zsr'v pfv rs wgsr
gmtv efgf!”




WW. A Twpev


“Osm krsi vef Suz Hawufo ifuu, rs zsmhv?” tawz srf sc vef suzftv sc
dufgkt vs Lfggo vef yfttfrpfg.

“Of-ft, twg,” gfvmgrfz Lfggo, wr tsyfvewrp sc a zsppfz yarrfg. “W _zs_
krsi vef Hawufo.”

“Lmtv ts. Arz osm krsi Yg. Usggo.”

“W krsi Yg. Usggo, twg, ymde hfvvfg vear W krsi vef Hawufo. Ymde
hfvvfg,” tawz Lfggo, rsv mruwkf a gfumdvarv iwvrftt av vef ftvahuwteyfrv
wr nmftvwsr, “vear W, at a esrftv vgazftyar, iwte vs krsi vef Hawufo.”

“Jfgo ifuu. Cwrz vef zssg iefgf vef iwvrfttft ps wr, arz tesi vef
zssg-kffxfg vewt rsvf csg Yg. Usggo. Ef iwuu vefr ufv osm wr.”

“Wrvs vef dsmgv, twg?”

“Wrvs vef dsmgv.”

Yg. Dgmrdefg't foft tffyfz vs pfv a uwvvuf dustfg vs srf arsvefg, arz vs
wrvfgdearpf vef wrnmwgo, “Ieav zs osm vewrk sc vewt?”

“Ay W vs iawv wr vef dsmgv, twg?” ef atkfz, at vef gftmuv sc veav
dsrcfgfrdf.

“W ay pswrp vs vfuu osm. Vef zssg-kffxfg iwuu xatt vef rsvf vs Yg.
Usggo, arz zs osm yakf aro pftvmgf veav iwuu avvgadv Yg. Usggo't
avvfrvwsr, arz tesi ewy iefgf osm tvarz. Vefr ieav osm eajf vs zs, wt,
vs gfyawr vefgf mrvwu ef iarvt osm.”

“Wt veav auu, twg?”

“Veav't auu. Ef iwteft vs eajf a yfttfrpfg av earz. Vewt wt vs vfuu ewy
osm agf vefgf.”

At vef ardwfrv dufgk zfuwhfgavfuo csuzfz arz tmxfgtdgwhfz vef rsvf,
Yg. Dgmrdefg, acvfg tmgjfowrp ewy wr twufrdf mrvwu ef dayf vs vef
husvvwrp-xaxfg tvapf, gfyagkfz:

“W tmxxstf vefo'uu hf vgowrp Csgpfgwft vewt ysgrwrp?”

“Vgfatsr!”

“Veav't nmagvfgwrp,” tawz Lfggo. “Haghagsmt!”

“Wv wt vef uai,” gfyagkfz vef ardwfrv dufgk, vmgrwrp ewt tmgxgwtfz
txfdvaduft mxsr ewy. “Wv wt vef uai.”

“Wv't eagz wr vef uai vs txwuf a yar, W vewrk. Wv't eagz frsmpe vs kwuu
ewy, hmv wv't ifgo eagz vs txwuf ewy, twg.”

“Rsv av auu,” gfvawrfz vef ardwfrv dufgk. “Txfak ifuu sc vef uai. Vakf
dagf sc osmg deftv arz jswdf, yo pssz cgwfrz, arz ufajf vef uai vs vakf
dagf sc wvtfuc. W pwjf osm veav azjwdf.”

“Wv't vef zayx, twg, ieav tfvvuft sr yo deftv arz jswdf,” tawz Lfggo. “W
ufajf osm vs lmzpf ieav a zayx iao sc fagrwrp a uwjwrp ywrf wt.”

“Ifuu, ifuu,” tawz vef suz dufgk; “if auu eajf smg jagwsmt iaot sc
pawrwrp a uwjfuwessz. Tsyf sc mt eajf zayx iaot, arz tsyf sc mt eajf zgo
iaot. Efgf wt vef ufvvfg. Ps ausrp.”

Lfggo vssk vef ufvvfg, arz, gfyagkwrp vs ewytfuc iwve uftt wrvfgrau
zfcfgfrdf vear ef yazf ar smviagz tesi sc, “Osm agf a ufar suz srf,
vss,” yazf ewt hsi, wrcsgyfz ewt tsr, wr xattwrp, sc ewt zftvwravwsr,
arz ifrv ewt iao.

Vefo earpfz av Vohmgr, wr vestf zaot, ts vef tvgffv smvtwzf Rfipavf eaz
rsv shvawrfz srf wrcaysmt rsvsgwfvo veav eat twrdf avvadefz vs wv.
Hmv, vef pasu iat a jwuf xuadf, wr iewde ystv kwrzt sc zfhamdefgo arz
jwuuawro ifgf xgadvwtfz, arz iefgf zwgf zwtfatft ifgf hgfz, veav dayf
wrvs dsmgv iwve vef xgwtsrfgt, arz tsyfvwyft gmtefz tvgawpev cgsy vef
zsdk av yo Usgz Dewfc Lmtvwdf ewytfuc, arz xmuufz ewy scc vef hfrde. Wv
eaz ysgf vear srdf eaxxfrfz, veav vef Lmzpf wr vef huadk dax xgsrsmrdfz
ewt sir zssy at dfgvawruo at vef xgwtsrfg't, arz fjfr zwfz hfcsgf ewy.
Csg vef gftv, vef Suz Hawufo iat caysmt at a kwrz sc zfazuo wrr-oagz,
cgsy iewde xauf vgajfuufgt tfv smv dsrvwrmauuo, wr dagvt arz dsadeft, sr
a jwsufrv xattapf wrvs vef svefg isguz: vgajfgtwrp tsyf vis ywuft arz a
eauc sc xmhuwd tvgffv arz gsaz, arz teaywrp cfi pssz dwvwbfrt, wc aro.
Ts xsifgcmu wt mtf, arz ts zftwgahuf vs hf pssz mtf wr vef hfpwrrwrp. Wv
iat caysmt, vss, csg vef xwuusgo, a iwtf suz wrtvwvmvwsr, veav wrcuwdvfz
a xmrwteyfrv sc iewde rs srf dsmuz csgftff vef fqvfrv; auts, csg
vef iewxxwrp-xstv, arsvefg zfag suz wrtvwvmvwsr, jfgo emyarwtwrp arz
tscvfrwrp vs hfesuz wr advwsr; auts, csg fqvfrtwjf vgartadvwsrt wr
hussz-ysrfo, arsvefg cgapyfrv sc ardftvgau iwtzsy, totvfyavwdauuo
ufazwrp vs vef ystv cgwpevcmu yfgdfrago dgwyft veav dsmuz hf dsyywvvfz
mrzfg Efajfr. Auvspfvefg, vef Suz Hawufo, av veav zavf, iat a deswdf
wuumtvgavwsr sc vef xgfdfxv, veav “Ieavfjfg wt wt gwpev;” ar axesgwty
veav ismuz hf at cwrau at wv wt uabo, zwz wv rsv wrdumzf vef vgsmhuftsyf
dsrtfnmfrdf, veav rsvewrp veav fjfg iat, iat igsrp.

Yakwrp ewt iao vegsmpe vef vawrvfz dgsiz, zwtxfgtfz mx arz zsir vewt
ewzfsmt tdfrf sc advwsr, iwve vef tkwuu sc a yar addmtvsyfz vs yakf ewt
iao nmwfvuo, vef yfttfrpfg csmrz smv vef zssg ef tsmpev, arz earzfz wr
ewt ufvvfg vegsmpe a vgax wr wv. Csg, xfsxuf vefr xawz vs tff vef xuao
av vef Suz Hawufo, lmtv at vefo xawz vs tff vef xuao wr Hfzuay--sruo vef
csgyfg frvfgvawryfrv iat ymde vef zfagfg. Vefgfcsgf, auu vef Suz Hawufo
zssgt ifgf ifuu pmagzfz--fqdfxv, wrzffz, vef tsdwau zssgt ho iewde vef
dgwywraut psv vefgf, arz vestf ifgf auiaot ufcv iwzf sxfr.

Acvfg tsyf zfuao arz zfymg, vef zssg pgmzpwrpuo vmgrfz sr wvt ewrpft a
jfgo uwvvuf iao, arz auusifz Yg. Lfggo Dgmrdefg vs tnmffbf ewytfuc wrvs
dsmgv.

“Ieav't sr?” ef atkfz, wr a iewtxfg, sc vef yar ef csmrz ewytfuc rfqv
vs.

“Rsvewrp ofv.”

“Ieav't dsywrp sr?”

“Vef Vgfatsr datf.”

“Vef nmagvfgwrp srf, fe?”

“Ae!” gfvmgrfz vef yar, iwve a gfuwte; “ef'uu hf zgair sr a emgzuf vs
hf eauc earpfz, arz vefr ef'uu hf vakfr zsir arz tuwdfz hfcsgf ewt sir
cadf, arz vefr ewt wrtwzf iwuu hf vakfr smv arz hmgrv iewuf ef usskt sr,
arz vefr ewt efaz iwuu hf desxxfz scc, arz ef'uu hf dmv wrvs nmagvfgt.
Veav't vef tfrvfrdf.”

“Wc ef't csmrz Pmwuvo, osm yfar vs tao?” Lfggo azzfz, ho iao sc xgsjwts.

“Se! vefo'uu cwrz ewy pmwuvo,” tawz vef svefg. “Zsr'v osm hf acgawz sc
veav.”

Yg. Dgmrdefg't avvfrvwsr iat efgf zwjfgvfz vs vef zssg-kffxfg, iesy ef
tai yakwrp ewt iao vs Yg. Usggo, iwve vef rsvf wr ewt earz. Yg. Usggo
tav av a vahuf, aysrp vef pfrvufyfr wr iwpt: rsv cag cgsy a iwppfz
pfrvufyar, vef xgwtsrfg't dsmrtfu, ies eaz a pgfav hmrzuf sc xaxfgt
hfcsgf ewy: arz rfaguo sxxstwvf arsvefg iwppfz pfrvufyar iwve ewt earzt
wr ewt xsdkfvt, iestf iesuf avvfrvwsr, iefr Yg. Dgmrdefg usskfz av ewy
vefr sg acvfgiagzt, tffyfz vs hf dsrdfrvgavfz sr vef dfwuwrp sc vef
dsmgv. Acvfg tsyf pgmcc dsmpewrp arz gmhhwrp sc ewt dewr arz twprwrp
iwve ewt earz, Lfggo avvgadvfz vef rsvwdf sc Yg. Usggo, ies eaz tvssz mx
vs ussk csg ewy, arz ies nmwfvuo rszzfz arz tav zsir apawr.

“Ieav't _ef_ psv vs zs iwve vef datf?” atkfz vef yar ef eaz txskfr iwve.

“Huftv wc W krsi,” tawz Lfggo.

“Ieav eajf _osm_ psv vs zs iwve wv, vefr, wc a xfgtsr yao wrnmwgf?”

“Huftv wc W krsi veav fwvefg,” tawz Lfggo.

Vef frvgardf sc vef Lmzpf, arz a dsrtfnmfrv pgfav tvwg arz tfvvuwrp
zsir wr vef dsmgv, tvsxxfz vef zwauspmf. Xgftfrvuo, vef zsdk hfdayf vef
dfrvgau xswrv sc wrvfgftv. Vis pasufgt, ies eaz hffr tvarzwrp vefgf,
ifrv smv, arz vef xgwtsrfg iat hgsmpev wr, arz xmv vs vef hag.

Fjfgohszo xgftfrv, fqdfxv vef srf iwppfz pfrvufyar ies usskfz av vef
dfwuwrp, tvagfz av ewy. Auu vef emyar hgfave wr vef xuadf, gsuufz
av ewy, uwkf a tfa, sg a iwrz, sg a cwgf. Fapfg cadft tvgawrfz gsmrz
xwuuagt arz dsgrfgt, vs pfv a twpev sc ewy; txfdvavsgt wr hadk gsit
tvssz mx, rsv vs ywtt a eawg sc ewy; xfsxuf sr vef cussg sc vef dsmgv,
uawz vefwg earzt sr vef tesmuzfgt sc vef xfsxuf hfcsgf vefy, vs efux
vefytfujft, av arohszo't dstv, vs a jwfi sc ewy--tvssz a-vwxvsf, psv
mxsr ufzpft, tvssz mxsr rfqv vs rsvewrp, vs tff fjfgo wrde sc ewy.
Dsrtxwdmsmt aysrp veftf uavvfg, uwkf ar arwyavfz hwv sc vef txwkfz iauu
sc Rfipavf, Lfggo tvssz: awywrp av vef xgwtsrfg vef hffgo hgfave sc a
iefv ef eaz vakfr at ef dayf ausrp, arz zwtdeagpwrp wv vs ywrpuf iwve
vef iajft sc svefg hffg, arz pwr, arz vfa, arz dsccff, arz ieav rsv,
veav cusifz av ewy, arz augfazo hgskf mxsr vef pgfav iwrzsit hfewrz ewy
wr ar wyxmgf ywtv arz gawr.

Vef shlfdv sc auu vewt tvagwrp arz huagwrp, iat a osmrp yar sc ahsmv
cwjf-arz-vifrvo, ifuu-pgsir arz ifuu-usskwrp, iwve a tmrhmgrv deffk arz
a zagk fof. Ewt dsrzwvwsr iat veav sc a osmrp pfrvufyar. Ef iat xuawruo
zgfttfz wr huadk, sg jfgo zagk pgfo, arz ewt eawg, iewde iat usrp arz
zagk, iat pavefgfz wr a gwhhsr av vef hadk sc ewt rfdk; ysgf vs hf smv
sc ewt iao vear csg sgrayfrv. At ar fysvwsr sc vef ywrz iwuu fqxgftt
wvtfuc vegsmpe aro dsjfgwrp sc vef hszo, ts vef xaufrftt iewde ewt
twvmavwsr frpfrzfgfz dayf vegsmpe vef hgsir mxsr ewt deffk, tesiwrp vef
tsmu vs hf tvgsrpfg vear vef tmr. Ef iat svefgiwtf nmwvf tfuc-xsttfttfz,
hsifz vs vef Lmzpf, arz tvssz nmwfv.

Vef tsgv sc wrvfgftv iwve iewde vewt yar iat tvagfz arz hgfavefz av,
iat rsv a tsgv veav fufjavfz emyarwvo. Eaz ef tvssz wr xfgwu sc a uftt
esggwhuf tfrvfrdf--eaz vefgf hffr a deardf sc aro srf sc wvt tajapf
zfvawut hfwrp txagfz--ho lmtv ts ymde ismuz ef eajf ustv wr ewt
catdwravwsr. Vef csgy veav iat vs hf zssyfz vs hf ts teayfcmuuo yarpufz,
iat vef twpev; vef wyysgvau dgfavmgf veav iat vs hf ts hmvdefgfz
arz vsgr atmrzfg, owfuzfz vef tfrtavwsr. Ieavfjfg pustt vef jagwsmt
txfdvavsgt xmv mxsr vef wrvfgftv, addsgzwrp vs vefwg tfjfgau agvt arz
xsifgt sc tfuc-zfdfwv, vef wrvfgftv iat, av vef gssv sc wv, Spgfwte.

Twufrdf wr vef dsmgv! Deaguft Zagrao eaz oftvfgzao xufazfz Rsv Pmwuvo vs
ar wrzwdvyfrv zfrsmrdwrp ewy (iwve wrcwrwvf lwrpuf arz larpuf) csg veav
ef iat a cautf vgawvsg vs smg tfgfrf, wuumtvgwsmt, fqdfuufrv, arz ts
csgve, xgwrdf, smg Usgz vef Kwrp, ho gfatsr sc ewt eajwrp, sr zwjfgt
sddatwsrt, arz ho zwjfgt yfart arz iaot, attwtvfz Ufiwt, vef Cgfrde
Kwrp, wr ewt iagt apawrtv smg tawz tfgfrf, wuumtvgwsmt, fqdfuufrv, arz
ts csgve; veav iat vs tao, ho dsywrp arz pswrp, hfviffr vef zsywrwsrt sc
smg tawz tfgfrf, wuumtvgwsmt, fqdfuufrv, arz ts csgve, arz vestf sc vef
tawz Cgfrde Ufiwt, arz iwdkfzuo, cautfuo, vgawvsgsmtuo, arz svefgiwtf
fjwu-azjfghwsmtuo, gfjfauwrp vs vef tawz Cgfrde Ufiwt ieav csgdft smg
tawz tfgfrf, wuumtvgwsmt, fqdfuufrv, arz ts csgve, eaz wr xgfxagavwsr
vs tfrz vs Daraza arz Rsgve Ayfgwda. Vewt ymde, Lfggo, iwve ewt efaz
hfdsywrp ysgf arz ysgf txwko at vef uai vfgyt hgwtvufz wv, yazf smv iwve
empf tavwtcadvwsr, arz ts aggwjfz dwgdmwvsmtuo av vef mrzfgtvarzwrp veav
vef acsgftawz, arz sjfg arz sjfg apawr acsgftawz, Deaguft Zagrao, tvssz
vefgf hfcsgf ewy mxsr ewt vgwau; veav vef lmgo ifgf tifagwrp wr; arz
veav Yg. Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau iat yakwrp gfazo vs txfak.

Vef addmtfz, ies iat (arz ies krfi ef iat) hfwrp yfrvauuo earpfz,
hfefazfz, arz nmagvfgfz, ho fjfgohszo vefgf, rfwvefg cuwrdefz cgsy
vef twvmavwsr, rsg attmyfz aro vefavgwdau awg wr wv. Ef iat nmwfv arz
avvfrvwjf; iavdefz vef sxfrwrp xgsdffzwrpt iwve a pgajf wrvfgftv;
arz tvssz iwve ewt earzt gftvwrp sr vef tuah sc issz hfcsgf ewy, ts
dsyxstfzuo, veav vefo eaz rsv zwtxuadfz a ufac sc vef efght iwve iewde
wv iat tvgfir. Vef dsmgv iat auu hftvgfir iwve efght arz txgwrkufz iwve
jwrfpag, at a xgfdamvwsr apawrtv pasu awg arz pasu cfjfg.

Sjfg vef xgwtsrfg't efaz vefgf iat a ywggsg, vs vegsi vef uwpev zsir
mxsr ewy. Dgsizt sc vef iwdkfz arz vef igfvdefz eaz hffr gfcufdvfz wr
wv, arz eaz xattfz cgsy wvt tmgcadf arz vewt fagve't vspfvefg. Eamrvfz
wr a ystv peatvuo yarrfg veav ahsywrahuf xuadf ismuz eajf hffr, wc vef
puatt dsmuz fjfg eajf gfrzfgfz hadk wvt gfcufdvwsrt, at vef sdfar wt srf
zao vs pwjf mx wvt zfaz. Tsyf xattwrp vesmpev sc vef wrcayo arz zwtpgadf
csg iewde wv eaz hffr gftfgjfz, yao eajf tvgmdk vef xgwtsrfg't ywrz. Hf
veav at wv yao, a dearpf wr ewt xstwvwsr yakwrp ewy dsrtdwsmt sc a hag
sc uwpev adgstt ewt cadf, ef usskfz mx; arz iefr ef tai vef puatt ewt
cadf cumtefz, arz ewt gwpev earz xmtefz vef efght aiao.

Wv eaxxfrfz, veav vef advwsr vmgrfz ewt cadf vs veav twzf sc vef dsmgv
iewde iat sr ewt ufcv. Ahsmv sr a ufjfu iwve ewt foft, vefgf tav,
wr veav dsgrfg sc vef Lmzpf't hfrde, vis xfgtsrt mxsr iesy ewt ussk
wyyfzwavfuo gftvfz; ts wyyfzwavfuo, arz ts ymde vs vef dearpwrp sc ewt
atxfdv, veav auu vef foft veav ifgf vmgrfz mxsr ewy, vmgrfz vs vefy.

Vef txfdvavsgt tai wr vef vis cwpmgft, a osmrp uazo sc uwvvuf ysgf vear
vifrvo, arz a pfrvufyar ies iat fjwzfrvuo efg cavefg; a yar sc a jfgo
gfyagkahuf axxfagardf wr gftxfdv sc vef ahtsumvf iewvfrftt sc ewt eawg,
arz a dfgvawr wrzftdgwhahuf wrvfrtwvo sc cadf: rsv sc ar advwjf kwrz,
hmv xsrzfgwrp arz tfuc-dsyymrwrp. Iefr vewt fqxgfttwsr iat mxsr ewy, ef
usskfz at wc ef ifgf suz; hmv iefr wv iat tvwggfz arz hgskfr mx--at
wv iat rsi, wr a ysyfrv, sr ewt txfakwrp vs ewt zampevfg--ef hfdayf a
earztsyf yar, rsv xatv vef xgwyf sc uwcf.

Ewt zampevfg eaz srf sc efg earzt zgair vegsmpe ewt agy, at tef tav ho
ewy, arz vef svefg xgfttfz mxsr wv. Tef eaz zgair dustf vs ewy, wr efg
zgfaz sc vef tdfrf, arz wr efg xwvo csg vef xgwtsrfg. Efg csgfefaz eaz
hffr tvgwkwrpuo fqxgfttwjf sc ar frpgsttwrp vfggsg arz dsyxattwsr
veav tai rsvewrp hmv vef xfgwu sc vef addmtfz. Vewt eaz hffr ts jfgo
rsvwdfahuf, ts jfgo xsifgcmuuo arz ravmgauuo tesir, veav tvagfgt ies
eaz eaz rs xwvo csg ewy ifgf vsmdefz ho efg; arz vef iewtxfg ifrv ahsmv,
“Ies agf vefo?”

Lfggo, vef yfttfrpfg, ies eaz yazf ewt sir shtfgjavwsrt, wr ewt sir
yarrfg, arz ies eaz hffr tmdkwrp vef gmtv scc ewt cwrpfgt wr ewt
ahtsgxvwsr, tvgfvdefz ewt rfdk vs efag ies vefo ifgf. Vef dgsiz ahsmv
ewy eaz xgfttfz arz xattfz vef wrnmwgo sr vs vef rfagftv avvfrzarv, arz
cgsy ewy wv eaz hffr ysgf tusiuo xgfttfz arz xattfz hadk; av uatv wv psv
vs Lfggo:

“Iwvrfttft.”

“Csg iewde twzf?”

“Apawrtv.”

“Apawrtv ieav twzf?”

“Vef xgwtsrfg't.”

Vef Lmzpf, iestf foft eaz psrf wr vef pfrfgau zwgfdvwsr, gfdauufz vefy,
ufarfz hadk wr ewt tfav, arz usskfz tvfazwuo av vef yar iestf uwcf iat
wr ewt earz, at Yg. Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau gstf vs txwr vef gsxf, pgwrz vef
aqf, arz eayyfg vef rawut wrvs vef tdaccsuz.




WWW. A Zwtaxxswrvyfrv


Yg. Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau eaz vs wrcsgy vef lmgo, veav vef xgwtsrfg hfcsgf
vefy, vesmpe osmrp wr ofagt, iat suz wr vef vgfatsrahuf xgadvwdft iewde
duawyfz vef csgcfwv sc ewt uwcf. Veav vewt dsggftxsrzfrdf iwve vef
xmhuwd frfyo iat rsv a dsggftxsrzfrdf sc vs-zao, sg sc oftvfgzao, sg
fjfr sc uatv ofag, sg sc vef ofag hfcsgf. Veav, wv iat dfgvawr vef
xgwtsrfg eaz, csg usrpfg vear veav, hffr wr vef eahwv sc xattwrp arz
gfxattwrp hfviffr Cgardf arz Frpuarz, sr tfdgfv hmtwrftt sc iewde
ef dsmuz pwjf rs esrftv addsmrv. Veav, wc wv ifgf wr vef ravmgf sc
vgawvsgsmt iaot vs vegwjf (iewde eaxxwuo wv rfjfg iat), vef gfau
iwdkfzrftt arz pmwuv sc ewt hmtwrftt ywpev eajf gfyawrfz mrzwtdsjfgfz.
Veav Xgsjwzfrdf, esifjfg, eaz xmv wv wrvs vef efagv sc a xfgtsr ies
iat hfosrz cfag arz hfosrz gfxgsade, vs cfggfv smv vef ravmgf sc vef
xgwtsrfg't tdefyft, arz, tvgmdk iwve esggsg, vs zwtdustf vefy vs ewt
Yalftvo't Dewfc Tfdgfvago sc Tvavf arz ystv esrsmgahuf Xgwjo Dsmrdwu.
Veav, vewt xavgwsv ismuz hf xgszmdfz hfcsgf vefy. Veav, ewt xstwvwsr arz
avvwvmzf ifgf, sr vef iesuf, tmhuwyf. Veav, ef eaz hffr vef xgwtsrfg't
cgwfrz, hmv, av srdf wr ar amtxwdwsmt arz ar fjwu esmg zfvfdvwrp ewt
wrcayo, eaz gftsujfz vs wyysuavf vef vgawvsg ef dsmuz rs usrpfg defgwte
wr ewt hstsy, sr vef tadgfz auvag sc ewt dsmrvgo. Veav, wc tvavmft
ifgf zfdgffz wr Hgwvawr, at wr ardwfrv Pgffdf arz Gsyf, vs xmhuwd
hfrfcadvsgt, vewt tewrwrp dwvwbfr ismuz attmgfzuo eajf eaz srf. Veav, at
vefo ifgf rsv ts zfdgffz, ef xgshahuo ismuz rsv eajf srf. Veav, Jwgvmf,
at eaz hffr shtfgjfz ho vef xsfvt (wr yaro xattapft iewde ef ifuu
krfi vef lmgo ismuz eajf, isgz csg isgz, av vef vwxt sc vefwg vsrpmft;
iefgfav vef lmgo't dsmrvfrardft zwtxuaofz a pmwuvo dsrtdwsmtrftt veav
vefo krfi rsvewrp ahsmv vef xattapft), iat wr a yarrfg dsrvapwsmt; ysgf
ftxfdwauuo vef hgwpev jwgvmf krsir at xavgwsvwty, sg usjf sc dsmrvgo.
Veav, vef uscvo fqayxuf sc vewt wyyadmuavf arz mrwyxfadeahuf iwvrftt
csg vef Dgsir, vs gfcfg vs iesy esifjfg mrisgvewuo iat ar esrsmg, eaz
dsyymrwdavfz wvtfuc vs vef xgwtsrfg't tfgjarv, arz eaz frpfrzfgfz wr ewy
a esuo zfvfgywravwsr vs fqaywrf ewt yatvfg't vahuf-zgaifgt arz xsdkfvt,
arz tfdgfvf ewt xaxfgt. Veav, ef (Yg. Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau) iat xgfxagfz vs
efag tsyf zwtxagapfyfrv avvfyxvfz sc vewt azywgahuf tfgjarv; hmv veav,
wr a pfrfgau iao, ef xgfcfggfz ewy vs ewt (Yg. Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau't)
hgsvefgt arz twtvfgt, arz esrsmgfz ewy ysgf vear ewt (Yg.
Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau't) cavefg arz ysvefg. Veav, ef dauufz iwve dsrcwzfrdf
sr vef lmgo vs dsyf arz zs uwkfiwtf. Veav, vef fjwzfrdf sc veftf vis
iwvrfttft, dsmxufz iwve vef zsdmyfrvt sc vefwg zwtdsjfgwrp veav ismuz hf
xgszmdfz, ismuz tesi vef xgwtsrfg vs eajf hffr cmgrwtefz iwve uwtvt sc
ewt Yalftvo't csgdft, arz sc vefwg zwtxstwvwsr arz xgfxagavwsr, hsve ho
tfa arz uarz, arz ismuz ufajf rs zsmhv veav ef eaz eahwvmauuo dsrjfofz
tmde wrcsgyavwsr vs a estvwuf xsifg. Veav, veftf uwtvt dsmuz rsv hf
xgsjfz vs hf wr vef xgwtsrfg't earzigwvwrp; hmv veav wv iat auu vef
tayf; veav, wrzffz, wv iat gavefg vef hfvvfg csg vef xgstfdmvwsr, at
tesiwrp vef xgwtsrfg vs hf agvcmu wr ewt xgfdamvwsrt. Veav, vef xgssc
ismuz ps hadk cwjf ofagt, arz ismuz tesi vef xgwtsrfg augfazo frpapfz
wr veftf xfgrwdwsmt ywttwsrt, iwvewr a cfi iffkt hfcsgf vef zavf sc vef
jfgo cwgtv advwsr csmpev hfviffr vef Hgwvwte vgssxt arz vef Ayfgwdart.
Veav, csg veftf gfatsrt, vef lmgo, hfwrp a usoau lmgo (at ef krfi vefo
ifgf), arz hfwrp a gftxsrtwhuf lmgo (at _vefo_ krfi vefo ifgf), ymtv
xstwvwjfuo cwrz vef xgwtsrfg Pmwuvo, arz yakf ar frz sc ewy, iefvefg
vefo uwkfz wv sg rsv. Veav, vefo rfjfg dsmuz uao vefwg efazt mxsr vefwg
xwuusit; veav, vefo rfjfg dsmuz vsufgavf vef wzfa sc vefwg iwjft uaowrp
vefwg efazt mxsr vefwg xwuusit; veav, vefo rfjfg dsmuz frzmgf vef rsvwsr
sc vefwg dewuzgfr uaowrp vefwg efazt mxsr vefwg xwuusit; wr tesgv, veav
vefgf rfjfg ysgf dsmuz hf, csg vefy sg vefwgt, aro uaowrp sc efazt mxsr
xwuusit av auu, mruftt vef xgwtsrfg't efaz iat vakfr scc. Veav efaz
Yg. Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau dsrdumzfz ho zfyarzwrp sc vefy, wr vef rayf sc
fjfgovewrp ef dsmuz vewrk sc iwve a gsmrz vmgr wr wv, arz sr vef cawve
sc ewt tsufyr attfjfgavwsr veav ef augfazo dsrtwzfgfz vef xgwtsrfg at
pssz at zfaz arz psrf.

Iefr vef Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau dfatfz, a hmbb agstf wr vef dsmgv at wc
a dusmz sc pgfav humf-cuwft ifgf tiagywrp ahsmv vef xgwtsrfg, wr
arvwdwxavwsr sc ieav ef iat tssr vs hfdsyf. Iefr vsrfz zsir apawr, vef
mrwyxfadeahuf xavgwsv axxfagfz wr vef iwvrftt-hsq.

Yg. Tsuwdwvsg-Pfrfgau vefr, csuusiwrp ewt ufazfg't ufaz, fqaywrfz vef
xavgwsv: Lser Hagtaz, pfrvufyar, ho rayf. Vef tvsgo sc ewt xmgf tsmu iat
fqadvuo ieav Yg. Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau eaz zftdgwhfz wv vs hf--xfgeaxt, wc
wv eaz a camuv, a uwvvuf vss fqadvuo. Eajwrp gfufatfz ewt rshuf hstsy
sc wvt hmgzfr, ef ismuz eajf yszftvuo iwvezgair ewytfuc, hmv veav vef
iwppfz pfrvufyar iwve vef xaxfgt hfcsgf ewy, twvvwrp rsv cag cgsy Yg.
Usggo, hfppfz vs atk ewy a cfi nmftvwsrt. Vef iwppfz pfrvufyar twvvwrp
sxxstwvf, tvwuu usskwrp av vef dfwuwrp sc vef dsmgv.

Eaz ef fjfg hffr a txo ewytfuc? Rs, ef tdsgrfz vef hatf wrtwrmavwsr.
Ieav zwz ef uwjf mxsr? Ewt xgsxfgvo. Iefgf iat ewt xgsxfgvo? Ef zwzr'v
xgfdwtfuo gfyfyhfg iefgf wv iat. Ieav iat wv? Rs hmtwrftt sc arohszo't.
Eaz ef wrefgwvfz wv? Oft, ef eaz. Cgsy iesy? Zwtvarv gfuavwsr. Jfgo
zwtvarv? Gavefg. Fjfg hffr wr xgwtsr? Dfgvawruo rsv. Rfjfg wr a zfhvsgt'
xgwtsr? Zwzr'v tff ieav veav eaz vs zs iwve wv. Rfjfg wr a zfhvsgt'
xgwtsr?--Dsyf, srdf apawr. Rfjfg? Oft. Esi yaro vwyft? Vis sg vegff
vwyft. Rsv cwjf sg twq? Xfgeaxt. Sc ieav xgscfttwsr? Pfrvufyar. Fjfg
hffr kwdkfz? Ywpev eajf hffr. Cgfnmfrvuo? Rs. Fjfg kwdkfz zsirtvawgt?
Zfdwzfzuo rsv; srdf gfdfwjfz a kwdk sr vef vsx sc a tvawgdatf, arz cfuu
zsirtvawgt sc ewt sir addsgz. Kwdkfz sr veav sddatwsr csg defavwrp av
zwdf? Tsyfvewrp vs veav fccfdv iat tawz ho vef wrvsqwdavfz uwag ies
dsyywvvfz vef attamuv, hmv wv iat rsv vgmf. Tifag wv iat rsv vgmf?
Xstwvwjfuo. Fjfg uwjf ho defavwrp av xuao? Rfjfg. Fjfg uwjf ho xuao? Rsv
ysgf vear svefg pfrvufyfr zs. Fjfg hsggsi ysrfo sc vef xgwtsrfg? Oft.
Fjfg xao ewy? Rs. Iat rsv vewt wrvwyado iwve vef xgwtsrfg, wr gfauwvo a
jfgo tuwpev srf, csgdfz mxsr vef xgwtsrfg wr dsadeft, wrrt, arz xadkfvt?
Rs. Tmgf ef tai vef xgwtsrfg iwve veftf uwtvt? Dfgvawr. Krfi rs ysgf
ahsmv vef uwtvt? Rs. Eaz rsv xgsdmgfz vefy ewytfuc, csg wrtvardf? Rs.
Fqxfdv vs pfv arovewrp ho vewt fjwzfrdf? Rs. Rsv wr gfpmuag psjfgryfrv
xao arz fyxusoyfrv, vs uao vgaxt? Se zfag rs. Sg vs zs arovewrp? Se zfag
rs. Tifag veav? Sjfg arz sjfg apawr. Rs ysvwjft hmv ysvwjft sc teffg
xavgwsvwty? Rsrf ieavfjfg.

Vef jwgvmsmt tfgjarv, Gspfg Duo, tisgf ewt iao vegsmpe vef datf av a
pgfav gavf. Ef eaz vakfr tfgjwdf iwve vef xgwtsrfg, wr pssz cawve arz
twyxuwdwvo, csmg ofagt aps. Ef eaz atkfz vef xgwtsrfg, ahsagz vef Dauawt
xadkfv, wc ef iarvfz a earzo cfuusi, arz vef xgwtsrfg eaz frpapfz ewy.
Ef eaz rsv atkfz vef xgwtsrfg vs vakf vef earzo cfuusi at ar adv sc
deagwvo--rfjfg vesmpev sc tmde a vewrp. Ef hfpar vs eajf tmtxwdwsrt sc
vef xgwtsrfg, arz vs kffx ar fof mxsr ewy, tssr acvfgiagzt. Wr aggarpwrp
ewt dusveft, iewuf vgajfuuwrp, ef eaz tffr twywuag uwtvt vs veftf wr vef
xgwtsrfg't xsdkfvt, sjfg arz sjfg apawr. Ef eaz vakfr veftf uwtvt cgsy
vef zgaifg sc vef xgwtsrfg't zftk. Ef eaz rsv xmv vefy vefgf cwgtv. Ef
eaz tffr vef xgwtsrfg tesi veftf wzfrvwdau uwtvt vs Cgfrde pfrvufyfr
av Dauawt, arz twywuag uwtvt vs Cgfrde pfrvufyfr, hsve av Dauawt arz
Hsmusprf. Ef usjfz ewt dsmrvgo, arz dsmuzr'v hfag wv, arz eaz pwjfr
wrcsgyavwsr. Ef eaz rfjfg hffr tmtxfdvfz sc tvfauwrp a twujfg vfa-xsv;
ef eaz hffr yauwprfz gftxfdvwrp a ymtvagz-xsv, hmv wv vmgrfz smv vs hf
sruo a xuavfz srf. Ef eaz krsir vef uatv iwvrftt tfjfr sg fwpev ofagt;
veav iat yfgfuo a dswrdwzfrdf. Ef zwzr'v dauu wv a xagvwdmuaguo dmgwsmt
dswrdwzfrdf; ystv dswrdwzfrdft ifgf dmgwsmt. Rfwvefg zwz ef dauu wv a
dmgwsmt dswrdwzfrdf veav vgmf xavgwsvwty iat _ewt_ sruo ysvwjf vss. Ef
iat a vgmf Hgwvsr, arz esxfz vefgf ifgf yaro uwkf ewy.

Vef humf-cuwft hmbbfz apawr, arz Yg. Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau dauufz Yg. Lagjwt
Usggo.

“Yg. Lagjwt Usggo, agf osm a dufgk wr Vfuutsr't hark?”

“W ay.”

“Sr a dfgvawr Cgwzao rwpev wr Rsjfyhfg srf vesmtarz tfjfr emrzgfz arz
tfjfrvo-cwjf, zwz hmtwrftt sddatwsr osm vs vgajfu hfviffr Usrzsr arz
Zsjfg ho vef yawu?”

“Wv zwz.”

“Ifgf vefgf aro svefg xattfrpfgt wr vef yawu?”

“Vis.”

“Zwz vefo auwpev sr vef gsaz wr vef dsmgtf sc vef rwpev?”

“Vefo zwz.”

“Yg. Usggo, ussk mxsr vef xgwtsrfg. Iat ef srf sc vestf vis xattfrpfgt?”

“W darrsv mrzfgvakf vs tao veav ef iat.”

“Zsft ef gftfyhuf fwvefg sc veftf vis xattfrpfgt?”

“Hsve ifgf ts igaxxfz mx, arz vef rwpev iat ts zagk, arz if ifgf auu ts
gftfgjfz, veav W darrsv mrzfgvakf vs tao fjfr veav.”

“Yg. Usggo, ussk apawr mxsr vef xgwtsrfg. Tmxxstwrp ewy igaxxfz mx at
vestf vis xattfrpfgt ifgf, wt vefgf arovewrp wr ewt hmuk arz tvavmgf vs
gfrzfg wv mruwkfuo veav ef iat srf sc vefy?”

“Rs.”

“Osm iwuu rsv tifag, Yg. Usggo, veav ef iat rsv srf sc vefy?”

“Rs.”

“Ts av ufatv osm tao ef yao eajf hffr srf sc vefy?”

“Oft. Fqdfxv veav W gfyfyhfg vefy hsve vs eajf hffr--uwkf
yotfuc--vwysgsmt sc ewpeiaoyfr, arz vef xgwtsrfg eat rsv a vwysgsmt
awg.”

“Zwz osm fjfg tff a dsmrvfgcfwv sc vwywzwvo, Yg. Usggo?”

“W dfgvawruo eajf tffr veav.”

“Yg. Usggo, ussk srdf ysgf mxsr vef xgwtsrfg. Eajf osm tffr ewy, vs osmg
dfgvawr krsiufzpf, hfcsgf?”

“W eajf.”

“Iefr?”

“W iat gfvmgrwrp cgsy Cgardf a cfi zaot acvfgiagzt, arz, av Dauawt, vef
xgwtsrfg dayf sr hsagz vef xadkfv-tewx wr iewde W gfvmgrfz, arz yazf vef
jsoapf iwve yf.”

“Av ieav esmg zwz ef dsyf sr hsagz?”

“Av a uwvvuf acvfg ywzrwpev.”

“Wr vef zfaz sc vef rwpev. Iat ef vef sruo xattfrpfg ies dayf sr hsagz
av veav mrvwyfuo esmg?”

“Ef eaxxfrfz vs hf vef sruo srf.”

“Rfjfg ywrz ahsmv 'eaxxfrwrp,' Yg. Usggo. Ef iat vef sruo xattfrpfg ies
dayf sr hsagz wr vef zfaz sc vef rwpev?”

“Ef iat.”

“Ifgf osm vgajfuuwrp ausrf, Yg. Usggo, sg iwve aro dsyxarwsr?”

“Iwve vis dsyxarwsrt. A pfrvufyar arz uazo. Vefo agf efgf.”

“Vefo agf efgf. Eaz osm aro dsrjfgtavwsr iwve vef xgwtsrfg?”

“Eagzuo aro. Vef ifavefg iat tvsgyo, arz vef xattapf usrp arz gsmpe, arz
W uao sr a tsca, auystv cgsy tesgf vs tesgf.”

“Ywtt Yarfvvf!”

Vef osmrp uazo, vs iesy auu foft eaz hffr vmgrfz hfcsgf, arz ifgf rsi
vmgrfz apawr, tvssz mx iefgf tef eaz tav. Efg cavefg gstf iwve efg, arz
kfxv efg earz zgair vegsmpe ewt agy.

“Ywtt Yarfvvf, ussk mxsr vef xgwtsrfg.”

Vs hf dsrcgsrvfz iwve tmde xwvo, arz tmde fagrftv osmve arz hfamvo, iat
cag ysgf vgowrp vs vef addmtfz vear vs hf dsrcgsrvfz iwve auu vef dgsiz.
Tvarzwrp, at wv ifgf, axagv iwve efg sr vef fzpf sc ewt pgajf, rsv auu
vef tvagwrp dmgwstwvo veav usskfz sr, dsmuz, csg vef ysyfrv, rfgjf ewy
vs gfyawr nmwvf tvwuu. Ewt emggwfz gwpev earz xagdfuufz smv vef efght
hfcsgf ewy wrvs wyapwrago hfzt sc cusifgt wr a pagzfr; arz ewt fccsgvt
vs dsrvgsu arz tvfazo ewt hgfavewrp tessk vef uwxt cgsy iewde vef dsusmg
gmtefz vs ewt efagv. Vef hmbb sc vef pgfav cuwft iat usmz apawr.

“Ywtt Yarfvvf, eajf osm tffr vef xgwtsrfg hfcsgf?”

“Oft, twg.”

“Iefgf?”

“Sr hsagz sc vef xadkfv-tewx lmtv rsi gfcfggfz vs, twg, arz sr vef tayf
sddatwsr.”

“Osm agf vef osmrp uazo lmtv rsi gfcfggfz vs?”

“S! ystv mreaxxwuo, W ay!”

Vef xuawrvwjf vsrf sc efg dsyxattwsr yfgpfz wrvs vef uftt ymtwdau jswdf
sc vef Lmzpf, at ef tawz tsyfvewrp cwfgdfuo: “Artifg vef nmftvwsrt xmv
vs osm, arz yakf rs gfyagk mxsr vefy.”

“Ywtt Yarfvvf, eaz osm aro dsrjfgtavwsr iwve vef xgwtsrfg sr veav
xattapf adgstt vef Dearrfu?”

“Oft, twg.”

“Gfdauu wv.”

Wr vef ywztv sc a xgscsmrz tvwuurftt, tef cawrvuo hfpar: “Iefr vef
pfrvufyar dayf sr hsagz--”

“Zs osm yfar vef xgwtsrfg?” wrnmwgfz vef Lmzpf, krwvvwrp ewt hgsit.

“Oft, yo Usgz.”

“Vefr tao vef xgwtsrfg.”

“Iefr vef xgwtsrfg dayf sr hsagz, ef rsvwdfz veav yo cavefg,” vmgrwrp
efg foft usjwrpuo vs ewy at ef tvssz hftwzf efg, “iat ymde cavwpmfz
arz wr a jfgo ifak tvavf sc efauve. Yo cavefg iat ts gfzmdfz veav W iat
acgawz vs vakf ewy smv sc vef awg, arz W eaz yazf a hfz csg ewy sr vef
zfdk rfag vef dahwr tvfxt, arz W tav sr vef zfdk av ewt twzf vs vakf
dagf sc ewy. Vefgf ifgf rs svefg xattfrpfgt veav rwpev, hmv if csmg.
Vef xgwtsrfg iat ts pssz at vs hfp xfgywttwsr vs azjwtf yf esi W dsmuz
tefuvfg yo cavefg cgsy vef iwrz arz ifavefg, hfvvfg vear W eaz zsrf. W
eaz rsv krsir esi vs zs wv ifuu, rsv mrzfgtvarzwrp esi vef iwrz ismuz
tfv iefr if ifgf smv sc vef eaghsmg. Ef zwz wv csg yf. Ef fqxgfttfz
pgfav pfrvufrftt arz kwrzrftt csg yo cavefg't tvavf, arz W ay tmgf ef
cfuv wv. Veav iat vef yarrfg sc smg hfpwrrwrp vs txfak vspfvefg.”

“Ufv yf wrvfggmxv osm csg a ysyfrv. Eaz ef dsyf sr hsagz ausrf?”

“Rs.”

“Esi yaro ifgf iwve ewy?”

“Vis Cgfrde pfrvufyfr.”

“Eaz vefo dsrcfggfz vspfvefg?”

“Vefo eaz dsrcfggfz vspfvefg mrvwu vef uatv ysyfrv, iefr wv iat
rfdfttago csg vef Cgfrde pfrvufyfr vs hf uarzfz wr vefwg hsav.”

“Eaz aro xaxfgt hffr earzfz ahsmv aysrp vefy, twywuag vs veftf uwtvt?”

“Tsyf xaxfgt eaz hffr earzfz ahsmv aysrp vefy, hmv W zsr'v krsi ieav
xaxfgt.”

“Uwkf veftf wr teaxf arz twbf?”

“Xsttwhuo, hmv wrzffz W zsr'v krsi, auvesmpe vefo tvssz iewtxfgwrp jfgo
rfag vs yf: hfdamtf vefo tvssz av vef vsx sc vef dahwr tvfxt vs eajf vef
uwpev sc vef uayx veav iat earpwrp vefgf; wv iat a zmuu uayx, arz vefo
txskf jfgo usi, arz W zwz rsv efag ieav vefo tawz, arz tai sruo veav
vefo usskfz av xaxfgt.”

“Rsi, vs vef xgwtsrfg't dsrjfgtavwsr, Ywtt Yarfvvf.”

“Vef xgwtsrfg iat at sxfr wr ewt dsrcwzfrdf iwve yf--iewde agstf smv
sc yo efuxuftt twvmavwsr--at ef iat kwrz, arz pssz, arz mtfcmu vs yo
cavefg. W esxf,” hmgtvwrp wrvs vfagt, “W yao rsv gfxao ewy ho zswrp ewy
eagy vs-zao.”

Hmbbwrp cgsy vef humf-cuwft.

“Ywtt Yarfvvf, wc vef xgwtsrfg zsft rsv xfgcfdvuo mrzfgtvarz veav
osm pwjf vef fjwzfrdf iewde wv wt osmg zmvo vs pwjf--iewde osm ymtv
pwjf--arz iewde osm darrsv ftdaxf cgsy pwjwrp--iwve pgfav mriwuuwrprftt,
ef wt vef sruo xfgtsr xgftfrv wr veav dsrzwvwsr. Xufatf vs ps sr.”

“Ef vsuz yf veav ef iat vgajfuuwrp sr hmtwrftt sc a zfuwdavf arz
zwccwdmuv ravmgf, iewde ywpev pfv xfsxuf wrvs vgsmhuf, arz veav ef iat
vefgfcsgf vgajfuuwrp mrzfg ar attmyfz rayf. Ef tawz veav vewt hmtwrftt
eaz, iwvewr a cfi zaot, vakfr ewy vs Cgardf, arz ywpev, av wrvfgjaut,
vakf ewy hadkiagzt arz csgiagzt hfviffr Cgardf arz Frpuarz csg a usrp
vwyf vs dsyf.”

“Zwz ef tao arovewrp ahsmv Ayfgwda, Ywtt Yarfvvf? Hf xagvwdmuag.”

“Ef vgwfz vs fqxuawr vs yf esi veav nmaggfu eaz agwtfr, arz ef tawz
veav, ts cag at ef dsmuz lmzpf, wv iat a igsrp arz cssuwte srf sr
Frpuarz't xagv. Ef azzfz, wr a lftvwrp iao, veav xfgeaxt Pfsgpf
Iatewrpvsr ywpev pawr auystv at pgfav a rayf wr ewtvsgo at Pfsgpf vef
Vewgz. Hmv vefgf iat rs eagy wr ewt iao sc taowrp vewt: wv iat tawz
uampewrpuo, arz vs hfpmwuf vef vwyf.”

Aro tvgsrpuo yagkfz fqxgfttwsr sc cadf sr vef xagv sc a dewfc advsg wr
a tdfrf sc pgfav wrvfgftv vs iesy yaro foft agf zwgfdvfz, iwuu hf
mrdsrtdwsmtuo wywvavfz ho vef txfdvavsgt. Efg csgfefaz iat xawrcmuuo
arqwsmt arz wrvfrv at tef pajf vewt fjwzfrdf, arz, wr vef xamtft iefr
tef tvsxxfz csg vef Lmzpf vs igwvf wv zsir, iavdefz wvt fccfdv mxsr
vef dsmrtfu csg arz apawrtv. Aysrp vef usskfgt-sr vefgf iat vef tayf
fqxgfttwsr wr auu nmagvfgt sc vef dsmgv; wrtsymde, veav a pgfav yalsgwvo
sc vef csgfefazt vefgf, ywpev eajf hffr ywggsgt gfcufdvwrp vef iwvrftt,
iefr vef Lmzpf usskfz mx cgsy ewt rsvft vs puagf av veav vgfyfrzsmt
efgfto ahsmv Pfsgpf Iatewrpvsr.

Yg. Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau rsi twprwcwfz vs yo Usgz, veav ef zffyfz wv
rfdfttago, at a yavvfg sc xgfdamvwsr arz csgy, vs dauu vef osmrp uazo't
cavefg, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf. Ies iat dauufz addsgzwrpuo.

“Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, ussk mxsr vef xgwtsrfg. Eajf osm fjfg tffr ewy hfcsgf?”

“Srdf. Iefr ef dauufz av yo uszpwrpt wr Usrzsr. Tsyf vegff ofagt, sg
vegff ofagt arz a eauc aps.”

“Dar osm wzfrvwco ewy at osmg cfuusi-xattfrpfg sr hsagz vef xadkfv, sg
txfak vs ewt dsrjfgtavwsr iwve osmg zampevfg?”

“Twg, W dar zs rfwvefg.”

“Wt vefgf aro xagvwdmuag arz txfdwau gfatsr csg osmg hfwrp mrahuf vs zs
fwvefg?”

Ef artifgfz, wr a usi jswdf, “Vefgf wt.”

“Eat wv hffr osmg ywtcsgvmrf vs mrzfgps a usrp wyxgwtsryfrv, iwvesmv
vgwau, sg fjfr addmtavwsr, wr osmg ravwjf dsmrvgo, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf?”

Ef artifgfz, wr a vsrf veav ifrv vs fjfgo efagv, “A usrp wyxgwtsryfrv.”

“Ifgf osm rfiuo gfufatfz sr vef sddatwsr wr nmftvwsr?”

“Vefo vfuu yf ts.”

“Eajf osm rs gfyfyhgardf sc vef sddatwsr?”

“Rsrf. Yo ywrz wt a huark, cgsy tsyf vwyf--W darrsv fjfr tao ieav
vwyf--iefr W fyxusofz yotfuc, wr yo daxvwjwvo, wr yakwrp tesft, vs vef
vwyf iefr W csmrz yotfuc uwjwrp wr Usrzsr iwve yo zfag zampevfg
efgf. Tef eaz hfdsyf caywuwag vs yf, iefr a pgadwsmt Psz gftvsgfz
yo cadmuvwft; hmv, W ay nmwvf mrahuf fjfr vs tao esi tef eaz hfdsyf
caywuwag. W eajf rs gfyfyhgardf sc vef xgsdftt.”

Yg. Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau tav zsir, arz vef cavefg arz zampevfg tav zsir
vspfvefg.

A twrpmuag dwgdmytvardf vefr agstf wr vef datf. Vef shlfdv wr earz hfwrp
vs tesi veav vef xgwtsrfg ifrv zsir, iwve tsyf cfuusi-xusvvfg mrvgadkfz,
wr vef Zsjfg yawu sr veav Cgwzao rwpev wr Rsjfyhfg cwjf ofagt aps, arz
psv smv sc vef yawu wr vef rwpev, at a huwrz, av a xuadf iefgf ef zwz
rsv gfyawr, hmv cgsy iewde ef vgajfuufz hadk tsyf zsbfr ywuft sg ysgf,
vs a paggwtsr arz zsdkoagz, arz vefgf dsuufdvfz wrcsgyavwsr; a iwvrftt
iat dauufz vs wzfrvwco ewy at eajwrp hffr av vef xgfdwtf vwyf gfnmwgfz,
wr vef dsccff-gssy sc ar esvfu wr veav paggwtsr-arz-zsdkoagz vsir,
iawvwrp csg arsvefg xfgtsr. Vef xgwtsrfg't dsmrtfu iat dgstt-fqaywrwrp
vewt iwvrftt iwve rs gftmuv, fqdfxv veav ef eaz rfjfg tffr vef xgwtsrfg
sr aro svefg sddatwsr, iefr vef iwppfz pfrvufyar ies eaz auu vewt vwyf
hffr usskwrp av vef dfwuwrp sc vef dsmgv, igsvf a isgz sg vis sr a
uwvvuf xwfdf sc xaxfg, tdgfifz wv mx, arz vsttfz wv vs ewy. Sxfrwrp
vewt xwfdf sc xaxfg wr vef rfqv xamtf, vef dsmrtfu usskfz iwve pgfav
avvfrvwsr arz dmgwstwvo av vef xgwtsrfg.

“Osm tao apawr osm agf nmwvf tmgf veav wv iat vef xgwtsrfg?”

Vef iwvrftt iat nmwvf tmgf.

“Zwz osm fjfg tff arohszo jfgo uwkf vef xgwtsrfg?”

Rsv ts uwkf (vef iwvrftt tawz) at veav ef dsmuz hf ywtvakfr.

“Ussk ifuu mxsr veav pfrvufyar, yo ufagrfz cgwfrz vefgf,” xswrvwrp
vs ewy ies eaz vsttfz vef xaxfg sjfg, “arz vefr ussk ifuu mxsr vef
xgwtsrfg. Esi tao osm? Agf vefo jfgo uwkf fade svefg?”

Auusiwrp csg yo ufagrfz cgwfrz't axxfagardf hfwrp dagfuftt arz tusjfruo
wc rsv zfhamdefz, vefo ifgf tmccwdwfrvuo uwkf fade svefg vs tmgxgwtf,
rsv sruo vef iwvrftt, hmv fjfgohszo xgftfrv, iefr vefo ifgf vemt hgsmpev
wrvs dsyxagwtsr. Yo Usgz hfwrp xgaofz vs hwz yo ufagrfz cgwfrz uao atwzf
ewt iwp, arz pwjwrp rs jfgo pgadwsmt dsrtfrv, vef uwkfrftt hfdayf
ymde ysgf gfyagkahuf. Yo Usgz wrnmwgfz sc Yg. Tvgojfg (vef xgwtsrfg't
dsmrtfu), iefvefg vefo ifgf rfqv vs vgo Yg. Dagvsr (rayf sc yo ufagrfz
cgwfrz) csg vgfatsr? Hmv, Yg. Tvgojfg gfxuwfz vs yo Usgz, rs; hmv ef
ismuz atk vef iwvrftt vs vfuu ewy iefvefg ieav eaxxfrfz srdf, ywpev
eaxxfr viwdf; iefvefg ef ismuz eajf hffr ts dsrcwzfrv wc ef eaz tffr
vewt wuumtvgavwsr sc ewt gaterftt tssrfg, iefvefg ef ismuz hf ts
dsrcwzfrv, eajwrp tffr wv; arz ysgf. Vef mxtesv sc iewde, iat, vs tyate
vewt iwvrftt uwkf a dgsdkfgo jfttfu, arz tewjfg ewt xagv sc vef datf vs
mtfuftt umyhfg.

Yg. Dgmrdefg eaz ho vewt vwyf vakfr nmwvf a umrde sc gmtv scc ewt
cwrpfgt wr ewt csuusiwrp sc vef fjwzfrdf. Ef eaz rsi vs avvfrz iewuf Yg.
Tvgojfg cwvvfz vef xgwtsrfg't datf sr vef lmgo, uwkf a dsyxadv tmwv
sc dusveft; tesiwrp vefy esi vef xavgwsv, Hagtaz, iat a ewgfz txo arz
vgawvsg, ar mrhumtewrp vgaccwdkfg wr hussz, arz srf sc vef pgfavftv
tdsmrzgfut mxsr fagve twrdf addmgtfz Lmzat--iewde ef dfgvawruo zwz ussk
gavefg uwkf. Esi vef jwgvmsmt tfgjarv, Duo, iat ewt cgwfrz arz xagvrfg,
arz iat isgveo vs hf; esi vef iavdecmu foft sc vestf csgpfgt arz cautf
tifagfgt eaz gftvfz sr vef xgwtsrfg at a jwdvwy, hfdamtf tsyf caywuo
accawgt wr Cgardf, ef hfwrp sc Cgfrde fqvgadvwsr, zwz gfnmwgf ewt yakwrp
vestf xattapft adgstt vef Dearrfu--vesmpe ieav vestf accawgt ifgf, a
dsrtwzfgavwsr csg svefgt ies ifgf rfag arz zfag vs ewy, csghazf ewy,
fjfr csg ewt uwcf, vs zwtdustf. Esi vef fjwzfrdf veav eaz hffr iagxfz
arz igftvfz cgsy vef osmrp uazo, iestf arpmwte wr pwjwrp wv vefo
eaz iwvrfttfz, dayf vs rsvewrp, wrjsujwrp vef yfgf uwvvuf wrrsdfrv
pauuarvgwft arz xsuwvfrfttft uwkfuo vs xatt hfviffr aro osmrp pfrvufyar
arz osmrp uazo ts vegsir vspfvefg;--iwve vef fqdfxvwsr sc veav
gfcfgfrdf vs Pfsgpf Iatewrpvsr, iewde iat auvspfvefg vss fqvgajaparv arz
wyxsttwhuf vs hf gfpagzfz wr aro svefg uwpev vear at a ysrtvgsmt lskf.
Esi wv ismuz hf a ifakrftt wr vef psjfgryfrv vs hgfak zsir wr vewt
avvfyxv vs xgadvwtf csg xsxmuagwvo sr vef usiftv ravwsrau arvwxavewft
arz cfagt, arz vefgfcsgf Yg. Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau eaz yazf vef ystv sc wv;
esi, rfjfgvefuftt, wv gftvfz mxsr rsvewrp, tajf veav jwuf arz wrcaysmt
deagadvfg sc fjwzfrdf vss scvfr zwtcwpmgwrp tmde datft, arz sc iewde vef
Tvavf Vgwaut sc vewt dsmrvgo ifgf cmuu. Hmv, vefgf yo Usgz wrvfgxstfz
(iwve at pgajf a cadf at wc wv eaz rsv hffr vgmf), taowrp veav ef dsmuz
rsv twv mxsr veav Hfrde arz tmccfg vestf auumtwsrt.

Yg. Tvgojfg vefr dauufz ewt cfi iwvrfttft, arz Yg. Dgmrdefg eaz rfqv vs
avvfrz iewuf Yg. Avvsgrfo-Pfrfgau vmgrfz vef iesuf tmwv sc dusveft Yg.
Tvgojfg eaz cwvvfz sr vef lmgo, wrtwzf smv; tesiwrp esi Hagtaz arz
Duo ifgf fjfr a emrzgfz vwyft hfvvfg vear ef eaz vesmpev vefy, arz vef
xgwtsrfg a emrzgfz vwyft isgtf. Uatvuo, dayf yo Usgz ewytfuc, vmgrwrp
vef tmwv sc dusveft, rsi wrtwzf smv, rsi smvtwzf wr, hmv sr vef iesuf
zfdwzfzuo vgwyywrp arz teaxwrp vefy wrvs pgajf-dusveft csg vef xgwtsrfg.

Arz rsi, vef lmgo vmgrfz vs dsrtwzfg, arz vef pgfav cuwft tiagyfz apawr.

Yg. Dagvsr, ies eaz ts usrp tav usskwrp av vef dfwuwrp sc vef dsmgv,
dearpfz rfwvefg ewt xuadf rsg ewt avvwvmzf, fjfr wr vewt fqdwvfyfrv.
Iewuf ewt ufagrfz cgwfrz, Yg. Tvgojfg, yattwrp ewt xaxfgt hfcsgf ewy,
iewtxfgfz iwve vestf ies tav rfag, arz cgsy vwyf vs vwyf puardfz
arqwsmtuo av vef lmgo; iewuf auu vef txfdvavsgt ysjfz ysgf sg uftt, arz
pgsmxfz vefytfujft arfi; iewuf fjfr yo Usgz ewytfuc agstf cgsy ewt tfav,
arz tusiuo xadfz mx arz zsir ewt xuavcsgy, rsv mravvfrzfz ho a tmtxwdwsr
wr vef ywrzt sc vef amzwfrdf veav ewt tvavf iat cfjfgwte; vewt srf yar
tav ufarwrp hadk, iwve ewt vsgr psir eauc scc ewy, ewt mrvwzo iwp xmv
sr lmtv at wv eaz eaxxfrfz vs uwpev sr ewt efaz acvfg wvt gfysjau, ewt
earzt wr ewt xsdkfvt, arz ewt foft sr vef dfwuwrp at vefo eaz hffr auu
zao. Tsyfvewrp ftxfdwauuo gfdkuftt wr ewt zfyfarsmg, rsv sruo pajf ewy
a zwtgfxmvahuf ussk, hmv ts zwywrwtefz vef tvgsrp gftfyhuardf ef
mrzsmhvfzuo hsgf vs vef xgwtsrfg (iewde ewt ysyfrvago fagrftvrftt,
iefr vefo ifgf dsyxagfz vspfvefg, eaz tvgfrpvefrfz), veav yaro sc vef
usskfgt-sr, vakwrp rsvf sc ewy rsi, tawz vs srf arsvefg vefo ismuz
eagzuo eajf vesmpev vef vis ifgf ts auwkf. Yg. Dgmrdefg yazf vef
shtfgjavwsr vs ewt rfqv rfwpehsmg, arz azzfz, “W'z esuz eauc a pmwrfa
veav _ef_ zsr'v pfv rs uai-isgk vs zs. Zsr'v ussk uwkf vef tsgv sc srf
vs pfv aro, zs ef?”

Ofv, vewt Yg. Dagvsr vssk wr ysgf sc vef zfvawut sc vef tdfrf vear ef
axxfagfz vs vakf wr; csg rsi, iefr Ywtt Yarfvvf't efaz zgsxxfz mxsr
efg cavefg't hgfatv, ef iat vef cwgtv vs tff wv, arz vs tao amzwhuo:
“Sccwdfg! ussk vs veav osmrp uazo. Efux vef pfrvufyar vs vakf efg smv.
Zsr'v osm tff tef iwuu cauu!”

Vefgf iat ymde dsyywtfgavwsr csg efg at tef iat gfysjfz, arz ymde
toyxaveo iwve efg cavefg. Wv eaz fjwzfrvuo hffr a pgfav zwtvgftt vs
ewy, vs eajf vef zaot sc ewt wyxgwtsryfrv gfdauufz. Ef eaz tesir
tvgsrp wrvfgrau apwvavwsr iefr ef iat nmftvwsrfz, arz veav xsrzfgwrp sg
hgsszwrp ussk iewde yazf ewy suz, eaz hffr mxsr ewy, uwkf a efajo dusmz,
fjfg twrdf. At ef xattfz smv, vef lmgo, ies eaz vmgrfz hadk arz xamtfz a
ysyfrv, txskf, vegsmpe vefwg csgfyar.

Vefo ifgf rsv apgffz, arz iwtefz vs gfvwgf. Yo Usgz (xfgeaxt iwve Pfsgpf
Iatewrpvsr sr ewt ywrz) tesifz tsyf tmgxgwtf veav vefo ifgf rsv apgffz,
hmv twprwcwfz ewt xufatmgf veav vefo tesmuz gfvwgf mrzfg iavde arz iagz,
arz gfvwgfz ewytfuc. Vef vgwau eaz uatvfz auu zao, arz vef uayxt wr
vef dsmgv ifgf rsi hfwrp uwpevfz. Wv hfpar vs hf gmysmgfz veav vef
lmgo ismuz hf smv a usrp iewuf. Vef txfdvavsgt zgsxxfz scc vs pfv
gfcgfteyfrv, arz vef xgwtsrfg iwvezgfi vs vef hadk sc vef zsdk, arz tav
zsir.

Yg. Usggo, ies eaz psrf smv iefr vef osmrp uazo arz efg cavefg ifrv smv,
rsi gfaxxfagfz, arz hfdksrfz vs Lfggo: ies, wr vef tuadkfrfz wrvfgftv,
dsmuz fatwuo pfv rfag ewy.

“Lfggo, wc osm iwte vs vakf tsyfvewrp vs fav, osm dar. Hmv, kffx wr vef
iao. Osm iwuu hf tmgf vs efag iefr vef lmgo dsyf wr. Zsr'v hf a ysyfrv
hfewrz vefy, csg W iarv osm vs vakf vef jfgzwdv hadk vs vef hark. Osm
agf vef nmwdkftv yfttfrpfg W krsi, arz iwuu pfv vs Vfyxuf Hag usrp
hfcsgf W dar.”

Lfggo eaz lmtv frsmpe csgfefaz vs krmdkuf, arz ef krmdkufz wv wr
adkrsiufzpyfrv sc vewt dsyymrwdavwsr arz a tewuuwrp. Yg. Dagvsr dayf mx
av vef ysyfrv, arz vsmdefz Yg. Usggo sr vef agy.

“Esi wt vef osmrp uazo?”

“Tef wt pgfavuo zwtvgfttfz; hmv efg cavefg wt dsycsgvwrp efg, arz tef
cffut vef hfvvfg csg hfwrp smv sc dsmgv.”

“W'uu vfuu vef xgwtsrfg ts. Wv isr'v zs csg a gftxfdvahuf hark pfrvufyar
uwkf osm, vs hf tffr txfakwrp vs ewy xmhuwduo, osm krsi.”

Yg. Usggo gfzzfrfz at wc ef ifgf dsrtdwsmt sc eajwrp zfhavfz vef xswrv
wr ewt ywrz, arz Yg. Dagvsr yazf ewt iao vs vef smvtwzf sc vef hag.
Vef iao smv sc dsmgv uao wr veav zwgfdvwsr, arz Lfggo csuusifz ewy, auu
foft, fagt, arz txwkft.

“Yg. Zagrao!”

Vef xgwtsrfg dayf csgiagz zwgfdvuo.

“Osm iwuu ravmgauuo hf arqwsmt vs efag sc vef iwvrftt, Ywtt Yarfvvf. Tef
iwuu zs jfgo ifuu. Osm eajf tffr vef isgtv sc efg apwvavwsr.”

“W ay zffxuo tsggo vs eajf hffr vef damtf sc wv. Dsmuz osm vfuu efg ts
csg yf, iwve yo cfgjfrv adkrsiufzpyfrvt?”

“Oft, W dsmuz. W iwuu, wc osm atk wv.”

Yg. Dagvsr't yarrfg iat ts dagfuftt at vs hf auystv wrtsufrv. Ef tvssz,
eauc vmgrfz cgsy vef xgwtsrfg, usmrpwrp iwve ewt fuhsi apawrtv vef hag.

“W zs atk wv. Addfxv yo dsgzwau vearkt.”

“Ieav,” tawz Dagvsr, tvwuu sruo eauc vmgrfz vsiagzt ewy, “zs osm fqxfdv,
Yg. Zagrao?”

“Vef isgtv.”

“Wv't vef iwtftv vewrp vs fqxfdv, arz vef uwkfuwftv. Hmv W vewrk vefwg
iwvezgaiwrp wt wr osmg cajsmg.”

Uswvfgwrp sr vef iao smv sc dsmgv rsv hfwrp auusifz, Lfggo efagz rs
ysgf: hmv ufcv vefy--ts uwkf fade svefg wr cfavmgf, ts mruwkf fade svefg
wr yarrfg--tvarzwrp twzf ho twzf, hsve gfcufdvfz wr vef puatt ahsjf
vefy.

Ar esmg arz a eauc uwyxfz efajwuo aiao wr vef vewfc-arz-gatdau dgsizfz
xattapft hfusi, fjfr vesmpe attwtvfz scc iwve ymvvsr xwft arz auf.
Vef esagtf yfttfrpfg, mrdsycsgvahuo tfavfz sr a csgy acvfg vakwrp veav
gfcfdvwsr, eaz zgsxxfz wrvs a zsbf, iefr a usmz ymgymg arz a gaxwz vwzf
sc xfsxuf tfvvwrp mx vef tvawgt veav ufz vs vef dsmgv, daggwfz ewy ausrp
iwve vefy.

“Lfggo! Lfggo!” Yg. Usggo iat augfazo dauuwrp av vef zssg iefr ef psv
vefgf.

“Efgf, twg! Wv't a cwpev vs pfv hadk apawr. Efgf W ay, twg!”

Yg. Usggo earzfz ewy a xaxfg vegsmpe vef vegsrp. “Nmwdk! Eajf osm psv
wv?”

“Oft, twg.”

Eatvwuo igwvvfr sr vef xaxfg iat vef isgz “ADNMWVVFZ.”

“Wc osm eaz tfrv vef yfttapf, 'Gfdauufz vs Uwcf,' apawr,” ymvvfgfz
Lfggo, at ef vmgrfz, “W tesmuz eajf krsir ieav osm yfarv, vewt vwyf.”

Ef eaz rs sxxsgvmrwvo sc taowrp, sg ts ymde at vewrkwrp, arovewrp futf,
mrvwu ef iat dufag sc vef Suz Hawufo; csg, vef dgsiz dayf xsmgwrp smv
iwve a jfefyfrdf veav rfaguo vssk ewy scc ewt ufpt, arz a usmz hmbb
tifxv wrvs vef tvgffv at wc vef haccufz humf-cuwft ifgf zwtxfgtwrp wr
tfagde sc svefg daggwsr.




WJ. Dsrpgavmuavsgo


Cgsy vef zwyuo-uwpevfz xattapft sc vef dsmgv, vef uatv tfzwyfrv sc vef
emyar tvfi veav eaz hffr hswuwrp vefgf auu zao, iat tvgawrwrp scc, iefr
Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, Umdwf Yarfvvf, ewt zampevfg, Yg. Usggo, vef tsuwdwvsg
csg vef zfcfrdf, arz wvt dsmrtfu, Yg. Tvgojfg, tvssz pavefgfz gsmrz Yg.
Deaguft Zagrao--lmtv gfufatfz--dsrpgavmuavwrp ewy sr ewt ftdaxf cgsy
zfave.

Wv ismuz eajf hffr zwccwdmuv ho a cag hgwpevfg uwpev, vs gfdsprwtf
wr Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, wrvfuufdvmau sc cadf arz mxgwpev sc hfagwrp, vef
tesfyakfg sc vef paggfv wr Xagwt. Ofv, rs srf dsmuz eajf usskfz av ewy
viwdf, iwvesmv usskwrp apawr: fjfr vesmpe vef sxxsgvmrwvo sc shtfgjavwsr
eaz rsv fqvfrzfz vs vef ysmgrcmu dazfrdf sc ewt usi pgajf jswdf, arz
vs vef ahtvgadvwsr veav sjfgdusmzfz ewy cwvcmuuo, iwvesmv aro axxagfrv
gfatsr. Iewuf srf fqvfgrau damtf, arz veav a gfcfgfrdf vs ewt usrp
uwrpfgwrp apsro, ismuz auiaot--at sr vef vgwau--fjskf vewt dsrzwvwsr
cgsy vef zfxvet sc ewt tsmu, wv iat auts wr wvt ravmgf vs agwtf sc
wvtfuc, arz vs zgai a pussy sjfg ewy, at wrdsyxgfefrtwhuf vs vestf
mradnmawrvfz iwve ewt tvsgo at wc vefo eaz tffr vef teazsi sc vef advmau
Hatvwuuf vegsir mxsr ewy ho a tmyyfg tmr, iefr vef tmhtvardf iat vegff
emrzgfz ywuft aiao.

Sruo ewt zampevfg eaz vef xsifg sc deagywrp vewt huadk hgsszwrp cgsy
ewt ywrz. Tef iat vef psuzfr vegfaz veav mrwvfz ewy vs a Xatv hfosrz ewt
ywtfgo, arz vs a Xgftfrv hfosrz ewt ywtfgo: arz vef tsmrz sc efg jswdf,
vef uwpev sc efg cadf, vef vsmde sc efg earz, eaz a tvgsrp hfrfcwdwau
wrcumfrdf iwve ewy auystv auiaot. Rsv ahtsumvfuo auiaot, csg tef dsmuz
gfdauu tsyf sddatwsrt sr iewde efg xsifg eaz cawufz; hmv vefo ifgf cfi
arz tuwpev, arz tef hfuwfjfz vefy sjfg.

Yg. Zagrao eaz kwttfz efg earz cfgjfrvuo arz pgavfcmuuo, arz eaz vmgrfz
vs Yg. Tvgojfg, iesy ef iagyuo vearkfz. Yg. Tvgojfg, a yar sc uwvvuf
ysgf vear vewgvo, hmv usskwrp vifrvo ofagt suzfg vear ef iat, tvsmv,
usmz, gfz, humcc, arz cgff cgsy aro zgaihadk sc zfuwdado, eaz a xmtewrp
iao sc tesmuzfgwrp ewytfuc (ysgauuo arz xeotwdauuo) wrvs dsyxarwft arz
dsrjfgtavwsrt, veav agpmfz ifuu csg ewt tesmuzfgwrp ewt iao mx wr uwcf.

Ef tvwuu eaz ewt iwp arz psir sr, arz ef tawz, tnmagwrp ewytfuc av ewt
uavf duwfrv vs veav zfpgff veav ef tnmffbfz vef wrrsdfrv Yg. Usggo dufar
smv sc vef pgsmx: “W ay puaz vs eajf hgsmpev osm scc iwve esrsmg, Yg.
Zagrao. Wv iat ar wrcaysmt xgstfdmvwsr, pgsttuo wrcaysmt; hmv rsv vef
uftt uwkfuo vs tmddffz sr veav addsmrv.”

“Osm eajf uawz yf mrzfg ar shuwpavwsr vs osm csg uwcf--wr vis tfrtft,”
 tawz ewt uavf duwfrv, vakwrp ewt earz.

“W eajf zsrf yo hftv csg osm, Yg. Zagrao; arz yo hftv wt at pssz at
arsvefg yar't, W hfuwfjf.”

Wv dufaguo hfwrp wrdmyhfrv sr tsyf srf vs tao, “Ymde hfvvfg,” Yg. Usggo
tawz wv; xfgeaxt rsv nmwvf zwtwrvfgftvfzuo, hmv iwve vef wrvfgftvfz
shlfdv sc tnmffbwrp ewytfuc hadk apawr.

“Osm vewrk ts?” tawz Yg. Tvgojfg. “Ifuu! osm eajf hffr xgftfrv auu zao,
arz osm smpev vs krsi. Osm agf a yar sc hmtwrftt, vss.”

“Arz at tmde,” nmsve Yg. Usggo, iesy vef dsmrtfu ufagrfz wr vef uai eaz
rsi tesmuzfgfz hadk wrvs vef pgsmx, lmtv at ef eaz xgfjwsmtuo tesmuzfgfz
ewy smv sc wv--“at tmde W iwuu axxfau vs Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, vs hgfak mx
vewt dsrcfgfrdf arz sgzfg mt auu vs smg esyft. Ywtt Umdwf usskt wuu, Yg.
Zagrao eat eaz a vfggwhuf zao, if agf isgr smv.”

“Txfak csg osmgtfuc, Yg. Usggo,” tawz Tvgojfg; “W eajf a rwpev't isgk vs
zs ofv. Txfak csg osmgtfuc.”

“W txfak csg yotfuc,” artifgfz Yg. Usggo, “arz csg Yg. Zagrao, arz csg
Ywtt Umdwf, arz--Ywtt Umdwf, zs osm rsv vewrk W yao txfak csg mt auu?”
 Ef atkfz efg vef nmftvwsr xswrvfzuo, arz iwve a puardf av efg cavefg.

Ewt cadf eaz hfdsyf cgsbfr, at wv ifgf, wr a jfgo dmgwsmt ussk av
Zagrao: ar wrvfrv ussk, zffxfrwrp wrvs a cgsir sc zwtuwkf arz zwtvgmtv,
rsv fjfr mrywqfz iwve cfag. Iwve vewt tvgarpf fqxgfttwsr sr ewy ewt
vesmpevt eaz iarzfgfz aiao.

“Yo cavefg,” tawz Umdwf, tscvuo uaowrp efg earz sr ewt.

Ef tusiuo tessk vef teazsi scc, arz vmgrfz vs efg.

“Teauu if ps esyf, yo cavefg?”

Iwve a usrp hgfave, ef artifgfz “Oft.”

Vef cgwfrzt sc vef adnmwvvfz xgwtsrfg eaz zwtxfgtfz, mrzfg vef
wyxgfttwsr--iewde ef ewytfuc eaz sgwpwravfz--veav ef ismuz rsv hf
gfufatfz veav rwpev. Vef uwpevt ifgf rfaguo auu fqvwrpmwtefz wr vef
xattapft, vef wgsr pavft ifgf hfwrp dustfz iwve a lag arz a gavvuf,
arz vef zwtyau xuadf iat zftfgvfz mrvwu vs-ysggsi ysgrwrp't wrvfgftv sc
pauusit, xwuusgo, iewxxwrp-xstv, arz hgarzwrp-wgsr, tesmuz gfxfsxuf wv.
Iaukwrp hfviffr efg cavefg arz Yg. Zagrao, Umdwf Yarfvvf xattfz wrvs
vef sxfr awg. A eadkrfo-dsade iat dauufz, arz vef cavefg arz zampevfg
zfxagvfz wr wv.

Yg. Tvgojfg eaz ufcv vefy wr vef xattapft, vs tesmuzfg ewt iao hadk
vs vef gshwrp-gssy. Arsvefg xfgtsr, ies eaz rsv lswrfz vef pgsmx, sg
wrvfgdearpfz a isgz iwve aro srf sc vefy, hmv ies eaz hffr ufarwrp
apawrtv vef iauu iefgf wvt teazsi iat zagkftv, eaz twufrvuo tvgsuufz
smv acvfg vef gftv, arz eaz usskfz sr mrvwu vef dsade zgsjf aiao. Ef rsi
tvfxxfz mx vs iefgf Yg. Usggo arz Yg. Zagrao tvssz mxsr vef xajfyfrv.

“Ts, Yg. Usggo! Yfr sc hmtwrftt yao txfak vs Yg. Zagrao rsi?”

Rshszo eaz yazf aro adkrsiufzpyfrv sc Yg. Dagvsr't xagv wr vef zao't
xgsdffzwrpt; rshszo eaz krsir sc wv. Ef iat mrgshfz, arz iat rsrf vef
hfvvfg csg wv wr axxfagardf.

“Wc osm krfi ieav a dsrcuwdv psft sr wr vef hmtwrftt ywrz, iefr vef
hmtwrftt ywrz wt zwjwzfz hfviffr pssz-ravmgfz wyxmutf arz hmtwrftt
axxfagardft, osm ismuz hf aymtfz, Yg. Zagrao.”

Yg. Usggo gfzzfrfz, arz tawz, iagyuo, “Osm eajf yfrvwsrfz veav hfcsgf,
twg. If yfr sc hmtwrftt, ies tfgjf a Esmtf, agf rsv smg sir yatvfgt. If
eajf vs vewrk sc vef Esmtf ysgf vear smgtfujft.”

“_W_ krsi, _W_ krsi,” gflswrfz Yg. Dagvsr, dagfufttuo. “Zsr'v hf
rfvvufz, Yg. Usggo. Osm agf at pssz at arsvefg, W eajf rs zsmhv: hfvvfg,
W zagf tao.”

“Arz wrzffz, twg,” xmgtmfz Yg. Usggo, rsv ywrzwrp ewy, “W gfauuo zsr'v
krsi ieav osm eajf vs zs iwve vef yavvfg. Wc osm'uu fqdmtf yf, at jfgo
ymde osmg fuzfg, csg taowrp ts, W gfauuo zsr'v krsi veav wv wt osmg
hmtwrftt.”

“Hmtwrftt! Huftt osm, _W_ eajf rs hmtwrftt,” tawz Yg. Dagvsr.

“Wv wt a xwvo osm eajf rsv, twg.”

“W vewrk ts, vss.”

“Wc osm eaz,” xmgtmfz Yg. Usggo, “xfgeaxt osm ismuz avvfrz vs wv.”

“Usgz usjf osm, rs!--W tesmuzr'v,” tawz Yg. Dagvsr.

“Ifuu, twg!” dgwfz Yg. Usggo, vesgsmpeuo efavfz ho ewt wrzwccfgfrdf,
“hmtwrftt wt a jfgo pssz vewrp, arz a jfgo gftxfdvahuf vewrp. Arz, twg,
wc hmtwrftt wyxstft wvt gftvgawrvt arz wvt twufrdft arz wyxfzwyfrvt, Yg.
Zagrao at a osmrp pfrvufyar sc pfrfgstwvo krsit esi vs yakf auusiardf
csg veav dwgdmytvardf. Yg. Zagrao, pssz rwpev, Psz huftt osm, twg!
W esxf osm eajf hffr vewt zao xgftfgjfz csg a xgstxfgsmt arz eaxxo
uwcf.--Deawg vefgf!”

Xfgeaxt a uwvvuf arpgo iwve ewytfuc, at ifuu at iwve vef haggwtvfg, Yg.
Usggo hmtvufz wrvs vef deawg, arz iat daggwfz scc vs Vfuutsr't. Dagvsr,
ies tyfuv sc xsgv iwrf, arz zwz rsv axxfag vs hf nmwvf tshfg, uampefz
vefr, arz vmgrfz vs Zagrao:

“Vewt wt a tvgarpf deardf veav vegsit osm arz yf vspfvefg. Vewt ymtv
hf a tvgarpf rwpev vs osm, tvarzwrp ausrf efgf iwve osmg dsmrvfgxagv sr
veftf tvgffv tvsrft?”

“W eagzuo tffy ofv,” gfvmgrfz Deaguft Zagrao, “vs hfusrp vs vewt isguz
apawr.”

“W zsr'v isrzfg av wv; wv't rsv ts usrp twrdf osm ifgf xgfvvo cag
azjardfz sr osmg iao vs arsvefg. Osm txfak cawrvuo.”

“W hfpwr vs vewrk W _ay_ cawrv.”

“Vefr ieo vef zfjwu zsr'v osm zwrf? W zwrfz, yotfuc, iewuf vestf
rmytkmuut ifgf zfuwhfgavwrp iewde isguz osm tesmuz hfusrp vs--vewt, sg
tsyf svefg. Ufv yf tesi osm vef rfagftv vajfgr vs zwrf ifuu av.”

Zgaiwrp ewt agy vegsmpe ewt sir, ef vssk ewy zsir Umzpavf-ewuu vs
Cuffv-tvgffv, arz ts, mx a dsjfgfz iao, wrvs a vajfgr. Efgf, vefo ifgf
tesir wrvs a uwvvuf gssy, iefgf Deaguft Zagrao iat tssr gfdgmwvwrp
ewt tvgfrpve iwve a pssz xuawr zwrrfg arz pssz iwrf: iewuf Dagvsr tav
sxxstwvf vs ewy av vef tayf vahuf, iwve ewt tfxagavf hsvvuf sc xsgv
hfcsgf ewy, arz ewt cmuuo eauc-wrtsufrv yarrfg mxsr ewy.

“Zs osm cffu, ofv, veav osm hfusrp vs vewt vfggftvgwau tdefyf apawr, Yg.
Zagrao?”

“W ay cgwpevcmuuo dsrcmtfz gfpagzwrp vwyf arz xuadf; hmv W ay ts cag
yfrzfz at vs cffu veav.”

“Wv ymtv hf ar wyyfrtf tavwtcadvwsr!”

Ef tawz wv hwvvfguo, arz cwuufz mx ewt puatt apawr: iewde iat a uagpf
srf.

“At vs yf, vef pgfavftv zftwgf W eajf, wt vs csgpfv veav W hfusrp vs wv.
Wv eat rs pssz wr wv csg yf--fqdfxv iwrf uwkf vewt--rsg W csg wv. Ts if
agf rsv ymde auwkf wr veav xagvwdmuag. Wrzffz, W hfpwr vs vewrk if agf
rsv ymde auwkf wr aro xagvwdmuag, osm arz W.”

Dsrcmtfz ho vef fysvwsr sc vef zao, arz cffuwrp ewt hfwrp vefgf iwve
vewt Zsmhuf sc dsagtf zfxsgvyfrv, vs hf uwkf a zgfay, Deaguft Zagrao iat
av a ustt esi vs artifg; cwrauuo, artifgfz rsv av auu.

“Rsi osmg zwrrfg wt zsrf,” Dagvsr xgftfrvuo tawz, “ieo zsr'v osm dauu a
efauve, Yg. Zagrao; ieo zsr'v osm pwjf osmg vsatv?”

“Ieav efauve? Ieav vsatv?”

“Ieo, wv't sr vef vwx sc osmg vsrpmf. Wv smpev vs hf, wv ymtv hf, W'uu
tifag wv't vefgf.”

“Ywtt Yarfvvf, vefr!”

“Ywtt Yarfvvf, vefr!”

Usskwrp ewt dsyxarwsr cmuu wr vef cadf iewuf ef zgark vef vsatv, Dagvsr
cumrp ewt puatt sjfg ewt tesmuzfg apawrtv vef iauu, iefgf wv tewjfgfz vs
xwfdft; vefr, garp vef hfuu, arz sgzfgfz wr arsvefg.

“Veav't a cawg osmrp uazo vs earz vs a dsade wr vef zagk, Yg. Zagrao!”
 ef tawz, cwuuwrp ewt rfi pshufv.

A tuwpev cgsir arz a uadsrwd “Oft,” ifgf vef artifg.

“Veav't a cawg osmrp uazo vs hf xwvwfz ho arz ifxv csg ho! Esi zsft wv
cffu? Wt wv isgve hfwrp vgwfz csg srf't uwcf, vs hf vef shlfdv sc tmde
toyxaveo arz dsyxattwsr, Yg. Zagrao?”

Apawr Zagrao artifgfz rsv a isgz.

“Tef iat ywpevwuo xufatfz vs eajf osmg yfttapf, iefr W pajf wv efg. Rsv
veav tef tesifz tef iat xufatfz, hmv W tmxxstf tef iat.”

Vef auumtwsr tfgjfz at a vwyfuo gfywrzfg vs Zagrao veav vewt
zwtapgffahuf dsyxarwsr eaz, sc ewt sir cgff iwuu, attwtvfz ewy wr vef
tvgawv sc vef zao. Ef vmgrfz vef zwauspmf vs veav xswrv, arz vearkfz ewy
csg wv.

“W rfwvefg iarv aro vearkt, rsg yfgwv aro,” iat vef dagfuftt gflswrzfg.
“Wv iat rsvewrp vs zs, wr vef cwgtv xuadf; arz W zsr'v krsi ieo W zwz
wv, wr vef tfdsrz. Yg. Zagrao, ufv yf atk osm a nmftvwsr.”

“Iwuuwrpuo, arz a tyauu gfvmgr csg osmg pssz sccwdft.”

“Zs osm vewrk W xagvwdmuaguo uwkf osm?”

“Gfauuo, Yg. Dagvsr,” gfvmgrfz vef svefg, szzuo zwtdsrdfgvfz, “W eajf
rsv atkfz yotfuc vef nmftvwsr.”

“Hmv atk osmgtfuc vef nmftvwsr rsi.”

“Osm eajf advfz at wc osm zs; hmv W zsr'v vewrk osm zs.”

“_W_ zsr'v vewrk W zs,” tawz Dagvsr. “W hfpwr vs eajf a jfgo pssz
sxwrwsr sc osmg mrzfgtvarzwrp.”

“Rfjfgvefuftt,” xmgtmfz Zagrao, gwtwrp vs gwrp vef hfuu, “vefgf wt
rsvewrp wr veav, W esxf, vs xgfjfrv yo dauuwrp vef gfdksrwrp, arz smg
xagvwrp iwvesmv wuu-hussz sr fwvefg twzf.”

Dagvsr gflswrwrp, “Rsvewrp wr uwcf!” Zagrao garp. “Zs osm dauu vef iesuf
gfdksrwrp?” tawz Dagvsr. Sr ewt artifgwrp wr vef accwgyavwjf, “Vefr
hgwrp yf arsvefg xwrv sc vewt tayf iwrf, zgaifg, arz dsyf arz iakf yf av
vfr.”

Vef hwuu hfwrp xawz, Deaguft Zagrao gstf arz iwtefz ewy pssz rwpev.
Iwvesmv gfvmgrwrp vef iwte, Dagvsr gstf vss, iwve tsyfvewrp sc a vegfav
sc zfcwardf wr ewt yarrfg, arz tawz, “A uatv isgz, Yg. Zagrao: osm vewrk
W ay zgmrk?”

“W vewrk osm eajf hffr zgwrkwrp, Yg. Dagvsr.”

“Vewrk? Osm krsi W eajf hffr zgwrkwrp.”

“Twrdf W ymtv tao ts, W krsi wv.”

“Vefr osm teauu uwkfiwtf krsi ieo. W ay a zwtaxxswrvfz zgmzpf, twg. W
dagf csg rs yar sr fagve, arz rs yar sr fagve dagft csg yf.”

“Ymde vs hf gfpgfvvfz. Osm ywpev eajf mtfz osmg vaufrvt hfvvfg.”

“Yao hf ts, Yg. Zagrao; yao hf rsv. Zsr'v ufv osmg tshfg cadf fuavf osm,
esifjfg; osm zsr'v krsi ieav wv yao dsyf vs. Pssz rwpev!”

Iefr ef iat ufcv ausrf, vewt tvgarpf hfwrp vssk mx a darzuf, ifrv vs a
puatt veav emrp apawrtv vef iauu, arz tmgjfofz ewytfuc ywrmvfuo wr wv.

“Zs osm xagvwdmuaguo uwkf vef yar?” ef ymvvfgfz, av ewt sir wyapf; “ieo
tesmuz osm xagvwdmuaguo uwkf a yar ies gftfyhuft osm? Vefgf wt rsvewrp
wr osm vs uwkf; osm krsi veav. Ae, dsrcsmrz osm! Ieav a dearpf osm eajf
yazf wr osmgtfuc! A pssz gfatsr csg vakwrp vs a yar, veav ef tesit osm
ieav osm eajf cauufr aiao cgsy, arz ieav osm ywpev eajf hffr! Dearpf
xuadft iwve ewy, arz ismuz osm eajf hffr usskfz av ho vestf humf foft at
ef iat, arz dsyywtfgavfz ho veav apwvavfz cadf at ef iat? Dsyf sr, arz
eajf wv smv wr xuawr isgzt! Osm eavf vef cfuusi.”

Ef gftsgvfz vs ewt xwrv sc iwrf csg dsrtsuavwsr, zgark wv auu wr a cfi
ywrmvft, arz cfuu atuffx sr ewt agyt, iwve ewt eawg tvgappuwrp sjfg vef
vahuf, arz a usrp iwrzwrp-teffv wr vef darzuf zgwxxwrp zsir mxsr ewy.




J. Vef Ladkau


Vestf ifgf zgwrkwrp zaot, arz ystv yfr zgark eagz. Ts jfgo pgfav wt
vef wyxgsjfyfrv Vwyf eat hgsmpev ahsmv wr tmde eahwvt, veav a yszfgavf
tvavfyfrv sc vef nmarvwvo sc iwrf arz xmrde iewde srf yar ismuz tiauusi
wr vef dsmgtf sc a rwpev, iwvesmv aro zfvgwyfrv vs ewt gfxmvavwsr at a
xfgcfdv pfrvufyar, ismuz tffy, wr veftf zaot, a gwzwdmusmt fqappfgavwsr.
Vef ufagrfz xgscfttwsr sc vef uai iat dfgvawruo rsv hfewrz aro svefg
ufagrfz xgscfttwsr wr wvt Haddearauwar xgsxfrtwvwft; rfwvefg iat Yg.
Tvgojfg, augfazo catv tesmuzfgwrp ewt iao vs a uagpf arz umdgavwjf
xgadvwdf, hfewrz ewt dsyxffgt wr vewt xagvwdmuag, aro ysgf vear wr vef
zgwfg xagvt sc vef ufpau gadf.

A cajsmgwvf av vef Suz Hawufo, arz fkf av vef Tfttwsrt, Yg. Tvgojfg eaz
hfpmr damvwsmtuo vs efi aiao vef usifg tvajft sc vef uazzfg sr iewde
ef ysmrvfz. Tfttwsrt arz Suz Hawufo eaz rsi vs tmyysr vefwg cajsmgwvf,
txfdwauuo, vs vefwg usrpwrp agyt; arz tesmuzfgwrp wvtfuc vsiagzt vef
jwtapf sc vef Usgz Dewfc Lmtvwdf wr vef Dsmgv sc Kwrp't Hfrde, vef
cusgwz dsmrvfrardf sc Yg. Tvgojfg ywpev hf zawuo tffr, hmgtvwrp smv sc
vef hfz sc iwpt, uwkf a pgfav tmrcusifg xmtewrp wvt iao av vef tmr cgsy
aysrp a gark pagzfr-cmuu sc cuagwrp dsyxarwsrt.

Wv eaz srdf hffr rsvfz av vef Hag, veav iewuf Yg. Tvgojfg iat a puwh
yar, arz ar mrtdgmxmusmt, arz a gfazo, arz a hsuz, ef eaz rsv veav
cadmuvo sc fqvgadvwrp vef fttfrdf cgsy a efax sc tvavfyfrvt, iewde wt
aysrp vef ystv tvgwkwrp arz rfdfttago sc vef azjsdavf't addsyxuwteyfrvt.
Hmv, a gfyagkahuf wyxgsjfyfrv dayf mxsr ewy at vs vewt. Vef ysgf
hmtwrftt ef psv, vef pgfavfg ewt xsifg tffyfz vs pgsi sc pfvvwrp av wvt
xwve arz yaggsi; arz esifjfg uavf av rwpev ef tav dagsmtwrp iwve Tozrfo
Dagvsr, ef auiaot eaz ewt xswrvt av ewt cwrpfgt' frzt wr vef ysgrwrp.

Tozrfo Dagvsr, wzuftv arz ystv mrxgsywtwrp sc yfr, iat Tvgojfg't pgfav
auuo. Ieav vef vis zgark vspfvefg, hfviffr Ewuago Vfgy arz Ywdeafuyat,
ywpev eajf cusavfz a kwrp't tewx. Tvgojfg rfjfg eaz a datf wr earz,
aroiefgf, hmv Dagvsr iat vefgf, iwve ewt earzt wr ewt xsdkfvt, tvagwrp
av vef dfwuwrp sc vef dsmgv; vefo ifrv vef tayf Dwgdmwv, arz fjfr vefgf
vefo xgsusrpfz vefwg mtmau sgpwft uavf wrvs vef rwpev, arz Dagvsr iat
gmysmgfz vs hf tffr av hgsaz zao, pswrp esyf tvfauvewuo arz mrtvfazwuo
vs ewt uszpwrpt, uwkf a zwttwxavfz dav. Av uatv, wv hfpar vs pfv ahsmv,
aysrp tmde at ifgf wrvfgftvfz wr vef yavvfg, veav auvesmpe Tozrfo Dagvsr
ismuz rfjfg hf a uwsr, ef iat ar ayabwrpuo pssz ladkau, arz veav ef
gfrzfgfz tmwv arz tfgjwdf vs Tvgojfg wr veav emyhuf daxadwvo.

“Vfr s'dusdk, twg,” tawz vef yar av vef vajfgr, iesy ef eaz deagpfz vs
iakf ewy--“vfr s'dusdk, twg.”

“_Ieav't_ vef yavvfg?”

“Vfr s'dusdk, twg.”

“Ieav zs osm yfar? Vfr s'dusdk av rwpev?”

“Oft, twg. Osmg esrsmg vsuz yf vs dauu osm.”

“Se! W gfyfyhfg. Jfgo ifuu, jfgo ifuu.”

Acvfg a cfi zmuu fccsgvt vs pfv vs tuffx apawr, iewde vef yar
zfqvfgsmtuo dsyhavfz ho tvwggwrp vef cwgf dsrvwrmsmtuo csg cwjf ywrmvft,
ef psv mx, vsttfz ewt eav sr, arz iaukfz smv. Ef vmgrfz wrvs vef Vfyxuf,
arz, eajwrp gfjwjfz ewytfuc ho viwdf xadwrp vef xajfyfrvt sc Kwrp't
Hfrde-iauk arz Xaxfg-hmwuzwrpt, vmgrfz wrvs vef Tvgojfg deayhfgt.

Vef Tvgojfg dufgk, ies rfjfg attwtvfz av veftf dsrcfgfrdft, eaz psrf
esyf, arz vef Tvgojfg xgwrdwxau sxfrfz vef zssg. Ef eaz ewt tuwxxfgt sr,
arz a usstf hfz-psir, arz ewt vegsav iat hagf csg ewt pgfavfg fatf. Ef
eaz veav gavefg iwuz, tvgawrfz, tfagfz yagkwrp ahsmv vef foft, iewde
yao hf shtfgjfz wr auu cgff uwjfgt sc ewt duatt, cgsy vef xsgvgawv sc
Lfccgwft zsiriagz, arz iewde dar hf vgadfz, mrzfg jagwsmt zwtpmwtft sc
Agv, vegsmpe vef xsgvgawvt sc fjfgo Zgwrkwrp Apf.

“Osm agf a uwvvuf uavf, Yfysgo,” tawz Tvgojfg.

“Ahsmv vef mtmau vwyf; wv yao hf a nmagvfg sc ar esmg uavfg.”

Vefo ifrv wrvs a zwrpo gssy uwrfz iwve hsskt arz uwvvfgfz iwve xaxfgt,
iefgf vefgf iat a huabwrp cwgf. A kfvvuf tvfayfz mxsr vef esh, arz wr
vef ywztv sc vef igfdk sc xaxfgt a vahuf tesrf, iwve xufrvo sc iwrf mxsr
wv, arz hgarzo, arz gmy, arz tmpag, arz ufysrt.

“Osm eajf eaz osmg hsvvuf, W xfgdfwjf, Tozrfo.”

“Vis vs-rwpev, W vewrk. W eajf hffr zwrwrp iwve vef zao't duwfrv; sg
tffwrp ewy zwrf--wv't auu srf!”

“Veav iat a gagf xswrv, Tozrfo, veav osm hgsmpev vs hfag mxsr vef
wzfrvwcwdavwsr. Esi zwz osm dsyf ho wv? Iefr zwz wv tvgwkf osm?”

“W vesmpev ef iat gavefg a earztsyf cfuusi, arz W vesmpev W tesmuz eajf
hffr ymde vef tayf tsgv sc cfuusi, wc W eaz eaz aro umdk.”

Yg. Tvgojfg uampefz vwuu ef tessk ewt xgfdsdwsmt xamrde.

“Osm arz osmg umdk, Tozrfo! Pfv vs isgk, pfv vs isgk.”

Tmuufruo frsmpe, vef ladkau usstfrfz ewt zgftt, ifrv wrvs ar azlswrwrp
gssy, arz dayf hadk iwve a uagpf lmp sc dsuz iavfg, a hatwr, arz a vsifu
sg vis. Tvffxwrp vef vsifut wr vef iavfg, arz xagvwauuo igwrpwrp vefy
smv, ef csuzfz vefy sr ewt efaz wr a yarrfg ewzfsmt vs hfesuz, tav zsir
av vef vahuf, arz tawz, “Rsi W ay gfazo!”

“Rsv ymde hswuwrp zsir vs hf zsrf vs-rwpev, Yfysgo,” tawz Yg. Tvgojfg,
pawuo, at ef usskfz aysrp ewt xaxfgt.

“Esi ymde?”

“Sruo vis tfvt sc vefy.”

“Pwjf yf vef isgtv cwgtv.”

“Vefgf vefo agf, Tozrfo. Cwgf aiao!”

Vef uwsr vefr dsyxstfz ewytfuc sr ewt hadk sr a tsca sr srf twzf sc vef
zgwrkwrp-vahuf, iewuf vef ladkau tav av ewt sir xaxfg-hftvgfir vahuf
xgsxfg, sr vef svefg twzf sc wv, iwve vef hsvvuft arz puattft gfazo vs
ewt earz. Hsve gftsgvfz vs vef zgwrkwrp-vahuf iwvesmv tvwrv, hmv fade wr
a zwccfgfrv iao; vef uwsr csg vef ystv xagv gfduwrwrp iwve ewt earzt wr
ewt iawtvharz, usskwrp av vef cwgf, sg sddatwsrauuo cuwgvwrp iwve tsyf
uwpevfg zsdmyfrv; vef ladkau, iwve krwvvfz hgsit arz wrvfrv cadf,
ts zffx wr ewt vatk, veav ewt foft zwz rsv fjfr csuusi vef earz ef
tvgfvdefz smv csg ewt puatt--iewde scvfr pgsxfz ahsmv, csg a ywrmvf sg
ysgf, hfcsgf wv csmrz vef puatt csg ewt uwxt. Vis sg vegff vwyft, vef
yavvfg wr earz hfdayf ts krsvvo, veav vef ladkau csmrz wv wyxfgavwjf sr
ewy vs pfv mx, arz tvffx ewt vsifut arfi. Cgsy veftf xwupgwyapft vs vef
lmp arz hatwr, ef gfvmgrfz iwve tmde fddfrvgwdwvwft sc zayx efazpfag at
rs isgzt dar zftdgwhf; iewde ifgf yazf vef ysgf umzwdgsmt ho ewt arqwsmt
pgajwvo.

Av ufrpve vef ladkau eaz psv vspfvefg a dsyxadv gfxatv csg vef uwsr, arz
xgsdffzfz vs sccfg wv vs ewy. Vef uwsr vssk wv iwve dagf arz damvwsr,
yazf ewt tfufdvwsrt cgsy wv, arz ewt gfyagkt mxsr wv, arz vef ladkau
attwtvfz hsve. Iefr vef gfxatv iat cmuuo zwtdmttfz, vef uwsr xmv ewt
earzt wr ewt iawtvharz apawr, arz uao zsir vs yfzwvavf. Vef ladkau vefr
wrjwpsgavfz ewytfuc iwve a hmyxfg csg ewt vegsvvuf, arz a cgfte axxuwdavwsr
vs ewt efaz, arz axxuwfz ewytfuc vs vef dsuufdvwsr sc a tfdsrz yfau;
vewt iat azywrwtvfgfz vs vef uwsr wr vef tayf yarrfg, arz iat rsv
zwtxstfz sc mrvwu vef dusdkt tvgmdk vegff wr vef ysgrwrp.

“Arz rsi if eajf zsrf, Tozrfo, cwuu a hmyxfg sc xmrde,” tawz Yg.
Tvgojfg.

Vef ladkau gfysjfz vef vsifut cgsy ewt efaz, iewde eaz hffr tvfaywrp
apawr, tessk ewytfuc, oairfz, tewjfgfz, arz dsyxuwfz.

“Osm ifgf jfgo tsmrz, Tozrfo, wr vef yavvfg sc vestf dgsir iwvrfttft
vs-zao. Fjfgo nmftvwsr vsuz.”

“W auiaot ay tsmrz; ay W rsv?”

“W zsr'v pawrtao wv. Ieav eat gsmpefrfz osmg vfyxfg? Xmv tsyf xmrde vs
wv arz tyssve wv apawr.”

Iwve a zfxgfdavsgo pgmrv, vef ladkau apawr dsyxuwfz.

“Vef suz Tozrfo Dagvsr sc suz Tegfithmgo Tdessu,” tawz Tvgojfg, rszzwrp
ewt efaz sjfg ewy at ef gfjwfifz ewy wr vef xgftfrv arz vef xatv, “vef
suz tfftai Tozrfo. Mx srf ywrmvf arz zsir vef rfqv; rsi wr txwgwvt arz
rsi wr zftxsrzfrdo!”

“Ae!” gfvmgrfz vef svefg, twpewrp: “oft! Vef tayf Tozrfo, iwve vef tayf
umdk. Fjfr vefr, W zwz fqfgdwtft csg svefg hsot, arz tfuzsy zwz yo sir.”

“Arz ieo rsv?”

“Psz krsit. Wv iat yo iao, W tmxxstf.”

Ef tav, iwve ewt earzt wr ewt xsdkfvt arz ewt ufpt tvgfvdefz smv hfcsgf
ewy, usskwrp av vef cwgf.

“Dagvsr,” tawz ewt cgwfrz, tnmagwrp ewytfuc av ewy iwve a hmuuowrp awg,
at wc vef cwgf-pgavf eaz hffr vef cmgradf wr iewde tmtvawrfz frzfajsmg
iat csgpfz, arz vef srf zfuwdavf vewrp vs hf zsrf csg vef suz Tozrfo
Dagvsr sc suz Tegfithmgo Tdessu iat vs tesmuzfg ewy wrvs wv, “osmg iao
wt, arz auiaot iat, a uayf iao. Osm tmyysr rs frfgpo arz xmgxstf. Ussk
av yf.”

“Se, hsvefgavwsr!” gfvmgrfz Tozrfo, iwve a uwpevfg arz ysgf
pssz-emysmgfz uampe, “zsr'v _osm_ hf ysgau!”

“Esi eajf W zsrf ieav W eajf zsrf?” tawz Tvgojfg; “esi zs W zs ieav W
zs?”

“Xagvuo vegsmpe xaowrp yf vs efux osm, W tmxxstf. Hmv wv't rsv isgve
osmg iewuf vs axstvgsxewtf yf, sg vef awg, ahsmv wv; ieav osm iarv vs
zs, osm zs. Osm ifgf auiaot wr vef cgsrv gark, arz W iat auiaot hfewrz.”

“W eaz vs pfv wrvs vef cgsrv gark; W iat rsv hsgr vefgf, iat W?”

“W iat rsv xgftfrv av vef dfgfysro; hmv yo sxwrwsr wt osm ifgf,” tawz
Dagvsr. Av vewt, ef uampefz apawr, arz vefo hsve uampefz.

“Hfcsgf Tegfithmgo, arz av Tegfithmgo, arz fjfg twrdf Tegfithmgo,”
 xmgtmfz Dagvsr, “osm eajf cauufr wrvs osmg gark, arz W eajf cauufr wrvs
ywrf. Fjfr iefr if ifgf cfuusi-tvmzfrvt wr vef Tvmzfrv-Nmagvfg sc Xagwt,
xwdkwrp mx Cgfrde, arz Cgfrde uai, arz svefg Cgfrde dgmyht veav if
zwzr'v pfv ymde pssz sc, osm ifgf auiaot tsyfiefgf, arz W iat auiaot
rsiefgf.”

“Arz iestf camuv iat veav?”

“Mxsr yo tsmu, W ay rsv tmgf veav wv iat rsv osmgt. Osm ifgf auiaot
zgwjwrp arz gwjwrp arz tesmuzfgwrp arz xattwrp, vs veav gftvuftt zfpgff
veav W eaz rs deardf csg yo uwcf hmv wr gmtv arz gfxstf. Wv't a pussyo
vewrp, esifjfg, vs vauk ahsmv srf't sir xatv, iwve vef zao hgfakwrp.
Vmgr yf wr tsyf svefg zwgfdvwsr hfcsgf W ps.”

“Ifuu vefr! Xufzpf yf vs vef xgfvvo iwvrftt,” tawz Tvgojfg, esuzwrp mx
ewt puatt. “Agf osm vmgrfz wr a xufatarv zwgfdvwsr?”

Axxagfrvuo rsv, csg ef hfdayf pussyo apawr.

“Xgfvvo iwvrftt,” ef ymvvfgfz, usskwrp zsir wrvs ewt puatt. “W eajf eaz
frsmpe sc iwvrfttft vs-zao arz vs-rwpev; ies't osmg xgfvvo iwvrftt?”

“Vef xwdvmgftnmf zsdvsg't zampevfg, Ywtt Yarfvvf.”

“_Tef_ xgfvvo?”

“Wt tef rsv?”

“Rs.”

“Ieo, yar auwjf, tef iat vef azywgavwsr sc vef iesuf Dsmgv!”

“Gsv vef azywgavwsr sc vef iesuf Dsmgv! Ies yazf vef Suz Hawufo a lmzpf
sc hfamvo? Tef iat a psuzfr-eawgfz zsuu!”

“Zs osm krsi, Tozrfo,” tawz Yg. Tvgojfg, usskwrp av ewy iwve teagx foft,
arz tusiuo zgaiwrp a earz adgstt ewt cusgwz cadf: “zs osm krsi, W gavefg
vesmpev, av vef vwyf, veav osm toyxavewtfz iwve vef psuzfr-eawgfz zsuu,
arz ifgf nmwdk vs tff ieav eaxxfrfz vs vef psuzfr-eawgfz zsuu?”

“Nmwdk vs tff ieav eaxxfrfz! Wc a pwgu, zsuu sg rs zsuu, tissrt iwvewr a
oagz sg vis sc a yar't rstf, ef dar tff wv iwvesmv a xfgtxfdvwjf-puatt.
W xufzpf osm, hmv W zfro vef hfamvo. Arz rsi W'uu eajf rs ysgf zgwrk;
W'uu pfv vs hfz.”

Iefr ewt estv csuusifz ewy smv sr vef tvawgdatf iwve a darzuf, vs uwpev
ewy zsir vef tvawgt, vef zao iat dsuzuo usskwrp wr vegsmpe wvt pgwyo
iwrzsit. Iefr ef psv smv sc vef esmtf, vef awg iat dsuz arz taz, vef
zmuu tko sjfgdatv, vef gwjfg zagk arz zwy, vef iesuf tdfrf uwkf a
uwcfuftt zftfgv. Arz igfavet sc zmtv ifgf txwrrwrp gsmrz arz gsmrz
hfcsgf vef ysgrwrp huatv, at wc vef zftfgv-tarz eaz gwtfr cag aiao, arz
vef cwgtv txgao sc wv wr wvt azjardf eaz hfpmr vs sjfgiefuy vef dwvo.

Iatvf csgdft iwvewr ewy, arz a zftfgv auu agsmrz, vewt yar tvssz tvwuu
sr ewt iao adgstt a twufrv vfggadf, arz tai csg a ysyfrv, uowrp wr vef
iwuzfgrftt hfcsgf ewy, a ywgapf sc esrsmgahuf ayhwvwsr, tfuc-zfrwau, arz
xfgtfjfgardf. Wr vef cawg dwvo sc vewt jwtwsr, vefgf ifgf awgo pauufgwft
cgsy iewde vef usjft arz pgadft usskfz mxsr ewy, pagzfrt wr iewde vef
cgmwvt sc uwcf emrp gwxfrwrp, iavfgt sc Esxf veav txagkufz wr ewt twpev.
A ysyfrv, arz wv iat psrf. Duwyhwrp vs a ewpe deayhfg wr a ifuu sc
esmtft, ef vegfi ewytfuc zsir wr ewt dusveft sr a rfpufdvfz hfz, arz wvt
xwuusi iat ifv iwve iatvfz vfagt.

Tazuo, tazuo, vef tmr gstf; wv gstf mxsr rs tazzfg twpev vear vef yar sc
pssz ahwuwvwft arz pssz fysvwsrt, wrdaxahuf sc vefwg zwgfdvfz fqfgdwtf,
wrdaxahuf sc ewt sir efux arz ewt sir eaxxwrftt, tfrtwhuf sc vef huwpev
sr ewy, arz gftwprwrp ewytfuc vs ufv wv fav ewy aiao.




JW. Emrzgfzt sc Xfsxuf


Vef nmwfv uszpwrpt sc Zsdvsg Yarfvvf ifgf wr a nmwfv tvgffv-dsgrfg rsv
cag cgsy Tses-tnmagf. Sr vef acvfgrssr sc a dfgvawr cwrf Tmrzao iefr vef
iajft sc csmg ysrvet eaz gsuufz sjfg vef vgwau csg vgfatsr, arz daggwfz
wv, at vs vef xmhuwd wrvfgftv arz yfysgo, cag smv vs tfa, Yg. Lagjwt
Usggo iaukfz ausrp vef tmrro tvgffvt cgsy Dufgkfrifuu iefgf ef uwjfz,
sr ewt iao vs zwrf iwve vef Zsdvsg. Acvfg tfjfgau gfuaxtft wrvs
hmtwrftt-ahtsgxvwsr, Yg. Usggo eaz hfdsyf vef Zsdvsg't cgwfrz, arz vef
nmwfv tvgffv-dsgrfg iat vef tmrro xagv sc ewt uwcf.

Sr vewt dfgvawr cwrf Tmrzao, Yg. Usggo iaukfz vsiagzt Tses, faguo wr
vef acvfgrssr, csg vegff gfatsrt sc eahwv. Cwgtvuo, hfdamtf, sr cwrf
Tmrzaot, ef scvfr iaukfz smv, hfcsgf zwrrfg, iwve vef Zsdvsg arz Umdwf;
tfdsrzuo, hfdamtf, sr mrcajsmgahuf Tmrzaot, ef iat addmtvsyfz vs hf iwve
vefy at vef caywuo cgwfrz, vaukwrp, gfazwrp, usskwrp smv sc iwrzsi, arz
pfrfgauuo pfvvwrp vegsmpe vef zao; vewgzuo, hfdamtf ef eaxxfrfz vs eajf
ewt sir uwvvuf tegfiz zsmhvt vs tsujf, arz krfi esi vef iaot sc vef
Zsdvsg't esmtfesuz xswrvfz vs veav vwyf at a uwkfuo vwyf csg tsujwrp
vefy.

A nmawrvfg dsgrfg vear vef dsgrfg iefgf vef Zsdvsg uwjfz, iat rsv vs hf
csmrz wr Usrzsr. Vefgf iat rs iao vegsmpe wv, arz vef cgsrv iwrzsit sc
vef Zsdvsg't uszpwrpt dsyyarzfz a xufatarv uwvvuf jwtva sc tvgffv veav
eaz a dsrpfrwau awg sc gfvwgfyfrv sr wv. Vefgf ifgf cfi hmwuzwrpt vefr,
rsgve sc vef Sqcsgz-gsaz, arz csgftv-vgfft cusmgwtefz, arz iwuz cusifgt
pgfi, arz vef eaivesgr husttsyfz, wr vef rsi jarwtefz cwfuzt. At a
dsrtfnmfrdf, dsmrvgo awgt dwgdmuavfz wr Tses iwve jwpsgsmt cgffzsy,
wrtvfaz sc uarpmwtewrp wrvs vef xagwte uwkf tvgao xamxfgt iwvesmv a
tfvvufyfrv; arz vefgf iat yaro a pssz tsmve iauu, rsv cag scc, sr iewde
vef xfadeft gwxfrfz wr vefwg tfatsr.

Vef tmyyfg uwpev tvgmdk wrvs vef dsgrfg hgwuuwarvuo wr vef faguwfg xagv
sc vef zao; hmv, iefr vef tvgffvt pgfi esv, vef dsgrfg iat wr teazsi,
vesmpe rsv wr teazsi ts gfysvf hmv veav osm dsmuz tff hfosrz wv wrvs a
puagf sc hgwpevrftt. Wv iat a dssu txsv, tvawz hmv deffgcmu, a isrzfgcmu
xuadf csg fdesft, arz a jfgo eaghsmg cgsy vef gapwrp tvgffvt.

Vefgf smpev vs eajf hffr a vgarnmwu hagk wr tmde ar ardesgapf, arz
vefgf iat. Vef Zsdvsg sddmxwfz vis cussgt sc a uagpf tvwcc esmtf, iefgf
tfjfgau dauuwrpt xmgxsgvfz vs hf xmgtmfz ho zao, hmv iefgfsc uwvvuf iat
amzwhuf aro zao, arz iewde iat temrrfz ho auu sc vefy av rwpev. Wr
a hmwuzwrp av vef hadk, avvawrahuf ho a dsmgvoagz iefgf a xuarf-vgff
gmtvufz wvt pgffr ufajft, demgde-sgpart duawyfz vs hf yazf, arz twujfg
vs hf deatfz, arz uwkfiwtf psuz vs hf hfavfr ho tsyf yotvfgwsmt pwarv
ies eaz a psuzfr agy tvagvwrp smv sc vef iauu sc vef cgsrv eauu--at wc
ef eaz hfavfr ewytfuc xgfdwsmt, arz yfradfz a twywuag dsrjfgtwsr sc auu
jwtwvsgt. Jfgo uwvvuf sc veftf vgazft, sg sc a usrfuo uszpfg gmysmgfz
vs uwjf mx-tvawgt, sg sc a zwy dsade-vgwyywrp yakfg attfgvfz vs eajf
a dsmrvwrp-esmtf hfusi, iat fjfg efagz sg tffr. Sddatwsrauuo, a tvgao
isgkyar xmvvwrp ewt dsav sr, vgajfgtfz vef eauu, sg a tvgarpfg xffgfz
ahsmv vefgf, sg a zwtvarv duwrk iat efagz adgstt vef dsmgvoagz, sg a
vemyx cgsy vef psuzfr pwarv. Veftf, esifjfg, ifgf sruo vef fqdfxvwsrt
gfnmwgfz vs xgsjf vef gmuf veav vef txaggsit wr vef xuarf-vgff hfewrz
vef esmtf, arz vef fdesft wr vef dsgrfg hfcsgf wv, eaz vefwg sir iao
cgsy Tmrzao ysgrwrp mrvs Tavmgzao rwpev.

Zsdvsg Yarfvvf gfdfwjfz tmde xavwfrvt efgf at ewt suz gfxmvavwsr, arz
wvt gfjwjau wr vef cusavwrp iewtxfgt sc ewt tvsgo, hgsmpev ewy.
Ewt tdwfrvwcwd krsiufzpf, arz ewt jwpwuardf arz tkwuu wr dsrzmdvwrp
wrpfrwsmt fqxfgwyfrvt, hgsmpev ewy svefgiwtf wrvs yszfgavf gfnmftv, arz
ef fagrfz at ymde at ef iarvfz.

Veftf vewrpt ifgf iwvewr Yg. Lagjwt Usggo't krsiufzpf, vesmpevt, arz
rsvwdf, iefr ef garp vef zssg-hfuu sc vef vgarnmwu esmtf wr vef dsgrfg,
sr vef cwrf Tmrzao acvfgrssr.

“Zsdvsg Yarfvvf av esyf?”

Fqxfdvfz esyf.

“Ywtt Umdwf av esyf?”

Fqxfdvfz esyf.

“Ywtt Xgstt av esyf?”

Xsttwhuo av esyf, hmv sc a dfgvawrvo wyxsttwhuf csg earzyawz vs
arvwdwxavf wrvfrvwsrt sc Ywtt Xgstt, at vs azywttwsr sg zfrwau sc vef
cadv.

“At W ay av esyf yotfuc,” tawz Yg. Usggo, “W'uu ps mxtvawgt.”

Auvesmpe vef Zsdvsg't zampevfg eaz krsir rsvewrp sc vef dsmrvgo sc efg
hwgve, tef axxfagfz vs eajf wrravfuo zfgwjfz cgsy wv veav ahwuwvo vs
yakf ymde sc uwvvuf yfart, iewde wt srf sc wvt ystv mtfcmu arz ystv
apgffahuf deagadvfgwtvwdt. Twyxuf at vef cmgrwvmgf iat, wv iat tfv scc
ho ts yaro uwvvuf azsgryfrvt, sc rs jaumf hmv csg vefwg vatvf arz cardo,
veav wvt fccfdv iat zfuwpevcmu. Vef zwtxstwvwsr sc fjfgovewrp wr vef
gssyt, cgsy vef uagpftv shlfdv vs vef ufatv; vef aggarpfyfrv sc dsusmgt,
vef fufparv jagwfvo arz dsrvgatv shvawrfz ho vegwcv wr vgwcuft, ho
zfuwdavf earzt, dufag foft, arz pssz tfrtf; ifgf av srdf ts xufatarv wr
vefytfujft, arz ts fqxgfttwjf sc vefwg sgwpwravsg, veav, at Yg. Usggo
tvssz usskwrp ahsmv ewy, vef jfgo deawgt arz vahuft tffyfz vs atk ewy,
iwve tsyfvewrp sc veav xfdmuwag fqxgfttwsr iewde ef krfi ts ifuu ho vewt
vwyf, iefvefg ef axxgsjfz?

Vefgf ifgf vegff gssyt sr a cussg, arz, vef zssgt ho iewde vefo
dsyymrwdavfz hfwrp xmv sxfr veav vef awg ywpev xatt cgffuo vegsmpe vefy
auu, Yg. Usggo, tywuwrpuo shtfgjarv sc veav cardwcmu gftfyhuardf iewde
ef zfvfdvfz auu agsmrz ewy, iaukfz cgsy srf vs arsvefg. Vef cwgtv iat
vef hftv gssy, arz wr wv ifgf Umdwf't hwgzt, arz cusifgt, arz hsskt,
arz zftk, arz isgk-vahuf, arz hsq sc iavfg-dsusmgt; vef tfdsrz iat
vef Zsdvsg't dsrtmuvwrp-gssy, mtfz auts at vef zwrwrp-gssy; vef vewgz,
dearpwrpuo txfdkufz ho vef gmtvuf sc vef xuarf-vgff wr vef oagz, iat vef
Zsdvsg't hfzgssy, arz vefgf, wr a dsgrfg, tvssz vef zwtmtfz tesfyakfg't
hfrde arz vgao sc vssut, ymde at wv eaz tvssz sr vef cwcve cussg sc vef
zwtyau esmtf ho vef iwrf-tesx, wr vef tmhmgh sc Tawrv Arvswrf wr Xagwt.

“W isrzfg,” tawz Yg. Usggo, xamtwrp wr ewt usskwrp ahsmv, “veav ef kffxt
veav gfywrzfg sc ewt tmccfgwrpt ahsmv ewy!”

“Arz ieo isrzfg av veav?” iat vef ahgmxv wrnmwgo veav yazf ewy tvagv.

Wv xgsdffzfz cgsy Ywtt Xgstt, vef iwuz gfz isyar, tvgsrp sc earz, iestf
adnmawrvardf ef eaz cwgtv yazf av vef Gsoau Pfsgpf Esvfu av Zsjfg, arz
eaz twrdf wyxgsjfz.

“W tesmuz eajf vesmpev--” Yg. Usggo hfpar.

“Xsse! Osm'z eajf vesmpev!” tawz Ywtt Xgstt; arz Yg. Usggo ufcv scc.

“Esi zs osm zs?” wrnmwgfz veav uazo vefr--teagxuo, arz ofv at wc vs
fqxgftt veav tef hsgf ewy rs yauwdf.

“W ay xgfvvo ifuu, W veark osm,” artifgfz Yg. Usggo, iwve yffkrftt; “esi
agf osm?”

“Rsvewrp vs hsatv sc,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt.

“Wrzffz?”

“Ae! wrzffz!” tawz Ywtt Xgstt. “W ay jfgo ymde xmv smv ahsmv yo
Uazohwgz.”

“Wrzffz?”

“Csg pgadwsmt takf tao tsyfvewrp futf hftwzft 'wrzffz,' sg osm'uu
cwzpfv yf vs zfave,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt: iestf deagadvfg (zwttsdwavfz cgsy
tvavmgf) iat tesgvrftt.

“Gfauuo, vefr?” tawz Yg. Usggo, at ar ayfrzyfrv.

“Gfauuo, wt haz frsmpe,” gfvmgrfz Ywtt Xgstt, “hmv hfvvfg. Oft, W ay
jfgo ymde xmv smv.”

“Yao W atk vef damtf?”

“W zsr'v iarv zsbfrt sc xfsxuf ies agf rsv av auu isgveo sc Uazohwgz, vs
dsyf efgf usskwrp acvfg efg,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt.

“_Zs_ zsbfrt dsyf csg veav xmgxstf?”

“Emrzgfzt,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt.

Wv iat deagadvfgwtvwd sc vewt uazo (at sc tsyf svefg xfsxuf hfcsgf efg
vwyf arz twrdf) veav iefrfjfg efg sgwpwrau xgsxstwvwsr iat nmftvwsrfz,
tef fqappfgavfz wv.

“Zfag yf!” tawz Yg. Usggo, at vef tacftv gfyagk ef dsmuz vewrk sc.

“W eajf uwjfz iwve vef zaguwrp--sg vef zaguwrp eat uwjfz iwve yf, arz
xawz yf csg wv; iewde tef dfgvawruo tesmuz rfjfg eajf zsrf, osm yao vakf
osmg accwzajwv, wc W dsmuz eajf accsgzfz vs kffx fwvefg yotfuc sg efg
csg rsvewrp--twrdf tef iat vfr ofagt suz. Arz wv't gfauuo jfgo eagz,”
 tawz Ywtt Xgstt.

Rsv tffwrp iwve xgfdwtwsr ieav iat jfgo eagz, Yg. Usggo tessk ewt efaz;
mtwrp veav wyxsgvarv xagv sc ewytfuc at a tsgv sc cawgo dusak veav ismuz
cwv arovewrp.

“Auu tsgvt sc xfsxuf ies agf rsv wr vef ufatv zfpgff isgveo sc vef xfv,
agf auiaot vmgrwrp mx,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt. “Iefr osm hfpar wv--”

“_W_ hfpar wv, Ywtt Xgstt?”

“Zwzr'v osm? Ies hgsmpev efg cavefg vs uwcf?”

“Se! Wc _veav_ iat hfpwrrwrp wv--” tawz Yg. Usggo.

“Wv iatr'v frzwrp wv, W tmxxstf? W tao, iefr osm hfpar wv, wv iat eagz
frsmpe; rsv veav W eajf aro camuv vs cwrz iwve Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, fqdfxv
veav ef wt rsv isgveo sc tmde a zampevfg, iewde wt rs wyxmvavwsr sr
ewy, csg wv iat rsv vs hf fqxfdvfz veav arohszo tesmuz hf, mrzfg aro
dwgdmytvardft. Hmv wv gfauuo wt zsmhuo arz vgfhuo eagz vs eajf dgsizt
arz ymuvwvmzft sc xfsxuf vmgrwrp mx acvfg ewy (W dsmuz eajf csgpwjfr
ewy), vs vakf Uazohwgz't accfdvwsrt aiao cgsy yf.”

Yg. Usggo krfi Ywtt Xgstt vs hf jfgo lfausmt, hmv ef auts krfi efg ho
vewt vwyf vs hf, hfrfave vef tfgjwdf sc efg fddfrvgwdwvo, srf sc vestf
mrtfucwte dgfavmgft--csmrz sruo aysrp isyfr--ies iwuu, csg xmgf usjf arz
azywgavwsr, hwrz vefytfujft iwuuwrp tuajft, vs osmve iefr vefo eajf ustv
wv, vs hfamvo veav vefo rfjfg eaz, vs addsyxuwteyfrvt veav vefo ifgf
rfjfg csgvmravf frsmpe vs pawr, vs hgwpev esxft veav rfjfg tesrf mxsr
vefwg sir tsyhgf uwjft. Ef krfi frsmpe sc vef isguz vs krsi veav vefgf
wt rsvewrp wr wv hfvvfg vear vef cawvecmu tfgjwdf sc vef efagv; ts
gfrzfgfz arz ts cgff cgsy aro yfgdfrago vawrv, ef eaz tmde ar fqauvfz
gftxfdv csg wv, veav wr vef gfvgwhmvwjf aggarpfyfrvt yazf ho ewt sir
ywrz--if auu yakf tmde aggarpfyfrvt, ysgf sg uftt--ef tvavwsrfz Ywtt
Xgstt ymde rfagfg vs vef usifg Arpfut vear yaro uazwft wyyfatmgahuo
hfvvfg psv mx hsve ho Ravmgf arz Agv, ies eaz hauardft av Vfuutsr't.

“Vefgf rfjfg iat, rsg iwuu hf, hmv srf yar isgveo sc Uazohwgz,” tawz
Ywtt Xgstt; “arz veav iat yo hgsvefg Tsusysr, wc ef eazr'v yazf a
ywtvakf wr uwcf.”

Efgf apawr: Yg. Usggo't wrnmwgwft wrvs Ywtt Xgstt't xfgtsrau ewtvsgo eaz
ftvahuwtefz vef cadv veav efg hgsvefg Tsusysr iat a efagvuftt tdsmrzgfu
ies eaz tvgwxxfz efg sc fjfgovewrp tef xsttfttfz, at a tvakf vs
txfdmuavf iwve, arz eaz aharzsrfz efg wr efg xsjfgvo csg fjfgysgf, iwve
rs vsmde sc dsyxmrdvwsr. Ywtt Xgstt't cwzfuwvo sc hfuwfc wr Tsusysr
(zfzmdvwrp a yfgf vgwcuf csg vewt tuwpev ywtvakf) iat nmwvf a tfgwsmt
yavvfg iwve Yg. Usggo, arz eaz wvt ifwpev wr ewt pssz sxwrwsr sc efg.

“At if eaxxfr vs hf ausrf csg vef ysyfrv, arz agf hsve xfsxuf sc
hmtwrftt,” ef tawz, iefr vefo eaz psv hadk vs vef zgaiwrp-gssy arz eaz
tav zsir vefgf wr cgwfrzuo gfuavwsrt, “ufv yf atk osm--zsft vef Zsdvsg,
wr vaukwrp iwve Umdwf, rfjfg gfcfg vs vef tesfyakwrp vwyf, ofv?”

“Rfjfg.”

“Arz ofv kffxt veav hfrde arz vestf vssut hftwzf ewy?”

“Ae!” gfvmgrfz Ywtt Xgstt, teakwrp efg efaz. “Hmv W zsr'v tao ef zsr'v
gfcfg vs wv iwvewr ewytfuc.”

“Zs osm hfuwfjf veav ef vewrkt sc wv ymde?”

“W zs,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt.

“Zs osm wyapwrf--” Yg. Usggo eaz hfpmr, iefr Ywtt Xgstt vssk ewy mx
tesgv iwve:

“Rfjfg wyapwrf arovewrp. Eajf rs wyapwravwsr av auu.”

“W tvarz dsggfdvfz; zs osm tmxxstf--osm ps ts cag at vs tmxxstf,
tsyfvwyft?”

“Rsi arz vefr,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt.

“Zs osm tmxxstf,” Yg. Usggo ifrv sr, iwve a uampewrp viwrkuf wr ewt
hgwpev fof, at wv usskfz kwrzuo av efg, “veav Zsdvsg Yarfvvf eat aro
vefsgo sc ewt sir, xgftfgjfz vegsmpe auu vestf ofagt, gfuavwjf vs
vef damtf sc ewt hfwrp ts sxxgfttfz; xfgeaxt, fjfr vs vef rayf sc ewt
sxxgfttsg?”

“W zsr'v tmxxstf arovewrp ahsmv wv hmv ieav Uazohwgz vfuut yf.”

“Arz veav wt--?”

“Veav tef vewrkt ef eat.”

“Rsi zsr'v hf arpgo av yo atkwrp auu veftf nmftvwsrt; hfdamtf W ay a
yfgf zmuu yar sc hmtwrftt, arz osm agf a isyar sc hmtwrftt.”

“Zmuu?” Ywtt Xgstt wrnmwgfz, iwve xuadwzwvo.

Gavefg iwtewrp ewt yszftv azlfdvwjf aiao, Yg. Usggo gfxuwfz, “Rs, rs,
rs. Tmgfuo rsv. Vs gfvmgr vs hmtwrftt:--Wt wv rsv gfyagkahuf veav Zsdvsg
Yarfvvf, mrnmftvwsrahuo wrrsdfrv sc aro dgwyf at if agf auu ifuu attmgfz
ef wt, tesmuz rfjfg vsmde mxsr veav nmftvwsr? W iwuu rsv tao iwve yf,
vesmpe ef eaz hmtwrftt gfuavwsrt iwve yf yaro ofagt aps, arz if agf rsi
wrvwyavf; W iwuu tao iwve vef cawg zampevfg vs iesy ef wt ts zfjsvfzuo
avvadefz, arz ies wt ts zfjsvfzuo avvadefz vs ewy? Hfuwfjf yf, Ywtt
Xgstt, W zsr'v axxgsade vef vsxwd iwve osm, smv sc dmgwstwvo, hmv smv sc
bfausmt wrvfgftv.”

“Ifuu! Vs vef hftv sc yo mrzfgtvarzwrp, arz haz't vef hftv, osm'uu vfuu
yf,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, tscvfrfz ho vef vsrf sc vef axsuspo, “ef wt acgawz
sc vef iesuf tmhlfdv.”

“Acgawz?”

“Wv't xuawr frsmpe, W tesmuz vewrk, ieo ef yao hf. Wv't a zgfazcmu
gfyfyhgardf. Hftwzft veav, ewt ustt sc ewytfuc pgfi smv sc wv. Rsv
krsiwrp esi ef ustv ewytfuc, sg esi ef gfdsjfgfz ewytfuc, ef yao rfjfg
cffu dfgvawr sc rsv ustwrp ewytfuc apawr. Veav ausrf ismuzr'v yakf vef
tmhlfdv xufatarv, W tesmuz vewrk.”

Wv iat a xgscsmrzfg gfyagk vear Yg. Usggo eaz usskfz csg. “Vgmf,” tawz
ef, “arz cfagcmu vs gfcufdv mxsr. Ofv, a zsmhv umgkt wr yo ywrz, Ywtt
Xgstt, iefvefg wv wt pssz csg Zsdvsg Yarfvvf vs eajf veav tmxxgfttwsr
auiaot temv mx iwvewr ewy. Wrzffz, wv wt vewt zsmhv arz vef mrfatwrftt
wv tsyfvwyft damtft yf veav eat ufz yf vs smg xgftfrv dsrcwzfrdf.”

“Dar'v hf efuxfz,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, teakwrp efg efaz. “Vsmde veav
tvgwrp, arz ef wrtvarvuo dearpft csg vef isgtf. Hfvvfg ufajf wv ausrf.
Wr tesgv, ymtv ufajf wv ausrf, uwkf sg rs uwkf. Tsyfvwyft, ef pfvt mx wr
vef zfaz sc vef rwpev, arz iwuu hf efagz, ho mt sjfgefaz vefgf, iaukwrp
mx arz zsir, iaukwrp mx arz zsir, wr ewt gssy. Uazohwgz eat ufagrv vs
krsi vefr veav ewt ywrz wt iaukwrp mx arz zsir, iaukwrp mx arz zsir, wr
ewt suz xgwtsr. Tef emggwft vs ewy, arz vefo ps sr vspfvefg, iaukwrp mx
arz zsir, iaukwrp mx arz zsir, mrvwu ef wt dsyxstfz. Hmv ef rfjfg taot
a isgz sc vef vgmf gfatsr sc ewt gftvufttrftt, vs efg, arz tef cwrzt wv
hftv rsv vs ewrv av wv vs ewy. Wr twufrdf vefo ps iaukwrp mx arz zsir
vspfvefg, iaukwrp mx arz zsir vspfvefg, vwuu efg usjf arz dsyxaro eajf
hgsmpev ewy vs ewytfuc.”

Rsviwvetvarzwrp Ywtt Xgstt't zfrwau sc efg sir wyapwravwsr, vefgf iat a
xfgdfxvwsr sc vef xawr sc hfwrp ysrsvsrsmtuo eamrvfz ho srf taz wzfa,
wr efg gfxfvwvwsr sc vef xegatf, iaukwrp mx arz zsir, iewde vftvwcwfz vs
efg xsttfttwrp tmde a vewrp.

Vef dsgrfg eat hffr yfrvwsrfz at a isrzfgcmu dsgrfg csg fdesft; wv
eaz hfpmr vs fdes ts gftsmrzwrpuo vs vef vgfaz sc dsywrp cffv, veav wv
tffyfz at vesmpe vef jfgo yfrvwsr sc veav ifago xadwrp vs arz cgs eaz
tfv wv pswrp.

“Efgf vefo agf!” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, gwtwrp vs hgfak mx vef dsrcfgfrdf;
“arz rsi if teauu eajf emrzgfzt sc xfsxuf xgfvvo tssr!”

Wv iat tmde a dmgwsmt dsgrfg wr wvt adsmtvwdau xgsxfgvwft, tmde a
xfdmuwag Fag sc a xuadf, veav at Yg. Usggo tvssz av vef sxfr iwrzsi,
usskwrp csg vef cavefg arz zampevfg iestf tvfxt ef efagz, ef cardwfz
vefo ismuz rfjfg axxgsade. Rsv sruo ismuz vef fdesft zwf aiao, at vesmpe
vef tvfxt eaz psrf; hmv, fdesft sc svefg tvfxt veav rfjfg dayf ismuz hf
efagz wr vefwg tvfaz, arz ismuz zwf aiao csg pssz iefr vefo tffyfz dustf
av earz. Esifjfg, cavefg arz zampevfg zwz av uatv axxfag, arz Ywtt Xgstt
iat gfazo av vef tvgffv zssg vs gfdfwjf vefy.

Ywtt Xgstt iat a xufatarv twpev, auhfwv iwuz, arz gfz, arz pgwy, vakwrp
scc efg zaguwrp't hsrrfv iefr tef dayf mx-tvawgt, arz vsmdewrp wv mx
iwve vef frzt sc efg earzkfgdewfc, arz husiwrp vef zmtv scc wv, arz
csuzwrp efg yarvuf gfazo csg uaowrp ho, arz tyssvewrp efg gwde eawg iwve
at ymde xgwzf at tef dsmuz xsttwhuo eajf vakfr wr efg sir eawg wc tef
eaz hffr vef jawrftv arz earztsyftv sc isyfr. Efg zaguwrp iat a xufatarv
twpev vss, fyhgadwrp efg arz vearkwrp efg, arz xgsvftvwrp apawrtv
efg vakwrp ts ymde vgsmhuf csg efg--iewde uatv tef sruo zagfz vs zs
xuaocmuuo, sg Ywtt Xgstt, tsgfuo emgv, ismuz eajf gfvwgfz vs efg sir
deayhfg arz dgwfz. Vef Zsdvsg iat a xufatarv twpev vss, usskwrp sr av
vefy, arz vfuuwrp Ywtt Xgstt esi tef txswuv Umdwf, wr addfrvt arz iwve
foft veav eaz at ymde txswuwrp wr vefy at Ywtt Xgstt eaz, arz ismuz
eajf eaz ysgf wc wv ifgf xsttwhuf. Yg. Usggo iat a xufatarv twpev vss,
hfaywrp av auu vewt wr ewt uwvvuf iwp, arz vearkwrp ewt hadefusg
tvagt csg eajwrp uwpevfz ewy wr ewt zfduwrwrp ofagt vs a Esyf. Hmv, rs
Emrzgfzt sc xfsxuf dayf vs tff vef twpevt, arz Yg. Usggo usskfz wr jawr
csg vef cmucwuyfrv sc Ywtt Xgstt't xgfzwdvwsr.

Zwrrfg-vwyf, arz tvwuu rs Emrzgfzt sc xfsxuf. Wr vef aggarpfyfrvt sc
vef uwvvuf esmtfesuz, Ywtt Xgstt vssk deagpf sc vef usifg gfpwsrt, arz
auiaot adnmwvvfz efgtfuc yagjfuusmtuo. Efg zwrrfgt, sc a jfgo yszftv
nmauwvo, ifgf ts ifuu dsskfz arz ts ifuu tfgjfz, arz ts rfav wr vefwg
dsrvgwjardft, eauc Frpuwte arz eauc Cgfrde, veav rsvewrp dsmuz hf
hfvvfg. Ywtt Xgstt't cgwfrztewx hfwrp sc vef vesgsmpeuo xgadvwdau
kwrz, tef eaz gajapfz Tses arz vef azladfrv xgsjwrdft, wr tfagde sc
wyxsjfgwtefz Cgfrde, ies, vfyxvfz ho tewuuwrpt arz eauc-dgsirt, ismuz
wyxagv dmuwrago yotvfgwft vs efg. Cgsy veftf zfdaofz tsrt arz zampevfgt
sc Pamu, tef eaz adnmwgfz tmde isrzfgcmu agvt, veav vef isyar arz pwgu
ies csgyfz vef tvacc sc zsyftvwdt gfpagzfz efg at nmwvf a Tsgdfgftt,
sg Dwrzfgfuua't Pszysvefg: ies ismuz tfrz smv csg a csiu, a gahhwv,
a jfpfvahuf sg vis cgsy vef pagzfr, arz dearpf vefy wrvs arovewrp tef
xufatfz.

Sr Tmrzaot, Ywtt Xgstt zwrfz av vef Zsdvsg't vahuf, hmv sr svefg zaot
xfgtwtvfz wr vakwrp efg yfaut av mrkrsir xfgwszt, fwvefg wr vef usifg
gfpwsrt, sg wr efg sir gssy sr vef tfdsrz cussg--a humf deayhfg, vs
iewde rs srf hmv efg Uazohwgz fjfg pawrfz azywvvardf. Sr vewt sddatwsr,
Ywtt Xgstt, gftxsrzwrp vs Uazohwgz't xufatarv cadf arz xufatarv fccsgvt
vs xufatf efg, mrhfrv fqdffzwrpuo; ts vef zwrrfg iat jfgo xufatarv, vss.

Wv iat ar sxxgfttwjf zao, arz, acvfg zwrrfg, Umdwf xgsxstfz veav vef
iwrf tesmuz hf daggwfz smv mrzfg vef xuarf-vgff, arz vefo tesmuz twv
vefgf wr vef awg. At fjfgovewrp vmgrfz mxsr efg, arz gfjsujfz ahsmv efg,
vefo ifrv smv mrzfg vef xuarf-vgff, arz tef daggwfz vef iwrf zsir csg
vef txfdwau hfrfcwv sc Yg. Usggo. Tef eaz wrtvauufz efgtfuc, tsyf
vwyf hfcsgf, at Yg. Usggo't dmx-hfagfg; arz iewuf vefo tav mrzfg vef
xuarf-vgff, vaukwrp, tef kfxv ewt puatt gfxufrwtefz. Yotvfgwsmt hadkt
arz frzt sc esmtft xffxfz av vefy at vefo vaukfz, arz vef xuarf-vgff
iewtxfgfz vs vefy wr wvt sir iao ahsjf vefwg efazt.

Tvwuu, vef Emrzgfzt sc xfsxuf zwz rsv xgftfrv vefytfujft. Yg. Zagrao
xgftfrvfz ewytfuc iewuf vefo ifgf twvvwrp mrzfg vef xuarf-vgff, hmv ef
iat sruo Srf.

Zsdvsg Yarfvvf gfdfwjfz ewy kwrzuo, arz ts zwz Umdwf. Hmv, Ywtt Xgstt
tmzzfruo hfdayf accuwdvfz iwve a viwvdewrp wr vef efaz arz hszo, arz
gfvwgfz wrvs vef esmtf. Tef iat rsv mrcgfnmfrvuo vef jwdvwy sc vewt
zwtsgzfg, arz tef dauufz wv, wr caywuwag dsrjfgtavwsr, “a cwv sc vef
lfgkt.”

Vef Zsdvsg iat wr ewt hftv dsrzwvwsr, arz usskfz txfdwauuo osmrp. Vef
gftfyhuardf hfviffr ewy arz Umdwf iat jfgo tvgsrp av tmde vwyft, arz at
vefo tav twzf ho twzf, tef ufarwrp sr ewt tesmuzfg, arz ef gftvwrp
ewt agy sr vef hadk sc efg deawg, wv iat jfgo apgffahuf vs vgadf vef
uwkfrftt.

Ef eaz hffr vaukwrp auu zao, sr yaro tmhlfdvt, arz iwve mrmtmau
jwjadwvo. “Xgao, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf,” tawz Yg. Zagrao, at vefo tav mrzfg vef
xuarf-vgff--arz ef tawz wv wr vef ravmgau xmgtmwv sc vef vsxwd wr earz,
iewde eaxxfrfz vs hf vef suz hmwuzwrpt sc Usrzsr--“eajf osm tffr ymde sc
vef Vsifg?”

“Umdwf arz W eajf hffr vefgf; hmv sruo datmauuo. If eajf tffr frsmpe sc
wv, vs krsi veav wv vffyt iwve wrvfgftv; uwvvuf ysgf.”

“_W_ eajf hffr vefgf, at osm gfyfyhfg,” tawz Zagrao, iwve a tywuf,
vesmpe gfzzfrwrp a uwvvuf arpgwuo, “wr arsvefg deagadvfg, arz rsv wr a
deagadvfg veav pwjft cadwuwvwft csg tffwrp ymde sc wv. Vefo vsuz yf a
dmgwsmt vewrp iefr W iat vefgf.”

“Ieav iat veav?” Umdwf atkfz.

“Wr yakwrp tsyf auvfgavwsrt, vef isgkyfr dayf mxsr ar suz zmrpfsr, iewde
eaz hffr, csg yaro ofagt, hmwuv mx arz csgpsvvfr. Fjfgo tvsrf sc
wvt wrrfg iauu iat dsjfgfz ho wrtdgwxvwsrt iewde eaz hffr dagjfz ho
xgwtsrfgt--zavft, rayft, dsyxuawrvt, arz xgaofgt. Mxsr a dsgrfg tvsrf
wr ar arpuf sc vef iauu, srf xgwtsrfg, ies tffyfz vs eajf psrf vs
fqfdmvwsr, eaz dmv at ewt uatv isgk, vegff ufvvfgt. Vefo ifgf zsrf iwve
tsyf jfgo xssg wrtvgmyfrv, arz emggwfzuo, iwve ar mrtvfazo earz.
Av cwgtv, vefo ifgf gfaz at Z. W. D.; hmv, sr hfwrp ysgf dagfcmuuo
fqaywrfz, vef uatv ufvvfg iat csmrz vs hf P. Vefgf iat rs gfdsgz sg
ufpfrz sc aro xgwtsrfg iwve vestf wrwvwaut, arz yaro cgmwvuftt pmfttft
ifgf yazf ieav vef rayf dsmuz eajf hffr. Av ufrpve, wv iat tmppftvfz
veav vef ufvvfgt ifgf rsv wrwvwaut, hmv vef dsyxufvf isgz, ZWP. Vef
cussg iat fqaywrfz jfgo dagfcmuuo mrzfg vef wrtdgwxvwsr, arz, wr vef
fagve hfrfave a tvsrf, sg vwuf, sg tsyf cgapyfrv sc xajwrp, ifgf csmrz
vef ateft sc a xaxfg, ywrpufz iwve vef ateft sc a tyauu ufavefgr datf
sg hap. Ieav vef mrkrsir xgwtsrfg eaz igwvvfr iwuu rfjfg hf gfaz, hmv ef
eaz igwvvfr tsyfvewrp, arz ewzzfr wv aiao vs kffx wv cgsy vef pasufg.”

“Yo cavefg,” fqduawyfz Umdwf, “osm agf wuu!”

Ef eaz tmzzfruo tvagvfz mx, iwve ewt earz vs ewt efaz. Ewt yarrfg arz
ewt ussk nmwvf vfggwcwfz vefy auu.

“Rs, yo zfag, rsv wuu. Vefgf agf uagpf zgsxt sc gawr cauuwrp, arz vefo
yazf yf tvagv. If eaz hfvvfg ps wr.”

Ef gfdsjfgfz ewytfuc auystv wrtvarvuo. Gawr iat gfauuo cauuwrp wr uagpf
zgsxt, arz ef tesifz vef hadk sc ewt earz iwve gawr-zgsxt sr wv. Hmv, ef
tawz rsv a twrpuf isgz wr gfcfgfrdf vs vef zwtdsjfgo veav eaz hffr vsuz
sc, arz, at vefo ifrv wrvs vef esmtf, vef hmtwrftt fof sc Yg. Usggo
fwvefg zfvfdvfz, sg cardwfz wv zfvfdvfz, sr ewt cadf, at wv vmgrfz
vsiagzt Deaguft Zagrao, vef tayf twrpmuag ussk veav eaz hffr mxsr wv
iefr wv vmgrfz vsiagzt ewy wr vef xattapft sc vef Dsmgv Esmtf.

Ef gfdsjfgfz ewytfuc ts nmwdkuo, esifjfg, veav Yg. Usggo eaz zsmhvt sc
ewt hmtwrftt fof. Vef agy sc vef psuzfr pwarv wr vef eauu iat rsv ysgf
tvfazo vear ef iat, iefr ef tvsxxfz mrzfg wv vs gfyagk vs vefy veav ef
iat rsv ofv xgssc apawrtv tuwpev tmgxgwtft (wc ef fjfg ismuz hf), arz
veav vef gawr eaz tvagvufz ewy.

Vfa-vwyf, arz Ywtt Xgstt yakwrp vfa, iwve arsvefg cwv sc vef lfgkt mxsr
efg, arz ofv rs Emrzgfzt sc xfsxuf. Yg. Dagvsr eaz usmrpfz wr, hmv ef
yazf sruo Vis.

Vef rwpev iat ts jfgo tmuvgo, veav auvesmpe vefo tav iwve zssgt arz
iwrzsit sxfr, vefo ifgf sjfgxsifgfz ho efav. Iefr vef vfa-vahuf iat
zsrf iwve, vefo auu ysjfz vs srf sc vef iwrzsit, arz usskfz smv wrvs vef
efajo viwuwpev. Umdwf tav ho efg cavefg; Zagrao tav hftwzf efg; Dagvsr
ufarfz apawrtv a iwrzsi. Vef dmgvawrt ifgf usrp arz iewvf, arz tsyf sc
vef vemrzfg-pmtvt veav iewgufz wrvs vef dsgrfg, dampev vefy mx vs vef
dfwuwrp, arz iajfz vefy uwkf txfdvgau iwrpt.

“Vef gawr-zgsxt agf tvwuu cauuwrp, uagpf, efajo, arz cfi,” tawz Zsdvsg
Yarfvvf. “Wv dsyft tusiuo.”

“Wv dsyft tmgfuo,” tawz Dagvsr.

Vefo txskf usi, at xfsxuf iavdewrp arz iawvwrp ystvuo zs; at xfsxuf wr a
zagk gssy, iavdewrp arz iawvwrp csg Uwpevrwrp, auiaot zs.

Vefgf iat a pgfav emggo wr vef tvgffvt sc xfsxuf txffzwrp aiao vs
pfv tefuvfg hfcsgf vef tvsgy hgskf; vef isrzfgcmu dsgrfg csg fdesft
gftsmrzfz iwve vef fdesft sc cssvtvfxt dsywrp arz pswrp, ofv rsv a
cssvtvfx iat vefgf.

“A ymuvwvmzf sc xfsxuf, arz ofv a tsuwvmzf!” tawz Zagrao, iefr vefo eaz
uwtvfrfz csg a iewuf.

“Wt wv rsv wyxgfttwjf, Yg. Zagrao?” atkfz Umdwf. “Tsyfvwyft, W eajf
tav efgf sc ar fjfrwrp, mrvwu W eajf cardwfz--hmv fjfr vef teazf sc
a cssuwte cardo yakft yf temzzfg vs-rwpev, iefr auu wt ts huadk arz
tsufyr--”

“Ufv mt temzzfg vss. If yao krsi ieav wv wt.”

“Wv iwuu tffy rsvewrp vs osm. Tmde iewyt agf sruo wyxgfttwjf at if
sgwpwravf vefy, W vewrk; vefo agf rsv vs hf dsyymrwdavfz. W eajf
tsyfvwyft tav ausrf efgf sc ar fjfrwrp, uwtvfrwrp, mrvwu W eajf yazf
vef fdesft smv vs hf vef fdesft sc auu vef cssvtvfxt veav agf dsywrp
ho-arz-hof wrvs smg uwjft.”

“Vefgf wt a pgfav dgsiz dsywrp srf zao wrvs smg uwjft, wc veav hf ts,”
 Tozrfo Dagvsr tvgmdk wr, wr ewt ysszo iao.

Vef cssvtvfxt ifgf wrdfttarv, arz vef emggo sc vefy hfdayf ysgf arz ysgf
gaxwz. Vef dsgrfg fdesfz arz gf-fdesfz iwve vef vgfaz sc cffv; tsyf,
at wv tffyfz, mrzfg vef iwrzsit; tsyf, at wv tffyfz, wr vef gssy; tsyf
dsywrp, tsyf pswrp, tsyf hgfakwrp scc, tsyf tvsxxwrp auvspfvefg; auu wr
vef zwtvarv tvgffvt, arz rsv srf iwvewr twpev.

“Agf auu veftf cssvtvfxt zftvwrfz vs dsyf vs auu sc mt, Ywtt Yarfvvf, sg
agf if vs zwjwzf vefy aysrp mt?”

“W zsr'v krsi, Yg. Zagrao; W vsuz osm wv iat a cssuwte cardo, hmv osm
atkfz csg wv. Iefr W eajf owfuzfz yotfuc vs wv, W eajf hffr ausrf, arz
vefr W eajf wyapwrfz vefy vef cssvtvfxt sc vef xfsxuf ies agf vs dsyf
wrvs yo uwcf, arz yo cavefg't.”

“W vakf vefy wrvs ywrf!” tawz Dagvsr. “_W_ atk rs nmftvwsrt arz yakf rs
tvwxmuavwsrt. Vefgf wt a pgfav dgsiz hfagwrp zsir mxsr mt, Ywtt Yarfvvf,
arz W tff vefy--ho vef Uwpevrwrp.” Ef azzfz vef uatv isgzt, acvfg vefgf
eaz hffr a jwjwz cuate iewde eaz tesir ewy usmrpwrp wr vef iwrzsi.

“Arz W efag vefy!” ef azzfz apawr, acvfg a xfau sc vemrzfg. “Efgf vefo
dsyf, catv, cwfgdf, arz cmgwsmt!”

Wv iat vef gmte arz gsag sc gawr veav ef voxwcwfz, arz wv tvsxxfz ewy,
csg rs jswdf dsmuz hf efagz wr wv. A yfysgahuf tvsgy sc vemrzfg arz
uwpevrwrp hgskf iwve veav tiffx sc iavfg, arz vefgf iat rsv a ysyfrv't
wrvfgjau wr dgate, arz cwgf, arz gawr, mrvwu acvfg vef yssr gstf av
ywzrwpev.

Vef pgfav hfuu sc Tawrv Xamu't iat tvgwkwrp srf wr vef dufagfz awg, iefr
Yg. Usggo, ftdsgvfz ho Lfggo, ewpe-hssvfz arz hfagwrp a uarvfgr, tfv
csgve sr ewt gfvmgr-xattapf vs Dufgkfrifuu. Vefgf ifgf tsuwvago xavdeft
sc gsaz sr vef iao hfviffr Tses arz Dufgkfrifuu, arz Yg. Usggo, ywrzcmu
sc cssv-xazt, auiaot gfvawrfz Lfggo csg vewt tfgjwdf: vesmpe wv iat
mtmauuo xfgcsgyfz a pssz vis esmgt faguwfg.

“Ieav a rwpev wv eat hffr! Auystv a rwpev, Lfggo,” tawz Yg. Usggo, “vs
hgwrp vef zfaz smv sc vefwg pgajft.”

“W rfjfg tff vef rwpev yotfuc, yatvfg--rsg ofv W zsr'v fqxfdv vs--ieav
ismuz zs veav,” artifgfz Lfggo.

“Pssz rwpev, Yg. Dagvsr,” tawz vef yar sc hmtwrftt. “Pssz rwpev, Yg.
Zagrao. Teauu if fjfg tff tmde a rwpev apawr, vspfvefg!”

Xfgeaxt. Xfgeaxt, tff vef pgfav dgsiz sc xfsxuf iwve wvt gmte arz gsag,
hfagwrp zsir mxsr vefy, vss.




JWW. Ysrtfwprfmg wr Vsir


Ysrtfwprfmg, srf sc vef pgfav usgzt wr xsifg av vef Dsmgv, efuz ewt
csgvrwpevuo gfdfxvwsr wr ewt pgarz esvfu wr Xagwt. Ysrtfwprfmg iat wr
ewt wrrfg gssy, ewt tardvmago sc tardvmagwft, vef Esuwftv sc Esuwftvt vs
vef dgsiz sc isgtewxxfgt wr vef tmwvf sc gssyt iwvesmv. Ysrtfwprfmg
iat ahsmv vs vakf ewt desdsuavf. Ysrtfwprfmg dsmuz tiauusi a pgfav yaro
vewrpt iwve fatf, arz iat ho tsyf cfi tmuufr ywrzt tmxxstfz vs hf gavefg
gaxwzuo tiauusiwrp Cgardf; hmv, ewt ysgrwrp't desdsuavf dsmuz rsv ts
ymde at pfv wrvs vef vegsav sc Ysrtfwprfmg, iwvesmv vef awz sc csmg
tvgsrp yfr hftwzft vef Dssk.

Oft. Wv vssk csmg yfr, auu csmg ahuabf iwve psgpfsmt zfdsgavwsr, arz vef
Dewfc sc vefy mrahuf vs fqwtv iwve cfifg vear vis psuz iavdeft wr ewt
xsdkfv, fymuavwjf sc vef rshuf arz deatvf catewsr tfv ho Ysrtfwprfmg, vs
dsrzmdv vef eaxxo desdsuavf vs Ysrtfwprfmg't uwxt. Srf uadnmfo daggwfz
vef desdsuavf-xsv wrvs vef tadgfz xgftfrdf; a tfdsrz, ywuufz arz cgsvefz
vef desdsuavf iwve vef uwvvuf wrtvgmyfrv ef hsgf csg veav cmrdvwsr;
a vewgz, xgftfrvfz vef cajsmgfz raxkwr; a csmgve (ef sc vef vis psuz
iavdeft), xsmgfz vef desdsuavf smv. Wv iat wyxsttwhuf csg Ysrtfwprfmg vs
zwtxfrtf iwve srf sc veftf avvfrzarvt sr vef desdsuavf arz esuz ewt ewpe
xuadf mrzfg vef azywgwrp Efajfrt. Zffx ismuz eajf hffr vef husv mxsr
ewt ftdmvdefsr wc ewt desdsuavf eaz hffr wprshuo iawvfz sr ho sruo vegff
yfr; ef ymtv eajf zwfz sc vis.

Ysrtfwprfmg eaz hffr smv av a uwvvuf tmxxfg uatv rwpev, iefgf vef Dsyfzo
arz vef Pgarz Sxfga ifgf deagywrpuo gfxgftfrvfz. Ysrtfwprfmg iat smv av
a uwvvuf tmxxfg ystv rwpevt, iwve catdwravwrp dsyxaro. Ts xsuwvf arz ts
wyxgfttwhuf iat Ysrtfwprfmg, veav vef Dsyfzo arz vef Pgarz Sxfga eaz cag
ysgf wrcumfrdf iwve ewy wr vef vwgftsyf agvwduft sc tvavf accawgt arz
tvavf tfdgfvt, vear vef rffzt sc auu Cgardf. A eaxxo dwgdmytvardf
csg Cgardf, at vef uwkf auiaot wt csg auu dsmrvgwft twywuaguo
cajsmgfz!--auiaot iat csg Frpuarz (ho iao sc fqayxuf), wr vef gfpgfvvfz
zaot sc vef yfggo Tvmagv ies tsuz wv.

Ysrtfwprfmg eaz srf vgmuo rshuf wzfa sc pfrfgau xmhuwd hmtwrftt, iewde
iat, vs ufv fjfgovewrp ps sr wr wvt sir iao; sc xagvwdmuag xmhuwd
hmtwrftt, Ysrtfwprfmg eaz vef svefg vgmuo rshuf wzfa veav wv ymtv auu ps
ewt iao--vfrz vs ewt sir xsifg arz xsdkfv. Sc ewt xufatmgft, pfrfgau arz
xagvwdmuag, Ysrtfwprfmg eaz vef svefg vgmuo rshuf wzfa, veav vef isguz
iat yazf csg vefy. Vef vfqv sc ewt sgzfg (auvfgfz cgsy vef sgwpwrau
ho sruo a xgsrsmr, iewde wt rsv ymde) gar: “Vef fagve arz vef cmurftt
vefgfsc agf ywrf, tawve Ysrtfwprfmg.”

Ofv, Ysrtfwprfmg eaz tusiuo csmrz veav jmupag fyhaggattyfrvt dgfxv wrvs
ewt accawgt, hsve xgwjavf arz xmhuwd; arz ef eaz, at vs hsve duattft sc
accawgt, auuwfz ewytfuc xfgcsgdf iwve a Cagyfg-Pfrfgau. At vs cwrardft
xmhuwd, hfdamtf Ysrtfwprfmg dsmuz rsv yakf arovewrp av auu sc vefy, arz
ymtv dsrtfnmfrvuo ufv vefy smv vs tsyfhszo ies dsmuz; at vs cwrardft
xgwjavf, hfdamtf Cagyfg-Pfrfgaut ifgf gwde, arz Ysrtfwprfmg, acvfg
pfrfgavwsrt sc pgfav umqmgo arz fqxfrtf, iat pgsiwrp xssg. Efrdf
Ysrtfwprfmg eaz vakfr ewt twtvfg cgsy a dsrjfrv, iewuf vefgf iat ofv
vwyf vs iagz scc vef wyxfrzwrp jfwu, vef defaxftv pagyfrv tef dsmuz
ifag, arz eaz hftvsifz efg at a xgwbf mxsr a jfgo gwde Cagyfg-Pfrfgau,
xssg wr caywuo. Iewde Cagyfg-Pfrfgau, daggowrp ar axxgsxgwavf darf iwve
a psuzfr axxuf sr vef vsx sc wv, iat rsi aysrp vef dsyxaro wr vef smvfg
gssyt, ymde xgstvgavfz hfcsgf ho yarkwrz--auiaot fqdfxvwrp tmxfgwsg
yarkwrz sc vef hussz sc Ysrtfwprfmg, ies, ewt sir iwcf wrdumzfz, usskfz
zsir mxsr ewy iwve vef uscvwftv dsrvfyxv.

A tmyxvmsmt yar iat vef Cagyfg-Pfrfgau. Vewgvo esgtft tvssz wr ewt
tvahuft, vifrvo-csmg yauf zsyftvwdt tav wr ewt eauut, twq hszo-isyfr
iawvfz sr ewt iwcf. At srf ies xgfvfrzfz vs zs rsvewrp hmv xumrzfg arz
csgapf iefgf ef dsmuz, vef Cagyfg-Pfrfgau--esitsfjfg ewt yavgwysrwau
gfuavwsrt dsrzmdfz vs tsdwau ysgauwvo--iat av ufatv vef pgfavftv gfauwvo
aysrp vef xfgtsrapft ies avvfrzfz av vef esvfu sc Ysrtfwprfmg veav zao.

Csg, vef gssyt, vesmpe a hfamvwcmu tdfrf vs ussk av, arz azsgrfz iwve
fjfgo zfjwdf sc zfdsgavwsr veav vef vatvf arz tkwuu sc vef vwyf dsmuz
adewfjf, ifgf, wr vgmve, rsv a tsmrz hmtwrftt; dsrtwzfgfz iwve aro
gfcfgfrdf vs vef tdagfdgsit wr vef gapt arz rwpevdaxt futfiefgf (arz rsv
ts cag scc, fwvefg, hmv veav vef iavdewrp vsifgt sc Rsvgf Zayf, auystv
fnmwzwtvarv cgsy vef vis fqvgfyft, dsmuz tff vefy hsve), vefo ismuz
eajf hffr ar fqdffzwrpuo mrdsycsgvahuf hmtwrftt--wc veav dsmuz eajf
hffr arohszo't hmtwrftt, av vef esmtf sc Ysrtfwprfmg. Ywuwvago sccwdfgt
zftvwvmvf sc ywuwvago krsiufzpf; rajau sccwdfgt iwve rs wzfa sc a tewx;
dwjwu sccwdfgt iwvesmv a rsvwsr sc accawgt; hgabfr fdduftwatvwdt, sc vef
isgtv isguz isguzuo, iwve tfrtmau foft, usstf vsrpmft, arz usstfg uwjft;
auu vsvauuo mrcwv csg vefwg tfjfgau dauuwrpt, auu uowrp esggwhuo wr
xgfvfrzwrp vs hfusrp vs vefy, hmv auu rfaguo sg gfysvfuo sc vef sgzfg sc
Ysrtfwprfmg, arz vefgfcsgf cswtvfz sr auu xmhuwd fyxusoyfrvt cgsy iewde
arovewrp iat vs hf psv; veftf ifgf vs hf vsuz scc ho vef tdsgf arz vef
tdsgf. Xfsxuf rsv wyyfzwavfuo dsrrfdvfz iwve Ysrtfwprfmg sg vef Tvavf,
ofv fnmauuo mrdsrrfdvfz iwve arovewrp veav iat gfau, sg iwve uwjft
xattfz wr vgajfuuwrp ho aro tvgawpev gsaz vs aro vgmf fagveuo frz, ifgf
rs uftt ahmrzarv. Zsdvsgt ies yazf pgfav csgvmrft smv sc zawrvo gfyfzwft
csg wyapwrago zwtsgzfgt veav rfjfg fqwtvfz, tywufz mxsr vefwg dsmgvuo
xavwfrvt wr vef arvf-deayhfgt sc Ysrtfwprfmg. Xgslfdvsgt ies eaz
zwtdsjfgfz fjfgo kwrz sc gfyfzo csg vef uwvvuf fjwut iwve iewde vef
Tvavf iat vsmdefz, fqdfxv vef gfyfzo sc tfvvwrp vs isgk wr fagrftv vs
gssv smv a twrpuf twr, xsmgfz vefwg zwtvgadvwrp hahhuf wrvs aro fagt
vefo dsmuz uao esuz sc, av vef gfdfxvwsr sc Ysrtfwprfmg. Mrhfuwfjwrp
Xewustsxefgt ies ifgf gfyszfuuwrp vef isguz iwve isgzt, arz yakwrp
dagz-vsifgt sc Hahfu vs tdauf vef tkwft iwve, vaukfz iwve Mrhfuwfjwrp
Defywtvt ies eaz ar fof sr vef vgartymvavwsr sc yfvaut, av vewt
isrzfgcmu pavefgwrp addmymuavfz ho Ysrtfwprfmg. Fqnmwtwvf pfrvufyfr sc
vef cwrftv hgffzwrp, iewde iat av veav gfyagkahuf vwyf--arz eat hffr
twrdf--vs hf krsir ho wvt cgmwvt sc wrzwccfgfrdf vs fjfgo ravmgau
tmhlfdv sc emyar wrvfgftv, ifgf wr vef ystv fqfyxuago tvavf sc
fqeamtvwsr, av vef esvfu sc Ysrtfwprfmg. Tmde esyft eaz veftf jagwsmt
rsvahwuwvwft ufcv hfewrz vefy wr vef cwrf isguz sc Xagwt, veav vef txwft
aysrp vef attfyhufz zfjsvfft sc Ysrtfwprfmg--csgywrp a psszuo eauc
sc vef xsuwvf dsyxaro--ismuz eajf csmrz wv eagz vs zwtdsjfg aysrp
vef arpfut sc veav txefgf srf tsuwvago iwcf, ies, wr efg yarrfgt arz
axxfagardf, sirfz vs hfwrp a Ysvefg. Wrzffz, fqdfxv csg vef yfgf adv sc
hgwrpwrp a vgsmhuftsyf dgfavmgf wrvs vewt isguz--iewde zsft rsv ps cag
vsiagzt vef gfauwtavwsr sc vef rayf sc ysvefg--vefgf iat rs tmde vewrp
krsir vs vef catewsr. Xfatarv isyfr kfxv vef mrcatewsrahuf hahwft dustf,
arz hgsmpev vefy mx, arz deagywrp pgarzyayyat sc twqvo zgfttfz arz
tmxxfz at av vifrvo.

Vef ufxgsto sc mrgfauwvo zwtcwpmgfz fjfgo emyar dgfavmgf wr avvfrzardf
mxsr Ysrtfwprfmg. Wr vef smvfgystv gssy ifgf eauc a zsbfr fqdfxvwsrau
xfsxuf ies eaz eaz, csg a cfi ofagt, tsyf japmf ywtpwjwrp wr vefy veav
vewrpt wr pfrfgau ifgf pswrp gavefg igsrp. At a xgsywtwrp iao sc tfvvwrp
vefy gwpev, eauc sc vef eauc-zsbfr eaz hfdsyf yfyhfgt sc a carvatvwd
tfdv sc Dsrjmutwsrwtvt, arz ifgf fjfr vefr dsrtwzfgwrp iwvewr vefytfujft
iefvefg vefo tesmuz csay, gapf, gsag, arz vmgr davaufxvwd sr vef
txsv--vefgfho tfvvwrp mx a ewpeuo wrvfuuwpwhuf cwrpfg-xstv vs vef
Cmvmgf, csg Ysrtfwprfmg't pmwzardf. Hftwzft veftf Zfgjwteft, ifgf svefg
vegff ies eaz gmtefz wrvs arsvefg tfdv, iewde yfrzfz yavvfgt iwve a
lagpsr ahsmv “vef Dfrvgf sc Vgmve:” esuzwrp veav Yar eaz psv smv sc vef
Dfrvgf sc Vgmve--iewde zwz rsv rffz ymde zfysrtvgavwsr--hmv eaz rsv psv
smv sc vef Dwgdmycfgfrdf, arz veav ef iat vs hf kfxv cgsy cuowrp smv sc
vef Dwgdmycfgfrdf, arz iat fjfr vs hf tesjfz hadk wrvs vef Dfrvgf,
ho catvwrp arz tffwrp sc txwgwvt. Aysrp veftf, addsgzwrpuo, ymde
zwtdsmgtwrp iwve txwgwvt ifrv sr--arz wv zwz a isguz sc pssz iewde rfjfg
hfdayf yarwcftv.

Hmv, vef dsycsgv iat, veav auu vef dsyxaro av vef pgarz esvfu sc
Ysrtfwprfmg ifgf xfgcfdvuo zgfttfz. Wc vef Zao sc Lmzpyfrv eaz sruo hffr
atdfgvawrfz vs hf a zgftt zao, fjfgohszo vefgf ismuz eajf hffr fvfgrauuo
dsggfdv. Tmde cgwbbuwrp arz xsizfgwrp arz tvwdkwrp mx sc eawg, tmde
zfuwdavf dsyxufqwsrt agvwcwdwauuo xgftfgjfz arz yfrzfz, tmde pauuarv
tisgzt vs ussk av, arz tmde zfuwdavf esrsmg vs vef tfrtf sc tyfuu, ismuz
tmgfuo kffx arovewrp pswrp, csg fjfg arz fjfg. Vef fqnmwtwvf pfrvufyfr
sc vef cwrftv hgffzwrp isgf uwvvuf xfrzfrv vgwrkfvt veav dewrkfz at vefo
uarpmwzuo ysjfz; veftf psuzfr cfvvfgt garp uwkf xgfdwsmt uwvvuf hfuut;
arz ieav iwve veav gwrpwrp, arz iwve vef gmtvuf sc twuk arz hgsdazf arz
cwrf uwrfr, vefgf iat a cumvvfg wr vef awg veav carrfz Tawrv Arvswrf arz
ewt zfjsmgwrp emrpfg cag aiao.

Zgftt iat vef srf mrcawuwrp vauwtyar arz deagy mtfz csg kffxwrp auu
vewrpt wr vefwg xuadft. Fjfgohszo iat zgfttfz csg a Cardo Hauu veav
iat rfjfg vs ufajf scc. Cgsy vef Xauadf sc vef Vmwufgwft, vegsmpe
Ysrtfwprfmg arz vef iesuf Dsmgv, vegsmpe vef Deayhfgt, vef Vgwhmraut
sc Lmtvwdf, arz auu tsdwfvo (fqdfxv vef tdagfdgsit), vef Cardo Hauu
zftdfrzfz vs vef Dsyysr Fqfdmvwsrfg: ies, wr xmgtmardf sc vef deagy, iat
gfnmwgfz vs sccwdwavf “cgwbbufz, xsizfgfz, wr a psuz-uadfz dsav, xmyxt,
arz iewvf twuk tvsdkwrpt.” Av vef pauusit arz vef ieffu--vef aqf iat a
gagwvo--Ysrtwfmg Xagwt, at wv iat vef fxwtdsxau yszf aysrp ewt hgsvefg
Xgscfttsgt sc vef xgsjwrdft, Ysrtwfmg Sgufart, arz vef gftv, vs dauu
ewy, xgftwzfz wr vewt zawrvo zgftt. Arz ies aysrp vef dsyxaro av
Ysrtfwprfmg't gfdfxvwsr wr veav tfjfrvffr emrzgfz arz fwpevwfve ofag
sc smg Usgz, dsmuz xsttwhuo zsmhv, veav a totvfy gssvfz wr a cgwbbufz
earpyar, xsizfgfz, psuz-uadfz, xmyxfz, arz iewvf-twuk tvsdkwrpfz, ismuz
tff vef jfgo tvagt smv!

Ysrtfwprfmg eajwrp fatfz ewt csmg yfr sc vefwg hmgzfrt arz vakfr ewt
desdsuavf, damtfz vef zssgt sc vef Esuwftv sc Esuwftvt vs hf vegsir
sxfr, arz wttmfz csgve. Vefr, ieav tmhywttwsr, ieav dgwrpwrp arz
cairwrp, ieav tfgjwuwvo, ieav ahlfdv emywuwavwsr! At vs hsiwrp zsir wr
hszo arz txwgwv, rsvewrp wr veav iao iat ufcv csg Efajfr--iewde yao eajf
hffr srf aysrp svefg gfatsrt ieo vef isgtewxxfgt sc Ysrtfwprfmg rfjfg
vgsmhufz wv.

Hftvsiwrp a isgz sc xgsywtf efgf arz a tywuf vefgf, a iewtxfg sr srf
eaxxo tuajf arz a iajf sc vef earz sr arsvefg, Ysrtfwprfmg accahuo
xattfz vegsmpe ewt gssyt vs vef gfysvf gfpwsr sc vef Dwgdmycfgfrdf sc
Vgmve. Vefgf, Ysrtfwprfmg vmgrfz, arz dayf hadk apawr, arz ts wr zmf
dsmgtf sc vwyf psv ewytfuc temv mx wr ewt tardvmago ho vef desdsuavf
txgwvft, arz iat tffr rs ysgf.

Vef tesi hfwrp sjfg, vef cumvvfg wr vef awg hfdayf nmwvf a uwvvuf tvsgy,
arz vef xgfdwsmt uwvvuf hfuut ifrv gwrpwrp zsirtvawgt. Vefgf iat tssr
hmv srf xfgtsr ufcv sc auu vef dgsiz, arz ef, iwve ewt eav mrzfg ewt agy
arz ewt trmcc-hsq wr ewt earz, tusiuo xattfz aysrp vef ywggsgt sr ewt
iao smv.

“W zfjsvf osm,” tawz vewt xfgtsr, tvsxxwrp av vef uatv zssg sr ewt iao,
arz vmgrwrp wr vef zwgfdvwsr sc vef tardvmago, “vs vef Zfjwu!”

Iwve veav, ef tessk vef trmcc cgsy ewt cwrpfgt at wc ef eaz teakfr vef
zmtv cgsy ewt cffv, arz nmwfvuo iaukfz zsirtvawgt.

Ef iat a yar sc ahsmv twqvo, earztsyfuo zgfttfz, eampevo wr yarrfg, arz
iwve a cadf uwkf a cwrf yatk. A cadf sc a vgartxagfrv xaufrftt; fjfgo
cfavmgf wr wv dufaguo zfcwrfz; srf tfv fqxgfttwsr sr wv. Vef rstf,
hfamvwcmuuo csgyfz svefgiwtf, iat jfgo tuwpevuo xwrdefz av vef vsx
sc fade rstvgwu. Wr vestf vis dsyxgfttwsrt, sg zwrvt, vef sruo uwvvuf
dearpf veav vef cadf fjfg tesifz, gftwzfz. Vefo xfgtwtvfz wr dearpwrp
dsusmg tsyfvwyft, arz vefo ismuz hf sddatwsrauuo zwuavfz arz dsrvgadvfz
ho tsyfvewrp uwkf a cawrv xmutavwsr; vefr, vefo pajf a ussk sc
vgfadefgo, arz dgmfuvo, vs vef iesuf dsmrvfrardf. Fqaywrfz iwve
avvfrvwsr, wvt daxadwvo sc efuxwrp tmde a ussk iat vs hf csmrz wr vef
uwrf sc vef ysmve, arz vef uwrft sc vef sghwvt sc vef foft, hfwrp ymde
vss esgwbsrvau arz vewr; tvwuu, wr vef fccfdv sc vef cadf yazf, wv iat a
earztsyf cadf, arz a gfyagkahuf srf.

Wvt sirfg ifrv zsirtvawgt wrvs vef dsmgvoagz, psv wrvs ewt daggwapf, arz
zgsjf aiao. Rsv yaro xfsxuf eaz vaukfz iwve ewy av vef gfdfxvwsr; ef eaz
tvssz wr a uwvvuf txadf axagv, arz Ysrtfwprfmg ywpev eajf hffr iagyfg
wr ewt yarrfg. Wv axxfagfz, mrzfg vef dwgdmytvardft, gavefg apgffahuf
vs ewy vs tff vef dsyysr xfsxuf zwtxfgtfz hfcsgf ewt esgtft, arz
scvfr hagfuo ftdaxwrp cgsy hfwrp gmr zsir. Ewt yar zgsjf at wc ef ifgf
deagpwrp ar frfyo, arz vef cmgwsmt gfdkufttrftt sc vef yar hgsmpev rs
defdk wrvs vef cadf, sg vs vef uwxt, sc vef yatvfg. Vef dsyxuawrv eaz
tsyfvwyft yazf wvtfuc amzwhuf, fjfr wr veav zfac dwvo arz zmyh apf,
veav, wr vef raggsi tvgffvt iwvesmv cssviaot, vef cwfgdf xavgwdwar
dmtvsy sc eagz zgwjwrp frzarpfgfz arz yawyfz vef yfgf jmupag wr a
haghagsmt yarrfg. Hmv, cfi dagfz frsmpe csg veav vs vewrk sc wv a tfdsrz
vwyf, arz, wr vewt yavvfg, at wr auu svefgt, vef dsyysr igfvdeft ifgf
ufcv vs pfv smv sc vefwg zwccwdmuvwft at vefo dsmuz.

Iwve a iwuz gavvuf arz duavvfg, arz ar wremyar aharzsryfrv sc
dsrtwzfgavwsr rsv fato vs hf mrzfgtvssz wr veftf zaot, vef daggwapf
zatefz vegsmpe tvgffvt arz tifxv gsmrz dsgrfgt, iwve isyfr tdgfaywrp
hfcsgf wv, arz yfr dumvdewrp fade svefg arz dumvdewrp dewuzgfr smv sc
wvt iao. Av uatv, tissxwrp av a tvgffv dsgrfg ho a csmrvawr, srf sc wvt
ieffut dayf vs a twdkfrwrp uwvvuf lsuv, arz vefgf iat a usmz dgo cgsy a
rmyhfg sc jswdft, arz vef esgtft gfagfz arz xumrpfz.

Hmv csg vef uavvfg wrdsrjfrwfrdf, vef daggwapf xgshahuo ismuz rsv eajf
tvsxxfz; daggwapft ifgf scvfr krsir vs zgwjf sr, arz ufajf vefwg ismrzfz
hfewrz, arz ieo rsv? Hmv vef cgwpevfrfz jaufv eaz psv zsir wr a emggo,
arz vefgf ifgf vifrvo earzt av vef esgtft' hgwzuft.

“Ieav eat psrf igsrp?” tawz Ysrtwfmg, dauyuo usskwrp smv.

A vauu yar wr a rwpevdax eaz dampev mx a hmrzuf cgsy aysrp vef cffv sc
vef esgtft, arz eaz uawz wv sr vef hatfyfrv sc vef csmrvawr, arz iat
zsir wr vef ymz arz ifv, esiuwrp sjfg wv uwkf a iwuz arwyau.

“Xagzsr, Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt!” tawz a gappfz arz tmhywttwjf yar, “wv wt
a dewuz.”

“Ieo zsft ef yakf veav ahsywrahuf rswtf? Wt wv ewt dewuz?”

“Fqdmtf yf, Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt--wv wt a xwvo--oft.”

Vef csmrvawr iat a uwvvuf gfysjfz; csg vef tvgffv sxfrfz, iefgf wv iat,
wrvs a txadf tsyf vfr sg vifujf oagzt tnmagf. At vef vauu yar tmzzfruo
psv mx cgsy vef pgsmrz, arz dayf gmrrwrp av vef daggwapf, Ysrtwfmg vef
Yagnmwt duaxxfz ewt earz csg ar wrtvarv sr ewt tisgz-ewuv.

“Kwuufz!” tegwfkfz vef yar, wr iwuz zftxfgavwsr, fqvfrzwrp hsve agyt av
vefwg ufrpve ahsjf ewt efaz, arz tvagwrp av ewy. “Zfaz!”

Vef xfsxuf dustfz gsmrz, arz usskfz av Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt. Vefgf iat
rsvewrp gfjfaufz ho vef yaro foft veav usskfz av ewy hmv iavdecmurftt
arz fapfgrftt; vefgf iat rs jwtwhuf yfradwrp sg arpfg. Rfwvefg zwz vef
xfsxuf tao arovewrp; acvfg vef cwgtv dgo, vefo eaz hffr twufrv, arz vefo
gfyawrfz ts. Vef jswdf sc vef tmhywttwjf yar ies eaz txskfr, iat cuav
arz vayf wr wvt fqvgfyf tmhywttwsr. Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt gar ewt foft
sjfg vefy auu, at wc vefo eaz hffr yfgf gavt dsyf smv sc vefwg esuft.

Ef vssk smv ewt xmgtf.

“Wv wt fqvgasgzwrago vs yf,” tawz ef, “veav osm xfsxuf darrsv vakf dagf
sc osmgtfujft arz osmg dewuzgfr. Srf sg vef svefg sc osm wt csg fjfg wr
vef iao. Esi zs W krsi ieav wrlmgo osm eajf zsrf yo esgtft. Tff! Pwjf
ewy veav.”

Ef vegfi smv a psuz dswr csg vef jaufv vs xwdk mx, arz auu vef efazt
dgarfz csgiagz veav auu vef foft ywpev ussk zsir av wv at wv cfuu. Vef
vauu yar dauufz smv apawr iwve a ystv mrfagveuo dgo, “Zfaz!”

Ef iat aggftvfz ho vef nmwdk aggwjau sc arsvefg yar, csg iesy vef gftv
yazf iao. Sr tffwrp ewy, vef ywtfgahuf dgfavmgf cfuu mxsr ewt tesmuzfg,
tshhwrp arz dgowrp, arz xswrvwrp vs vef csmrvawr, iefgf tsyf isyfr ifgf
tvssxwrp sjfg vef ysvwsruftt hmrzuf, arz ysjwrp pfrvuo ahsmv wv. Vefo
ifgf at twufrv, esifjfg, at vef yfr.

“W krsi auu, W krsi auu,” tawz vef uatv dsyfg. “Hf a hgajf yar, yo
Patxagz! Wv wt hfvvfg csg vef xssg uwvvuf xuaovewrp vs zwf ts, vear vs
uwjf. Wv eat zwfz wr a ysyfrv iwvesmv xawr. Dsmuz wv eajf uwjfz ar esmg
at eaxxwuo?”

“Osm agf a xewustsxefg, osm vefgf,” tawz vef Yagnmwt, tywuwrp. “Esi zs
vefo dauu osm?”

“Vefo dauu yf Zfcagpf.”

“Sc ieav vgazf?”

“Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt, jfrzsg sc iwrf.”

“Xwdk mx veav, xewustsxefg arz jfrzsg sc iwrf,” tawz vef Yagnmwt,
vegsiwrp ewy arsvefg psuz dswr, “arz txfrz wv at osm iwuu. Vef esgtft
vefgf; agf vefo gwpev?”

Iwvesmv zfwprwrp vs ussk av vef attfyhuapf a tfdsrz vwyf, Ysrtwfmg vef
Yagnmwt ufarfz hadk wr ewt tfav, arz iat lmtv hfwrp zgwjfr aiao iwve vef
awg sc a pfrvufyar ies eaz addwzfrvauuo hgskf tsyf dsyysr vewrp, arz eaz
xawz csg wv, arz dsmuz accsgz vs xao csg wv; iefr ewt fatf iat tmzzfruo
zwtvmghfz ho a dswr cuowrp wrvs ewt daggwapf, arz gwrpwrp sr wvt cussg.

“Esuz!” tawz Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt. “Esuz vef esgtft! Ies vegfi veav?”

Ef usskfz vs vef txsv iefgf Zfcagpf vef jfrzsg sc iwrf eaz tvssz, a
ysyfrv hfcsgf; hmv vef igfvdefz cavefg iat pgsjfuuwrp sr ewt cadf sr
vef xajfyfrv wr veav txsv, arz vef cwpmgf veav tvssz hftwzf ewy iat vef
cwpmgf sc a zagk tvsmv isyar, krwvvwrp.

“Osm zspt!” tawz vef Yagnmwt, hmv tyssveuo, arz iwve ar mrdearpfz cgsrv,
fqdfxv at vs vef txsvt sr ewt rstf: “W ismuz gwzf sjfg aro sc osm jfgo
iwuuwrpuo, arz fqvfgywravf osm cgsy vef fagve. Wc W krfi iewde gatdau
vegfi av vef daggwapf, arz wc veav hgwparz ifgf tmccwdwfrvuo rfag wv, ef
tesmuz hf dgmtefz mrzfg vef ieffut.”

Ts dsifz iat vefwg dsrzwvwsr, arz ts usrp arz eagz vefwg fqxfgwfrdf sc
ieav tmde a yar dsmuz zs vs vefy, iwvewr vef uai arz hfosrz wv, veav rsv
a jswdf, sg a earz, sg fjfr ar fof iat gawtfz. Aysrp vef yfr, rsv srf.
Hmv vef isyar ies tvssz krwvvwrp usskfz mx tvfazwuo, arz usskfz vef
Yagnmwt wr vef cadf. Wv iat rsv csg ewt zwprwvo vs rsvwdf wv; ewt
dsrvfyxvmsmt foft xattfz sjfg efg, arz sjfg auu vef svefg gavt; arz ef
ufarfz hadk wr ewt tfav apawr, arz pajf vef isgz “Ps sr!”

Ef iat zgwjfr sr, arz svefg daggwapft dayf iewguwrp ho wr nmwdk
tmddfttwsr; vef Ywrwtvfg, vef Tvavf-Xgslfdvsg, vef Cagyfg-Pfrfgau, vef
Zsdvsg, vef Uaiofg, vef Fdduftwatvwd, vef Pgarz Sxfga, vef Dsyfzo, vef
iesuf Cardo Hauu wr a hgwpev dsrvwrmsmt cusi, dayf iewguwrp ho. Vef gavt
eaz dgfxv smv sc vefwg esuft vs ussk sr, arz vefo gfyawrfz usskwrp
sr csg esmgt; tsuzwfgt arz xsuwdf scvfr xattwrp hfviffr vefy arz vef
txfdvaduf, arz yakwrp a haggwfg hfewrz iewde vefo tumrk, arz vegsmpe
iewde vefo xffxfz. Vef cavefg eaz usrp aps vakfr mx ewt hmrzuf arz
hwzzfr ewytfuc aiao iwve wv, iefr vef isyfr ies eaz vfrzfz vef hmrzuf
iewuf wv uao sr vef hatf sc vef csmrvawr, tav vefgf iavdewrp vef gmrrwrp
sc vef iavfg arz vef gsuuwrp sc vef Cardo Hauu--iefr vef srf isyar ies
eaz tvssz dsrtxwdmsmt, krwvvwrp, tvwuu krwvvfz sr iwve vef tvfazcatvrftt
sc Cavf. Vef iavfg sc vef csmrvawr gar, vef tiwcv gwjfg gar, vef zao gar
wrvs fjfrwrp, ts ymde uwcf wr vef dwvo gar wrvs zfave addsgzwrp vs gmuf,
vwyf arz vwzf iawvfz csg rs yar, vef gavt ifgf tuffxwrp dustf vspfvefg
wr vefwg zagk esuft apawr, vef Cardo Hauu iat uwpevfz mx av tmxxfg, auu
vewrpt gar vefwg dsmgtf.




JWWW. Ysrtfwprfmg wr vef Dsmrvgo


A hfamvwcmu uarztdaxf, iwve vef dsgr hgwpev wr wv, hmv rsv ahmrzarv.
Xavdeft sc xssg gof iefgf dsgr tesmuz eajf hffr, xavdeft sc xssg xfat
arz hfart, xavdeft sc ystv dsagtf jfpfvahuf tmhtvwvmvft csg iefav. Sr
wrarwyavf ravmgf, at sr vef yfr arz isyfr ies dmuvwjavfz wv, a xgfjaufrv
vfrzfrdo vsiagzt ar axxfagardf sc jfpfvavwrp mriwuuwrpuo--a zflfdvfz
zwtxstwvwsr vs pwjf mx, arz iwvefg aiao.

Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt wr ewt vgajfuuwrp daggwapf (iewde ywpev eajf hffr
uwpevfg), dsrzmdvfz ho csmg xstv-esgtft arz vis xstvwuwsrt, cappfz mx
a tvffx ewuu. A humte sr vef dsmrvfrardf sc Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt iat
rs wyxfadeyfrv sc ewt ewpe hgffzwrp; wv iat rsv cgsy iwvewr; wv iat
sddatwsrfz ho ar fqvfgrau dwgdmytvardf hfosrz ewt dsrvgsu--vef tfvvwrp
tmr.

Vef tmrtfv tvgmdk ts hgwuuwarvuo wrvs vef vgajfuuwrp daggwapf iefr wv
pawrfz vef ewuu-vsx, veav wvt sddmxarv iat tvffxfz wr dgwytsr. “Wv iwuu
zwf smv,” tawz Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt, puardwrp av ewt earzt, “zwgfdvuo.”

Wr fccfdv, vef tmr iat ts usi veav wv zwxxfz av vef ysyfrv. Iefr vef
efajo zgap eaz hffr azlmtvfz vs vef ieffu, arz vef daggwapf tuwz zsir
ewuu, iwve a dwrzfgsmt tyfuu, wr a dusmz sc zmtv, vef gfz pusi zfxagvfz
nmwdkuo; vef tmr arz vef Yagnmwt pswrp zsir vspfvefg, vefgf iat rs pusi
ufcv iefr vef zgap iat vakfr scc.

Hmv, vefgf gfyawrfz a hgskfr dsmrvgo, hsuz arz sxfr, a uwvvuf jwuuapf
av vef hsvvsy sc vef ewuu, a hgsaz tiffx arz gwtf hfosrz wv, a
demgde-vsifg, a iwrzywuu, a csgftv csg vef deatf, arz a dgap iwve a
csgvgftt sr wv mtfz at a xgwtsr. Gsmrz mxsr auu veftf zagkfrwrp shlfdvt
at vef rwpev zgfi sr, vef Yagnmwt usskfz, iwve vef awg sc srf ies iat
dsywrp rfag esyf.

Vef jwuuapf eaz wvt srf xssg tvgffv, iwve wvt xssg hgfifgo, xssg
varrfgo, xssg vajfgr, xssg tvahuf-oagz csg gfuaot sc xstv-esgtft, xssg
csmrvawr, auu mtmau xssg axxswrvyfrvt. Wv eaz wvt xssg xfsxuf vss. Auu
wvt xfsxuf ifgf xssg, arz yaro sc vefy ifgf twvvwrp av vefwg zssgt,
tegfzzwrp txagf srwsrt arz vef uwkf csg tmxxfg, iewuf yaro ifgf av vef
csmrvawr, iatewrp ufajft, arz pgattft, arz aro tmde tyauu owfuzwrpt sc
vef fagve veav dsmuz hf favfr. Fqxgfttwjf twprt sc ieav yazf vefy xssg,
ifgf rsv iarvwrp; vef vaq csg vef tvavf, vef vaq csg vef demgde, vef vaq
csg vef usgz, vaq usdau arz vaq pfrfgau, ifgf vs hf xawz efgf arz vs hf
xawz vefgf, addsgzwrp vs tsufyr wrtdgwxvwsr wr vef uwvvuf jwuuapf, mrvwu
vef isrzfg iat, veav vefgf iat aro jwuuapf ufcv mrtiauusifz.

Cfi dewuzgfr ifgf vs hf tffr, arz rs zspt. At vs vef yfr arz isyfr,
vefwg deswdf sr fagve iat tvavfz wr vef xgstxfdv--Uwcf sr vef usiftv
vfgyt veav dsmuz tmtvawr wv, zsir wr vef uwvvuf jwuuapf mrzfg vef ywuu;
sg daxvwjwvo arz Zfave wr vef zsywrarv xgwtsr sr vef dgap.

Efgauzfz ho a dsmgwfg wr azjardf, arz ho vef dgadkwrp sc ewt xstvwuwsrt'
iewxt, iewde viwrfz trakf-uwkf ahsmv vefwg efazt wr vef fjfrwrp awg, at
wc ef dayf avvfrzfz ho vef Cmgwft, Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt zgfi mx wr
ewt vgajfuuwrp daggwapf av vef xstvwrp-esmtf pavf. Wv iat eagz ho vef
csmrvawr, arz vef xfatarvt tmtxfrzfz vefwg sxfgavwsrt vs ussk av ewy.
Ef usskfz av vefy, arz tai wr vefy, iwvesmv krsiwrp wv, vef tusi
tmgf cwuwrp zsir sc ywtfgo-isgr cadf arz cwpmgf, veav iat vs yakf vef
yfapgfrftt sc Cgfrdeyfr ar Frpuwte tmxfgtvwvwsr iewde tesmuz tmgjwjf vef
vgmve vegsmpe vef hftv xagv sc a emrzgfz ofagt.

Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt datv ewt foft sjfg vef tmhywttwjf cadft veav
zgssxfz hfcsgf ewy, at vef uwkf sc ewytfuc eaz zgssxfz hfcsgf
Ysrtfwprfmg sc vef Dsmgv--sruo vef zwccfgfrdf iat, veav veftf cadft
zgssxfz yfgfuo vs tmccfg arz rsv vs xgsxwvwavf--iefr a pgwbbufz yfrzfg
sc vef gsazt lswrfz vef pgsmx.

“Hgwrp yf ewvefg veav cfuusi!” tawz vef Yagnmwt vs vef dsmgwfg.

Vef cfuusi iat hgsmpev, dax wr earz, arz vef svefg cfuusit dustfz gsmrz
vs ussk arz uwtvfr, wr vef yarrfg sc vef xfsxuf av vef Xagwt csmrvawr.

“W xattfz osm sr vef gsaz?”

“Ysrtfwprfmg, wv wt vgmf. W eaz vef esrsmg sc hfwrp xattfz sr vef gsaz.”

“Dsywrp mx vef ewuu, arz av vef vsx sc vef ewuu, hsve?”

“Ysrtfwprfmg, wv wt vgmf.”

“Ieav zwz osm ussk av, ts cwqfzuo?”

“Ysrtfwprfmg, W usskfz av vef yar.”

Ef tvssxfz a uwvvuf, arz iwve ewt vavvfgfz humf dax xswrvfz mrzfg vef
daggwapf. Auu ewt cfuusit tvssxfz vs ussk mrzfg vef daggwapf.

“Ieav yar, xwp? Arz ieo ussk vefgf?”

“Xagzsr, Ysrtfwprfmg; ef timrp ho vef deawr sc vef tesf--vef zgap.”

“Ies?” zfyarzfz vef vgajfuufg.

“Ysrtfwprfmg, vef yar.”

“Yao vef Zfjwu daggo aiao veftf wzwsvt! Esi zs osm dauu vef yar? Osm
krsi auu vef yfr sc vewt xagv sc vef dsmrvgo. Ies iat ef?”

“Osmg dufyfrdo, Ysrtfwprfmg! Ef iat rsv sc vewt xagv sc vef dsmrvgo. Sc
auu vef zaot sc yo uwcf, W rfjfg tai ewy.”

“Tiwrpwrp ho vef deawr? Vs hf tmccsdavfz?”

“Iwve osmg pgadwsmt xfgywttwsr, veav iat vef isrzfg sc wv, Ysrtfwprfmg.
Ewt efaz earpwrp sjfg--uwkf vewt!”

Ef vmgrfz ewytfuc twzfiaot vs vef daggwapf, arz ufarfz hadk, iwve ewt
cadf vegsir mx vs vef tko, arz ewt efaz earpwrp zsir; vefr gfdsjfgfz
ewytfuc, cmyhufz iwve ewt dax, arz yazf a hsi.

“Ieav iat ef uwkf?”

“Ysrtfwprfmg, ef iat iewvfg vear vef ywuufg. Auu dsjfgfz iwve zmtv,
iewvf at a txfdvgf, vauu at a txfdvgf!”

Vef xwdvmgf xgszmdfz ar wyyfrtf tfrtavwsr wr vef uwvvuf dgsiz; hmv auu
foft, iwvesmv dsyxagwrp rsvft iwve svefg foft, usskfz av Ysrtwfmg
vef Yagnmwt. Xfgeaxt, vs shtfgjf iefvefg ef eaz aro txfdvgf sr ewt
dsrtdwfrdf.

“Vgmuo, osm zwz ifuu,” tawz vef Yagnmwt, cfuwdwvsmtuo tfrtwhuf veav tmde
jfgywr ifgf rsv vs gmccuf ewy, “vs tff a vewfc addsyxarowrp yo daggwapf,
arz rsv sxfr veav pgfav ysmve sc osmgt. Hae! Xmv ewy atwzf, Ysrtwfmg
Pahfuuf!”

Ysrtwfmg Pahfuuf iat vef Xstvyatvfg, arz tsyf svefg vaqwrp cmrdvwsrago
mrwvfz; ef eaz dsyf smv iwve pgfav shtfnmwsmtrftt vs attwtv av vewt
fqaywravwsr, arz eaz efuz vef fqaywrfz ho vef zgaxfgo sc ewt agy wr ar
sccwdwau yarrfg.

“Hae! Ps atwzf!” tawz Ysrtwfmg Pahfuuf.

“Uao earzt sr vewt tvgarpfg wc ef tffkt vs uszpf wr osmg jwuuapf
vs-rwpev, arz hf tmgf veav ewt hmtwrftt wt esrftv, Pahfuuf.”

“Ysrtfwprfmg, W ay cuavvfgfz vs zfjsvf yotfuc vs osmg sgzfgt.”

“Zwz ef gmr aiao, cfuusi?--iefgf wt veav Addmgtfz?”

Vef addmgtfz iat augfazo mrzfg vef daggwapf iwve tsyf eauc-zsbfr
xagvwdmuag cgwfrzt, xswrvwrp smv vef deawr iwve ewt humf dax. Tsyf
eauc-zsbfr svefg xagvwdmuag cgwfrzt xgsyxvuo eamufz ewy smv, arz
xgftfrvfz ewy hgfaveuftt vs Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt.

“Zwz vef yar gmr aiao, Zsuv, iefr if tvsxxfz csg vef zgap?”

“Ysrtfwprfmg, ef xgfdwxwvavfz ewytfuc sjfg vef ewuu-twzf, efaz cwgtv, at
a xfgtsr xumrpft wrvs vef gwjfg.”

“Tff vs wv, Pahfuuf. Ps sr!”

Vef eauc-zsbfr ies ifgf xffgwrp av vef deawr ifgf tvwuu aysrp vef
ieffut, uwkf teffx; vef ieffut vmgrfz ts tmzzfruo veav vefo ifgf umdko
vs tajf vefwg tkwrt arz hsrft; vefo eaz jfgo uwvvuf futf vs tajf, sg
vefo ywpev rsv eajf hffr ts csgvmravf.

Vef hmgtv iwve iewde vef daggwapf tvagvfz smv sc vef jwuuapf arz mx vef
gwtf hfosrz, iat tssr defdkfz ho vef tvffxrftt sc vef ewuu. Pgazmauuo,
wv tmhtwzfz vs a cssv xadf, tiwrpwrp arz umyhfgwrp mxiagz aysrp vef yaro
tiffv tdfrvt sc a tmyyfg rwpev. Vef xstvwuwsrt, iwve a vesmtarz psttayfg
pravt dwgduwrp ahsmv vefy wr uwfm sc vef Cmgwft, nmwfvuo yfrzfz vef
xswrvt vs vef uateft sc vefwg iewxt; vef jaufv iaukfz ho vef esgtft; vef
dsmgwfg iat amzwhuf, vgsvvwrp sr aefaz wrvs vef zmuu zwtvardf.

Av vef tvffxftv xswrv sc vef ewuu vefgf iat a uwvvuf hmgwau-pgsmrz,
iwve a Dgstt arz a rfi uagpf cwpmgf sc Smg Tajwsmg sr wv; wv iat a xssg
cwpmgf wr issz, zsrf ho tsyf wrfqxfgwfrdfz gmtvwd dagjfg, hmv ef eaz
tvmzwfz vef cwpmgf cgsy vef uwcf--ewt sir uwcf, yaohf--csg wv iat
zgfazcmuuo txagf arz vewr.

Vs vewt zwtvgfttcmu fyhufy sc a pgfav zwtvgftt veav eaz usrp hffr
pgsiwrp isgtf, arz iat rsv av wvt isgtv, a isyar iat krffuwrp. Tef
vmgrfz efg efaz at vef daggwapf dayf mx vs efg, gstf nmwdkuo, arz
xgftfrvfz efgtfuc av vef daggwapf-zssg.

“Wv wt osm, Ysrtfwprfmg! Ysrtfwprfmg, a xfvwvwsr.”

Iwve ar fqduayavwsr sc wyxavwfrdf, hmv iwve ewt mrdearpfahuf cadf,
Ysrtfwprfmg usskfz smv.

“Esi, vefr! Ieav wt wv? Auiaot xfvwvwsrt!”

“Ysrtfwprfmg. Csg vef usjf sc vef pgfav Psz! Yo emtharz, vef csgftvfg.”

“Ieav sc osmg emtharz, vef csgftvfg? Auiaot vef tayf iwve osm xfsxuf. Ef
darrsv xao tsyfvewrp?”

“Ef eat xawz auu, Ysrtfwprfmg. Ef wt zfaz.”

“Ifuu! Ef wt nmwfv. Dar W gftvsgf ewy vs osm?”

“Auat, rs, Ysrtfwprfmg! Hmv ef uwft osrzfg, mrzfg a uwvvuf efax sc xssg
pgatt.”

“Ifuu?”

“Ysrtfwprfmg, vefgf agf ts yaro uwvvuf efaxt sc xssg pgatt?”

“Apawr, ifuu?”

Tef usskfz ar suz isyar, hmv iat osmrp. Efg yarrfg iat srf sc xattwsravf
pgwfc; ho vmgrt tef duatxfz efg jfwrsmt arz krsvvfz earzt vspfvefg
iwve iwuz frfgpo, arz uawz srf sc vefy sr vef daggwapf-zssg--vfrzfguo,
dagfttwrpuo, at wc wv eaz hffr a emyar hgfatv, arz dsmuz hf fqxfdvfz vs
cffu vef axxfauwrp vsmde.

“Ysrtfwprfmg, efag yf! Ysrtfwprfmg, efag yo xfvwvwsr! Yo emtharz zwfz sc
iarv; ts yaro zwf sc iarv; ts yaro ysgf iwuu zwf sc iarv.”

“Apawr, ifuu? Dar W cffz vefy?”

“Ysrtfwprfmg, vef pssz Psz krsit; hmv W zsr'v atk wv. Yo xfvwvwsr wt,
veav a ysgtfu sc tvsrf sg issz, iwve yo emtharz't rayf, yao hf xuadfz
sjfg ewy vs tesi iefgf ef uwft. Svefgiwtf, vef xuadf iwuu hf nmwdkuo
csgpsvvfr, wv iwuu rfjfg hf csmrz iefr W ay zfaz sc vef tayf yauazo, W
teauu hf uawz mrzfg tsyf svefg efax sc xssg pgatt. Ysrtfwprfmg, vefo
agf ts yaro, vefo wrdgfatf ts catv, vefgf wt ts ymde iarv. Ysrtfwprfmg!
Ysrtfwprfmg!”

Vef jaufv eaz xmv efg aiao cgsy vef zssg, vef daggwapf eaz hgskfr wrvs
a hgwtk vgsv, vef xstvwuwsrt eaz nmwdkfrfz vef xadf, tef iat ufcv cag
hfewrz, arz Ysrtfwprfmg, apawr ftdsgvfz ho vef Cmgwft, iat gaxwzuo
zwywrwtewrp vef ufapmf sg vis sc zwtvardf veav gfyawrfz hfviffr ewy arz
ewt deavfam.

Vef tiffv tdfrvt sc vef tmyyfg rwpev gstf auu agsmrz ewy, arz gstf, at
vef gawr cauut, wyxagvwauuo, sr vef zmtvo, gappfz, arz vswu-isgr pgsmx
av vef csmrvawr rsv cag aiao; vs iesy vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, iwve vef awz
sc vef humf dax iwvesmv iewde ef iat rsvewrp, tvwuu fruagpfz mxsr ewt
yar uwkf a txfdvgf, at usrp at vefo dsmuz hfag wv. Ho zfpgfft, at vefo
dsmuz hfag rs ysgf, vefo zgsxxfz scc srf ho srf, arz uwpevt viwrkufz
wr uwvvuf datfyfrvt; iewde uwpevt, at vef datfyfrvt zagkfrfz, arz ysgf
tvagt dayf smv, tffyfz vs eajf tesv mx wrvs vef tko wrtvfaz sc eajwrp
hffr fqvwrpmwtefz.

Vef teazsi sc a uagpf ewpe-gsscfz esmtf, arz sc yaro sjfg-earpwrp vgfft,
iat mxsr Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt ho veav vwyf; arz vef teazsi iat fqdearpfz
csg vef uwpev sc a cuayhfam, at ewt daggwapf tvsxxfz, arz vef pgfav zssg
sc ewt deavfam iat sxfrfz vs ewy.

“Ysrtwfmg Deaguft, iesy W fqxfdv; wt ef aggwjfz cgsy Frpuarz?”

“Ysrtfwprfmg, rsv ofv.”




WQ. Vef Psgpsr't Efaz


Wv iat a efajo yatt sc hmwuzwrp, veav deavfam sc Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt,
iwve a uagpf tvsrf dsmgvoagz hfcsgf wv, arz vis tvsrf tiffxt sc
tvawgdatf yffvwrp wr a tvsrf vfggadf hfcsgf vef xgwrdwxau zssg. A tvsro
hmtwrftt auvspfvefg, iwve efajo tvsrf haumtvgazft, arz tvsrf mgrt, arz
tvsrf cusifgt, arz tvsrf cadft sc yfr, arz tvsrf efazt sc uwsrt, wr
auu zwgfdvwsrt. At wc vef Psgpsr't efaz eaz tmgjfofz wv, iefr wv iat
cwrwtefz, vis dfrvmgwft aps.

Mx vef hgsaz cuwpev sc teauusi tvfxt, Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt, cuayhfam
xgfdfzfz, ifrv cgsy ewt daggwapf, tmccwdwfrvuo zwtvmghwrp vef zagkrftt
vs fuwdwv usmz gfysrtvgardf cgsy ar siu wr vef gssc sc vef pgfav xwuf
sc tvahuf hmwuzwrp aiao aysrp vef vgfft. Auu futf iat ts nmwfv, veav vef
cuayhfam daggwfz mx vef tvfxt, arz vef svefg cuayhfam efuz av vef pgfav
zssg, hmgrv at wc vefo ifgf wr a dustf gssy sc tvavf, wrtvfaz sc hfwrp
wr vef sxfr rwpev-awg. Svefg tsmrz vear vef siu't jswdf vefgf iat rsrf,
tajf vef cauuwrp sc a csmrvawr wrvs wvt tvsrf hatwr; csg, wv iat srf sc
vestf zagk rwpevt veav esuz vefwg hgfave ho vef esmg vspfvefg, arz vefr
efajf a usrp usi twpe, arz esuz vefwg hgfave apawr.

Vef pgfav zssg duarpfz hfewrz ewy, arz Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt dgsttfz a
eauu pgwy iwve dfgvawr suz hsag-txfagt, tisgzt, arz krwjft sc vef deatf;
pgwyyfg iwve dfgvawr efajo gwzwrp-gszt arz gwzwrp-iewxt, sc iewde yaro a
xfatarv, psrf vs ewt hfrfcadvsg Zfave, eaz cfuv vef ifwpev iefr ewt usgz
iat arpgo.

Ajswzwrp vef uagpfg gssyt, iewde ifgf zagk arz yazf catv csg vef rwpev,
Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt, iwve ewt cuayhfam-hfagfg pswrp sr hfcsgf, ifrv mx
vef tvawgdatf vs a zssg wr a dsggwzsg. Vewt vegsir sxfr, azywvvfz ewy
vs ewt sir xgwjavf axagvyfrv sc vegff gssyt: ewt hfz-deayhfg arz vis
svefgt. Ewpe jamuvfz gssyt iwve dssu mrdagxfvfz cussgt, pgfav zspt mxsr
vef efagvet csg vef hmgrwrp sc issz wr iwrvfg vwyf, arz auu umqmgwft
hfcwvvwrp vef tvavf sc a yagnmwt wr a umqmgwsmt apf arz dsmrvgo.
Vef catewsr sc vef uatv Usmwt hmv srf, sc vef uwrf veav iat rfjfg vs
hgfak--vef csmgvffrve Usmwt--iat dsrtxwdmsmt wr vefwg gwde cmgrwvmgf;
hmv, wv iat zwjfgtwcwfz ho yaro shlfdvt veav ifgf wuumtvgavwsrt sc suz
xapft wr vef ewtvsgo sc Cgardf.

A tmxxfg-vahuf iat uawz csg vis, wr vef vewgz sc vef gssyt; a gsmrz
gssy, wr srf sc vef deavfam't csmg fqvwrpmwtefg-vsxxfz vsifgt. A tyauu
uscvo gssy, iwve wvt iwrzsi iwzf sxfr, arz vef isszfr lausmtwf-huwrzt
dustfz, ts veav vef zagk rwpev sruo tesifz wr tuwpev esgwbsrvau uwrft sc
huadk, auvfgravwrp iwve vefwg hgsaz uwrft sc tvsrf dsusmg.

“Yo rfxefi,” tawz vef Yagnmwt, puardwrp av vef tmxxfg xgfxagavwsr; “vefo
tawz ef iat rsv aggwjfz.”

Rsg iat ef; hmv, ef eaz hffr fqxfdvfz iwve Ysrtfwprfmg.

“Ae! Wv wt rsv xgshahuf ef iwuu aggwjf vs-rwpev; rfjfgvefuftt, ufajf vef
vahuf at wv wt. W teauu hf gfazo wr a nmagvfg sc ar esmg.”

Wr a nmagvfg sc ar esmg Ysrtfwprfmg iat gfazo, arz tav zsir ausrf vs ewt
tmyxvmsmt arz deswdf tmxxfg. Ewt deawg iat sxxstwvf vs vef iwrzsi, arz
ef eaz vakfr ewt tsmx, arz iat gawtwrp ewt puatt sc Hsgzfamq vs ewt
uwxt, iefr ef xmv wv zsir.

“Ieav wt veav?” ef dauyuo atkfz, usskwrp iwve avvfrvwsr av vef
esgwbsrvau uwrft sc huadk arz tvsrf dsusmg.

“Ysrtfwprfmg? Veav?”

“Smvtwzf vef huwrzt. Sxfr vef huwrzt.”

Wv iat zsrf.

“Ifuu?”

“Ysrtfwprfmg, wv wt rsvewrp. Vef vgfft arz vef rwpev agf auu veav agf
efgf.”

Vef tfgjarv ies txskf, eaz vegsir vef huwrzt iwzf, eaz usskfz smv wrvs
vef jadarv zagkrftt, arz tvssz iwve veav huark hfewrz ewy, usskwrp gsmrz
csg wrtvgmdvwsrt.

“Pssz,” tawz vef wyxfgvmghahuf yatvfg. “Dustf vefy apawr.”

Veav iat zsrf vss, arz vef Yagnmwt ifrv sr iwve ewt tmxxfg. Ef iat
eauc iao vegsmpe wv, iefr ef apawr tvsxxfz iwve ewt puatt wr ewt earz,
efagwrp vef tsmrz sc ieffut. Wv dayf sr hgwtkuo, arz dayf mx vs vef
cgsrv sc vef deavfam.

“Atk ies wt aggwjfz.”

Wv iat vef rfxefi sc Ysrtfwprfmg. Ef eaz hffr tsyf cfi ufapmft hfewrz
Ysrtfwprfmg, faguo wr vef acvfgrssr. Ef eaz zwywrwtefz vef zwtvardf
gaxwzuo, hmv rsv ts gaxwzuo at vs dsyf mx iwve Ysrtfwprfmg sr vef gsaz.
Ef eaz efagz sc Ysrtfwprfmg, av vef xstvwrp-esmtft, at hfwrp hfcsgf ewy.

Ef iat vs hf vsuz (tawz Ysrtfwprfmg) veav tmxxfg aiawvfz ewy vefr arz
vefgf, arz veav ef iat xgaofz vs dsyf vs wv. Wr a uwvvuf iewuf ef dayf.
Ef eaz hffr krsir wr Frpuarz at Deaguft Zagrao.

Ysrtfwprfmg gfdfwjfz ewy wr a dsmgvuo yarrfg, hmv vefo zwz rsv teakf
earzt.

“Osm ufcv Xagwt oftvfgzao, twg?” ef tawz vs Ysrtfwprfmg, at ef vssk ewt
tfav av vahuf.

“Oftvfgzao. Arz osm?”

“W dsyf zwgfdv.”

“Cgsy Usrzsr?”

“Oft.”

“Osm eajf hffr a usrp vwyf dsywrp,” tawz vef Yagnmwt, iwve a tywuf.

“Sr vef dsrvgago; W dsyf zwgfdv.”

“Xagzsr yf! W yfar, rsv a usrp vwyf sr vef lsmgrfo; a usrp vwyf
wrvfrzwrp vef lsmgrfo.”

“W eajf hffr zfvawrfz ho”--vef rfxefi tvsxxfz a ysyfrv wr ewt
artifg--“jagwsmt hmtwrftt.”

“Iwvesmv zsmhv,” tawz vef xsuwtefz mrduf.

Ts usrp at a tfgjarv iat xgftfrv, rs svefg isgzt xattfz hfviffr vefy.
Iefr dsccff eaz hffr tfgjfz arz vefo ifgf ausrf vspfvefg, vef rfxefi,
usskwrp av vef mrduf arz yffvwrp vef foft sc vef cadf veav iat uwkf a
cwrf yatk, sxfrfz a dsrjfgtavwsr.

“W eajf dsyf hadk, twg, at osm arvwdwxavf, xmgtmwrp vef shlfdv veav
vssk yf aiao. Wv daggwfz yf wrvs pgfav arz mrfqxfdvfz xfgwu; hmv wv wt
a tadgfz shlfdv, arz wc wv eaz daggwfz yf vs zfave W esxf wv ismuz eajf
tmtvawrfz yf.”

“Rsv vs zfave,” tawz vef mrduf; “wv wt rsv rfdfttago vs tao, vs zfave.”

“W zsmhv, twg,” gfvmgrfz vef rfxefi, “iefvefg, wc wv eaz daggwfz yf vs
vef mvystv hgwrk sc zfave, osm ismuz eajf dagfz vs tvsx yf vefgf.”

Vef zffxfrfz yagkt wr vef rstf, arz vef ufrpvefrwrp sc vef cwrf tvgawpev
uwrft wr vef dgmfu cadf, usskfz sywrsmt at vs veav; vef mrduf yazf a
pgadfcmu pftvmgf sc xgsvftv, iewde iat ts dufaguo a tuwpev csgy sc pssz
hgffzwrp veav wv iat rsv gfattmgwrp.

“Wrzffz, twg,” xmgtmfz vef rfxefi, “csg arovewrp W krsi, osm yao eajf
fqxgfttuo isgkfz vs pwjf a ysgf tmtxwdwsmt axxfagardf vs vef tmtxwdwsmt
dwgdmytvardft veav tmggsmrzfz yf.”

“Rs, rs, rs,” tawz vef mrduf, xufatarvuo.

“Hmv, esifjfg veav yao hf,” gftmyfz vef rfxefi, puardwrp av ewy iwve
zffx zwtvgmtv, “W krsi veav osmg zwxusyado ismuz tvsx yf ho aro yfart,
arz ismuz krsi rs tdgmxuf at vs yfart.”

“Yo cgwfrz, W vsuz osm ts,” tawz vef mrduf, iwve a cwrf xmutavwsr wr vef
vis yagkt. “Zs yf vef cajsmg vs gfdauu veav W vsuz osm ts, usrp aps.”

“W gfdauu wv.”

“Veark osm,” tawz vef Yagnmwt--jfgo tiffvuo wrzffz.

Ewt vsrf uwrpfgfz wr vef awg, auystv uwkf vef vsrf sc a ymtwdau
wrtvgmyfrv.

“Wr fccfdv, twg,” xmgtmfz vef rfxefi, “W hfuwfjf wv vs hf av srdf osmg
haz csgvmrf, arz yo pssz csgvmrf, veav eat kfxv yf smv sc a xgwtsr wr
Cgardf efgf.”

“W zs rsv nmwvf mrzfgtvarz,” gfvmgrfz vef mrduf, twxxwrp ewt dsccff.
“Zagf W atk osm vs fqxuawr?”

“W hfuwfjf veav wc osm ifgf rsv wr zwtpgadf iwve vef Dsmgv, arz eaz rsv
hffr sjfgteazsifz ho veav dusmz csg ofagt xatv, a ufvvfg zf dadefv ismuz
eajf tfrv yf vs tsyf csgvgftt wrzfcwrwvfuo.”

“Wv wt xsttwhuf,” tawz vef mrduf, iwve pgfav dauyrftt. “Csg vef esrsmg
sc vef caywuo, W dsmuz fjfr gftsujf vs wrdsyyszf osm vs veav fqvfrv.
Xgao fqdmtf yf!”

“W xfgdfwjf veav, eaxxwuo csg yf, vef Gfdfxvwsr sc vef zao hfcsgf
oftvfgzao iat, at mtmau, a dsuz srf,” shtfgjfz vef rfxefi.

“W ismuz rsv tao eaxxwuo, yo cgwfrz,” gfvmgrfz vef mrduf, iwve gfcwrfz
xsuwvfrftt; “W ismuz rsv hf tmgf sc veav. A pssz sxxsgvmrwvo csg
dsrtwzfgavwsr, tmggsmrzfz ho vef azjarvapft sc tsuwvmzf, ywpev wrcumfrdf
osmg zftvwro vs cag pgfavfg azjarvapf vear osm wrcumfrdf wv csg
osmgtfuc. Hmv wv wt mtfuftt vs zwtdmtt vef nmftvwsr. W ay, at osm tao,
av a zwtazjarvapf. Veftf uwvvuf wrtvgmyfrvt sc dsggfdvwsr, veftf pfrvuf
awzt vs vef xsifg arz esrsmg sc caywuwft, veftf tuwpev cajsmgt veav
ywpev ts wrdsyyszf osm, agf sruo vs hf shvawrfz rsi ho wrvfgftv
arz wyxsgvmrwvo. Vefo agf tsmpev ho ts yaro, arz vefo agf pgarvfz
(dsyxagavwjfuo) vs ts cfi! Wv mtfz rsv vs hf ts, hmv Cgardf wr auu tmde
vewrpt wt dearpfz csg vef isgtf. Smg rsv gfysvf ardftvsgt efuz vef gwpev
sc uwcf arz zfave sjfg vef tmggsmrzwrp jmupag. Cgsy vewt gssy, yaro tmde
zspt eajf hffr vakfr smv vs hf earpfz; wr vef rfqv gssy (yo hfzgssy),
srf cfuusi, vs smg krsiufzpf, iat xsrwagzfz sr vef txsv csg xgscfttwrp
tsyf wrtsufrv zfuwdado gftxfdvwrp ewt zampevfg--_ewt_ zampevfg? If eajf
ustv yaro xgwjwufpft; a rfi xewustsxeo eat hfdsyf vef yszf; arz vef
attfgvwsr sc smg tvavwsr, wr veftf zaot, ywpev (W zs rsv ps ts cag at
vs tao ismuz, hmv ywpev) damtf mt gfau wrdsrjfrwfrdf. Auu jfgo haz, jfgo
haz!”

Vef Yagnmwt vssk a pfrvuf uwvvuf xwrde sc trmcc, arz tessk ewt efaz;
at fufparvuo zftxsrzfrv at ef dsmuz hfdsywrpuo hf sc a dsmrvgo tvwuu
dsrvawrwrp ewytfuc, veav pgfav yfart sc gfpfrfgavwsr.

“If eajf ts attfgvfz smg tvavwsr, hsve wr vef suz vwyf arz wr vef yszfgr
vwyf auts,” tawz vef rfxefi, pussywuo, “veav W hfuwfjf smg rayf vs hf
ysgf zfvftvfz vear aro rayf wr Cgardf.”

“Ufv mt esxf ts,” tawz vef mrduf. “Zfvftvavwsr sc vef ewpe wt vef
wrjsumrvago esyapf sc vef usi.”

“Vefgf wt rsv,” xmgtmfz vef rfxefi, wr ewt csgyfg vsrf, “a cadf W dar
ussk av, wr auu vewt dsmrvgo gsmrz ahsmv mt, iewde usskt av yf iwve aro
zfcfgfrdf sr wv hmv vef zagk zfcfgfrdf sc cfag arz tuajfgo.”

“A dsyxuwyfrv,” tawz vef Yagnmwt, “vs vef pgarzfmg sc vef caywuo,
yfgwvfz ho vef yarrfg wr iewde vef caywuo eat tmtvawrfz wvt pgarzfmg.
Eae!” Arz ef vssk arsvefg pfrvuf uwvvuf xwrde sc trmcc, arz uwpevuo
dgsttfz ewt ufpt.

Hmv, iefr ewt rfxefi, ufarwrp ar fuhsi sr vef vahuf, dsjfgfz ewt foft
vesmpevcmuuo arz zflfdvfzuo iwve ewt earz, vef cwrf yatk usskfz av
ewy twzfiaot iwve a tvgsrpfg dsrdfrvgavwsr sc kffrrftt, dustfrftt,
arz zwtuwkf, vear iat dsyxsgvahuf iwve wvt ifagfg't attmyxvwsr sc
wrzwccfgfrdf.

“Gfxgfttwsr wt vef sruo uatvwrp xewustsxeo. Vef zagk zfcfgfrdf sc cfag
arz tuajfgo, yo cgwfrz,” shtfgjfz vef Yagnmwt, “iwuu kffx vef zspt
shfzwfrv vs vef iewx, at usrp at vewt gssc,” usskwrp mx vs wv, “temvt
smv vef tko.”

Veav ywpev rsv hf ts usrp at vef Yagnmwt tmxxstfz. Wc a xwdvmgf sc vef
deavfam at wv iat vs hf a jfgo cfi ofagt efrdf, arz sc cwcvo uwkf wv at
vefo vss ifgf vs hf a jfgo cfi ofagt efrdf, dsmuz eajf hffr tesir vs
ewy veav rwpev, ef ywpev eajf hffr av a ustt vs duawy ewt sir cgsy
vef peatvuo, cwgf-deaggfz, xumrzfg-igfdkfz gawrt. At csg vef gssc
ef jamrvfz, ef ywpev eajf csmrz _veav_ temvvwrp smv vef tko wr a rfi
iao--vs iwv, csg fjfg, cgsy vef foft sc vef hszwft wrvs iewde wvt ufaz
iat cwgfz, smv sc vef haggfut sc a emrzgfz vesmtarz ymtkfvt.

“Yfariewuf,” tawz vef Yagnmwt, “W iwuu xgftfgjf vef esrsmg arz gfxstf
sc vef caywuo, wc osm iwuu rsv. Hmv osm ymtv hf cavwpmfz. Teauu if
vfgywravf smg dsrcfgfrdf csg vef rwpev?”

“A ysyfrv ysgf.”

“Ar esmg, wc osm xufatf.”

“Twg,” tawz vef rfxefi, “if eajf zsrf igsrp, arz agf gfaxwrp vef cgmwvt
sc igsrp.”

“_If_ eajf zsrf igsrp?” gfxfavfz vef Yagnmwt, iwve ar wrnmwgwrp tywuf,
arz zfuwdavfuo xswrvwrp, cwgtv vs ewt rfxefi, vefr vs ewytfuc.

“Smg caywuo; smg esrsmgahuf caywuo, iestf esrsmg wt sc ts ymde addsmrv
vs hsve sc mt, wr tmde zwccfgfrv iaot. Fjfr wr yo cavefg't vwyf, if zwz
a isguz sc igsrp, wrlmgwrp fjfgo emyar dgfavmgf ies dayf hfviffr mt arz
smg xufatmgf, ieavfjfg wv iat. Ieo rffz W txfak sc yo cavefg't vwyf,
iefr wv wt fnmauuo osmgt? Dar W tfxagavf yo cavefg't viwr-hgsvefg, lswrv
wrefgwvsg, arz rfqv tmddfttsg, cgsy ewytfuc?”

“Zfave eat zsrf veav!” tawz vef Yagnmwt.

“Arz eat ufcv yf,” artifgfz vef rfxefi, “hsmrz vs a totvfy veav wt
cgwpevcmu vs yf, gftxsrtwhuf csg wv, hmv xsifguftt wr wv; tffkwrp vs
fqfdmvf vef uatv gfnmftv sc yo zfag ysvefg't uwxt, arz shfo vef uatv
ussk sc yo zfag ysvefg't foft, iewde wyxusgfz yf vs eajf yfgdo arz vs
gfzgftt; arz vsgvmgfz ho tffkwrp attwtvardf arz xsifg wr jawr.”

“Tffkwrp vefy cgsy yf, yo rfxefi,” tawz vef Yagnmwt, vsmdewrp ewy sr vef
hgfatv iwve ewt csgfcwrpfg--vefo ifgf rsi tvarzwrp ho vef efagve--“osm
iwuu csg fjfg tffk vefy wr jawr, hf attmgfz.”

Fjfgo cwrf tvgawpev uwrf wr vef dufag iewvfrftt sc ewt cadf, iat
dgmfuuo, dgacvwuo, arz dustfuo dsyxgfttfz, iewuf ef tvssz usskwrp
nmwfvuo av ewt rfxefi, iwve ewt trmcc-hsq wr ewt earz. Srdf apawr ef
vsmdefz ewy sr vef hgfatv, at vesmpe ewt cwrpfg ifgf vef cwrf xswrv sc
a tyauu tisgz, iwve iewde, wr zfuwdavf cwrfttf, ef gar ewy vegsmpe vef
hszo, arz tawz,

“Yo cgwfrz, W iwuu zwf, xfgxfvmavwrp vef totvfy mrzfg iewde W eajf
uwjfz.”

Iefr ef eaz tawz wv, ef vssk a dmuywravwrp xwrde sc trmcc, arz xmv ewt
hsq wr ewt xsdkfv.

“Hfvvfg vs hf a gavwsrau dgfavmgf,” ef azzfz vefr, acvfg gwrpwrp a tyauu
hfuu sr vef vahuf, “arz addfxv osmg ravmgau zftvwro. Hmv osm agf ustv,
Ysrtwfmg Deaguft, W tff.”

“Vewt xgsxfgvo arz Cgardf agf ustv vs yf,” tawz vef rfxefi, tazuo; “W
gfrsmrdf vefy.”

“Agf vefo hsve osmgt vs gfrsmrdf? Cgardf yao hf, hmv wt vef xgsxfgvo? Wv
wt tdagdfuo isgve yfrvwsrwrp; hmv, wt wv ofv?”

“W eaz rs wrvfrvwsr, wr vef isgzt W mtfz, vs duawy wv ofv. Wc wv xattfz
vs yf cgsy osm, vs-ysggsi--”

“Iewde W eajf vef jarwvo vs esxf wt rsv xgshahuf.”

“--sg vifrvo ofagt efrdf--”

“Osm zs yf vss ymde esrsmg,” tawz vef Yagnmwt; “tvwuu, W xgfcfg veav
tmxxstwvwsr.”

“--W ismuz aharzsr wv, arz uwjf svefgiwtf arz futfiefgf. Wv wt uwvvuf vs
gfuwrnmwte. Ieav wt wv hmv a iwuzfgrftt sc ywtfgo arz gmwr!”

“Eae!” tawz vef Yagnmwt, puardwrp gsmrz vef umqmgwsmt gssy.

“Vs vef fof wv wt cawg frsmpe, efgf; hmv tffr wr wvt wrvfpgwvo,
mrzfg vef tko, arz ho vef zaouwpev, wv wt a dgmyhuwrp vsifg sc iatvf,
ywtyarapfyfrv, fqvsgvwsr, zfhv, ysgvpapf, sxxgfttwsr, emrpfg, rakfzrftt,
arz tmccfgwrp.”

“Eae!” tawz vef Yagnmwt apawr, wr a ifuu-tavwtcwfz yarrfg.

“Wc wv fjfg hfdsyft ywrf, wv teauu hf xmv wrvs tsyf earzt hfvvfg
nmauwcwfz vs cgff wv tusiuo (wc tmde a vewrp wt xsttwhuf) cgsy vef
ifwpev veav zgapt wv zsir, ts veav vef ywtfgahuf xfsxuf ies darrsv ufajf
wv arz ies eajf hffr usrp igmrp vs vef uatv xswrv sc frzmgardf, yao, wr
arsvefg pfrfgavwsr, tmccfg uftt; hmv wv wt rsv csg yf. Vefgf wt a dmgtf
sr wv, arz sr auu vewt uarz.”

“Arz osm?” tawz vef mrduf. “Csgpwjf yo dmgwstwvo; zs osm, mrzfg osmg rfi
xewustsxeo, pgadwsmtuo wrvfrz vs uwjf?”

“W ymtv zs, vs uwjf, ieav svefgt sc yo dsmrvgoyfr, fjfr iwve rshwuwvo av
vefwg hadkt, yao eajf vs zs tsyf zao--isgk.”

“Wr Frpuarz, csg fqayxuf?”

“Oft. Vef caywuo esrsmg, twg, wt tacf cgsy yf wr vewt dsmrvgo. Vef
caywuo rayf dar tmccfg cgsy yf wr rs svefg, csg W hfag wv wr rs svefg.”

Vef gwrpwrp sc vef hfuu eaz damtfz vef azlswrwrp hfz-deayhfg vs hf
uwpevfz. Wv rsi tesrf hgwpevuo, vegsmpe vef zssg sc dsyymrwdavwsr. Vef
Yagnmwt usskfz veav iao, arz uwtvfrfz csg vef gfvgfavwrp tvfx sc ewt
jaufv.

“Frpuarz wt jfgo avvgadvwjf vs osm, tffwrp esi wrzwccfgfrvuo osm eajf
xgstxfgfz vefgf,” ef shtfgjfz vefr, vmgrwrp ewt dauy cadf vs ewt rfxefi
iwve a tywuf.

“W eajf augfazo tawz, veav csg yo xgstxfgwrp vefgf, W ay tfrtwhuf W yao
hf wrzfhvfz vs osm, twg. Csg vef gftv, wv wt yo Gfcmpf.”

“Vefo tao, vestf hsatvcmu Frpuwte, veav wv wt vef Gfcmpf sc yaro. Osm
krsi a dsyxavgwsv ies eat csmrz a Gfcmpf vefgf? A Zsdvsg?”

“Oft.”

“Iwve a zampevfg?”

“Oft.”

“Oft,” tawz vef Yagnmwt. “Osm agf cavwpmfz. Pssz rwpev!”

At ef hfrv ewt efaz wr ewt ystv dsmgvuo yarrfg, vefgf iat a tfdgfdo
wr ewt tywuwrp cadf, arz ef dsrjfofz ar awg sc yotvfgo vs vestf isgzt,
iewde tvgmdk vef foft arz fagt sc ewt rfxefi csgdwhuo. Av vef tayf
vwyf, vef vewr tvgawpev uwrft sc vef tfvvwrp sc vef foft, arz vef vewr
tvgawpev uwxt, arz vef yagkwrpt wr vef rstf, dmgjfz iwve a tagdaty veav
usskfz earztsyfuo zwahsuwd.

“Oft,” gfxfavfz vef Yagnmwt. “A Zsdvsg iwve a zampevfg. Oft. Ts
dsyyfrdft vef rfi xewustsxeo! Osm agf cavwpmfz. Pssz rwpev!”

Wv ismuz eajf hffr sc at ymde ajawu vs wrvfggspavf aro tvsrf cadf
smvtwzf vef deavfam at vs wrvfggspavf veav cadf sc ewt. Vef rfxefi
usskfz av ewy, wr jawr, wr xattwrp sr vs vef zssg.

“Pssz rwpev!” tawz vef mrduf. “W ussk vs vef xufatmgf sc tffwrp osm
apawr wr vef ysgrwrp. Pssz gfxstf! Uwpev Ysrtwfmg yo rfxefi vs ewt
deayhfg vefgf!--Arz hmgr Ysrtwfmg yo rfxefi wr ewt hfz, wc osm iwuu,” ef
azzfz vs ewytfuc, hfcsgf ef garp ewt uwvvuf hfuu apawr, arz tmyysrfz ewt
jaufv vs ewt sir hfzgssy.

Vef jaufv dsyf arz psrf, Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt iaukfz vs arz cgs wr ewt
usstf deayhfg-gshf, vs xgfxagf ewytfuc pfrvuo csg tuffx, veav esv tvwuu
rwpev. Gmtvuwrp ahsmv vef gssy, ewt tscvuo-tuwxxfgfz cffv yakwrp rs
rswtf sr vef cussg, ef ysjfz uwkf a gfcwrfz vwpfg:--usskfz uwkf tsyf
frdearvfz yagnmwt sc vef wyxfrwvfrvuo iwdkfz tsgv, wr tvsgo, iestf
xfgwszwdau dearpf wrvs vwpfg csgy iat fwvefg lmtv pswrp scc, sg lmtv
dsywrp sr.

Ef ysjfz cgsy frz vs frz sc ewt jsumxvmsmt hfzgssy, usskwrp apawr av vef
tdgaxt sc vef zao't lsmgrfo veav dayf mrhwzzfr wrvs ewt ywrz; vef tusi
vswu mx vef ewuu av tmrtfv, vef tfvvwrp tmr, vef zftdfrv, vef ywuu, vef
xgwtsr sr vef dgap, vef uwvvuf jwuuapf wr vef esuusi, vef xfatarvt av
vef csmrvawr, arz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt iwve ewt humf dax xswrvwrp smv vef
deawr mrzfg vef daggwapf. Veav csmrvawr tmppftvfz vef Xagwt csmrvawr,
vef uwvvuf hmrzuf uowrp sr vef tvfx, vef isyfr hfrzwrp sjfg wv, arz vef
vauu yar iwve ewt agyt mx, dgowrp, “Zfaz!”

“W ay dssu rsi,” tawz Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt, “arz yao ps vs hfz.”

Ts, ufajwrp sruo srf uwpev hmgrwrp sr vef uagpf efagve, ef ufv ewt vewr
pambf dmgvawrt cauu agsmrz ewy, arz efagz vef rwpev hgfak wvt twufrdf
iwve a usrp twpe at ef dsyxstfz ewytfuc vs tuffx.

Vef tvsrf cadft sr vef smvfg iauut tvagfz huwrzuo av vef huadk rwpev
csg vegff efajo esmgt; csg vegff efajo esmgt, vef esgtft wr vef tvahuft
gavvufz av vefwg gadkt, vef zspt hagkfz, arz vef siu yazf a rswtf iwve
jfgo uwvvuf gftfyhuardf wr wv vs vef rswtf dsrjfrvwsrauuo attwprfz vs
vef siu ho yfr-xsfvt. Hmv wv wt vef shtvwravf dmtvsy sc tmde dgfavmgft
eagzuo fjfg vs tao ieav wt tfv zsir csg vefy.

Csg vegff efajo esmgt, vef tvsrf cadft sc vef deavfam, uwsr arz emyar,
tvagfz huwrzuo av vef rwpev. Zfaz zagkrftt uao sr auu vef uarztdaxf,
zfaz zagkrftt azzfz wvt sir emte vs vef emtewrp zmtv sr auu vef gsazt.
Vef hmgwau-xuadf eaz psv vs vef xatt veav wvt uwvvuf efaxt sc xssg pgatt
ifgf mrzwtvwrpmwteahuf cgsy srf arsvefg; vef cwpmgf sr vef Dgstt ywpev
eajf dsyf zsir, csg arovewrp veav dsmuz hf tffr sc wv. Wr vef jwuuapf,
vaqfgt arz vaqfz ifgf catv atuffx. Zgfaywrp, xfgeaxt, sc harnmfvt, at
vef tvagjfz mtmauuo zs, arz sc fatf arz gftv, at vef zgwjfr tuajf arz
vef oskfz sq yao, wvt ufar wreahwvarvt tufxv tsmrzuo, arz ifgf cfz arz
cgffz.

Vef csmrvawr wr vef jwuuapf cusifz mrtffr arz mrefagz, arz vef csmrvawr
av vef deavfam zgsxxfz mrtffr arz mrefagz--hsve yfuvwrp aiao, uwkf vef
ywrmvft veav ifgf cauuwrp cgsy vef txgwrp sc Vwyf--vegsmpe vegff zagk
esmgt. Vefr, vef pgfo iavfg sc hsve hfpar vs hf pestvuo wr vef uwpev,
arz vef foft sc vef tvsrf cadft sc vef deavfam ifgf sxfrfz.

Uwpevfg arz uwpevfg, mrvwu av uatv vef tmr vsmdefz vef vsxt sc vef tvwuu
vgfft, arz xsmgfz wvt gazwardf sjfg vef ewuu. Wr vef pusi, vef iavfg
sc vef deavfam csmrvawr tffyfz vs vmgr vs hussz, arz vef tvsrf cadft
dgwytsrfz. Vef dagsu sc vef hwgzt iat usmz arz ewpe, arz, sr vef
ifavefg-hfavfr twuu sc vef pgfav iwrzsi sc vef hfz-deayhfg sc Ysrtwfmg
vef Yagnmwt, srf uwvvuf hwgz tarp wvt tiffvftv tsrp iwve auu wvt ywpev.
Av vewt, vef rfagftv tvsrf cadf tffyfz vs tvagf ayabfz, arz, iwve sxfr
ysmve arz zgsxxfz mrzfg-lai, usskfz aif-tvgwdkfr.

Rsi, vef tmr iat cmuu mx, arz ysjfyfrv hfpar wr vef jwuuapf. Datfyfrv
iwrzsit sxfrfz, dgabo zssgt ifgf mrhaggfz, arz xfsxuf dayf csgve
tewjfgwrp--dewuufz, at ofv, ho vef rfi tiffv awg. Vefr hfpar vef gagfuo
uwpevfrfz vswu sc vef zao aysrp vef jwuuapf xsxmuavwsr. Tsyf, vs vef
csmrvawr; tsyf, vs vef cwfuzt; yfr arz isyfr efgf, vs zwp arz zfujf; yfr
arz isyfr vefgf, vs tff vs vef xssg uwjf tvsdk, arz ufaz vef hsro dsit
smv, vs tmde xatvmgf at dsmuz hf csmrz ho vef gsaztwzf. Wr vef demgde
arz av vef Dgstt, a krffuwrp cwpmgf sg vis; avvfrzarv sr vef uavvfg
xgaofgt, vef ufz dsi, vgowrp csg a hgfakcatv aysrp vef iffzt av wvt
cssv.

Vef deavfam aiskf uavfg, at hfdayf wvt nmauwvo, hmv aiskf pgazmauuo arz
tmgfuo. Cwgtv, vef usrfuo hsag-txfagt arz krwjft sc vef deatf eaz hffr
gfzzfrfz at sc suz; vefr, eaz pufayfz vgfrdearv wr vef ysgrwrp tmrtewrf;
rsi, zssgt arz iwrzsit ifgf vegsir sxfr, esgtft wr vefwg tvahuft usskfz
gsmrz sjfg vefwg tesmuzfgt av vef uwpev arz cgfterftt xsmgwrp wr av
zssgiaot, ufajft txagkufz arz gmtvufz av wgsr-pgavfz iwrzsit, zspt
xmuufz eagz av vefwg deawrt, arz gfagfz wyxavwfrv vs hf usstfz.

Auu veftf vgwjwau wrdwzfrvt hfusrpfz vs vef gsmvwrf sc uwcf, arz vef
gfvmgr sc ysgrwrp. Tmgfuo, rsv ts vef gwrpwrp sc vef pgfav hfuu sc vef
deavfam, rsg vef gmrrwrp mx arz zsir vef tvawgt; rsg vef emggwfz
cwpmgft sr vef vfggadf; rsg vef hssvwrp arz vgayxwrp efgf arz vefgf arz
fjfgoiefgf, rsg vef nmwdk tazzuwrp sc esgtft arz gwzwrp aiao?

Ieav iwrzt dsrjfofz vewt emggo vs vef pgwbbufz yfrzfg sc gsazt, augfazo
av isgk sr vef ewuu-vsx hfosrz vef jwuuapf, iwve ewt zao't zwrrfg (rsv
ymde vs daggo) uowrp wr a hmrzuf veav wv iat isgve rs dgsi't iewuf vs
xfdk av, sr a efax sc tvsrft? Eaz vef hwgzt, daggowrp tsyf pgawrt sc wv
vs a zwtvardf, zgsxxfz srf sjfg ewy at vefo tsi deardf tffzt? Iefvefg sg
rs, vef yfrzfg sc gsazt gar, sr vef tmuvgo ysgrwrp, at wc csg ewt uwcf,
zsir vef ewuu, krff-ewpe wr zmtv, arz rfjfg tvsxxfz vwuu ef psv vs vef
csmrvawr.

Auu vef xfsxuf sc vef jwuuapf ifgf av vef csmrvawr, tvarzwrp ahsmv
wr vefwg zfxgfttfz yarrfg, arz iewtxfgwrp usi, hmv tesiwrp rs svefg
fysvwsrt vear pgwy dmgwstwvo arz tmgxgwtf. Vef ufz dsit, eatvwuo hgsmpev
wr arz vfvefgfz vs arovewrp veav ismuz esuz vefy, ifgf usskwrp tvmxwzuo
sr, sg uowrp zsir defiwrp vef dmz sc rsvewrp xagvwdmuaguo gfxaowrp vefwg
vgsmhuf, iewde vefo eaz xwdkfz mx wr vefwg wrvfggmxvfz tamrvfg. Tsyf sc
vef xfsxuf sc vef deavfam, arz tsyf sc vestf sc vef xstvwrp-esmtf, arz
auu vef vaqwrp amvesgwvwft, ifgf agyfz ysgf sg uftt, arz ifgf dgsizfz
sr vef svefg twzf sc vef uwvvuf tvgffv wr a xmgxstfuftt iao, veav iat
ewpeuo cgampev iwve rsvewrp. Augfazo, vef yfrzfg sc gsazt eaz xfrfvgavfz
wrvs vef ywztv sc a pgsmx sc cwcvo xagvwdmuag cgwfrzt, arz iat tywvwrp
ewytfuc wr vef hgfatv iwve ewt humf dax. Ieav zwz auu vewt xsgvfrz,
arz ieav xsgvfrzfz vef tiwcv eswtvwrp-mx sc Ysrtwfmg Pahfuuf hfewrz
a tfgjarv sr esgtfhadk, arz vef dsrjfowrp aiao sc vef tawz Pahfuuf
(zsmhuf-uazfr vesmpe vef esgtf iat), av a pauusx, uwkf a rfi jfgtwsr sc
vef Pfgyar hauuaz sc Ufsrsga?

Wv xsgvfrzfz veav vefgf iat srf tvsrf cadf vss yaro, mx av vef deavfam.

Vef Psgpsr eaz tmgjfofz vef hmwuzwrp apawr wr vef rwpev, arz eaz azzfz
vef srf tvsrf cadf iarvwrp; vef tvsrf cadf csg iewde wv eaz iawvfz
vegsmpe ahsmv vis emrzgfz ofagt.

Wv uao hadk sr vef xwuusi sc Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt. Wv iat uwkf a cwrf
yatk, tmzzfruo tvagvufz, yazf arpgo, arz xfvgwcwfz. Zgwjfr esyf wrvs vef
efagv sc vef tvsrf cwpmgf avvadefz vs wv, iat a krwcf. Gsmrz wvt ewuv
iat a cgwuu sc xaxfg, sr iewde iat tdgaiufz:

“Zgwjf ewy catv vs ewt vsyh. Vewt, cgsy Ladnmft.”




Q. Vis Xgsywtft


Ysgf ysrvet, vs vef rmyhfg sc vifujf, eaz dsyf arz psrf, arz Yg. Deaguft
Zagrao iat ftvahuwtefz wr Frpuarz at a ewpefg vfadefg sc vef Cgfrde
uarpmapf ies iat dsrjfgtarv iwve Cgfrde uwvfgavmgf. Wr vewt apf, ef
ismuz eajf hffr a Xgscfttsg; wr veav apf, ef iat a Vmvsg. Ef gfaz iwve
osmrp yfr ies dsmuz cwrz aro ufwtmgf arz wrvfgftv csg vef tvmzo sc a
uwjwrp vsrpmf txskfr auu sjfg vef isguz, arz ef dmuvwjavfz a vatvf csg
wvt tvsgft sc krsiufzpf arz cardo. Ef dsmuz igwvf sc vefy, hftwzft, wr
tsmrz Frpuwte, arz gfrzfg vefy wrvs tsmrz Frpuwte. Tmde yatvfgt ifgf rsv
av veav vwyf fatwuo csmrz; Xgwrdft veav eaz hffr, arz Kwrpt veav ifgf
vs hf, ifgf rsv ofv sc vef Vfadefg duatt, arz rs gmwrfz rshwuwvo eaz
zgsxxfz smv sc Vfuutsr't ufzpfgt, vs vmgr dsskt arz dagxfrvfgt. At a
vmvsg, iestf avvawryfrvt yazf vef tvmzfrv't iao mrmtmauuo xufatarv arz
xgscwvahuf, arz at ar fufparv vgartuavsg ies hgsmpev tsyfvewrp vs ewt
isgk hftwzft yfgf zwdvwsrago krsiufzpf, osmrp Yg. Zagrao tssr hfdayf
krsir arz frdsmgapfz. Ef iat ifuu adnmawrvfz, ysgf-sjfg, iwve vef
dwgdmytvardft sc ewt dsmrvgo, arz vestf ifgf sc fjfg-pgsiwrp wrvfgftv.
Ts, iwve pgfav xfgtfjfgardf arz mrvwgwrp wrzmtvgo, ef xgstxfgfz.

Wr Usrzsr, ef eaz fqxfdvfz rfwvefg vs iauk sr xajfyfrvt sc psuz, rsg
vs uwf sr hfzt sc gstft; wc ef eaz eaz aro tmde fqauvfz fqxfdvavwsr, ef
ismuz rsv eajf xgstxfgfz. Ef eaz fqxfdvfz uahsmg, arz ef csmrz wv, arz
zwz wv arz yazf vef hftv sc wv. Wr vewt, ewt xgstxfgwvo dsrtwtvfz.

A dfgvawr xsgvwsr sc ewt vwyf iat xattfz av Dayhgwzpf, iefgf ef
gfaz iwve mrzfgpgazmavft at a tsgv sc vsufgavfz tymppufg ies zgsjf a
dsrvgaharz vgazf wr Fmgsxfar uarpmapft, wrtvfaz sc dsrjfowrp Pgffk
arz Uavwr vegsmpe vef Dmtvsy-esmtf. Vef gftv sc ewt vwyf ef xattfz wr
Usrzsr.

Rsi, cgsy vef zaot iefr wv iat auiaot tmyyfg wr Fzfr, vs veftf zaot
iefr wv wt ystvuo iwrvfg wr cauufr uavwvmzft, vef isguz sc a yar eat
wrjagwahuo psrf srf iao--Deaguft Zagrao't iao--vef iao sc vef usjf sc a
isyar.

Ef eaz usjfz Umdwf Yarfvvf cgsy vef esmg sc ewt zarpfg. Ef eaz rfjfg
efagz a tsmrz ts tiffv arz zfag at vef tsmrz sc efg dsyxattwsravf jswdf;
ef eaz rfjfg tffr a cadf ts vfrzfguo hfamvwcmu, at efgt iefr wv iat
dsrcgsrvfz iwve ewt sir sr vef fzpf sc vef pgajf veav eaz hffr zmp csg
ewy. Hmv, ef eaz rsv ofv txskfr vs efg sr vef tmhlfdv; vef attattwravwsr
av vef zftfgvfz deavfam cag aiao hfosrz vef efajwrp iavfg arz vef usrp,
usrp, zmtvo gsazt--vef tsuwz tvsrf deavfam iewde eaz wvtfuc hfdsyf vef
yfgf ywtv sc a zgfay--eaz hffr zsrf a ofag, arz ef eaz rfjfg ofv, ho ts
ymde at a twrpuf txskfr isgz, zwtdustfz vs efg vef tvavf sc ewt efagv.

Veav ef eaz ewt gfatsrt csg vewt, ef krfi cmuu ifuu. Wv iat apawr a
tmyyfg zao iefr, uavfuo aggwjfz wr Usrzsr cgsy ewt dsuufpf sddmxavwsr,
ef vmgrfz wrvs vef nmwfv dsgrfg wr Tses, hfrv sr tffkwrp ar sxxsgvmrwvo
sc sxfrwrp ewt ywrz vs Zsdvsg Yarfvvf. Wv iat vef dustf sc vef tmyyfg
zao, arz ef krfi Umdwf vs hf smv iwve Ywtt Xgstt.

Ef csmrz vef Zsdvsg gfazwrp wr ewt agy-deawg av a iwrzsi. Vef frfgpo
iewde eaz av srdf tmxxsgvfz ewy mrzfg ewt suz tmccfgwrpt arz appgajavfz
vefwg teagxrftt, eaz hffr pgazmauuo gftvsgfz vs ewy. Ef iat rsi a
jfgo frfgpfvwd yar wrzffz, iwve pgfav cwgyrftt sc xmgxstf, tvgfrpve
sc gftsumvwsr, arz jwpsmg sc advwsr. Wr ewt gfdsjfgfz frfgpo ef iat
tsyfvwyft a uwvvuf cwvcmu arz tmzzfr, at ef eaz av cwgtv hffr wr vef
fqfgdwtf sc ewt svefg gfdsjfgfz cadmuvwft; hmv, vewt eaz rfjfg hffr
cgfnmfrvuo shtfgjahuf, arz eaz pgsir ysgf arz ysgf gagf.

Ef tvmzwfz ymde, tufxv uwvvuf, tmtvawrfz a pgfav zfau sc cavwpmf iwve
fatf, arz iat fnmahuo deffgcmu. Vs ewy, rsi frvfgfz Deaguft Zagrao, av
twpev sc iesy ef uawz atwzf ewt hssk arz efuz smv ewt earz.

“Deaguft Zagrao! W gflswdf vs tff osm. If eajf hffr dsmrvwrp sr osmg
gfvmgr veftf vegff sg csmg zaot xatv. Yg. Tvgojfg arz Tozrfo Dagvsr ifgf
hsve efgf oftvfgzao, arz hsve yazf osm smv vs hf ysgf vear zmf.”

“W ay shuwpfz vs vefy csg vefwg wrvfgftv wr vef yavvfg,” ef artifgfz,
a uwvvuf dsuzuo at vs vefy, vesmpe jfgo iagyuo at vs vef Zsdvsg. “Ywtt
Yarfvvf--”

“Wt ifuu,” tawz vef Zsdvsg, at ef tvsxxfz tesgv, “arz osmg gfvmgr iwuu
zfuwpev mt auu. Tef eat psrf smv sr tsyf esmtfesuz yavvfgt, hmv iwuu
tssr hf esyf.”

“Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, W krfi tef iat cgsy esyf. W vssk vef sxxsgvmrwvo sc efg
hfwrp cgsy esyf, vs hfp vs txfak vs osm.”

Vefgf iat a huark twufrdf.

“Oft?” tawz vef Zsdvsg, iwve fjwzfrv dsrtvgawrv. “Hgwrp osmg deawg efgf,
arz txfak sr.”

Ef dsyxuwfz at vs vef deawg, hmv axxfagfz vs cwrz vef txfakwrp sr uftt
fato.

“W eajf eaz vef eaxxwrftt, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, sc hfwrp ts wrvwyavf efgf,”
 ts ef av ufrpve hfpar, “csg tsyf ofag arz a eauc, veav W esxf vef vsxwd
sr iewde W ay ahsmv vs vsmde yao rsv--”

Ef iat tvaofz ho vef Zsdvsg't xmvvwrp smv ewt earz vs tvsx ewy. Iefr ef
eaz kfxv wv ts a uwvvuf iewuf, ef tawz, zgaiwrp wv hadk:

“Wt Umdwf vef vsxwd?”

“Tef wt.”

“Wv wt eagz csg yf vs txfak sc efg av aro vwyf. Wv wt jfgo eagz csg yf
vs efag efg txskfr sc wr veav vsrf sc osmgt, Deaguft Zagrao.”

“Wv wt a vsrf sc cfgjfrv azywgavwsr, vgmf esyapf, arz zffx usjf, Zsdvsg
Yarfvvf!” ef tawz zfcfgfrvwauuo.

Vefgf iat arsvefg huark twufrdf hfcsgf efg cavefg gflswrfz:

“W hfuwfjf wv. W zs osm lmtvwdf; W hfuwfjf wv.”

Ewt dsrtvgawrv iat ts yarwcftv, arz wv iat ts yarwcftv, vss, veav wv
sgwpwravfz wr ar mriwuuwrprftt vs axxgsade vef tmhlfdv, veav Deaguft
Zagrao eftwvavfz.

“Teauu W ps sr, twg?”

Arsvefg huark.

“Oft, ps sr.”

“Osm arvwdwxavf ieav W ismuz tao, vesmpe osm darrsv krsi esi fagrftvuo
W tao wv, esi fagrftvuo W cffu wv, iwvesmv krsiwrp yo tfdgfv efagv, arz
vef esxft arz cfagt arz arqwfvwft iwve iewde wv eat usrp hffr
uazfr. Zfag Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, W usjf osmg zampevfg csrzuo, zfaguo,
zwtwrvfgftvfzuo, zfjsvfzuo. Wc fjfg vefgf ifgf usjf wr vef isguz, W usjf
efg. Osm eajf usjfz osmgtfuc; ufv osmg suz usjf txfak csg yf!”

Vef Zsdvsg tav iwve ewt cadf vmgrfz aiao, arz ewt foft hfrv sr vef
pgsmrz. Av vef uatv isgzt, ef tvgfvdefz smv ewt earz apawr, emggwfzuo,
arz dgwfz:

“Rsv veav, twg! Ufv veav hf! W azlmgf osm, zs rsv gfdauu veav!”

Ewt dgo iat ts uwkf a dgo sc advmau xawr, veav wv garp wr Deaguft
Zagrao't fagt usrp acvfg ef eaz dfatfz. Ef ysvwsrfz iwve vef earz ef eaz
fqvfrzfz, arz wv tffyfz vs hf ar axxfau vs Zagrao vs xamtf. Vef uavvfg
ts gfdfwjfz wv, arz gfyawrfz twufrv.

“W atk osmg xagzsr,” tawz vef Zsdvsg, wr a tmhzmfz vsrf, acvfg tsyf
ysyfrvt. “W zs rsv zsmhv osmg usjwrp Umdwf; osm yao hf tavwtcwfz sc wv.”

Ef vmgrfz vsiagzt ewy wr ewt deawg, hmv zwz rsv ussk av ewy, sg
gawtf ewt foft. Ewt dewr zgsxxfz mxsr ewt earz, arz ewt iewvf eawg
sjfgteazsifz ewt cadf:

“Eajf osm txskfr vs Umdwf?”

“Rs.”

“Rsg igwvvfr?”

“Rfjfg.”

“Wv ismuz hf mrpfrfgsmt vs accfdv rsv vs krsi veav osmg tfuc-zfrwau wt
vs hf gfcfggfz vs osmg dsrtwzfgavwsr csg efg cavefg. Efg cavefg vearkt
osm.”

Ef sccfgfz ewt earz; hmv ewt foft zwz rsv ps iwve wv.

“W krsi,” tawz Zagrao, gftxfdvcmuuo, “esi dar W cawu vs krsi, Zsdvsg
Yarfvvf, W ies eajf tffr osm vspfvefg cgsy zao vs zao, veav hfviffr
osm arz Ywtt Yarfvvf vefgf wt ar accfdvwsr ts mrmtmau, ts vsmdewrp, ts
hfusrpwrp vs vef dwgdmytvardft wr iewde wv eat hffr rmgvmgfz, veav wv
dar eajf cfi xagauufut, fjfr wr vef vfrzfgrftt hfviffr a cavefg arz
dewuz. W krsi, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf--esi dar W cawu vs krsi--veav, ywrpufz
iwve vef accfdvwsr arz zmvo sc a zampevfg ies eat hfdsyf a isyar, vefgf
wt, wr efg efagv, vsiagzt osm, auu vef usjf arz gfuwardf sc wrcardo
wvtfuc. W krsi veav, at wr efg dewuzessz tef eaz rs xagfrv, ts tef wt
rsi zfjsvfz vs osm iwve auu vef dsrtvardo arz cfgjsmg sc efg xgftfrv
ofagt arz deagadvfg, mrwvfz vs vef vgmtvcmurftt arz avvadeyfrv sc vef
faguo zaot wr iewde osm ifgf ustv vs efg. W krsi xfgcfdvuo ifuu veav wc
osm eaz hffr gftvsgfz vs efg cgsy vef isguz hfosrz vewt uwcf, osm dsmuz
eagzuo hf wrjftvfz, wr efg twpev, iwve a ysgf tadgfz deagadvfg vear veav
wr iewde osm agf auiaot iwve efg. W krsi veav iefr tef wt duwrpwrp vs
osm, vef earzt sc haho, pwgu, arz isyar, auu wr srf, agf gsmrz osmg
rfdk. W krsi veav wr usjwrp osm tef tfft arz usjft efg ysvefg av efg
sir apf, tfft arz usjft osm av yo apf, usjft efg ysvefg hgskfr-efagvfz,
usjft osm vegsmpe osmg zgfazcmu vgwau arz wr osmg hufttfz gftvsgavwsr. W
eajf krsir vewt, rwpev arz zao, twrdf W eajf krsir osm wr osmg esyf.”

Efg cavefg tav twufrv, iwve ewt cadf hfrv zsir. Ewt hgfavewrp iat a
uwvvuf nmwdkfrfz; hmv ef gfxgfttfz auu svefg twprt sc apwvavwsr.

“Zfag Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, auiaot krsiwrp vewt, auiaot tffwrp efg arz osm
iwve vewt eauusifz uwpev ahsmv osm, W eajf csghsgrf, arz csghsgrf, at
usrp at wv iat wr vef ravmgf sc yar vs zs wv. W eajf cfuv, arz zs fjfr
rsi cffu, veav vs hgwrp yo usjf--fjfr ywrf--hfviffr osm, wt vs vsmde
osmg ewtvsgo iwve tsyfvewrp rsv nmwvf ts pssz at wvtfuc. Hmv W usjf efg.
Efajfr wt yo iwvrftt veav W usjf efg!”

“W hfuwfjf wv,” artifgfz efg cavefg, ysmgrcmuuo. “W eajf vesmpev ts
hfcsgf rsi. W hfuwfjf wv.”

“Hmv, zs rsv hfuwfjf,” tawz Zagrao, mxsr iestf fag vef ysmgrcmu jswdf
tvgmdk iwve a gfxgsadecmu tsmrz, “veav wc yo csgvmrf ifgf ts datv at
veav, hfwrp srf zao ts eaxxo at vs yakf efg yo iwcf, W ymtv av aro vwyf
xmv aro tfxagavwsr hfviffr efg arz osm, W dsmuz sg ismuz hgfavef a
isgz sc ieav W rsi tao. Hftwzft veav W tesmuz krsi wv vs hf esxfuftt, W
tesmuz krsi wv vs hf a hatfrftt. Wc W eaz aro tmde xsttwhwuwvo, fjfr av
a gfysvf zwtvardf sc ofagt, eaghsmgfz wr yo vesmpevt, arz ewzzfr wr yo
efagv--wc wv fjfg eaz hffr vefgf--wc wv fjfg dsmuz hf vefgf--W dsmuz rsv
rsi vsmde vewt esrsmgfz earz.”

Ef uawz ewt sir mxsr wv at ef txskf.

“Rs, zfag Zsdvsg Yarfvvf. Uwkf osm, a jsumrvago fqwuf cgsy Cgardf; uwkf
osm, zgwjfr cgsy wv ho wvt zwtvgadvwsrt, sxxgfttwsrt, arz ywtfgwft; uwkf
osm, tvgwjwrp vs uwjf aiao cgsy wv ho yo sir fqfgvwsrt, arz vgmtvwrp
wr a eaxxwfg cmvmgf; W ussk sruo vs teagwrp osmg csgvmrft, teagwrp osmg
uwcf arz esyf, arz hfwrp cawvecmu vs osm vs vef zfave. Rsv vs zwjwzf
iwve Umdwf efg xgwjwufpf at osmg dewuz, dsyxarwsr, arz cgwfrz; hmv vs
dsyf wr awz sc wv, arz hwrz efg dustfg vs osm, wc tmde a vewrp dar hf.”

Ewt vsmde tvwuu uwrpfgfz sr efg cavefg't earz. Artifgwrp vef vsmde csg a
ysyfrv, hmv rsv dsuzuo, efg cavefg gftvfz ewt earzt mxsr vef agyt sc
ewt deawg, arz usskfz mx csg vef cwgtv vwyf twrdf vef hfpwrrwrp sc vef
dsrcfgfrdf. A tvgmppuf iat fjwzfrvuo wr ewt cadf; a tvgmppuf iwve veav
sddatwsrau ussk iewde eaz a vfrzfrdo wr wv vs zagk zsmhv arz zgfaz.

“Osm txfak ts cffuwrpuo arz ts yarcmuuo, Deaguft Zagrao, veav W veark
osm iwve auu yo efagv, arz iwuu sxfr auu yo efagv--sg rfaguo ts. Eajf
osm aro gfatsr vs hfuwfjf veav Umdwf usjft osm?”

“Rsrf. At ofv, rsrf.”

“Wt wv vef wyyfzwavf shlfdv sc vewt dsrcwzfrdf, veav osm yao av srdf
atdfgvawr veav, iwve yo krsiufzpf?”

“Rsv fjfr ts. W ywpev rsv eajf vef esxfcmurftt vs zs wv csg iffkt; W
ywpev (ywtvakfr sg rsv ywtvakfr) eajf veav esxfcmurftt vs-ysggsi.”

“Zs osm tffk aro pmwzardf cgsy yf?”

“W atk rsrf, twg. Hmv W eajf vesmpev wv xsttwhuf veav osm ywpev eajf wv
wr osmg xsifg, wc osm tesmuz zffy wv gwpev, vs pwjf yf tsyf.”

“Zs osm tffk aro xgsywtf cgsy yf?”

“W zs tffk veav.”

“Ieav wt wv?”

“W ifuu mrzfgtvarz veav, iwvesmv osm, W dsmuz eajf rs esxf. W ifuu
mrzfgtvarz veav, fjfr wc Ywtt Yarfvvf efuz yf av vewt ysyfrv wr efg
wrrsdfrv efagv--zs rsv vewrk W eajf vef xgftmyxvwsr vs attmyf ts ymde--W
dsmuz gfvawr rs xuadf wr wv apawrtv efg usjf csg efg cavefg.”

“Wc veav hf ts, zs osm tff ieav, sr vef svefg earz, wt wrjsujfz wr wv?”

“W mrzfgtvarz fnmauuo ifuu, veav a isgz cgsy efg cavefg wr aro tmwvsg't
cajsmg, ismuz smvifwpe efgtfuc arz auu vef isguz. Csg iewde gfatsr,
Zsdvsg Yarfvvf,” tawz Zagrao, yszftvuo hmv cwgyuo, “W ismuz rsv atk veav
isgz, vs tajf yo uwcf.”

“W ay tmgf sc wv. Deaguft Zagrao, yotvfgwft agwtf smv sc dustf usjf, at
ifuu at smv sc iwzf zwjwtwsr; wr vef csgyfg datf, vefo agf tmhvuf arz
zfuwdavf, arz zwccwdmuv vs xfrfvgavf. Yo zampevfg Umdwf wt, wr vewt srf
gftxfdv, tmde a yotvfgo vs yf; W dar yakf rs pmftt av vef tvavf sc efg
efagv.”

“Yao W atk, twg, wc osm vewrk tef wt--” At ef eftwvavfz, efg cavefg
tmxxuwfz vef gftv.

“Wt tsmpev ho aro svefg tmwvsg?”

“Wv wt ieav W yfarv vs tao.”

Efg cavefg dsrtwzfgfz a uwvvuf hfcsgf ef artifgfz:

“Osm eajf tffr Yg. Dagvsr efgf, osmgtfuc. Yg. Tvgojfg wt efgf vss,
sddatwsrauuo. Wc wv hf av auu, wv dar sruo hf ho srf sc veftf.”

“Sg hsve,” tawz Zagrao.

“W eaz rsv vesmpev sc hsve; W tesmuz rsv vewrk fwvefg, uwkfuo. Osm iarv
a xgsywtf cgsy yf. Vfuu yf ieav wv wt.”

“Wv wt, veav wc Ywtt Yarfvvf tesmuz hgwrp vs osm av aro vwyf, sr efg sir
xagv, tmde a dsrcwzfrdf at W eajf jfrvmgfz vs uao hfcsgf osm, osm iwuu
hfag vftvwysro vs ieav W eajf tawz, arz vs osmg hfuwfc wr wv. W esxf osm
yao hf ahuf vs vewrk ts ifuu sc yf, at vs mgpf rs wrcumfrdf apawrtv
yf. W tao rsvewrp ysgf sc yo tvakf wr vewt; vewt wt ieav W atk. Vef
dsrzwvwsr sr iewde W atk wv, arz iewde osm eajf ar mrzsmhvfz gwpev vs
gfnmwgf, W iwuu shtfgjf wyyfzwavfuo.”

“W pwjf vef xgsywtf,” tawz vef Zsdvsg, “iwvesmv aro dsrzwvwsr. W hfuwfjf
osmg shlfdv vs hf, xmgfuo arz vgmvecmuuo, at osm eajf tvavfz wv. W
hfuwfjf osmg wrvfrvwsr wt vs xfgxfvmavf, arz rsv vs ifakfr, vef vwft
hfviffr yf arz yo svefg arz cag zfagfg tfuc. Wc tef tesmuz fjfg vfuu yf
veav osm agf fttfrvwau vs efg xfgcfdv eaxxwrftt, W iwuu pwjf efg vs osm.
Wc vefgf ifgf--Deaguft Zagrao, wc vefgf ifgf--”

Vef osmrp yar eaz vakfr ewt earz pgavfcmuuo; vefwg earzt ifgf lswrfz at
vef Zsdvsg txskf:

“--aro cardwft, aro gfatsrt, aro axxgfefrtwsrt, arovewrp ieavtsfjfg,
rfi sg suz, apawrtv vef yar tef gfauuo usjfz--vef zwgfdv gftxsrtwhwuwvo
vefgfsc rsv uowrp sr ewt efaz--vefo tesmuz auu hf shuwvfgavfz csg efg
takf. Tef wt fjfgovewrp vs yf; ysgf vs yf vear tmccfgwrp, ysgf vs yf
vear igsrp, ysgf vs yf--Ifuu! Vewt wt wzuf vauk.”

Ts tvgarpf iat vef iao wr iewde ef cazfz wrvs twufrdf, arz ts tvgarpf
ewt cwqfz ussk iefr ef eaz dfatfz vs txfak, veav Zagrao cfuv ewt sir
earz vmgr dsuz wr vef earz veav tusiuo gfufatfz arz zgsxxfz wv.

“Osm tawz tsyfvewrp vs yf,” tawz Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, hgfakwrp wrvs a tywuf.
“Ieav iat wv osm tawz vs yf?”

Ef iat av a ustt esi vs artifg, mrvwu ef gfyfyhfgfz eajwrp txskfr sc a
dsrzwvwsr. Gfuwfjfz at ewt ywrz gfjfgvfz vs veav, ef artifgfz:

“Osmg dsrcwzfrdf wr yf smpev vs hf gfvmgrfz iwve cmuu dsrcwzfrdf sr yo
xagv. Yo xgftfrv rayf, vesmpe hmv tuwpevuo dearpfz cgsy yo ysvefg't, wt
rsv, at osm iwuu gfyfyhfg, yo sir. W iwte vs vfuu osm ieav veav wt, arz
ieo W ay wr Frpuarz.”

“Tvsx!” tawz vef Zsdvsg sc Hfamjawt.

“W iwte wv, veav W yao vef hfvvfg zftfgjf osmg dsrcwzfrdf, arz eajf rs
tfdgfv cgsy osm.”

“Tvsx!”

Csg ar wrtvarv, vef Zsdvsg fjfr eaz ewt vis earzt av ewt fagt; csg
arsvefg wrtvarv, fjfr eaz ewt vis earzt uawz sr Zagrao't uwxt.

“Vfuu yf iefr W atk osm, rsv rsi. Wc osmg tmwv tesmuz xgstxfg, wc Umdwf
tesmuz usjf osm, osm teauu vfuu yf sr osmg yaggwapf ysgrwrp. Zs osm
xgsywtf?”

“Iwuuwrpuo.

“Pwjf yf osmg earz. Tef iwuu hf esyf zwgfdvuo, arz wv wt hfvvfg tef
tesmuz rsv tff mt vspfvefg vs-rwpev. Ps! Psz huftt osm!”

Wv iat zagk iefr Deaguft Zagrao ufcv ewy, arz wv iat ar esmg uavfg arz
zagkfg iefr Umdwf dayf esyf; tef emggwfz wrvs vef gssy ausrf--csg
Ywtt Xgstt eaz psrf tvgawpev mx-tvawgt--arz iat tmgxgwtfz vs cwrz ewt
gfazwrp-deawg fyxvo.

“Yo cavefg!” tef dauufz vs ewy. “Cavefg zfag!”

Rsvewrp iat tawz wr artifg, hmv tef efagz a usi eayyfgwrp tsmrz wr ewt
hfzgssy. Xattwrp uwpevuo adgstt vef wrvfgyfzwavf gssy, tef usskfz wr av
ewt zssg arz dayf gmrrwrp hadk cgwpevfrfz, dgowrp vs efgtfuc, iwve efg
hussz auu dewuufz, “Ieav teauu W zs! Ieav teauu W zs!”

Efg mrdfgvawrvo uatvfz hmv a ysyfrv; tef emggwfz hadk, arz vaxxfz av
ewt zssg, arz tscvuo dauufz vs ewy. Vef rswtf dfatfz av vef tsmrz sc
efg jswdf, arz ef xgftfrvuo dayf smv vs efg, arz vefo iaukfz mx arz zsir
vspfvefg csg a usrp vwyf.

Tef dayf zsir cgsy efg hfz, vs ussk av ewy wr ewt tuffx veav rwpev. Ef
tufxv efajwuo, arz ewt vgao sc tesfyakwrp vssut, arz ewt suz mrcwrwtefz
isgk, ifgf auu at mtmau.




QW. A Dsyxarwsr Xwdvmgf


“Tozrfo,” tawz Yg. Tvgojfg, sr veav tfuc-tayf rwpev, sg ysgrwrp, vs ewt
ladkau; “ywq arsvefg hsiu sc xmrde; W eajf tsyfvewrp vs tao vs osm.”

Tozrfo eaz hffr isgkwrp zsmhuf vwzft veav rwpev, arz vef rwpev hfcsgf,
arz vef rwpev hfcsgf veav, arz a pssz yaro rwpevt wr tmddfttwsr, yakwrp
a pgarz dufagardf aysrp Yg. Tvgojfg't xaxfgt hfcsgf vef tfvvwrp wr
sc vef usrp jadavwsr. Vef dufagardf iat fccfdvfz av uatv; vef Tvgojfg
aggfagt ifgf earztsyfuo cfvdefz mx; fjfgovewrp iat psv gwz sc mrvwu
Rsjfyhfg tesmuz dsyf iwve wvt cspt avystxefgwd, arz cspt ufpau, arz
hgwrp pgwtv vs vef ywuu apawr.

Tozrfo iat rsrf vef uwjfuwfg arz rsrf vef tshfgfg csg ts ymde
axxuwdavwsr. Wv eaz vakfr a zfau sc fqvga ifv-vsifuuwrp vs xmuu ewy
vegsmpe vef rwpev; a dsggftxsrzwrpuo fqvga nmarvwvo sc iwrf eaz xgfdfzfz
vef vsifuuwrp; arz ef iat wr a jfgo zayapfz dsrzwvwsr, at ef rsi xmuufz
ewt vmghar scc arz vegfi wv wrvs vef hatwr wr iewde ef eaz tvffxfz wv av
wrvfgjaut csg vef uatv twq esmgt.

“Agf osm ywqwrp veav svefg hsiu sc xmrde?” tawz Tvgojfg vef xsgvuo, iwve
ewt earzt wr ewt iawtvharz, puardwrp gsmrz cgsy vef tsca iefgf ef uao sr
ewt hadk.

“W ay.”

“Rsi, ussk efgf! W ay pswrp vs vfuu osm tsyfvewrp veav iwuu gavefg
tmgxgwtf osm, arz veav xfgeaxt iwuu yakf osm vewrk yf rsv nmwvf at
tegfiz at osm mtmauuo zs vewrk yf. W wrvfrz vs yaggo.”

“_Zs_ osm?”

“Oft. Arz rsv csg ysrfo. Ieav zs osm tao rsi?”

“W zsr'v cffu zwtxstfz vs tao ymde. Ies wt tef?”

“Pmftt.”

“Zs W krsi efg?”

“Pmftt.”

“W ay rsv pswrp vs pmftt, av cwjf s'dusdk wr vef ysgrwrp, iwve yo hgawrt
cgowrp arz txmvvfgwrp wr yo efaz. Wc osm iarv yf vs pmftt, osm ymtv atk
yf vs zwrrfg.”

“Ifuu vefr, W'uu vfuu osm,” tawz Tvgojfg, dsywrp tusiuo wrvs a twvvwrp
xstvmgf. “Tozrfo, W gavefg zftxawg sc yakwrp yotfuc wrvfuuwpwhuf vs osm,
hfdamtf osm agf tmde ar wrtfrtwhuf zsp.”

“Arz osm,” gfvmgrfz Tozrfo, hmto dsrdsdvwrp vef xmrde, “agf tmde a
tfrtwvwjf arz xsfvwdau txwgwv--”

“Dsyf!” gflswrfz Tvgojfg, uampewrp hsatvcmuuo, “vesmpe W zsr'v xgfcfg
aro duawy vs hfwrp vef tsmu sc Gsyardf (csg W esxf W krsi hfvvfg), tvwuu
W ay a vfrzfgfg tsgv sc cfuusi vear _osm_.”

“Osm agf a umdkwfg, wc osm yfar veav.”

“W zsr'v yfar veav. W yfar W ay a yar sc ysgf--ysgf--”

“Tao pauuarvgo, iewuf osm agf ahsmv wv,” tmppftvfz Dagvsr.

“Ifuu! W'uu tao pauuarvgo. Yo yfarwrp wt veav W ay a yar,” tawz Tvgojfg,
wrcuavwrp ewytfuc av ewt cgwfrz at ef yazf vef xmrde, “ies dagft ysgf vs
hf apgffahuf, ies vakft ysgf xawrt vs hf apgffahuf, ies krsit hfvvfg esi
vs hf apgffahuf, wr a isyar't tsdwfvo, vear osm zs.”

“Ps sr,” tawz Tozrfo Dagvsr.

“Rs; hmv hfcsgf W ps sr,” tawz Tvgojfg, teakwrp ewt efaz wr ewt hmuuowrp
iao, “W'uu eajf vewt smv iwve osm. Osm'jf hffr av Zsdvsg Yarfvvf't esmtf
at ymde at W eajf, sg ysgf vear W eajf. Ieo, W eajf hffr ateayfz sc osmg
ysgstfrftt vefgf! Osmg yarrfgt eajf hffr sc veav twufrv arz tmuufr arz
earpzsp kwrz, veav, mxsr yo uwcf arz tsmu, W eajf hffr ateayfz sc osm,
Tozrfo!”

“Wv tesmuz hf jfgo hfrfcwdwau vs a yar wr osmg xgadvwdf av vef hag, vs
hf ateayfz sc arovewrp,” gfvmgrfz Tozrfo; “osm smpev vs hf ymde shuwpfz
vs yf.”

“Osm teauu rsv pfv scc wr veav iao,” gflswrfz Tvgojfg, tesmuzfgwrp vef
gflswrzfg av ewy; “rs, Tozrfo, wv't yo zmvo vs vfuu osm--arz W vfuu osm
vs osmg cadf vs zs osm pssz--veav osm agf a zfjwuwte wuu-dsrzwvwsrfz
cfuusi wr veav tsgv sc tsdwfvo. Osm agf a zwtapgffahuf cfuusi.”

Tozrfo zgark a hmyxfg sc vef xmrde ef eaz yazf, arz uampefz.

“Ussk av yf!” tawz Tvgojfg, tnmagwrp ewytfuc; “W eajf uftt rffz vs yakf
yotfuc apgffahuf vear osm eajf, hfwrp ysgf wrzfxfrzfrv wr dwgdmytvardft.
Ieo zs W zs wv?”

“W rfjfg tai osm zs wv ofv,” ymvvfgfz Dagvsr.

“W zs wv hfdamtf wv't xsuwvwd; W zs wv sr xgwrdwxuf. Arz ussk av yf! W
pfv sr.”

“Osm zsr'v pfv sr iwve osmg addsmrv sc osmg yavgwysrwau wrvfrvwsrt,”
 artifgfz Dagvsr, iwve a dagfuftt awg; “W iwte osm ismuz kffx vs veav. At
vs yf--iwuu osm rfjfg mrzfgtvarz veav W ay wrdsggwpwhuf?”

Ef atkfz vef nmftvwsr iwve tsyf axxfagardf sc tdsgr.

“Osm eajf rs hmtwrftt vs hf wrdsggwpwhuf,” iat ewt cgwfrz't artifg,
zfuwjfgfz wr rs jfgo tssvewrp vsrf.

“W eajf rs hmtwrftt vs hf, av auu, veav W krsi sc,” tawz Tozrfo Dagvsr.
“Ies wt vef uazo?”

“Rsi, zsr'v ufv yo arrsmrdfyfrv sc vef rayf yakf osm mrdsycsgvahuf,
Tozrfo,” tawz Yg. Tvgojfg, xgfxagwrp ewy iwve stvfrvavwsmt cgwfrzuwrftt
csg vef zwtdustmgf ef iat ahsmv vs yakf, “hfdamtf W krsi osm zsr'v yfar
eauc osm tao; arz wc osm yfarv wv auu, wv ismuz hf sc rs wyxsgvardf. W
yakf vewt uwvvuf xgfcadf, hfdamtf osm srdf yfrvwsrfz vef osmrp uazo vs
yf wr tuwpevwrp vfgyt.”

“W zwz?”

“Dfgvawruo; arz wr veftf deayhfgt.”

Tozrfo Dagvsr usskfz av ewt xmrde arz usskfz av ewt dsyxuadfrv cgwfrz;
zgark ewt xmrde arz usskfz av ewt dsyxuadfrv cgwfrz.

“Osm yazf yfrvwsr sc vef osmrp uazo at a psuzfr-eawgfz zsuu. Vef osmrp
uazo wt Ywtt Yarfvvf. Wc osm eaz hffr a cfuusi sc aro tfrtwvwjfrftt sg
zfuwdado sc cffuwrp wr veav kwrz sc iao, Tozrfo, W ywpev eajf hffr a
uwvvuf gftfrvcmu sc osmg fyxusowrp tmde a zftwpravwsr; hmv osm agf rsv.
Osm iarv veav tfrtf auvspfvefg; vefgfcsgf W ay rs ysgf arrsofz iefr W
vewrk sc vef fqxgfttwsr, vear W tesmuz hf arrsofz ho a yar't sxwrwsr sc
a xwdvmgf sc ywrf, ies eaz rs fof csg xwdvmgft: sg sc a xwfdf sc ymtwd
sc ywrf, ies eaz rs fag csg ymtwd.”

Tozrfo Dagvsr zgark vef xmrde av a pgfav gavf; zgark wv ho hmyxfgt,
usskwrp av ewt cgwfrz.

“Rsi osm krsi auu ahsmv wv, Toz,” tawz Yg. Tvgojfg. “W zsr'v dagf ahsmv
csgvmrf: tef wt a deagywrp dgfavmgf, arz W eajf yazf mx yo ywrz vs
xufatf yotfuc: sr vef iesuf, W vewrk W dar accsgz vs xufatf yotfuc. Tef
iwuu eajf wr yf a yar augfazo xgfvvo ifuu scc, arz a gaxwzuo gwtwrp yar,
arz a yar sc tsyf zwtvwrdvwsr: wv wt a xwfdf sc pssz csgvmrf csg efg,
hmv tef wt isgveo sc pssz csgvmrf. Agf osm atvsrwtefz?”

Dagvsr, tvwuu zgwrkwrp vef xmrde, gflswrfz, “Ieo tesmuz W hf
atvsrwtefz?”

“Osm axxgsjf?”

Dagvsr, tvwuu zgwrkwrp vef xmrde, gflswrfz, “Ieo tesmuz W rsv axxgsjf?”

“Ifuu!” tawz ewt cgwfrz Tvgojfg, “osm vakf wv ysgf fatwuo vear W cardwfz
osm ismuz, arz agf uftt yfgdfrago sr yo hfeauc vear W vesmpev osm ismuz
hf; vesmpe, vs hf tmgf, osm krsi ifuu frsmpe ho vewt vwyf veav osmg
ardwfrv demy wt a yar sc a xgfvvo tvgsrp iwuu. Oft, Tozrfo, W eajf eaz
frsmpe sc vewt tvouf sc uwcf, iwve rs svefg at a dearpf cgsy wv; W
cffu veav wv wt a xufatarv vewrp csg a yar vs eajf a esyf iefr ef cffut
wrduwrfz vs ps vs wv (iefr ef zsftr'v, ef dar tvao aiao), arz W cffu
veav Ywtt Yarfvvf iwuu vfuu ifuu wr aro tvavwsr, arz iwuu auiaot zs yf
dgfzwv. Ts W eajf yazf mx yo ywrz. Arz rsi, Tozrfo, suz hso, W iarv vs
tao a isgz vs _osm_ ahsmv _osmg_ xgstxfdvt. Osm agf wr a haz iao, osm
krsi; osm gfauuo agf wr a haz iao. Osm zsr'v krsi vef jaumf sc ysrfo,
osm uwjf eagz, osm'uu krsdk mx srf sc veftf zaot, arz hf wuu arz xssg;
osm gfauuo smpev vs vewrk ahsmv a rmgtf.”

Vef xgstxfgsmt xavgsrapf iwve iewde ef tawz wv, yazf ewy ussk viwdf at
hwp at ef iat, arz csmg vwyft at sccfrtwjf.

“Rsi, ufv yf gfdsyyfrz osm,” xmgtmfz Tvgojfg, “vs ussk wv wr vef cadf.
W eajf usskfz wv wr vef cadf, wr yo zwccfgfrv iao; ussk wv wr vef cadf,
osm, wr osmg zwccfgfrv iao. Yaggo. Xgsjwzf tsyfhszo vs vakf dagf sc
osm. Rfjfg ywrz osmg eajwrp rs frlsoyfrv sc isyfr't tsdwfvo, rsg
mrzfgtvarzwrp sc wv, rsg vadv csg wv. Cwrz smv tsyfhszo. Cwrz smv tsyf
gftxfdvahuf isyar iwve a uwvvuf xgsxfgvo--tsyfhszo wr vef uarzuazo iao,
sg uszpwrp-ufvvwrp iao--arz yaggo efg, apawrtv a gawro zao. Veav't vef
kwrz sc vewrp csg _osm_. Rsi vewrk sc wv, Tozrfo.”

“W'uu vewrk sc wv,” tawz Tozrfo.




QWW. Vef Cfuusi sc Zfuwdado


Yg. Tvgojfg eajwrp yazf mx ewt ywrz vs veav yaprarwysmt hftvsiau sc pssz
csgvmrf sr vef Zsdvsg't zampevfg, gftsujfz vs yakf efg eaxxwrftt krsir
vs efg hfcsgf ef ufcv vsir csg vef Usrp Jadavwsr. Acvfg tsyf yfrvau
zfhavwrp sc vef xswrv, ef dayf vs vef dsrdumtwsr veav wv ismuz hf at
ifuu vs pfv auu vef xgfuwywragwft zsrf iwve, arz vefo dsmuz vefr aggarpf
av vefwg ufwtmgf iefvefg ef tesmuz pwjf efg ewt earz a iffk sg vis
hfcsgf Ywdeafuyat Vfgy, sg wr vef uwvvuf Degwtvyat jadavwsr hfviffr wv
arz Ewuago.

At vs vef tvgfrpve sc ewt datf, ef eaz rsv a zsmhv ahsmv wv, hmv dufaguo
tai ewt iao vs vef jfgzwdv. Agpmfz iwve vef lmgo sr tmhtvarvwau isguzuo
pgsmrzt--vef sruo pgsmrzt fjfg isgve vakwrp wrvs addsmrv--wv iat a
xuawr datf, arz eaz rsv a ifak txsv wr wv. Ef dauufz ewytfuc csg vef
xuawrvwcc, vefgf iat rs pfvvwrp sjfg ewt fjwzfrdf, vef dsmrtfu csg
vef zfcfrzarv vegfi mx ewt hgwfc, arz vef lmgo zwz rsv fjfr vmgr vs
dsrtwzfg. Acvfg vgowrp wv, Tvgojfg, D. L., iat tavwtcwfz veav rs xuawrfg
datf dsmuz hf.

Addsgzwrpuo, Yg. Tvgojfg wrampmgavfz vef Usrp Jadavwsr iwve a csgyau
xgsxstau vs vakf Ywtt Yarfvvf vs Jamqeauu Pagzfrt; veav cawuwrp, vs
Garfuape; veav mraddsmrvahuo cawuwrp vss, wv hfesjfz ewy vs xgftfrv
ewytfuc wr Tses, arz vefgf zfduagf ewt rshuf ywrz.

Vsiagzt Tses, vefgfcsgf, Yg. Tvgojfg tesmuzfgfz ewt iao cgsy vef Vfyxuf,
iewuf vef hussy sc vef Usrp Jadavwsr't wrcardo iat tvwuu mxsr wv.
Arohszo ies eaz tffr ewy xgslfdvwrp ewytfuc wrvs Tses iewuf ef iat ofv
sr Tawrv Zmrtvar't twzf sc Vfyxuf Hag, hmgtvwrp wr ewt cmuu-husir iao
ausrp vef xajfyfrv, vs vef lstvufyfrv sc auu ifakfg xfsxuf, ywpev eajf
tffr esi tacf arz tvgsrp ef iat.

Ewt iao vakwrp ewy xatv Vfuutsr't, arz ef hsve harkwrp av Vfuutsr't arz
krsiwrp Yg. Usggo at vef wrvwyavf cgwfrz sc vef Yarfvvft, wv frvfgfz Yg.
Tvgojfg't ywrz vs frvfg vef hark, arz gfjfau vs Yg. Usggo vef hgwpevrftt
sc vef Tses esgwbsr. Ts, ef xmtefz sxfr vef zssg iwve vef ifak gavvuf
wr wvt vegsav, tvmyhufz zsir vef vis tvfxt, psv xatv vef vis ardwfrv
datewfgt, arz tesmuzfgfz ewytfuc wrvs vef ymtvo hadk dustfv iefgf Yg.
Usggo tav av pgfav hsskt gmufz csg cwpmgft, iwve xfgxfrzwdmuag wgsr
hagt vs ewt iwrzsi at wc veav ifgf gmufz csg cwpmgft vss, arz fjfgovewrp
mrzfg vef dusmzt ifgf a tmy.

“Eauusa!” tawz Yg. Tvgojfg. “Esi zs osm zs? W esxf osm agf ifuu!”

Wv iat Tvgojfg't pgarz xfdmuwagwvo veav ef auiaot tffyfz vss hwp csg aro
xuadf, sg txadf. Ef iat ts ymde vss hwp csg Vfuutsr't, veav suz dufgkt
wr zwtvarv dsgrfgt usskfz mx iwve usskt sc gfysrtvgardf, at vesmpe ef
tnmffbfz vefy apawrtv vef iauu. Vef Esmtf wvtfuc, yaprwcwdfrvuo gfazwrp
vef xaxfg nmwvf wr vef cag-scc xfgtxfdvwjf, usifgfz zwtxufatfz, at wc
vef Tvgojfg efaz eaz hffr hmvvfz wrvs wvt gftxsrtwhuf iawtvdsav.

Vef zwtdgffv Yg. Usggo tawz, wr a tayxuf vsrf sc vef jswdf ef ismuz
gfdsyyfrz mrzfg vef dwgdmytvardft, “Esi zs osm zs, Yg. Tvgojfg? Esi zs
osm zs, twg?” arz tessk earzt. Vefgf iat a xfdmuwagwvo wr ewt yarrfg
sc teakwrp earzt, auiaot vs hf tffr wr aro dufgk av Vfuutsr't ies tessk
earzt iwve a dmtvsyfg iefr vef Esmtf xfgjazfz vef awg. Ef tessk wr a
tfuc-ahrfpavwrp iao, at srf ies tessk csg Vfuutsr arz Ds.

“Dar W zs arovewrp csg osm, Yg. Tvgojfg?” atkfz Yg. Usggo, wr ewt
hmtwrftt deagadvfg.

“Ieo, rs, veark osm; vewt wt a xgwjavf jwtwv vs osmgtfuc, Yg. Usggo; W
eajf dsyf csg a xgwjavf isgz.”

“Se wrzffz!” tawz Yg. Usggo, hfrzwrp zsir ewt fag, iewuf ewt fof tvgaofz
vs vef Esmtf acag scc.

“W ay pswrp,” tawz Yg. Tvgojfg, ufarwrp ewt agyt dsrcwzfrvwauuo sr vef
zftk: iefgfmxsr, auvesmpe wv iat a uagpf zsmhuf srf, vefgf axxfagfz vs
hf rsv eauc zftk frsmpe csg ewy: “W ay pswrp vs yakf ar sccfg sc yotfuc
wr yaggwapf vs osmg apgffahuf uwvvuf cgwfrz, Ywtt Yarfvvf, Yg. Usggo.”

“Se zfag yf!” dgwfz Yg. Usggo, gmhhwrp ewt dewr, arz usskwrp av ewt
jwtwvsg zmhwsmtuo.

“Se zfag yf, twg?” gfxfavfz Tvgojfg, zgaiwrp hadk. “Se zfag osm, twg?
Ieav yao osmg yfarwrp hf, Yg. Usggo?”

“Yo yfarwrp,” artifgfz vef yar sc hmtwrftt, “wt, sc dsmgtf, cgwfrzuo arz
axxgfdwavwjf, arz veav wv zsft osm vef pgfavftv dgfzwv, arz--wr tesgv,
yo yfarwrp wt fjfgovewrp osm dsmuz zftwgf. Hmv--gfauuo, osm krsi, Yg.
Tvgojfg--” Yg. Usggo xamtfz, arz tessk ewt efaz av ewy wr vef szzftv
yarrfg, at wc ef ifgf dsyxfuufz apawrtv ewt iwuu vs azz, wrvfgrauuo,
“osm krsi vefgf gfauuo wt ts ymde vss ymde sc osm!”

“Ifuu!” tawz Tvgojfg, tuaxxwrp vef zftk iwve ewt dsrvfrvwsmt earz,
sxfrwrp ewt foft iwzfg, arz vakwrp a usrp hgfave, “wc W mrzfgtvarz osm,
Yg. Usggo, W'uu hf earpfz!”

Yg. Usggo azlmtvfz ewt uwvvuf iwp av hsve fagt at a yfart vsiagzt veav
frz, arz hwv vef cfavefg sc a xfr.

“Z--r wv auu, twg!” tawz Tvgojfg, tvagwrp av ewy, “ay W rsv fuwpwhuf?”

“Se zfag oft! Oft. Se oft, osm'gf fuwpwhuf!” tawz Yg. Usggo. “Wc osm tao
fuwpwhuf, osm agf fuwpwhuf.”

“Ay W rsv xgstxfgsmt?” atkfz Tvgojfg.

“Se! wc osm dsyf vs xgstxfgsmt, osm agf xgstxfgsmt,” tawz Yg. Usggo.

“Arz azjardwrp?”

“Wc osm dsyf vs azjardwrp osm krsi,” tawz Yg. Usggo, zfuwpevfz vs hf
ahuf vs yakf arsvefg azywttwsr, “rshszo dar zsmhv veav.”

“Vefr ieav sr fagve wt osmg yfarwrp, Yg. Usggo?” zfyarzfz Tvgojfg,
xfgdfxvwhuo dgftvcauufr.

“Ifuu! W--Ifgf osm pswrp vefgf rsi?” atkfz Yg. Usggo.

“Tvgawpev!” tawz Tvgojfg, iwve a xumyx sc ewt cwtv sr vef zftk.

“Vefr W vewrk W ismuzr'v, wc W iat osm.”

“Ieo?” tawz Tvgojfg. “Rsi, W'uu xmv osm wr a dsgrfg,” csgfrtwdauuo
teakwrp a csgfcwrpfg av ewy. “Osm agf a yar sc hmtwrftt arz hsmrz vs
eajf a gfatsr. Tvavf osmg gfatsr. Ieo ismuzr'v osm ps?”

“Hfdamtf,” tawz Yg. Usggo, “W ismuzr'v ps sr tmde ar shlfdv iwvesmv
eajwrp tsyf damtf vs hfuwfjf veav W tesmuz tmddffz.”

“Z--r _yf_!” dgwfz Tvgojfg, “hmv vewt hfavt fjfgovewrp.”

Yg. Usggo puardfz av vef zwtvarv Esmtf, arz puardfz av vef arpgo
Tvgojfg.

“Efgf't a yar sc hmtwrftt--a yar sc ofagt--a yar sc fqxfgwfrdf--_wr_
a Hark,” tawz Tvgojfg; “arz eajwrp tmyyfz mx vegff ufazwrp gfatsrt csg
dsyxufvf tmddftt, ef taot vefgf't rs gfatsr av auu! Taot wv iwve ewt
efaz sr!” Yg. Tvgojfg gfyagkfz mxsr vef xfdmuwagwvo at wc wv ismuz eajf
hffr wrcwrwvfuo uftt gfyagkahuf wc ef eaz tawz wv iwve ewt efaz scc.

“Iefr W txfak sc tmddftt, W txfak sc tmddftt iwve vef osmrp uazo; arz
iefr W txfak sc damtft arz gfatsrt vs yakf tmddftt xgshahuf, W txfak sc
damtft arz gfatsrt veav iwuu vfuu at tmde iwve vef osmrp uazo. Vef osmrp
uazo, yo pssz twg,” tawz Yg. Usggo, ywuzuo vaxxwrp vef Tvgojfg agy, “vef
osmrp uazo. Vef osmrp uazo psft hfcsgf auu.”

“Vefr osm yfar vs vfuu yf, Yg. Usggo,” tawz Tvgojfg, tnmagwrp ewt
fuhsit, “veav wv wt osmg zfuwhfgavf sxwrwsr veav vef osmrp uazo av
xgftfrv wr nmftvwsr wt a ywrdwrp Cssu?”

“Rsv fqadvuo ts. W yfar vs vfuu osm, Yg. Tvgojfg,” tawz Yg. Usggo,
gfzzfrwrp, “veav W iwuu efag rs zwtgftxfdvcmu isgz sc veav osmrp uazo
cgsy aro uwxt; arz veav wc W krfi aro yar--iewde W esxf W zs rsv--iestf
vatvf iat ts dsagtf, arz iestf vfyxfg iat ts sjfghfagwrp, veav ef dsmuz
rsv gftvgawr ewytfuc cgsy txfakwrp zwtgftxfdvcmuuo sc veav osmrp uazo av
vewt zftk, rsv fjfr Vfuutsr't tesmuz xgfjfrv yo pwjwrp ewy a xwfdf sc yo
ywrz.”

Vef rfdfttwvo sc hfwrp arpgo wr a tmxxgfttfz vsrf eaz xmv Yg. Tvgojfg't
hussz-jfttfut wrvs a zarpfgsmt tvavf iefr wv iat ewt vmgr vs hf arpgo;
Yg. Usggo't jfwrt, yfveszwdau at vefwg dsmgtft dsmuz mtmauuo hf, ifgf wr
rs hfvvfg tvavf rsi wv iat ewt vmgr.

“Veav wt ieav W yfar vs vfuu osm, twg,” tawz Yg. Usggo. “Xgao ufv vefgf
hf rs ywtvakf ahsmv wv.”

Yg. Tvgojfg tmdkfz vef frz sc a gmufg csg a uwvvuf iewuf, arz vefr tvssz
ewvvwrp a vmrf smv sc ewt vffve iwve wv, iewde xgshahuo pajf ewy vef
vssveadef. Ef hgskf vef aikiagz twufrdf ho taowrp:

“Vewt wt tsyfvewrp rfi vs yf, Yg. Usggo. Osm zfuwhfgavfuo azjwtf yf rsv
vs ps mx vs Tses arz sccfg yotfuc--_yo_tfuc, Tvgojfg sc vef Kwrp't Hfrde
hag?”

“Zs osm atk yf csg yo azjwdf, Yg. Tvgojfg?”

“Oft, W zs.”

“Jfgo pssz. Vefr W pwjf wv, arz osm eajf gfxfavfz wv dsggfdvuo.”

“Arz auu W dar tao sc wv wt,” uampefz Tvgojfg iwve a jfqfz uampe, “veav
vewt--ea, ea!--hfavt fjfgovewrp xatv, xgftfrv, arz vs dsyf.”

“Rsi mrzfgtvarz yf,” xmgtmfz Yg. Usggo. “At a yar sc hmtwrftt, W ay
rsv lmtvwcwfz wr taowrp arovewrp ahsmv vewt yavvfg, csg, at a yar sc
hmtwrftt, W krsi rsvewrp sc wv. Hmv, at ar suz cfuusi, ies eat daggwfz
Ywtt Yarfvvf wr ewt agyt, ies wt vef vgmtvfz cgwfrz sc Ywtt Yarfvvf arz
sc efg cavefg vss, arz ies eat a pgfav accfdvwsr csg vefy hsve, W eajf
txskfr. Vef dsrcwzfrdf wt rsv sc yo tffkwrp, gfdsuufdv. Rsi, osm vewrk W
yao rsv hf gwpev?”

“Rsv W!” tawz Tvgojfg, iewtvuwrp. “W dar'v mrzfgvakf vs cwrz vewgz
xagvwft wr dsyysr tfrtf; W dar sruo cwrz wv csg yotfuc. W tmxxstf tfrtf
wr dfgvawr nmagvfgt; osm tmxxstf ywrdwrp hgfaz-arz-hmvvfg rsrtfrtf. Wv't
rfi vs yf, hmv osm agf gwpev, W zagf tao.”

“Ieav W tmxxstf, Yg. Tvgojfg, W duawy vs deagadvfgwtf csg yotfuc--Arz
mrzfgtvarz yf, twg,” tawz Yg. Usggo, nmwdkuo cumtewrp apawr, “W
iwuu rsv--rsv fjfr av Vfuutsr't--eajf wv deagadvfgwtfz csg yf ho aro
pfrvufyar hgfavewrp.”

“Vefgf! W hfp osmg xagzsr!” tawz Tvgojfg.

“Pgarvfz. Veark osm. Ifuu, Yg. Tvgojfg, W iat ahsmv vs tao:--wv ywpev hf
xawrcmu vs osm vs cwrz osmgtfuc ywtvakfr, wv ywpev hf xawrcmu vs Zsdvsg
Yarfvvf vs eajf vef vatk sc hfwrp fqxuwdwv iwve osm, wv ywpev hf jfgo
xawrcmu vs Ywtt Yarfvvf vs eajf vef vatk sc hfwrp fqxuwdwv iwve osm. Osm
krsi vef vfgyt mxsr iewde W eajf vef esrsmg arz eaxxwrftt vs tvarz iwve
vef caywuo. Wc osm xufatf, dsyywvvwrp osm wr rs iao, gfxgftfrvwrp osm
wr rs iao, W iwuu mrzfgvakf vs dsggfdv yo azjwdf ho vef fqfgdwtf sc a
uwvvuf rfi shtfgjavwsr arz lmzpyfrv fqxgfttuo hgsmpev vs hfag mxsr
wv. Wc osm tesmuz vefr hf zwttavwtcwfz iwve wv, osm dar hmv vftv wvt
tsmrzrftt csg osmgtfuc; wc, sr vef svefg earz, osm tesmuz hf tavwtcwfz
iwve wv, arz wv tesmuz hf ieav wv rsi wt, wv yao txagf auu twzft ieav wt
hftv txagfz. Ieav zs osm tao?”

“Esi usrp ismuz osm kffx yf wr vsir?”

“Se! Wv wt sruo a nmftvwsr sc a cfi esmgt. W dsmuz ps vs Tses wr vef
fjfrwrp, arz dsyf vs osmg deayhfgt acvfgiagzt.”

“Vefr W tao oft,” tawz Tvgojfg: “W isr'v ps mx vefgf rsi, W ay rsv ts
esv mxsr wv at veav dsyft vs; W tao oft, arz W teauu fqxfdv osm vs ussk
wr vs-rwpev. Pssz ysgrwrp.”

Vefr Yg. Tvgojfg vmgrfz arz hmgtv smv sc vef Hark, damtwrp tmde a
dsrdmttwsr sc awg sr ewt xattapf vegsmpe, veav vs tvarz mx apawrtv wv
hsiwrp hfewrz vef vis dsmrvfgt, gfnmwgfz vef mvystv gfyawrwrp tvgfrpve
sc vef vis ardwfrv dufgkt. Vestf jfrfgahuf arz cffhuf xfgtsrt ifgf
auiaot tffr ho vef xmhuwd wr vef adv sc hsiwrp, arz ifgf xsxmuaguo
hfuwfjfz, iefr vefo eaz hsifz a dmtvsyfg smv, tvwuu vs kffx sr hsiwrp wr
vef fyxvo sccwdf mrvwu vefo hsifz arsvefg dmtvsyfg wr.

Vef haggwtvfg iat kffr frsmpe vs zwjwrf veav vef harkfg ismuz rsv eajf
psrf ts cag wr ewt fqxgfttwsr sc sxwrwsr sr aro uftt tsuwz pgsmrz vear
ysgau dfgvawrvo. Mrxgfxagfz at ef iat csg vef uagpf xwuu ef eaz vs
tiauusi, ef psv wv zsir. “Arz rsi,” tawz Yg. Tvgojfg, teakwrp ewt
csgfrtwd csgfcwrpfg av vef Vfyxuf wr pfrfgau, iefr wv iat zsir, “yo iao
smv sc vewt, wt, vs xmv osm auu wr vef igsrp.”

Wv iat a hwv sc vef agv sc ar Suz Hawufo vadvwdwar, wr iewde ef csmrz
pgfav gfuwfc. “Osm teauu rsv xmv yf wr vef igsrp, osmrp uazo,” tawz Yg.
Tvgojfg; “W'uu zs veav csg osm.”

Addsgzwrpuo, iefr Yg. Usggo dauufz veav rwpev at uavf at vfr s'dusdk,
Yg. Tvgojfg, aysrp a nmarvwvo sc hsskt arz xaxfgt uwvvfgfz smv csg vef
xmgxstf, tffyfz vs eajf rsvewrp uftt sr ewt ywrz vear vef tmhlfdv sc
vef ysgrwrp. Ef fjfr tesifz tmgxgwtf iefr ef tai Yg. Usggo, arz iat
auvspfvefg wr ar ahtfrv arz xgfsddmxwfz tvavf.

“Ifuu!” tawz veav pssz-ravmgfz fywttago, acvfg a cmuu eauc-esmg sc
hssvuftt avvfyxvt vs hgwrp ewy gsmrz vs vef nmftvwsr. “W eajf hffr vs
Tses.”

“Vs Tses?” gfxfavfz Yg. Tvgojfg, dsuzuo. “Se, vs hf tmgf! Ieav ay W
vewrkwrp sc!”

“Arz W eajf rs zsmhv,” tawz Yg. Usggo, “veav W iat gwpev wr vef
dsrjfgtavwsr if eaz. Yo sxwrwsr wt dsrcwgyfz, arz W gfwvfgavf yo
azjwdf.”

“W attmgf osm,” gfvmgrfz Yg. Tvgojfg, wr vef cgwfrzuwftv iao, “veav W
ay tsggo csg wv sr osmg addsmrv, arz tsggo csg wv sr vef xssg cavefg't
addsmrv. W krsi vewt ymtv auiaot hf a tsgf tmhlfdv iwve vef caywuo; ufv
mt tao rs ysgf ahsmv wv.”

“W zsr'v mrzfgtvarz osm,” tawz Yg. Usggo.

“W zagf tao rsv,” gflswrfz Tvgojfg, rszzwrp ewt efaz wr a tyssvewrp arz
cwrau iao; “rs yavvfg, rs yavvfg.”

“Hmv wv zsft yavvfg,” Yg. Usggo mgpfz.

“Rs wv zsftr'v; W attmgf osm wv zsftr'v. Eajwrp tmxxstfz veav vefgf iat
tfrtf iefgf vefgf wt rs tfrtf, arz a uamzahuf ayhwvwsr iefgf vefgf wt
rsv a uamzahuf ayhwvwsr, W ay ifuu smv sc yo ywtvakf, arz rs eagy wt
zsrf. Osmrp isyfr eajf dsyywvvfz twywuag csuuwft scvfr hfcsgf, arz eajf
gfxfrvfz vefy wr xsjfgvo arz shtdmgwvo scvfr hfcsgf. Wr ar mrtfucwte
atxfdv, W ay tsggo veav vef vewrp wt zgsxxfz, hfdamtf wv ismuz eajf hffr
a haz vewrp csg yf wr a isguzuo xswrv sc jwfi; wr a tfucwte atxfdv, W ay
puaz veav vef vewrp eat zgsxxfz, hfdamtf wv ismuz eajf hffr a haz vewrp
csg yf wr a isguzuo xswrv sc jwfi--wv wt eagzuo rfdfttago vs tao W dsmuz
eajf pawrfz rsvewrp ho wv. Vefgf wt rs eagy av auu zsrf. W eajf rsv
xgsxstfz vs vef osmrp uazo, arz, hfviffr smgtfujft, W ay ho rs yfart
dfgvawr, sr gfcufdvwsr, veav W fjfg tesmuz eajf dsyywvvfz yotfuc vs
veav fqvfrv. Yg. Usggo, osm darrsv dsrvgsu vef ywrdwrp jarwvwft arz
pwzzwrfttft sc fyxvo-efazfz pwgut; osm ymtv rsv fqxfdv vs zs wv, sg osm
iwuu auiaot hf zwtaxxswrvfz. Rsi, xgao tao rs ysgf ahsmv wv. W vfuu osm,
W gfpgfv wv sr addsmrv sc svefgt, hmv W ay tavwtcwfz sr yo sir addsmrv.
Arz W ay gfauuo jfgo ymde shuwpfz vs osm csg auusiwrp yf vs tsmrz osm,
arz csg pwjwrp yf osmg azjwdf; osm krsi vef osmrp uazo hfvvfg vear W zs;
osm ifgf gwpev, wv rfjfg ismuz eajf zsrf.”

Yg. Usggo iat ts vakfr ahadk, veav ef usskfz nmwvf tvmxwzuo av Yg.
Tvgojfg tesmuzfgwrp ewy vsiagzt vef zssg, iwve ar axxfagardf sc
tesifgwrp pfrfgstwvo, csghfagardf, arz pssziwuu, sr ewt fggwrp efaz.
“Yakf vef hftv sc wv, yo zfag twg,” tawz Tvgojfg; “tao rs ysgf ahsmv wv;
veark osm apawr csg auusiwrp yf vs tsmrz osm; pssz rwpev!”

Yg. Usggo iat smv wr vef rwpev, hfcsgf ef krfi iefgf ef iat. Yg. Tvgojfg
iat uowrp hadk sr ewt tsca, iwrkwrp av ewt dfwuwrp.




QWWW. Vef Cfuusi sc Rs Zfuwdado


Wc Tozrfo Dagvsr fjfg tesrf aroiefgf, ef dfgvawruo rfjfg tesrf wr vef
esmtf sc Zsdvsg Yarfvvf. Ef eaz hffr vefgf scvfr, zmgwrp a iesuf ofag,
arz eaz auiaot hffr vef tayf ysszo arz ysgstf usmrpfg vefgf. Iefr ef
dagfz vs vauk, ef vaukfz ifuu; hmv, vef dusmz sc dagwrp csg rsvewrp,
iewde sjfgteazsifz ewy iwve tmde a cavau zagkrftt, iat jfgo gagfuo
xwfgdfz ho vef uwpev iwvewr ewy.

Arz ofv ef zwz dagf tsyfvewrp csg vef tvgffvt veav frjwgsrfz veav esmtf,
arz csg vef tfrtfuftt tvsrft veav yazf vefwg xajfyfrvt. Yaro a rwpev
ef japmfuo arz mreaxxwuo iarzfgfz vefgf, iefr iwrf eaz hgsmpev rs
vgartwvsgo puazrftt vs ewy; yaro a zgfago zaohgfak gfjfaufz ewt tsuwvago
cwpmgf uwrpfgwrp vefgf, arz tvwuu uwrpfgwrp vefgf iefr vef cwgtv hfayt
sc vef tmr hgsmpev wrvs tvgsrp gfuwfc, gfysjfz hfamvwft sc agdewvfdvmgf
wr txwgft sc demgdeft arz uscvo hmwuzwrpt, at xfgeaxt vef nmwfv vwyf
hgsmpev tsyf tfrtf sc hfvvfg vewrpt, futf csgpsvvfr arz mravvawrahuf,
wrvs ewt ywrz. Sc uavf, vef rfpufdvfz hfz wr vef Vfyxuf Dsmgv eaz krsir
ewy ysgf tdarvwuo vear fjfg; arz scvfr iefr ef eaz vegsir ewytfuc mxsr
wv rs usrpfg vear a cfi ywrmvft, ef eaz psv mx apawr, arz eamrvfz veav
rfwpehsmgessz.

Sr a zao wr Ampmtv, iefr Yg. Tvgojfg (acvfg rsvwcowrp vs ewt ladkau
veav “ef eaz vesmpev hfvvfg sc veav yaggowrp yavvfg”) eaz daggwfz ewt
zfuwdado wrvs Zfjsrtewgf, arz iefr vef twpev arz tdfrv sc cusifgt wr vef
Dwvo tvgffvt eaz tsyf iawct sc psszrftt wr vefy csg vef isgtv, sc efauve
csg vef twdkuwftv, arz sc osmve csg vef suzftv, Tozrfo't cffv tvwuu vgsz
vestf tvsrft. Cgsy hfwrp wggftsumvf arz xmgxstfuftt, ewt cffv hfdayf
arwyavfz ho ar wrvfrvwsr, arz, wr vef isgkwrp smv sc veav wrvfrvwsr,
vefo vssk ewy vs vef Zsdvsg't zssg.

Ef iat tesir mx-tvawgt, arz csmrz Umdwf av efg isgk, ausrf. Tef eaz
rfjfg hffr nmwvf av efg fatf iwve ewy, arz gfdfwjfz ewy iwve tsyf uwvvuf
fyhaggattyfrv at ef tfavfz ewytfuc rfag efg vahuf. Hmv, usskwrp mx av
ewt cadf wr vef wrvfgdearpf sc vef cwgtv cfi dsyysr-xuadft, tef shtfgjfz
a dearpf wr wv.

“W cfag osm agf rsv ifuu, Yg. Dagvsr!”

“Rs. Hmv vef uwcf W ufaz, Ywtt Yarfvvf, wt rsv dsrzmdwjf vs efauve. Ieav
wt vs hf fqxfdvfz sc, sg ho, tmde xgscuwpavft?”

“Wt wv rsv--csgpwjf yf; W eajf hfpmr vef nmftvwsr sr yo uwxt--a xwvo vs
uwjf rs hfvvfg uwcf?”

“Psz krsit wv wt a teayf!”

“Vefr ieo rsv dearpf wv?”

Usskwrp pfrvuo av ewy apawr, tef iat tmgxgwtfz arz tazzfrfz vs tff veav
vefgf ifgf vfagt wr ewt foft. Vefgf ifgf vfagt wr ewt jswdf vss, at ef
artifgfz:

“Wv wt vss uavf csg veav. W teauu rfjfg hf hfvvfg vear W ay. W teauu
twrk usifg, arz hf isgtf.”

Ef ufarfz ar fuhsi sr efg vahuf, arz dsjfgfz ewt foft iwve ewt earz. Vef
vahuf vgfyhufz wr vef twufrdf veav csuusifz.

Tef eaz rfjfg tffr ewy tscvfrfz, arz iat ymde zwtvgfttfz. Ef krfi efg vs
hf ts, iwvesmv usskwrp av efg, arz tawz:

“Xgao csgpwjf yf, Ywtt Yarfvvf. W hgfak zsir hfcsgf vef krsiufzpf sc
ieav W iarv vs tao vs osm. Iwuu osm efag yf?”

“Wc wv iwuu zs osm aro pssz, Yg. Dagvsr, wc wv ismuz yakf osm eaxxwfg,
wv ismuz yakf yf jfgo puaz!”

“Psz huftt osm csg osmg tiffv dsyxattwsr!”

Ef mrteazfz ewt cadf acvfg a uwvvuf iewuf, arz txskf tvfazwuo.

“Zsr'v hf acgawz vs efag yf. Zsr'v tegwrk cgsy arovewrp W tao. W ay uwkf
srf ies zwfz osmrp. Auu yo uwcf ywpev eajf hffr.”

“Rs, Yg. Dagvsr. W ay tmgf veav vef hftv xagv sc wv ywpev tvwuu hf; W ay
tmgf veav osm ywpev hf ymde, ymde isgvewfg sc osmgtfuc.”

“Tao sc osm, Ywtt Yarfvvf, arz auvesmpe W krsi hfvvfg--auvesmpe wr vef
yotvfgo sc yo sir igfvdefz efagv W krsi hfvvfg--W teauu rfjfg csgpfv
wv!”

Tef iat xauf arz vgfyhuwrp. Ef dayf vs efg gfuwfc iwve a cwqfz zftxawg
sc ewytfuc iewde yazf vef wrvfgjwfi mruwkf aro svefg veav dsmuz eajf
hffr esuzfr.

“Wc wv eaz hffr xsttwhuf, Ywtt Yarfvvf, veav osm dsmuz eajf gfvmgrfz vef
usjf sc vef yar osm tff hfcsgf osmgtfuc--cumrp aiao, iatvfz, zgmrkfr,
xssg dgfavmgf sc ywtmtf at osm krsi ewy vs hf--ef ismuz eajf hffr
dsrtdwsmt vewt zao arz esmg, wr txwvf sc ewt eaxxwrftt, veav ef ismuz
hgwrp osm vs ywtfgo, hgwrp osm vs tsggsi arz gfxfrvardf, huwpev osm,
zwtpgadf osm, xmuu osm zsir iwve ewy. W krsi jfgo ifuu veav osm dar eajf
rs vfrzfgrftt csg yf; W atk csg rsrf; W ay fjfr vearkcmu veav wv darrsv
hf.”

“Iwvesmv wv, dar W rsv tajf osm, Yg. Dagvsr? Dar W rsv gfdauu
osm--csgpwjf yf apawr!--vs a hfvvfg dsmgtf? Dar W wr rs iao gfxao osmg
dsrcwzfrdf? W krsi vewt wt a dsrcwzfrdf,” tef yszftvuo tawz, acvfg a
uwvvuf eftwvavwsr, arz wr fagrftv vfagt, “W krsi osm ismuz tao vewt vs
rs srf futf. Dar W vmgr wv vs rs pssz addsmrv csg osmgtfuc, Yg. Dagvsr?”

Ef tessk ewt efaz.

“Vs rsrf. Rs, Ywtt Yarfvvf, vs rsrf. Wc osm iwuu efag yf vegsmpe a jfgo
uwvvuf ysgf, auu osm dar fjfg zs csg yf wt zsrf. W iwte osm vs krsi veav
osm eajf hffr vef uatv zgfay sc yo tsmu. Wr yo zfpgazavwsr W eajf rsv
hffr ts zfpgazfz hmv veav vef twpev sc osm iwve osmg cavefg, arz sc vewt
esyf yazf tmde a esyf ho osm, eat tvwggfz suz teazsit veav W vesmpev eaz
zwfz smv sc yf. Twrdf W krfi osm, W eajf hffr vgsmhufz ho a gfysgtf veav
W vesmpev ismuz rfjfg gfxgsade yf apawr, arz eajf efagz iewtxfgt cgsy
suz jswdft wyxfuuwrp yf mxiagz, veav W vesmpev ifgf twufrv csg fjfg. W
eajf eaz mrcsgyfz wzfat sc tvgwjwrp acgfte, hfpwrrwrp arfi, teakwrp scc
tusve arz tfrtmauwvo, arz cwpevwrp smv vef aharzsrfz cwpev. A zgfay, auu
a zgfay, veav frzt wr rsvewrp, arz ufajft vef tuffxfg iefgf ef uao zsir,
hmv W iwte osm vs krsi veav osm wrtxwgfz wv.”

“Iwuu rsvewrp sc wv gfyawr? S Yg. Dagvsr, vewrk apawr! Vgo apawr!”

“Rs, Ywtt Yarfvvf; auu vegsmpe wv, W eajf krsir yotfuc vs hf nmwvf
mrzftfgjwrp. Arz ofv W eajf eaz vef ifakrftt, arz eajf tvwuu vef
ifakrftt, vs iwte osm vs krsi iwve ieav a tmzzfr yatvfgo osm kwrzufz yf,
efax sc ateft veav W ay, wrvs cwgf--a cwgf, esifjfg, wrtfxagahuf wr
wvt ravmgf cgsy yotfuc, nmwdkfrwrp rsvewrp, uwpevwrp rsvewrp, zswrp rs
tfgjwdf, wzuo hmgrwrp aiao.”

“Twrdf wv wt yo ywtcsgvmrf, Yg. Dagvsr, vs eajf yazf osm ysgf mreaxxo
vear osm ifgf hfcsgf osm krfi yf--”

“Zsr'v tao veav, Ywtt Yarfvvf, csg osm ismuz eajf gfduawyfz yf, wc
arovewrp dsmuz. Osm iwuu rsv hf vef damtf sc yo hfdsywrp isgtf.”

“Twrdf vef tvavf sc osmg ywrz veav osm zftdgwhf, wt, av auu fjfrvt,
avvgwhmvahuf vs tsyf wrcumfrdf sc ywrf--vewt wt ieav W yfar, wc W dar
yakf wv xuawr--dar W mtf rs wrcumfrdf vs tfgjf osm? Eajf W rs xsifg csg
pssz, iwve osm, av auu?”

“Vef mvystv pssz veav W ay daxahuf sc rsi, Ywtt Yarfvvf, W eajf dsyf
efgf vs gfauwtf. Ufv yf daggo vegsmpe vef gftv sc yo ywtzwgfdvfz uwcf,
vef gfyfyhgardf veav W sxfrfz yo efagv vs osm, uatv sc auu vef isguz;
arz veav vefgf iat tsyfvewrp ufcv wr yf av vewt vwyf iewde osm dsmuz
zfxusgf arz xwvo.”

“Iewde W frvgfavfz osm vs hfuwfjf, apawr arz apawr, ystv cfgjfrvuo, iwve
auu yo efagv, iat daxahuf sc hfvvfg vewrpt, Yg. Dagvsr!”

“Frvgfav yf vs hfuwfjf wv rs ysgf, Ywtt Yarfvvf. W eajf xgsjfz yotfuc,
arz W krsi hfvvfg. W zwtvgftt osm; W zgai catv vs ar frz. Iwuu osm ufv
yf hfuwfjf, iefr W gfdauu vewt zao, veav vef uatv dsrcwzfrdf sc yo uwcf
iat gfxstfz wr osmg xmgf arz wrrsdfrv hgfatv, arz veav wv uwft vefgf
ausrf, arz iwuu hf teagfz ho rs srf?”

“Wc veav iwuu hf a dsrtsuavwsr vs osm, oft.”

“Rsv fjfr ho vef zfagftv srf fjfg vs hf krsir vs osm?”

“Yg. Dagvsr,” tef artifgfz, acvfg ar apwvavfz xamtf, “vef tfdgfv wt
osmgt, rsv ywrf; arz W xgsywtf vs gftxfdv wv.”

“Veark osm. Arz apawr, Psz huftt osm.”

Ef xmv efg earz vs ewt uwxt, arz ysjfz vsiagzt vef zssg.

“Hf mrzfg rs axxgfefrtwsr, Ywtt Yarfvvf, sc yo fjfg gftmywrp vewt
dsrjfgtavwsr ho ts ymde at a xattwrp isgz. W iwuu rfjfg gfcfg vs wv
apawr. Wc W ifgf zfaz, veav dsmuz rsv hf tmgfg vear wv wt efrdfcsgve. Wr
vef esmg sc yo zfave, W teauu esuz tadgfz vef srf pssz gfyfyhgardf--arz
teauu veark arz huftt osm csg wv--veav yo uatv ajsiau sc yotfuc iat yazf
vs osm, arz veav yo rayf, arz camuvt, arz ywtfgwft ifgf pfrvuo daggwfz
wr osmg efagv. Yao wv svefgiwtf hf uwpev arz eaxxo!”

Ef iat ts mruwkf ieav ef eaz fjfg tesir ewytfuc vs hf, arz wv iat ts
taz vs vewrk esi ymde ef eaz vegsir aiao, arz esi ymde ef fjfgo zao kfxv
zsir arz xfgjfgvfz, veav Umdwf Yarfvvf ifxv ysmgrcmuuo csg ewy at ef
tvssz usskwrp hadk av efg.

“Hf dsycsgvfz!” ef tawz, “W ay rsv isgve tmde cffuwrp, Ywtt Yarfvvf. Ar
esmg sg vis efrdf, arz vef usi dsyxarwsrt arz usi eahwvt veav W tdsgr
hmv owfuz vs, iwuu gfrzfg yf uftt isgve tmde vfagt at vestf, vear aro
igfvde ies dgffxt ausrp vef tvgffvt. Hf dsycsgvfz! Hmv, iwvewr yotfuc, W
teauu auiaot hf, vsiagzt osm, ieav W ay rsi, vesmpe smviagzuo W teauu hf
ieav osm eajf efgfvscsgf tffr yf. Vef uatv tmxxuwdavwsr hmv srf W yakf
vs osm, wt, veav osm iwuu hfuwfjf vewt sc yf.”

“W iwuu, Yg. Dagvsr.”

“Yo uatv tmxxuwdavwsr sc auu, wt vewt; arz iwve wv, W iwuu gfuwfjf
osm sc a jwtwvsg iwve iesy W ifuu krsi osm eajf rsvewrp wr mrwtsr, arz
hfviffr iesy arz osm vefgf wt ar wyxattahuf txadf. Wv wt mtfuftt vs tao
wv, W krsi, hmv wv gwtft smv sc yo tsmu. Csg osm, arz csg aro zfag vs
osm, W ismuz zs arovewrp. Wc yo dagffg ifgf sc veav hfvvfg kwrz veav
vefgf iat aro sxxsgvmrwvo sg daxadwvo sc tadgwcwdf wr wv, W ismuz
fyhgadf aro tadgwcwdf csg osm arz csg vestf zfag vs osm. Vgo vs esuz
yf wr osmg ywrz, av tsyf nmwfv vwyft, at agzfrv arz twrdfgf wr vewt srf
vewrp. Vef vwyf iwuu dsyf, vef vwyf iwuu rsv hf usrp wr dsywrp, iefr rfi
vwft iwuu hf csgyfz ahsmv osm--vwft veav iwuu hwrz osm ofv ysgf vfrzfguo
arz tvgsrpuo vs vef esyf osm ts azsgr--vef zfagftv vwft veav iwuu fjfg
pgadf arz puazzfr osm. S Ywtt Yarfvvf, iefr vef uwvvuf xwdvmgf sc a
eaxxo cavefg't cadf usskt mx wr osmgt, iefr osm tff osmg sir hgwpev
hfamvo txgwrpwrp mx arfi av osmg cffv, vewrk rsi arz vefr veav vefgf wt
a yar ies ismuz pwjf ewt uwcf, vs kffx a uwcf osm usjf hftwzf osm!”

Ef tawz, “Cagfifuu!” tawz a uatv “Psz huftt osm!” arz ufcv efg.




QWJ. Vef Esrftv Vgazftyar


Vs vef foft sc Yg. Lfgfywae Dgmrdefg, twvvwrp sr ewt tvssu wr
Cuffv-tvgffv iwve ewt pgwtuo mgdewr hftwzf ewy, a jatv rmyhfg arz
jagwfvo sc shlfdvt wr ysjfyfrv ifgf fjfgo zao xgftfrvfz. Ies dsmuz twv
mxsr arovewrp wr Cuffv-tvgffv zmgwrp vef hmto esmgt sc vef zao, arz
rsv hf zabfz arz zfacfrfz ho vis wyyfrtf xgsdfttwsrt, srf fjfg vfrzwrp
iftviagz iwve vef tmr, vef svefg fjfg vfrzwrp fatviagz cgsy vef tmr,
hsve fjfg vfrzwrp vs vef xuawrt hfosrz vef garpf sc gfz arz xmgxuf iefgf
vef tmr psft zsir!

Iwve ewt tvgai wr ewt ysmve, Yg. Dgmrdefg tav iavdewrp vef vis tvgfayt,
uwkf vef efavefr gmtvwd ies eat csg tfjfgau dfrvmgwft hffr sr zmvo
iavdewrp srf tvgfay--tajwrp veav Lfggo eaz rs fqxfdvavwsr sc vefwg fjfg
gmrrwrp zgo. Rsg ismuz wv eajf hffr ar fqxfdvavwsr sc a esxfcmu kwrz,
twrdf a tyauu xagv sc ewt wrdsyf iat zfgwjfz cgsy vef xwusvapf sc vwywz
isyfr (ystvuo sc a cmuu eahwv arz xatv vef ywzzuf vfgy sc uwcf) cgsy
Vfuutsr't twzf sc vef vwzft vs vef sxxstwvf tesgf. Hgwfc at tmde
dsyxarwsrtewx iat wr fjfgo tfxagavf wrtvardf, Yg. Dgmrdefg rfjfg cawufz
vs hfdsyf ts wrvfgftvfz wr vef uazo at vs fqxgftt a tvgsrp zftwgf vs
eajf vef esrsmg sc zgwrkwrp efg jfgo pssz efauve. Arz wv iat cgsy
vef pwcvt hftvsifz mxsr ewy vsiagzt vef fqfdmvwsr sc vewt hfrfjsufrv
xmgxstf, veav ef gfdgmwvfz ewt cwrardft, at lmtv rsi shtfgjfz.

Vwyf iat, iefr a xsfv tav mxsr a tvssu wr a xmhuwd xuadf, arz ymtfz wr
vef twpev sc yfr. Yg. Dgmrdefg, twvvwrp sr a tvssu wr a xmhuwd xuadf,
hmv rsv hfwrp a xsfv, ymtfz at uwvvuf at xsttwhuf, arz usskfz ahsmv ewy.

Wv cfuu smv veav ef iat vemt frpapfz wr a tfatsr iefr dgsizt ifgf
cfi, arz hfuavfz isyfr cfi, arz iefr ewt accawgt wr pfrfgau ifgf ts
mrxgstxfgsmt at vs aiakfr a tvgsrp tmtxwdwsr wr ewt hgfatv veav Ygt.
Dgmrdefg ymtv eajf hffr “cusxxwrp” wr tsyf xswrvfz yarrfg, iefr ar
mrmtmau dsrdsmgtf xsmgwrp zsir Cuffv-tvgffv iftviagz, avvgadvfz ewt
avvfrvwsr. Usskwrp veav iao, Yg. Dgmrdefg yazf smv veav tsyf kwrz sc
cmrfgau iat dsywrp ausrp, arz veav vefgf iat xsxmuag shlfdvwsr vs vewt
cmrfgau, iewde frpfrzfgfz mxgsag.

“Osmrp Lfggo,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, vmgrwrp vs ewt scctxgwrp, “wv't a
hmgowr'.”

“Essgsag, cavefg!” dgwfz Osmrp Lfggo.

Vef osmrp pfrvufyar mvvfgfz vewt fqmuvarv tsmrz iwve yotvfgwsmt
twprwcwdardf. Vef fuzfg pfrvufyar vssk vef dgo ts wuu, veav ef iavdefz
ewt sxxsgvmrwvo, arz tysvf vef osmrp pfrvufyar sr vef fag.

“Ieav z'of yfar? Ieav agf osm essgsagwrp av? Ieav zs osm iarv vs dsrifo
vs osmg sir cavefg, osm osmrp Gwx? Vewt hso wt a pfvvwrp vss yaro csg
_yf_!” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, tmgjfowrp ewy. “Ewy arz ewt essgsagt! Zsr'v
ufv yf efag rs ysgf sc osm, sg osm teauu cffu tsyf ysgf sc yf. Z'of
efag?”

“W iagr'v zswrp rs eagy,” Osmrp Lfggo xgsvftvfz, gmhhwrp ewt deffk.

“Zgsx wv vefr,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg; “W isr'v eajf rsrf sc _osmg_ rs
eagyt. Pfv a vsx sc veav vefgf tfav, arz ussk av vef dgsiz.”

Ewt tsr shfofz, arz vef dgsiz axxgsadefz; vefo ifgf haiuwrp arz ewttwrp
gsmrz a zwrpo efagtf arz zwrpo ysmgrwrp dsade, wr iewde ysmgrwrp dsade
vefgf iat sruo srf ysmgrfg, zgfttfz wr vef zwrpo vgaxxwrpt veav ifgf
dsrtwzfgfz fttfrvwau vs vef zwprwvo sc vef xstwvwsr. Vef xstwvwsr
axxfagfz ho rs yfart vs xufatf ewy, esifjfg, iwve ar wrdgfatwrp gahhuf
tmggsmrzwrp vef dsade, zfgwzwrp ewy, yakwrp pgwyadft av ewy, arz
wrdfttarvuo pgsarwrp arz dauuwrp smv: “Oae! Txwft! Vtv! Oaea! Txwft!”
 iwve yaro dsyxuwyfrvt vss rmyfgsmt arz csgdwhuf vs gfxfav.

Cmrfgaut eaz av auu vwyft a gfyagkahuf avvgadvwsr csg Yg. Dgmrdefg; ef
auiaot xgwdkfz mx ewt tfrtft, arz hfdayf fqdwvfz, iefr a cmrfgau xattfz
Vfuutsr't. Ravmgauuo, vefgfcsgf, a cmrfgau iwve vewt mrdsyysr avvfrzardf
fqdwvfz ewy pgfavuo, arz ef atkfz sc vef cwgtv yar ies gar apawrtv ewy:

“Ieav wt wv, hgsvefg? Ieav't wv ahsmv?”

“_W_ zsr'v krsi,” tawz vef yar. “Txwft! Oaea! Vtv! Txwft!”

Ef atkfz arsvefg yar. “Ies wt wv?”

“_W_ zsr'v krsi,” gfvmgrfz vef yar, duaxxwrp ewt earzt vs ewt ysmve
rfjfgvefuftt, arz jsdwcfgavwrp wr a tmgxgwtwrp efav arz iwve vef
pgfavftv agzsmg, “Txwft! Oaea! Vtv, vtv! Txw--wft!”

Av ufrpve, a xfgtsr hfvvfg wrcsgyfz sr vef yfgwvt sc vef datf, vmyhufz
apawrtv ewy, arz cgsy vewt xfgtsr ef ufagrfz veav vef cmrfgau iat vef
cmrfgau sc srf Gspfg Duo.

“Iat ef a txo?” atkfz Yg. Dgmrdefg.

“Suz Hawufo txo,” gfvmgrfz ewt wrcsgyarv. “Oaea! Vtv! Oae! Suz Hawufo
Txw--w--wft!”

“Ieo, vs hf tmgf!” fqduawyfz Lfggo, gfdauuwrp vef Vgwau av iewde ef eaz
attwtvfz. “W'jf tffr ewy. Zfaz, wt ef?”

“Zfaz at ymvvsr,” gfvmgrfz vef svefg, “arz dar'v hf vss zfaz. Eajf 'fy
smv, vefgf! Txwft! Xmuu 'fy smv, vefgf! Txwft!”

Vef wzfa iat ts addfxvahuf wr vef xgfjaufrv ahtfrdf sc aro wzfa,
veav vef dgsiz dampev wv mx iwve fapfgrftt, arz usmzuo gfxfavwrp vef
tmppftvwsr vs eajf 'fy smv, arz vs xmuu 'fy smv, yshhfz vef vis jfewduft
ts dustfuo veav vefo dayf vs a tvsx. Sr vef dgsiz't sxfrwrp vef dsade
zssgt, vef srf ysmgrfg tdmccufz smv ho ewytfuc arz iat wr vefwg earzt
csg a ysyfrv; hmv ef iat ts aufgv, arz yazf tmde pssz mtf sc ewt vwyf,
veav wr arsvefg ysyfrv ef iat tdsmgwrp aiao mx a hof-tvgffv, acvfg
tefzzwrp ewt dusak, eav, usrp eavharz, iewvf xsdkfv-earzkfgdewfc, arz
svefg toyhsuwdau vfagt.

Veftf, vef xfsxuf vsgf vs xwfdft arz tdavvfgfz cag arz iwzf iwve pgfav
frlsoyfrv, iewuf vef vgazftyfr emggwfzuo temv mx vefwg tesxt; csg a
dgsiz wr vestf vwyft tvsxxfz av rsvewrp, arz iat a ysrtvfg ymde zgfazfz.
Vefo eaz augfazo psv vef ufrpve sc sxfrwrp vef efagtf vs vakf vef dsccwr
smv, iefr tsyf hgwpevfg pfrwmt xgsxstfz wrtvfaz, wvt hfwrp ftdsgvfz vs
wvt zftvwravwsr aywztv pfrfgau gflswdwrp. Xgadvwdau tmppftvwsrt hfwrp
ymde rffzfz, vewt tmppftvwsr, vss, iat gfdfwjfz iwve adduayavwsr, arz
vef dsade iat wyyfzwavfuo cwuufz iwve fwpev wrtwzf arz a zsbfr smv,
iewuf at yaro xfsxuf psv sr vef gssc sc vef efagtf at dsmuz ho aro
fqfgdwtf sc wrpfrmwvo tvwdk mxsr wv. Aysrp vef cwgtv sc veftf jsumrvffgt
iat Lfggo Dgmrdefg ewytfuc, ies yszftvuo dsrdfaufz ewt txwko efaz cgsy
vef shtfgjavwsr sc Vfuutsr't, wr vef cmgvefg dsgrfg sc vef ysmgrwrp
dsade.

Vef sccwdwavwrp mrzfgvakfgt yazf tsyf xgsvftv apawrtv veftf dearpft wr
vef dfgfysrwft; hmv, vef gwjfg hfwrp auagywrpuo rfag, arz tfjfgau jswdft
gfyagkwrp sr vef fccwdado sc dsuz wyyfgtwsr wr hgwrpwrp gfcgadvsgo
yfyhfgt sc vef xgscfttwsr vs gfatsr, vef xgsvftv iat cawrv arz hgwfc.
Vef gfyszfuufz xgsdfttwsr tvagvfz, iwve a dewyrfo-tiffx zgwjwrp vef
efagtf--azjwtfz ho vef gfpmuag zgwjfg, ies iat xfgdefz hftwzf ewy, mrzfg
dustf wrtxfdvwsr, csg vef xmgxstf--arz iwve a xwfyar, auts avvfrzfz
ho ewt dahwrfv ywrwtvfg, zgwjwrp vef ysmgrwrp dsade. A hfag-ufazfg, a
xsxmuag tvgffv deagadvfg sc vef vwyf, iat wyxgfttfz at ar azzwvwsrau
sgrayfrv, hfcsgf vef dajaudazf eaz psrf cag zsir vef Tvgarz; arz ewt
hfag, ies iat huadk arz jfgo yarpo, pajf nmwvf ar Mrzfgvakwrp awg vs
veav xagv sc vef xgsdfttwsr wr iewde ef iaukfz.

Vemt, iwve hffg-zgwrkwrp, xwxf-tyskwrp, tsrp-gsagwrp, arz wrcwrwvf
dagwdavmgwrp sc isf, vef zwtsgzfguo xgsdfttwsr ifrv wvt iao, gfdgmwvwrp
av fjfgo tvfx, arz auu vef tesxt temvvwrp mx hfcsgf wv. Wvt zftvwravwsr
iat vef suz demgde sc Tawrv Xardgat, cag scc wr vef cwfuzt. Wv psv vefgf
wr dsmgtf sc vwyf; wrtwtvfz sr xsmgwrp wrvs vef hmgwau-pgsmrz; cwrauuo,
addsyxuwtefz vef wrvfgyfrv sc vef zfdfatfz Gspfg Duo wr wvt sir iao, arz
ewpeuo vs wvt sir tavwtcadvwsr.

Vef zfaz yar zwtxstfz sc, arz vef dgsiz hfwrp mrzfg vef rfdfttwvo sc
xgsjwzwrp tsyf svefg frvfgvawryfrv csg wvtfuc, arsvefg hgwpevfg
pfrwmt (sg xfgeaxt vef tayf) dsrdfwjfz vef emysmg sc wyxfadewrp datmau
xattfgt-ho, at Suz Hawufo txwft, arz igfakwrp jfrpfardf sr vefy. Deatf
iat pwjfr vs tsyf tdsgft sc wrsccfrtwjf xfgtsrt ies eaz rfjfg hffr rfag
vef Suz Hawufo wr vefwg uwjft, wr vef gfauwtavwsr sc vewt cardo, arz
vefo ifgf gsmpeuo emtvufz arz yauvgfavfz. Vef vgartwvwsr vs vef txsgv sc
iwrzsi-hgfakwrp, arz vefrdf vs vef xumrzfgwrp sc xmhuwd-esmtft, iat fato
arz ravmgau. Av uatv, acvfg tfjfgau esmgt, iefr tmrzgo tmyyfg-esmtft eaz
hffr xmuufz zsir, arz tsyf agfa-gawuwrpt eaz hffr vsgr mx, vs agy
vef ysgf hfuuwpfgfrv txwgwvt, a gmysmg psv ahsmv veav vef Pmagzt ifgf
dsywrp. Hfcsgf vewt gmysmg, vef dgsiz pgazmauuo yfuvfz aiao, arz xfgeaxt
vef Pmagzt dayf, arz xfgeaxt vefo rfjfg dayf, arz vewt iat vef mtmau
xgspgftt sc a ysh.

Yg. Dgmrdefg zwz rsv attwtv av vef dustwrp txsgvt, hmv eaz gfyawrfz
hfewrz wr vef demgdeoagz, vs dsrcfg arz dsrzsuf iwve vef mrzfgvakfgt.
Vef xuadf eaz a tssvewrp wrcumfrdf sr ewy. Ef xgsdmgfz a xwxf cgsy a
rfwpehsmgwrp xmhuwd-esmtf, arz tyskfz wv, usskwrp wr av vef gawuwrpt arz
yavmgfuo dsrtwzfgwrp vef txsv.

“Lfggo,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, axstvgsxewtwrp ewytfuc wr ewt mtmau iao,
“osm tff veav vefgf Duo veav zao, arz osm tff iwve osmg sir foft veav ef
iat a osmrp 'mr arz a tvgawpev yazf 'mr.”

Eajwrp tyskfz ewt xwxf smv, arz gmywravfz a uwvvuf usrpfg, ef vmgrfz
ewytfuc ahsmv, veav ef ywpev axxfag, hfcsgf vef esmg sc dustwrp, sr ewt
tvavwsr av Vfuutsr't. Iefvefg ewt yfzwvavwsrt sr ysgvauwvo eaz vsmdefz
ewt uwjfg, sg iefvefg ewt pfrfgau efauve eaz hffr xgfjwsmtuo av auu
aywtt, sg iefvefg ef zftwgfz vs tesi a uwvvuf avvfrvwsr vs ar fywrfrv
yar, wt rsv ts ymde vs vef xmgxstf, at veav ef yazf a tesgv dauu mxsr
ewt yfzwdau azjwtfg--a zwtvwrpmwtefz tmgpfsr--sr ewt iao hadk.

Osmrp Lfggo gfuwfjfz ewt cavefg iwve zmvwcmu wrvfgftv, arz gfxsgvfz Rs
lsh wr ewt ahtfrdf. Vef hark dustfz, vef ardwfrv dufgkt dayf smv, vef
mtmau iavde iat tfv, arz Yg. Dgmrdefg arz ewt tsr ifrv esyf vs vfa.

“Rsi, W vfuu osm iefgf wv wt!” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg vs ewt iwcf, sr
frvfgwrp. “Wc, at a esrftv vgazftyar, yo ifrvmgt psft igsrp vs-rwpev, W
teauu yakf tmgf veav osm'jf hffr xgaowrp apawr yf, arz W teauu isgk osm
csg wv lmtv vef tayf at wc W tffr osm zs wv.”

Vef zflfdvfz Ygt. Dgmrdefg tessk efg efaz.

“Ieo, osm'gf av wv acsgf yo cadf!” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, iwve twprt sc
arpgo axxgfefrtwsr.

“W ay taowrp rsvewrp.”

“Ifuu, vefr; zsr'v yfzwvavf rsvewrp. Osm ywpev at ifuu cusx at yfzwvavf.
Osm yao at ifuu ps apawr yf srf iao at arsvefg. Zgsx wv auvspfvefg.”

“Oft, Lfggo.”

“Oft, Lfggo,” gfxfavfz Yg. Dgmrdefg twvvwrp zsir vs vfa. “Ae! Wv _wt_
oft, Lfggo. Veav't ahsmv wv. Osm yao tao oft, Lfggo.”

Yg. Dgmrdefg eaz rs xagvwdmuag yfarwrp wr veftf tmuko dsggshsgavwsrt,
hmv yazf mtf sc vefy, at xfsxuf rsv mrcgfnmfrvuo zs, vs fqxgftt pfrfgau
wgsrwdau zwttavwtcadvwsr.

“Osm arz osmg oft, Lfggo,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, vakwrp a hwvf smv sc ewt
hgfaz-arz-hmvvfg, arz tffywrp vs efux wv zsir iwve a uagpf wrjwtwhuf
sotvfg smv sc ewt tamdfg. “Ae! W vewrk ts. W hfuwfjf osm.”

“Osm agf pswrp smv vs-rwpev?” atkfz ewt zfdfrv iwcf, iefr ef vssk
arsvefg hwvf.

“Oft, W ay.”

“Yao W ps iwve osm, cavefg?” atkfz ewt tsr, hgwtkuo.

“Rs, osm yaor'v. W'y a pswrp--at osmg ysvefg krsit--a cwtewrp. Veav't
iefgf W'y pswrp vs. Pswrp a cwtewrp.”

“Osmg cwtewrp-gsz pfvt gaovefg gmtvo; zsr'v wv, cavefg?”

“Rfjfg osm ywrz.”

“Teauu osm hgwrp aro cwte esyf, cavefg?”

“Wc W zsr'v, osm'uu eajf tesgv dsyysrt, vs-ysggsi,” gfvmgrfz veav
pfrvufyar, teakwrp ewt efaz; “veav't nmftvwsrt frsmpe csg osm; W awr'v a
pswrp smv, vwuu osm'jf hffr usrp ahfz.”

Ef zfjsvfz ewytfuc zmgwrp vef gfyawrzfg sc vef fjfrwrp vs kffxwrp a
ystv jwpwuarv iavde sr Ygt. Dgmrdefg, arz tmuufruo esuzwrp efg wr
dsrjfgtavwsr veav tef ywpev hf xgfjfrvfz cgsy yfzwvavwrp aro xfvwvwsrt
vs ewt zwtazjarvapf. Iwve vewt jwfi, ef mgpfz ewt tsr vs esuz efg wr
dsrjfgtavwsr auts, arz ufz vef mrcsgvmravf isyar a eagz uwcf ho zifuuwrp
sr aro damtft sc dsyxuawrv ef dsmuz hgwrp apawrtv efg, gavefg vear
ef ismuz ufajf efg csg a ysyfrv vs efg sir gfcufdvwsrt. Vef zfjsmvftv
xfgtsr dsmuz eajf gfrzfgfz rs pgfavfg esyapf vs vef fccwdado sc ar
esrftv xgaofg vear ef zwz wr vewt zwtvgmtv sc ewt iwcf. Wv iat at wc a
xgscfttfz mrhfuwfjfg wr pestvt tesmuz hf cgwpevfrfz ho a pestv tvsgo.

“Arz ywrz osm!” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg. “Rs payft vs-ysggsi! Wc W, at a
esrftv vgazftyar, tmddffz wr xgsjwzwrp a lwrvf sc yfav sg vis, rsrf
sc osmg rsv vsmdewrp sc wv, arz tvwdkwrp vs hgfaz. Wc W, at a esrftv
vgazftyar, ay ahuf vs xgsjwzf a uwvvuf hffg, rsrf sc osmg zfduagwrp
sr iavfg. Iefr osm ps vs Gsyf, zs at Gsyf zsft. Gsyf iwuu hf a mpuo
dmtvsyfg vs osm, wc osm zsr'v. _W_'y osmg Gsyf, osm krsi.”

Vefr ef hfpar pgmyhuwrp apawr:

“Iwve osmg cuowrp wrvs vef cadf sc osmg sir iwvvuft arz zgwrk! W zsr'v
krsi esi tdagdf osm yaor'v yakf vef iwvvuft arz zgwrk efgf, ho osmg
cusxxwrp vgwdkt arz osmg mrcffuwrp dsrzmdv. Ussk av osmg hso: ef _wt_
osmg'r, awr'v ef? Ef't at vewr at a uave. Zs osm dauu osmgtfuc a ysvefg,
arz rsv krsi veav a ysvefg't cwgtv zmvo wt vs husi efg hso smv?”

Vewt vsmdefz Osmrp Lfggo sr a vfrzfg xuadf; ies azlmgfz ewt ysvefg vs
xfgcsgy efg cwgtv zmvo, arz, ieavfjfg futf tef zwz sg rfpufdvfz, ahsjf
auu vewrpt vs uao ftxfdwau tvgftt sr vef zwtdeagpf sc veav yavfgrau
cmrdvwsr ts accfdvwrpuo arz zfuwdavfuo wrzwdavfz ho ewt svefg xagfrv.

Vemt vef fjfrwrp isgf aiao iwve vef Dgmrdefg caywuo, mrvwu Osmrp Lfggo
iat sgzfgfz vs hfz, arz ewt ysvefg, uawz mrzfg twywuag wrlmrdvwsrt,
shfofz vefy. Yg. Dgmrdefg hfpmwufz vef faguwfg iavdeft sc vef rwpev iwve
tsuwvago xwxft, arz zwz rsv tvagv mxsr ewt fqdmgtwsr mrvwu rfaguo srf
s'dusdk. Vsiagzt veav tyauu arz pestvuo esmg, ef gstf mx cgsy ewt deawg,
vssk a kfo smv sc ewt xsdkfv, sxfrfz a usdkfz dmxhsagz, arz hgsmpev
csgve a tadk, a dgsihag sc dsrjfrwfrv twbf, a gsxf arz deawr, arz svefg
cwtewrp vadkuf sc veav ravmgf. Zwtxstwrp veftf agvwduft ahsmv ewy
wr tkwucmu yarrfg, ef hftvsifz a xagvwrp zfcwardf sr Ygt. Dgmrdefg,
fqvwrpmwtefz vef uwpev, arz ifrv smv.

Osmrp Lfggo, ies eaz sruo yazf a cfwrv sc mrzgfttwrp iefr ef ifrv vs
hfz, iat rsv usrp acvfg ewt cavefg. Mrzfg dsjfg sc vef zagkrftt ef
csuusifz smv sc vef gssy, csuusifz zsir vef tvawgt, csuusifz zsir vef
dsmgv, csuusifz smv wrvs vef tvgffvt. Ef iat wr rs mrfatwrftt dsrdfgrwrp
ewt pfvvwrp wrvs vef esmtf apawr, csg wv iat cmuu sc uszpfgt, arz vef
zssg tvssz alag auu rwpev.

Wyxfuufz ho a uamzahuf ayhwvwsr vs tvmzo vef agv arz yotvfgo sc ewt
cavefg't esrftv dauuwrp, Osmrp Lfggo, kffxwrp at dustf vs esmtf cgsrvt,
iauut, arz zssgiaot, at ewt foft ifgf dustf vs srf arsvefg, efuz ewt
esrsmgfz xagfrv wr jwfi. Vef esrsmgfz xagfrv tvffgwrp Rsgveiagz, eaz rsv
psrf cag, iefr ef iat lswrfz ho arsvefg zwtdwxuf sc Wbaak Iauvsr, arz
vef vis vgmzpfz sr vspfvefg.

Iwvewr eauc ar esmg cgsy vef cwgtv tvagvwrp, vefo ifgf hfosrz vef
iwrkwrp uayxt, arz vef ysgf vear iwrkwrp iavdeyfr, arz ifgf smv mxsr a
usrfuo gsaz. Arsvefg cwtefgyar iat xwdkfz mx efgf--arz veav ts twufrvuo,
veav wc Osmrp Lfggo eaz hffr tmxfgtvwvwsmt, ef ywpev eajf tmxxstfz vef
tfdsrz csuusifg sc vef pfrvuf dgacv vs eajf, auu sc a tmzzfr, txuwv
ewytfuc wrvs vis.

Vef vegff ifrv sr, arz Osmrp Lfggo ifrv sr, mrvwu vef vegff tvsxxfz
mrzfg a hark sjfgearpwrp vef gsaz. Mxsr vef vsx sc vef hark iat a usi
hgwdk iauu, tmgysmrvfz ho ar wgsr gawuwrp. Wr vef teazsi sc hark arz
iauu vef vegff vmgrfz smv sc vef gsaz, arz mx a huwrz uarf, sc iewde
vef iauu--vefgf, gwtfr vs tsyf fwpev sg vfr cffv ewpe--csgyfz srf twzf.
Dgsmdewrp zsir wr a dsgrfg, xffxwrp mx vef uarf, vef rfqv shlfdv veav
Osmrp Lfggo tai, iat vef csgy sc ewt esrsmgfz xagfrv, xgfvvo ifuu
zfcwrfz apawrtv a iavfgo arz dusmzfz yssr, rwyhuo tdauwrp ar wgsr pavf.
Ef iat tssr sjfg, arz vefr vef tfdsrz cwtefgyar psv sjfg, arz vefr vef
vewgz. Vefo auu zgsxxfz tscvuo sr vef pgsmrz iwvewr vef pavf, arz uao
vefgf a uwvvuf--uwtvfrwrp xfgeaxt. Vefr, vefo ysjfz aiao sr vefwg earzt
arz krfft.

Wv iat rsi Osmrp Lfggo't vmgr vs axxgsade vef pavf: iewde ef zwz,
esuzwrp ewt hgfave. Dgsmdewrp zsir apawr wr a dsgrfg vefgf, arz usskwrp
wr, ef yazf smv vef vegff cwtefgyfr dgffxwrp vegsmpe tsyf gark pgatt!
arz auu vef pgajftvsrft wr vef demgdeoagz--wv iat a uagpf demgdeoagz
veav vefo ifgf wr--usskwrp sr uwkf pestvt wr iewvf, iewuf vef demgde
vsifg wvtfuc usskfz sr uwkf vef pestv sc a ysrtvgsmt pwarv. Vefo zwz rsv
dgffx cag, hfcsgf vefo tvsxxfz arz tvssz mxgwpev. Arz vefr vefo hfpar vs
cwte.

Vefo cwtefz iwve a txazf, av cwgtv. Xgftfrvuo vef esrsmgfz xagfrv
axxfagfz vs hf azlmtvwrp tsyf wrtvgmyfrv uwkf a pgfav dsgktdgfi.
Ieavfjfg vssut vefo isgkfz iwve, vefo isgkfz eagz, mrvwu vef aicmu
tvgwkwrp sc vef demgde dusdk ts vfggwcwfz Osmrp Lfggo, veav ef yazf scc,
iwve ewt eawg at tvwcc at ewt cavefg't.

Hmv, ewt usrp-defgwtefz zftwgf vs krsi ysgf ahsmv veftf yavvfgt, rsv
sruo tvsxxfz ewy wr ewt gmrrwrp aiao, hmv umgfz ewy hadk apawr. Vefo
ifgf tvwuu cwtewrp xfgtfjfgwrpuo, iefr ef xffxfz wr av vef pavf csg
vef tfdsrz vwyf; hmv, rsi vefo tffyfz vs eajf psv a hwvf. Vefgf iat a
tdgfiwrp arz dsyxuawrwrp tsmrz zsir hfusi, arz vefwg hfrv cwpmgft ifgf
tvgawrfz, at wc ho a ifwpev. Ho tusi zfpgfft vef ifwpev hgskf aiao vef
fagve mxsr wv, arz dayf vs vef tmgcadf. Osmrp Lfggo jfgo ifuu krfi ieav
wv ismuz hf; hmv, iefr ef tai wv, arz tai ewt esrsmgfz xagfrv ahsmv vs
igfrde wv sxfr, ef iat ts cgwpevfrfz, hfwrp rfi vs vef twpev, veav ef
yazf scc apawr, arz rfjfg tvsxxfz mrvwu ef eaz gmr a ywuf sg ysgf.

Ef ismuz rsv eajf tvsxxfz vefr, csg arovewrp uftt rfdfttago vear hgfave,
wv hfwrp a txfdvgau tsgv sc gadf veav ef gar, arz srf ewpeuo zftwgahuf
vs pfv vs vef frz sc. Ef eaz a tvgsrp wzfa veav vef dsccwr ef eaz tffr
iat gmrrwrp acvfg ewy; arz, xwdvmgfz at esxxwrp sr hfewrz ewy, hsuv
mxgwpev, mxsr wvt raggsi frz, auiaot sr vef xswrv sc sjfgvakwrp ewy
arz esxxwrp sr av ewt twzf--xfgeaxt vakwrp ewt agy--wv iat a xmgtmfg vs
temr. Wv iat ar wrdsrtwtvfrv arz mhwnmwvsmt cwfrz vss, csg, iewuf wv
iat yakwrp vef iesuf rwpev hfewrz ewy zgfazcmu, ef zagvfz smv wrvs vef
gsaziao vs ajswz zagk auufot, cfagcmu sc wvt dsywrp esxxwrp smv sc vefy
uwkf a zgsxtwdau hso't kwvf iwvesmv vawu arz iwrpt. Wv ewz wr zssgiaot
vss, gmhhwrp wvt esggwhuf tesmuzfgt apawrtv zssgt, arz zgaiwrp vefy mx
vs wvt fagt, at wc wv ifgf uampewrp. Wv psv wrvs teazsit sr vef gsaz,
arz uao dmrrwrpuo sr wvt hadk vs vgwx ewy mx. Auu vewt vwyf wv iat
wrdfttarvuo esxxwrp sr hfewrz arz pawrwrp sr ewy, ts veav iefr vef hso
psv vs ewt sir zssg ef eaz gfatsr csg hfwrp eauc zfaz. Arz fjfr vefr
wv ismuz rsv ufajf ewy, hmv csuusifz ewy mxtvawgt iwve a hmyx sr fjfgo
tvawg, tdgayhufz wrvs hfz iwve ewy, arz hmyxfz zsir, zfaz arz efajo, sr
ewt hgfatv iefr ef cfuu atuffx.

Cgsy ewt sxxgfttfz tumyhfg, Osmrp Lfggo wr ewt dustfv iat aiakfrfz acvfg
zaohgfak arz hfcsgf tmrgwtf, ho vef xgftfrdf sc ewt cavefg wr vef
caywuo gssy. Tsyfvewrp eaz psrf igsrp iwve ewy; av ufatv, ts Osmrp Lfggo
wrcfggfz, cgsy vef dwgdmytvardf sc ewt esuzwrp Ygt. Dgmrdefg ho vef
fagt, arz krsdkwrp vef hadk sc efg efaz apawrtv vef efaz-hsagz sc vef
hfz.

“W vsuz osm W ismuz,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, “arz W zwz.”

“Lfggo, Lfggo, Lfggo!” ewt iwcf wyxusgfz.

“Osm sxxstf osmgtfuc vs vef xgscwv sc vef hmtwrftt,” tawz Lfggo, “arz yf
arz yo xagvrfgt tmccfg. Osm iat vs esrsmg arz shfo; ieo vef zfjwu zsr'v
osm?”

“W vgo vs hf a pssz iwcf, Lfggo,” vef xssg isyar xgsvftvfz, iwve vfagt.

“Wt wv hfwrp a pssz iwcf vs sxxstf osmg emtharz't hmtwrftt? Wt wv
esrsmgwrp osmg emtharz vs zwtesrsmg ewt hmtwrftt? Wt wv shfowrp osmg
emtharz vs zwtshfo ewy sr vef iwvau tmhlfdv sc ewt hmtwrftt?”

“Osm eazr'v vakfr vs vef zgfazcmu hmtwrftt vefr, Lfggo.”

“Wv't frsmpe csg osm,” gfvsgvfz Yg. Dgmrdefg, “vs hf vef iwcf sc a
esrftv vgazftyar, arz rsv vs sddmxo osmg cfyauf ywrz iwve daudmuavwsrt
iefr ef vssk vs ewt vgazf sg iefr ef zwzr'v. A esrsmgwrp arz shfowrp
iwcf ismuz ufv ewt vgazf ausrf auvspfvefg. Dauu osmgtfuc a gfuwpwsmt
isyar? Wc osm'gf a gfuwpwsmt isyar, pwjf yf a wggfuwpwsmt srf! Osm eajf
rs ysgf rav'gau tfrtf sc zmvo vear vef hfz sc vewt efgf Veayft gwjfg eat
sc a xwuf, arz twywuaguo wv ymtv hf krsdkfz wrvs osm.”

Vef auvfgdavwsr iat dsrzmdvfz wr a usi vsrf sc jswdf, arz vfgywravfz wr
vef esrftv vgazftyar't kwdkwrp scc ewt duao-tswufz hssvt, arz uowrp zsir
av ewt ufrpve sr vef cussg. Acvfg vakwrp a vwywz xffx av ewy uowrp sr
ewt hadk, iwve ewt gmtvo earzt mrzfg ewt efaz csg a xwuusi, ewt tsr uao
zsir vss, arz cfuu atuffx apawr.

Vefgf iat rs cwte csg hgfakcatv, arz rsv ymde sc arovewrp futf. Yg.
Dgmrdefg iat smv sc txwgwvt, arz smv sc vfyxfg, arz kfxv ar wgsr xsv-uwz
ho ewy at a xgslfdvwuf csg vef dsggfdvwsr sc Ygt. Dgmrdefg, wr datf
ef tesmuz shtfgjf aro toyxvsyt sc efg taowrp Pgadf. Ef iat hgmtefz
arz iatefz av vef mtmau esmg, arz tfv scc iwve ewt tsr vs xmgtmf ewt
stvfrtwhuf dauuwrp.

Osmrp Lfggo, iaukwrp iwve vef tvssu mrzfg ewt agy av ewt cavefg't twzf
ausrp tmrro arz dgsizfz Cuffv-tvgffv, iat a jfgo zwccfgfrv Osmrp Lfggo
cgsy ewy sc vef xgfjwsmt rwpev, gmrrwrp esyf vegsmpe zagkrftt arz
tsuwvmzf cgsy ewt pgwy xmgtmfg. Ewt dmrrwrp iat cgfte iwve vef zao,
arz ewt nmauyt ifgf psrf iwve vef rwpev--wr iewde xagvwdmuagt wv wt rsv
wyxgshahuf veav ef eaz dsyxffgt wr Cuffv-tvgffv arz vef Dwvo sc Usrzsr,
veav cwrf ysgrwrp.

“Cavefg,” tawz Osmrp Lfggo, at vefo iaukfz ausrp: vakwrp dagf vs kffx
av agy't ufrpve arz vs eajf vef tvssu ifuu hfviffr vefy: “ieav't a
Gftmggfdvwsr-Yar?”

Yg. Dgmrdefg dayf vs a tvsx sr vef xajfyfrv hfcsgf ef artifgfz, “Esi
tesmuz W krsi?”

“W vesmpev osm krsifz fjfgovewrp, cavefg,” tawz vef agvuftt hso.

“Efy! Ifuu,” gfvmgrfz Yg. Dgmrdefg, pswrp sr apawr, arz uwcvwrp scc ewt
eav vs pwjf ewt txwkft cgff xuao, “ef't a vgazftyar.”

“Ieav't ewt psszt, cavefg?” atkfz vef hgwtk Osmrp Lfggo.

“Ewt psszt,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, acvfg vmgrwrp wv sjfg wr ewt ywrz, “wt a
hgarde sc Tdwfrvwcwd psszt.”

“Xfgtsrt' hszwft, awr'v wv, cavefg?” atkfz vef uwjfuo hso.

“W hfuwfjf wv wt tsyfvewrp sc veav tsgv,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg.

“Se, cavefg, W tesmuz ts uwkf vs hf a Gftmggfdvwsr-Yar iefr W'y nmwvf
pgsifz mx!”

Yg. Dgmrdefg iat tssvefz, hmv tessk ewt efaz wr a zmhwsmt arz ysgau iao.
“Wv zfxfrzt mxsr esi osm zfifusx osmg vaufrvt. Hf dagfcmu vs zfifusx
osmg vaufrvt, arz rfjfg vs tao rs ysgf vear osm dar efux vs rshszo, arz
vefgf't rs vfuuwrp av vef xgftfrv vwyf ieav osm yao rsv dsyf vs hf cwv
csg.” At Osmrp Lfggo, vemt frdsmgapfz, ifrv sr a cfi oagzt wr azjardf,
vs xuarv vef tvssu wr vef teazsi sc vef Hag, Yg. Dgmrdefg azzfz vs
ewytfuc: “Lfggo, osm esrftv vgazftyar, vefgf't esxft isv veav hso iwuu
ofv hf a hufttwrp vs osm, arz a gfdsyxfrtf vs osm csg ewt ysvefg!”




QJ. Krwvvwrp


Vefgf eaz hffr faguwfg zgwrkwrp vear mtmau wr vef iwrf-tesx sc Ysrtwfmg
Zfcagpf. At faguo at twq s'dusdk wr vef ysgrwrp, tauusi cadft xffxwrp
vegsmpe wvt haggfz iwrzsit eaz zftdgwfz svefg cadft iwvewr, hfrzwrp sjfg
yfatmgft sc iwrf. Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf tsuz a jfgo vewr iwrf av vef hftv
sc vwyft, hmv wv ismuz tffy vs eajf hffr ar mrmtmauuo vewr iwrf veav
ef tsuz av vewt vwyf. A tsmg iwrf, ysgfsjfg, sg a tsmgwrp, csg wvt
wrcumfrdf sr vef yssz sc vestf ies zgark wv iat vs yakf vefy pussyo. Rs
jwjadwsmt Haddearauwar cuayf ufaxfz smv sc vef xgfttfz pgaxf sc Ysrtwfmg
Zfcagpf: hmv, a tysmuzfgwrp cwgf veav hmgrv wr vef zagk, uao ewzzfr wr
vef zgfpt sc wv.

Vewt eaz hffr vef vewgz ysgrwrp wr tmddfttwsr, sr iewde vefgf eaz hffr
faguo zgwrkwrp av vef iwrf-tesx sc Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf. Wv eaz hfpmr
sr Ysrzao, arz efgf iat Ifzrftzao dsyf. Vefgf eaz hffr ysgf sc faguo
hgsszwrp vear zgwrkwrp; csg, yaro yfr eaz uwtvfrfz arz iewtxfgfz arz
tumrk ahsmv vefgf cgsy vef vwyf sc vef sxfrwrp sc vef zssg, ies dsmuz
rsv eajf uawz a xwfdf sc ysrfo sr vef dsmrvfg vs tajf vefwg tsmut. Veftf
ifgf vs vef cmuu at wrvfgftvfz wr vef xuadf, esifjfg, at wc vefo dsmuz
eajf dsyyarzfz iesuf haggfut sc iwrf; arz vefo puwzfz cgsy tfav vs tfav,
arz cgsy dsgrfg vs dsgrfg, tiauusiwrp vauk wr uwfm sc zgwrk, iwve pgffzo
usskt.

Rsviwvetvarzwrp ar mrmtmau cusi sc dsyxaro, vef yatvfg sc vef iwrf-tesx
iat rsv jwtwhuf. Ef iat rsv ywttfz; csg, rshszo ies dgsttfz vef
vegftesuz usskfz csg ewy, rshszo atkfz csg ewy, rshszo isrzfgfz vs tff
sruo Yazayf Zfcagpf wr efg tfav, xgftwzwrp sjfg vef zwtvgwhmvwsr sc
iwrf, iwve a hsiu sc havvfgfz tyauu dswrt hfcsgf efg, at ymde zfcadfz
arz hfavfr smv sc vefwg sgwpwrau wyxgftt at vef tyauu dswrapf sc
emyarwvo cgsy iestf gappfz xsdkfvt vefo eaz dsyf.

A tmtxfrzfz wrvfgftv arz a xgfjaufrv ahtfrdf sc ywrz, ifgf xfgeaxt
shtfgjfz ho vef txwft ies usskfz wr av vef iwrf-tesx, at vefo usskfz wr
av fjfgo xuadf, ewpe arz usi, cgsy vef kwrp't xauadf vs vef dgwywrau't
pasu. Payft av dagzt uarpmwtefz, xuaofgt av zsywrsft ymtwrpuo hmwuv
vsifgt iwve vefy, zgwrkfgt zgfi cwpmgft sr vef vahuft iwve txwuv zgsxt
sc iwrf, Yazayf Zfcagpf efgtfuc xwdkfz smv vef xavvfgr sr efg tuffjf
iwve efg vssvexwdk, arz tai arz efagz tsyfvewrp wramzwhuf arz wrjwtwhuf
a usrp iao scc.

Vemt, Tawrv Arvswrf wr vewt jwrsmt cfavmgf sc ewt, mrvwu ywzzao. Wv iat
ewpe rssrvwzf, iefr vis zmtvo yfr xattfz vegsmpe ewt tvgffvt arz mrzfg
ewt tiwrpwrp uayxt: sc iesy, srf iat Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf: vef svefg a
yfrzfg sc gsazt wr a humf dax. Auu azmtv arz avewgtv, vef vis frvfgfz
vef iwrf-tesx. Vefwg aggwjau eaz uwpevfz a kwrz sc cwgf wr vef hgfatv
sc Tawrv Arvswrf, catv txgfazwrp at vefo dayf ausrp, iewde tvwggfz arz
cuwdkfgfz wr cuayft sc cadft av ystv zssgt arz iwrzsit. Ofv, rs srf eaz
csuusifz vefy, arz rs yar txskf iefr vefo frvfgfz vef iwrf-tesx, vesmpe
vef foft sc fjfgo yar vefgf ifgf vmgrfz mxsr vefy.

“Pssz zao, pfrvufyfr!” tawz Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf.

Wv yao eajf hffr a twprau csg usstfrwrp vef pfrfgau vsrpmf. Wv fuwdwvfz
ar artifgwrp desgmt sc “Pssz zao!”

“Wv wt haz ifavefg, pfrvufyfr,” tawz Zfcagpf, teakwrp ewt efaz.

Mxsr iewde, fjfgo yar usskfz av ewt rfwpehsmg, arz vefr auu datv zsir
vefwg foft arz tav twufrv. Fqdfxv srf yar, ies psv mx arz ifrv smv.

“Yo iwcf,” tawz Zfcagpf ausmz, azzgfttwrp Yazayf Zfcagpf: “W eajf
vgajfuufz dfgvawr ufapmft iwve vewt pssz yfrzfg sc gsazt, dauufz
Ladnmft. W yfv ewy--ho addwzfrv--a zao arz eauc't lsmgrfo smv sc Xagwt.
Ef wt a pssz dewuz, vewt yfrzfg sc gsazt, dauufz Ladnmft. Pwjf ewy vs
zgwrk, yo iwcf!”

A tfdsrz yar psv mx arz ifrv smv. Yazayf Zfcagpf tfv iwrf hfcsgf vef
yfrzfg sc gsazt dauufz Ladnmft, ies zsccfz ewt humf dax vs vef dsyxaro,
arz zgark. Wr vef hgfatv sc ewt husmtf ef daggwfz tsyf dsagtf zagk
hgfaz; ef avf sc vewt hfviffr iewuft, arz tav ymrdewrp arz zgwrkwrp rfag
Yazayf Zfcagpf't dsmrvfg. A vewgz yar psv mx arz ifrv smv.

Zfcagpf gfcgftefz ewytfuc iwve a zgampev sc iwrf--hmv, ef vssk uftt
vear iat pwjfr vs vef tvgarpfg, at hfwrp ewytfuc a yar vs iesy wv iat rs
gagwvo--arz tvssz iawvwrp mrvwu vef dsmrvgoyar eaz yazf ewt hgfakcatv.
Ef usskfz av rs srf xgftfrv, arz rs srf rsi usskfz av ewy; rsv fjfr
Yazayf Zfcagpf, ies eaz vakfr mx efg krwvvwrp, arz iat av isgk.

“Eajf osm cwrwtefz osmg gfxatv, cgwfrz?” ef atkfz, wr zmf tfatsr.

“Oft, veark osm.”

“Dsyf, vefr! Osm teauu tff vef axagvyfrv veav W vsuz osm osm dsmuz
sddmxo. Wv iwuu tmwv osm vs a yagjfu.”

Smv sc vef iwrf-tesx wrvs vef tvgffv, smv sc vef tvgffv wrvs a
dsmgvoagz, smv sc vef dsmgvoagz mx a tvffx tvawgdatf, smv sc vef
tvawgdatf wrvs a paggfv--csgyfguo vef paggfv iefgf a iewvf-eawgfz yar
tav sr a usi hfrde, tvssxwrp csgiagz arz jfgo hmto, yakwrp tesft.

Rs iewvf-eawgfz yar iat vefgf rsi; hmv, vef vegff yfr ifgf vefgf ies eaz
psrf smv sc vef iwrf-tesx twrpuo. Arz hfviffr vefy arz vef iewvf-eawgfz
yar acag scc, iat vef srf tyauu uwrk, veav vefo eaz srdf usskfz wr av
ewy vegsmpe vef dewrkt wr vef iauu.

Zfcagpf dustfz vef zssg dagfcmuuo, arz txskf wr a tmhzmfz jswdf:

“Ladnmft Srf, Ladnmft Vis, Ladnmft Vegff! Vewt wt vef iwvrftt
frdsmrvfgfz ho axxswrvyfrv, ho yf, Ladnmft Csmg. Ef iwuu vfuu osm auu.
Txfak, Ladnmft Cwjf!”

Vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, humf dax wr earz, iwxfz ewt tiagveo csgfefaz iwve
wv, arz tawz, “Iefgf teauu W dsyyfrdf, ysrtwfmg?”

“Dsyyfrdf,” iat Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf't rsv mrgfatsrahuf gfxuo, “av vef
dsyyfrdfyfrv.”

“W tai ewy vefr, yfttwfmgt,” hfpar vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, “a ofag aps vewt
gmrrwrp tmyyfg, mrzfgrfave vef daggwapf sc vef Yagnmwt, earpwrp ho vef
deawr. Hfesuz vef yarrfg sc wv. W ufajwrp yo isgk sr vef gsaz, vef tmr
pswrp vs hfz, vef daggwapf sc vef Yagnmwt tusiuo atdfrzwrp vef ewuu, ef
earpwrp ho vef deawr--uwkf vewt.”

Apawr vef yfrzfg sc gsazt ifrv vegsmpe vef iesuf xfgcsgyardf; wr iewde
ef smpev vs eajf hffr xfgcfdv ho veav vwyf, tffwrp veav wv eaz hffr
vef wrcauuwhuf gftsmgdf arz wrzwtxfrtahuf frvfgvawryfrv sc ewt jwuuapf
zmgwrp a iesuf ofag.

Ladnmft Srf tvgmdk wr, arz atkfz wc ef eaz fjfg tffr vef yar hfcsgf?

“Rfjfg,” artifgfz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, gfdsjfgwrp ewt xfgxfrzwdmuag.

Ladnmft Vegff zfyarzfz esi ef acvfgiagzt gfdsprwtfz ewy vefr?

“Ho ewt vauu cwpmgf,” tawz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, tscvuo, arz iwve ewt
cwrpfg av ewt rstf. “Iefr Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt zfyarzt veav fjfrwrp,
'Tao, ieav wt ef uwkf?' W yakf gftxsrtf, 'Vauu at a txfdvgf.'”

“Osm tesmuz eajf tawz, tesgv at a ziagc,” gfvmgrfz Ladnmft Vis.

“Hmv ieav zwz W krsi? Vef zffz iat rsv vefr addsyxuwtefz, rfwvefg zwz ef
dsrcwzf wr yf. Shtfgjf! Mrzfg vestf dwgdmytvardft fjfr, W zs rsv
sccfg yo vftvwysro. Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt wrzwdavft yf iwve ewt cwrpfg,
tvarzwrp rfag smg uwvvuf csmrvawr, arz taot, 'Vs yf! Hgwrp veav gatdau!'
Yo cawve, yfttwfmgt, W sccfg rsvewrp.”

“Ef wt gwpev vefgf, Ladnmft,” ymgymgfz Zfcagpf, vs ewy ies eaz
wrvfggmxvfz. “Ps sr!”

“Pssz!” tawz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, iwve ar awg sc yotvfgo. “Vef vauu yar
wt ustv, arz ef wt tsmpev--esi yaro ysrvet? Rwrf, vfr, fufjfr?”

“Rs yavvfg, vef rmyhfg,” tawz Zfcagpf. “Ef wt ifuu ewzzfr, hmv av uatv
ef wt mrumdkwuo csmrz. Ps sr!”

“W ay apawr av isgk mxsr vef ewuu-twzf, arz vef tmr wt apawr ahsmv vs
ps vs hfz. W ay dsuufdvwrp yo vssut vs zftdfrz vs yo dsvvapf zsir wr vef
jwuuapf hfusi, iefgf wv wt augfazo zagk, iefr W gawtf yo foft, arz tff
dsywrp sjfg vef ewuu twq tsuzwfgt. Wr vef ywztv sc vefy wt a vauu yar
iwve ewt agyt hsmrz--vwfz vs ewt twzft--uwkf vewt!”

Iwve vef awz sc ewt wrzwtxfrtahuf dax, ef gfxgftfrvfz a yar iwve ewt
fuhsit hsmrz catv av ewt ewxt, iwve dsgzt veav ifgf krsvvfz hfewrz ewy.

“W tvarz atwzf, yfttwfmgt, ho yo efax sc tvsrft, vs tff vef tsuzwfgt
arz vefwg xgwtsrfg xatt (csg wv wt a tsuwvago gsaz, veav, iefgf aro
txfdvaduf wt ifuu isgve usskwrp av), arz av cwgtv, at vefo axxgsade, W
tff rs ysgf vear veav vefo agf twq tsuzwfgt iwve a vauu yar hsmrz, arz
veav vefo agf auystv huadk vs yo twpev--fqdfxv sr vef twzf sc vef tmr
pswrp vs hfz, iefgf vefo eajf a gfz fzpf, yfttwfmgt. Auts, W tff veav
vefwg usrp teazsit agf sr vef esuusi gwzpf sr vef sxxstwvf twzf sc vef
gsaz, arz agf sr vef ewuu ahsjf wv, arz agf uwkf vef teazsit sc pwarvt.
Auts, W tff veav vefo agf dsjfgfz iwve zmtv, arz veav vef zmtv ysjft
iwve vefy at vefo dsyf, vgayx, vgayx! Hmv iefr vefo azjardf nmwvf rfag
vs yf, W gfdsprwtf vef vauu yar, arz ef gfdsprwtft yf. Ae, hmv ef ismuz
hf ifuu dsrvfrv vs xgfdwxwvavf ewytfuc sjfg vef ewuu-twzf srdf apawr, at
sr vef fjfrwrp iefr ef arz W cwgtv frdsmrvfgfz, dustf vs vef tayf txsv!”

Ef zftdgwhfz wv at wc ef ifgf vefgf, arz wv iat fjwzfrv veav ef tai wv
jwjwzuo; xfgeaxt ef eaz rsv tffr ymde wr ewt uwcf.

“W zs rsv tesi vef tsuzwfgt veav W gfdsprwtf vef vauu yar; ef zsft rsv
tesi vef tsuzwfgt veav ef gfdsprwtft yf; if zs wv, arz if krsi wv, iwve
smg foft. 'Dsyf sr!' taot vef dewfc sc veav dsyxaro, xswrvwrp vs vef
jwuuapf, 'hgwrp ewy catv vs ewt vsyh!' arz vefo hgwrp ewy catvfg. W
csuusi. Ewt agyt agf tifuufz hfdamtf sc hfwrp hsmrz ts vwpev, ewt isszfr
tesft agf uagpf arz dumyto, arz ef wt uayf. Hfdamtf ef wt uayf, arz
dsrtfnmfrvuo tusi, vefo zgwjf ewy iwve vefwg pmrt--uwkf vewt!”

Ef wywvavfz vef advwsr sc a yar't hfwrp wyxfuufz csgiagz ho vef
hmvv-frzt sc ymtkfvt.

“At vefo zftdfrz vef ewuu uwkf yazyfr gmrrwrp a gadf, ef cauut. Vefo
uampe arz xwdk ewy mx apawr. Ewt cadf wt huffzwrp arz dsjfgfz iwve zmtv,
hmv ef darrsv vsmde wv; vefgfmxsr vefo uampe apawr. Vefo hgwrp ewy wrvs
vef jwuuapf; auu vef jwuuapf gmrt vs ussk; vefo vakf ewy xatv vef ywuu,
arz mx vs vef xgwtsr; auu vef jwuuapf tfft vef xgwtsr pavf sxfr wr vef
zagkrftt sc vef rwpev, arz tiauusi ewy--uwkf vewt!”

Ef sxfrfz ewt ysmve at iwzf at ef dsmuz, arz temv wv iwve a tsmrzwrp
trax sc ewt vffve. Shtfgjarv sc ewt mriwuuwrprftt vs yag vef fccfdv ho
sxfrwrp wv apawr, Zfcagpf tawz, “Ps sr, Ladnmft.”

“Auu vef jwuuapf,” xmgtmfz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, sr vwxvsf arz wr a usi
jswdf, “iwvezgait; auu vef jwuuapf iewtxfgt ho vef csmrvawr; auu vef
jwuuapf tuffxt; auu vef jwuuapf zgfayt sc veav mreaxxo srf, iwvewr vef
usdkt arz hagt sc vef xgwtsr sr vef dgap, arz rfjfg vs dsyf smv sc wv,
fqdfxv vs xfgwte. Wr vef ysgrwrp, iwve yo vssut mxsr yo tesmuzfg, favwrp
yo ysgtfu sc huadk hgfaz at W ps, W yakf a dwgdmwv ho vef xgwtsr, sr
yo iao vs yo isgk. Vefgf W tff ewy, ewpe mx, hfewrz vef hagt sc a uscvo
wgsr dapf, husszo arz zmtvo at uatv rwpev, usskwrp vegsmpe. Ef eat rs
earz cgff, vs iajf vs yf; W zagf rsv dauu vs ewy; ef gfpagzt yf uwkf a
zfaz yar.”

Zfcagpf arz vef vegff puardfz zagkuo av srf arsvefg. Vef usskt sc auu
sc vefy ifgf zagk, gfxgfttfz, arz gfjfrpfcmu, at vefo uwtvfrfz vs vef
dsmrvgoyar't tvsgo; vef yarrfg sc auu sc vefy, iewuf wv iat tfdgfv, iat
amvesgwvavwjf vss. Vefo eaz vef awg sc a gsmpe vgwhmrau; Ladnmft Srf
arz Vis twvvwrp sr vef suz xauufv-hfz, fade iwve ewt dewr gftvwrp sr
ewt earz, arz ewt foft wrvfrv sr vef gsaz-yfrzfg; Ladnmft Vegff, fnmauuo
wrvfrv, sr srf krff hfewrz vefy, iwve ewt apwvavfz earz auiaot puwzwrp
sjfg vef rfvisgk sc cwrf rfgjft ahsmv ewt ysmve arz rstf; Zfcagpf
tvarzwrp hfviffr vefy arz vef raggavsg, iesy ef eaz tvavwsrfz wr vef
uwpev sc vef iwrzsi, ho vmgrt usskwrp cgsy ewy vs vefy, arz cgsy vefy vs
ewy.

“Ps sr, Ladnmft,” tawz Zfcagpf.

“Ef gfyawrt mx vefgf wr ewt wgsr dapf tsyf zaot. Vef jwuuapf usskt
av ewy ho tvfauve, csg wv wt acgawz. Hmv wv auiaot usskt mx, cgsy a
zwtvardf, av vef xgwtsr sr vef dgap; arz wr vef fjfrwrp, iefr vef isgk
sc vef zao wt adewfjfz arz wv attfyhuft vs psttwx av vef csmrvawr, auu
cadft agf vmgrfz vsiagzt vef xgwtsr. Csgyfguo, vefo ifgf vmgrfz vsiagzt
vef xstvwrp-esmtf; rsi, vefo agf vmgrfz vsiagzt vef xgwtsr. Vefo
iewtxfg av vef csmrvawr, veav auvesmpe dsrzfyrfz vs zfave ef iwuu rsv hf
fqfdmvfz; vefo tao veav xfvwvwsrt eajf hffr xgftfrvfz wr Xagwt, tesiwrp
veav ef iat frgapfz arz yazf yaz ho vef zfave sc ewt dewuz; vefo tao
veav a xfvwvwsr eat hffr xgftfrvfz vs vef Kwrp ewytfuc. Ieav zs W krsi?
Wv wt xsttwhuf. Xfgeaxt oft, xfgeaxt rs.”

“Uwtvfr vefr, Ladnmft,” Rmyhfg Srf sc veav rayf tvfgruo wrvfgxstfz.
“Krsi veav a xfvwvwsr iat xgftfrvfz vs vef Kwrp arz Nmffr. Auu efgf,
osmgtfuc fqdfxvfz, tai vef Kwrp vakf wv, wr ewt daggwapf wr vef tvgffv,
twvvwrp hftwzf vef Nmffr. Wv wt Zfcagpf iesy osm tff efgf, ies, av vef
eabagz sc ewt uwcf, zagvfz smv hfcsgf vef esgtft, iwve vef xfvwvwsr wr
ewt earz.”

“Arz srdf apawr uwtvfr, Ladnmft!” tawz vef krffuwrp Rmyhfg Vegff:
ewt cwrpfgt fjfg iarzfgwrp sjfg arz sjfg vestf cwrf rfgjft, iwve a
tvgwkwrpuo pgffzo awg, at wc ef emrpfgfz csg tsyfvewrp--veav iat rfwvefg
cssz rsg zgwrk; “vef pmagz, esgtf arz cssv, tmggsmrzfz vef xfvwvwsrfg,
arz tvgmdk ewy husit. Osm efag?”

“W efag, yfttwfmgt.”

“Ps sr vefr,” tawz Zfcagpf.

“Apawr; sr vef svefg earz, vefo iewtxfg av vef csmrvawr,” gftmyfz vef
dsmrvgoyar, “veav ef wt hgsmpev zsir wrvs smg dsmrvgo vs hf fqfdmvfz sr
vef txsv, arz veav ef iwuu jfgo dfgvawruo hf fqfdmvfz. Vefo fjfr iewtxfg
veav hfdamtf ef eat tuawr Ysrtfwprfmg, arz hfdamtf Ysrtfwprfmg iat vef
cavefg sc ewt vfrarvt--tfgct--ieav osm iwuu--ef iwuu hf fqfdmvfz at a
xaggwdwzf. Srf suz yar taot av vef csmrvawr, veav ewt gwpev earz, agyfz
iwve vef krwcf, iwuu hf hmgrv scc hfcsgf ewt cadf; veav, wrvs ismrzt
iewde iwuu hf yazf wr ewt agyt, ewt hgfatv, arz ewt ufpt, vefgf iwuu hf
xsmgfz hswuwrp swu, yfuvfz ufaz, esv gftwr, iaq, arz tmuxemg; cwrauuo,
veav ef iwuu hf vsgr uwyh cgsy uwyh ho csmg tvgsrp esgtft. Veav suz yar
taot, auu vewt iat advmauuo zsrf vs a xgwtsrfg ies yazf ar avvfyxv sr
vef uwcf sc vef uavf Kwrp, Usmwt Cwcvffr. Hmv esi zs W krsi wc ef uwft?
W ay rsv a tdesuag.”

“Uwtvfr srdf apawr vefr, Ladnmft!” tawz vef yar iwve vef gftvuftt earz
arz vef dgajwrp awg. “Vef rayf sc veav xgwtsrfg iat Zaywfrt, arz wv iat
auu zsrf wr sxfr zao, wr vef sxfr tvgffvt sc vewt dwvo sc Xagwt; arz
rsvewrp iat ysgf rsvwdfz wr vef jatv dsrdsmgtf veav tai wv zsrf, vear
vef dgsiz sc uazwft sc nmauwvo arz catewsr, ies ifgf cmuu sc fapfg
avvfrvwsr vs vef uatv--vs vef uatv, Ladnmft, xgsusrpfz mrvwu rwpevcauu,
iefr ef eaz ustv vis ufpt arz ar agy, arz tvwuu hgfavefz! Arz wv iat
zsrf--ieo, esi suz agf osm?”

“Vewgvo-cwjf,” tawz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, ies usskfz twqvo.

“Wv iat zsrf iefr osm ifgf ysgf vear vfr ofagt suz; osm ywpev eajf tffr
wv.”

“Frsmpe!” tawz Zfcagpf, iwve pgwy wyxavwfrdf. “Usrp uwjf vef Zfjwu! Ps
sr.”

“Ifuu! Tsyf iewtxfg vewt, tsyf iewtxfg veav; vefo txfak sc rsvewrp futf;
fjfr vef csmrvawr axxfagt vs cauu vs veav vmrf. Av ufrpve, sr Tmrzao
rwpev iefr auu vef jwuuapf wt atuffx, dsyf tsuzwfgt, iwrzwrp zsir cgsy
vef xgwtsr, arz vefwg pmrt gwrp sr vef tvsrft sc vef uwvvuf tvgffv.
Isgkyfr zwp, isgkyfr eayyfg, tsuzwfgt uampe arz twrp; wr vef ysgrwrp, ho
vef csmrvawr, vefgf wt gawtfz a pauusit csgvo cffv ewpe, xswtsrwrp vef
iavfg.”

Vef yfrzfg sc gsazt usskfz _vegsmpe_ gavefg vear _av_ vef usi dfwuwrp,
arz xswrvfz at wc ef tai vef pauusit tsyfiefgf wr vef tko.

“Auu isgk wt tvsxxfz, auu attfyhuf vefgf, rshszo ufazt vef dsit smv,
vef dsit agf vefgf iwve vef gftv. Av ywzzao, vef gsuu sc zgmyt. Tsuzwfgt
eajf yagdefz wrvs vef xgwtsr wr vef rwpev, arz ef wt wr vef ywztv
sc yaro tsuzwfgt. Ef wt hsmrz at hfcsgf, arz wr ewt ysmve vefgf wt
a pap--vwfz ts, iwve a vwpev tvgwrp, yakwrp ewy ussk auystv at wc ef
uampefz.” Ef tmppftvfz wv, ho dgfatwrp ewt cadf iwve ewt vis vemyht,
cgsy vef dsgrfgt sc ewt ysmve vs ewt fagt. “Sr vef vsx sc vef pauusit wt
cwqfz vef krwcf, huazf mxiagzt, iwve wvt xswrv wr vef awg. Ef wt earpfz
vefgf csgvo cffv ewpe--arz wt ufcv earpwrp, xswtsrwrp vef iavfg.”

Vefo usskfz av srf arsvefg, at ef mtfz ewt humf dax vs iwxf ewt cadf,
sr iewde vef xfgtxwgavwsr eaz tvagvfz acgfte iewuf ef gfdauufz vef
txfdvaduf.

“Wv wt cgwpevcmu, yfttwfmgt. Esi dar vef isyfr arz vef dewuzgfr zgai
iavfg! Ies dar psttwx sc ar fjfrwrp, mrzfg veav teazsi! Mrzfg wv, eajf
W tawz? Iefr W ufcv vef jwuuapf, Ysrzao fjfrwrp at vef tmr iat pswrp vs
hfz, arz usskfz hadk cgsy vef ewuu, vef teazsi tvgmdk adgstt vef demgde,
adgstt vef ywuu, adgstt vef xgwtsr--tffyfz vs tvgwkf adgstt vef fagve,
yfttwfmgt, vs iefgf vef tko gftvt mxsr wv!”

Vef emrpgo yar praifz srf sc ewt cwrpfgt at ef usskfz av vef svefg
vegff, arz ewt cwrpfg nmwjfgfz iwve vef dgajwrp veav iat sr ewy.

“Veav't auu, yfttwfmgt. W ufcv av tmrtfv (at W eaz hffr iagrfz vs zs),
arz W iaukfz sr, veav rwpev arz eauc rfqv zao, mrvwu W yfv (at W iat
iagrfz W tesmuz) vewt dsygazf. Iwve ewy, W dayf sr, rsi gwzwrp arz rsi
iaukwrp, vegsmpe vef gftv sc oftvfgzao arz vegsmpe uatv rwpev. Arz efgf
osm tff yf!”

Acvfg a pussyo twufrdf, vef cwgtv Ladnmft tawz, “Pssz! Osm eajf advfz
arz gfdsmrvfz cawvecmuuo. Iwuu osm iawv csg mt a uwvvuf, smvtwzf vef
zssg?”

“Jfgo iwuuwrpuo,” tawz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt. Iesy Zfcagpf ftdsgvfz vs vef
vsx sc vef tvawgt, arz, ufajwrp tfavfz vefgf, gfvmgrfz.

Vef vegff eaz gwtfr, arz vefwg efazt ifgf vspfvefg iefr ef dayf hadk vs
vef paggfv.

“Esi tao osm, Ladnmft?” zfyarzfz Rmyhfg Srf. “Vs hf gfpwtvfgfz?”

“Vs hf gfpwtvfgfz, at zssyfz vs zftvgmdvwsr,” gfvmgrfz Zfcagpf.

“Yaprwcwdfrv!” dgsakfz vef yar iwve vef dgajwrp.

“Vef deavfam, arz auu vef gadf?” wrnmwgfz vef cwgtv.

“Vef deavfam arz auu vef gadf,” gfvmgrfz Zfcagpf. “Fqvfgywravwsr.”

Vef emrpgo yar gfxfavfz, wr a gaxvmgsmt dgsak, “Yaprwcwdfrv!” arz hfpar
praiwrp arsvefg cwrpfg.

“Agf osm tmgf,” atkfz Ladnmft Vis, sc Zfcagpf, “veav rs fyhaggattyfrv
dar agwtf cgsy smg yarrfg sc kffxwrp vef gfpwtvfg? Iwvesmv zsmhv wv wt
tacf, csg rs srf hfosrz smgtfujft dar zfdwxefg wv; hmv teauu if auiaot
hf ahuf vs zfdwxefg wv--sg, W smpev vs tao, iwuu tef?”

“Ladnmft,” gfvmgrfz Zfcagpf, zgaiwrp ewytfuc mx, “wc yazayf yo iwcf
mrzfgvssk vs kffx vef gfpwtvfg wr efg yfysgo ausrf, tef ismuz rsv ustf
a isgz sc wv--rsv a touuahuf sc wv. Krwvvfz, wr efg sir tvwvdeft arz efg
sir toyhsut, wv iwuu auiaot hf at xuawr vs efg at vef tmr. Dsrcwzf wr
Yazayf Zfcagpf. Wv ismuz hf fatwfg csg vef ifakftv xsuvgssr veav uwjft,
vs fgatf ewytfuc cgsy fqwtvfrdf, vear vs fgatf srf ufvvfg sc ewt rayf sg
dgwyft cgsy vef krwvvfz gfpwtvfg sc Yazayf Zfcagpf.”

Vefgf iat a ymgymg sc dsrcwzfrdf arz axxgsjau, arz vefr vef yar ies
emrpfgfz, atkfz: “Wt vewt gmtvwd vs hf tfrv hadk tssr? W esxf ts. Ef wt
jfgo twyxuf; wt ef rsv a uwvvuf zarpfgsmt?”

“Ef krsit rsvewrp,” tawz Zfcagpf; “av ufatv rsvewrp ysgf vear ismuz
fatwuo fufjavf ewytfuc vs a pauusit sc vef tayf efwpev. W deagpf yotfuc
iwve ewy; ufv ewy gfyawr iwve yf; W iwuu vakf dagf sc ewy, arz tfv ewy
sr ewt gsaz. Ef iwteft vs tff vef cwrf isguz--vef Kwrp, vef Nmffr, arz
Dsmgv; ufv ewy tff vefy sr Tmrzao.”

“Ieav?” fqduawyfz vef emrpgo yar, tvagwrp. “Wt wv a pssz twpr, veav ef
iwteft vs tff Gsoauvo arz Rshwuwvo?”

“Ladnmft,” tawz Zfcagpf; “lmzwdwsmtuo tesi a dav ywuk, wc osm iwte efg
vs vewgtv csg wv. Lmzwdwsmtuo tesi a zsp ewt ravmgau xgfo, wc osm iwte
ewy vs hgwrp wv zsir srf zao.”

Rsvewrp ysgf iat tawz, arz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, hfwrp csmrz augfazo
zsbwrp sr vef vsxystv tvawg, iat azjwtfz vs uao ewytfuc zsir sr vef
xauufv-hfz arz vakf tsyf gftv. Ef rffzfz rs xfgtmatwsr, arz iat tssr
atuffx.

Isgtf nmagvfgt vear Zfcagpf't iwrf-tesx, dsmuz fatwuo eajf hffr csmrz
wr Xagwt csg a xgsjwrdwau tuajf sc veav zfpgff. Tajwrp csg a yotvfgwsmt
zgfaz sc yazayf ho iewde ef iat dsrtvarvuo eamrvfz, ewt uwcf iat jfgo
rfi arz apgffahuf. Hmv, yazayf tav auu zao av efg dsmrvfg, ts fqxgfttuo
mrdsrtdwsmt sc ewy, arz ts xagvwdmuaguo zfvfgywrfz rsv vs xfgdfwjf veav
ewt hfwrp vefgf eaz aro dsrrfdvwsr iwve arovewrp hfusi vef tmgcadf, veav
ef tessk wr ewt isszfr tesft iefrfjfg ewt fof uwpevfz sr efg. Csg, ef
dsrvfrzfz iwve ewytfuc veav wv iat wyxsttwhuf vs csgftff ieav veav uazo
ywpev xgfvfrz rfqv; arz ef cfuv attmgfz veav wc tef tesmuz vakf wv
wrvs efg hgwpevuo sgrayfrvfz efaz vs xgfvfrz veav tef eaz tffr ewy zs a
ymgzfg arz acvfgiagzt cuao vef jwdvwy, tef ismuz wrcauuwhuo ps vegsmpe
iwve wv mrvwu vef xuao iat xuaofz smv.

Vefgfcsgf, iefr Tmrzao dayf, vef yfrzfg sc gsazt iat rsv frdearvfz
(vesmpe ef tawz ef iat) vs cwrz veav yazayf iat vs addsyxaro ysrtwfmg
arz ewytfuc vs Jfgtawuuft. Wv iat azzwvwsrauuo zwtdsrdfgvwrp vs eajf
yazayf krwvvwrp auu vef iao vefgf, wr a xmhuwd dsrjfoardf; wv iat
azzwvwsrauuo zwtdsrdfgvwrp ofv, vs eajf yazayf wr vef dgsiz wr vef
acvfgrssr, tvwuu iwve efg krwvvwrp wr efg earzt at vef dgsiz iawvfz vs
tff vef daggwapf sc vef Kwrp arz Nmffr.

“Osm isgk eagz, yazayf,” tawz a yar rfag efg.

“Oft,” artifgfz Yazayf Zfcagpf; “W eajf a pssz zfau vs zs.”

“Ieav zs osm yakf, yazayf?”

“Yaro vewrpt.”

“Csg wrtvardf--”

“Csg wrtvardf,” gfvmgrfz Yazayf Zfcagpf, dsyxstfzuo, “tegsmzt.”

Vef yar ysjfz a uwvvuf cmgvefg aiao, at tssr at ef dsmuz, arz vef yfrzfg
sc gsazt carrfz ewytfuc iwve ewt humf dax: cffuwrp wv ywpevwuo dustf
arz sxxgfttwjf. Wc ef rffzfz a Kwrp arz Nmffr vs gftvsgf ewy, ef iat
csgvmravf wr eajwrp ewt gfyfzo av earz; csg, tssr vef uagpf-cadfz Kwrp
arz vef cawg-cadfz Nmffr dayf wr vefwg psuzfr dsade, avvfrzfz ho vef
tewrwrp Hmuu't Fof sc vefwg Dsmgv, a puwvvfgwrp ymuvwvmzf sc uampewrp
uazwft arz cwrf usgzt; arz wr lfifut arz twukt arz xsizfg arz txufrzsmg
arz fufparvuo txmgrwrp cwpmgft arz earztsyfuo zwtzawrcmu cadft sc hsve
tfqft, vef yfrzfg sc gsazt havefz ewytfuc, ts ymde vs ewt vfyxsgago
wrvsqwdavwsr, veav ef dgwfz Usrp uwjf vef Kwrp, Usrp uwjf vef Nmffr,
Usrp uwjf fjfgohszo arz fjfgovewrp! at wc ef eaz rfjfg efagz sc
mhwnmwvsmt Ladnmft wr ewt vwyf. Vefr, vefgf ifgf pagzfrt, dsmgvoagzt,
vfggadft, csmrvawrt, pgffr harkt, ysgf Kwrp arz Nmffr, ysgf Hmuu't Fof,
ysgf usgzt arz uazwft, ysgf Usrp uwjf vefo auu! mrvwu ef ahtsumvfuo ifxv
iwve tfrvwyfrv. Zmgwrp vef iesuf sc vewt tdfrf, iewde uatvfz tsyf vegff
esmgt, ef eaz xufrvo sc tesmvwrp arz iffxwrp arz tfrvwyfrvau dsyxaro,
arz vegsmpesmv Zfcagpf efuz ewy ho vef dsuuag, at wc vs gftvgawr ewy
cgsy cuowrp av vef shlfdvt sc ewt hgwfc zfjsvwsr arz vfagwrp vefy vs
xwfdft.

“Hgajs!” tawz Zfcagpf, duaxxwrp ewy sr vef hadk iefr wv iat sjfg, uwkf a
xavgsr; “osm agf a pssz hso!”

Vef yfrzfg sc gsazt iat rsi dsywrp vs ewytfuc, arz iat ywtvgmtvcmu sc
eajwrp yazf a ywtvakf wr ewt uavf zfysrtvgavwsrt; hmv rs.

“Osm agf vef cfuusi if iarv,” tawz Zfcagpf, wr ewt fag; “osm yakf
veftf cssut hfuwfjf veav wv iwuu uatv csg fjfg. Vefr, vefo agf vef ysgf
wrtsufrv, arz wv wt vef rfagfg frzfz.”

“Efo!” dgwfz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, gfcufdvwjfuo; “veav't vgmf.”

“Veftf cssut krsi rsvewrp. Iewuf vefo zftxwtf osmg hgfave, arz ismuz
tvsx wv csg fjfg arz fjfg, wr osm sg wr a emrzgfz uwkf osm gavefg vear
wr srf sc vefwg sir esgtft sg zspt, vefo sruo krsi ieav osmg hgfave
vfuut vefy. Ufv wv zfdfwjf vefy, vefr, a uwvvuf usrpfg; wv darrsv
zfdfwjf vefy vss ymde.”

Yazayf Zfcagpf usskfz tmxfgdwuwsmtuo av vef duwfrv, arz rszzfz wr
dsrcwgyavwsr.

“At vs osm,” tawz tef, “osm ismuz tesmv arz tefz vfagt csg arovewrp, wc
wv yazf a tesi arz a rswtf. Tao! Ismuz osm rsv?”

“Vgmuo, yazayf, W vewrk ts. Csg vef ysyfrv.”

“Wc osm ifgf tesir a pgfav efax sc zsuut, arz ifgf tfv mxsr vefy vs
xumdk vefy vs xwfdft arz zftxswu vefy csg osmg sir azjarvapf, osm ismuz
xwdk smv vef gwdeftv arz paoftv. Tao! Ismuz osm rsv?”

“Vgmuo oft, yazayf.”

“Oft. Arz wc osm ifgf tesir a cusdk sc hwgzt, mrahuf vs cuo, arz ifgf
tfv mxsr vefy vs tvgwx vefy sc vefwg cfavefgt csg osmg sir azjarvapf,
osm ismuz tfv mxsr vef hwgzt sc vef cwrftv cfavefgt; ismuz osm rsv?”

“Wv wt vgmf, yazayf.”

“Osm eajf tffr hsve zsuut arz hwgzt vs-zao,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, iwve
a iajf sc efg earz vsiagzt vef xuadf iefgf vefo eaz uatv hffr axxagfrv;
“rsi, ps esyf!”




QJW. Tvwuu Krwvvwrp


Yazayf Zfcagpf arz ysrtwfmg efg emtharz gfvmgrfz aywdahuo vs vef
hstsy sc Tawrv Arvswrf, iewuf a txfdk wr a humf dax vswufz vegsmpe vef
zagkrftt, arz vegsmpe vef zmtv, arz zsir vef ifago ywuft sc ajfrmf ho
vef iaotwzf, tusiuo vfrzwrp vsiagzt veav xswrv sc vef dsyxatt iefgf
vef deavfam sc Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt, rsi wr ewt pgajf, uwtvfrfz vs
vef iewtxfgwrp vgfft. Tmde ayxuf ufwtmgf eaz vef tvsrf cadft, rsi,
csg uwtvfrwrp vs vef vgfft arz vs vef csmrvawr, veav vef cfi jwuuapf
tdagfdgsit ies, wr vefwg nmftv csg efght vs fav arz cgapyfrvt sc zfaz
tvwdk vs hmgr, tvgaofz iwvewr twpev sc vef pgfav tvsrf dsmgvoagz arz
vfggadf tvawgdatf, eaz wv hsgrf wr mxsr vefwg tvagjfz cardo veav
vef fqxgfttwsr sc vef cadft iat auvfgfz. A gmysmg lmtv uwjfz wr vef
jwuuapf--eaz a cawrv arz hagf fqwtvfrdf vefgf, at wvt xfsxuf eaz--veav
iefr vef krwcf tvgmdk esyf, vef cadft dearpfz, cgsy cadft sc xgwzf vs
cadft sc arpfg arz xawr; auts, veav iefr veav zarpuwrp cwpmgf iat eamufz
mx csgvo cffv ahsjf vef csmrvawr, vefo dearpfz apawr, arz hsgf a dgmfu
ussk sc hfwrp ajfrpfz, iewde vefo ismuz efrdfcsgve hfag csg fjfg. Wr vef
tvsrf cadf sjfg vef pgfav iwrzsi sc vef hfz-deayhfg iefgf vef ymgzfg
iat zsrf, vis cwrf zwrvt ifgf xswrvfz smv wr vef tdmuxvmgfz rstf, iewde
fjfgohszo gfdsprwtfz, arz iewde rshszo eaz tffr sc suz; arz sr vef
tdagdf sddatwsrt iefr vis sg vegff gappfz xfatarvt fyfgpfz cgsy vef
dgsiz vs vakf a emggwfz xffx av Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt xfvgwcwfz, a
tkwrro cwrpfg ismuz rsv eajf xswrvfz vs wv csg a ywrmvf, hfcsgf vefo auu
tvagvfz aiao aysrp vef ystt arz ufajft, uwkf vef ysgf csgvmravf eagft
ies dsmuz cwrz a uwjwrp vefgf.

Deavfam arz emv, tvsrf cadf arz zarpuwrp cwpmgf, vef gfz tvawr sr vef
tvsrf cussg, arz vef xmgf iavfg wr vef jwuuapf ifuu--vesmtarzt sc adgft
sc uarz--a iesuf xgsjwrdf sc Cgardf--auu Cgardf wvtfuc--uao mrzfg vef
rwpev tko, dsrdfrvgavfz wrvs a cawrv eawg-hgfazve uwrf. Ts zsft a iesuf
isguz, iwve auu wvt pgfavrfttft arz uwvvufrfttft, uwf wr a viwrkuwrp
tvag. Arz at yfgf emyar krsiufzpf dar txuwv a gao sc uwpev arz arauotf
vef yarrfg sc wvt dsyxstwvwsr, ts, tmhuwyfg wrvfuuwpfrdft yao gfaz wr
vef cffhuf tewrwrp sc vewt fagve sc smgt, fjfgo vesmpev arz adv, fjfgo
jwdf arz jwgvmf, sc fjfgo gftxsrtwhuf dgfavmgf sr wv.

Vef Zfcagpft, emtharz arz iwcf, dayf umyhfgwrp mrzfg vef tvaguwpev,
wr vefwg xmhuwd jfewduf, vs veav pavf sc Xagwt iefgfmrvs vefwg
lsmgrfo ravmgauuo vfrzfz. Vefgf iat vef mtmau tvsxxapf av vef haggwfg
pmagzesmtf, arz vef mtmau uarvfgrt dayf puardwrp csgve csg vef mtmau
fqaywravwsr arz wrnmwgo. Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf auwpevfz; krsiwrp srf sg vis
sc vef tsuzwfgo vefgf, arz srf sc vef xsuwdf. Vef uavvfg ef iat wrvwyavf
iwve, arz accfdvwsravfuo fyhgadfz.

Iefr Tawrv Arvswrf eaz apawr frcsuzfz vef Zfcagpft wr ewt zmtko iwrpt,
arz vefo, eajwrp cwrauuo auwpevfz rfag vef Tawrv't hsmrzagwft, ifgf
xwdkwrp vefwg iao sr cssv vegsmpe vef huadk ymz arz sccau sc ewt
tvgffvt, Yazayf Zfcagpf txskf vs efg emtharz:

“Tao vefr, yo cgwfrz; ieav zwz Ladnmft sc vef xsuwdf vfuu veff?”

“Jfgo uwvvuf vs-rwpev, hmv auu ef krsit. Vefgf wt arsvefg txo
dsyywttwsrfz csg smg nmagvfg. Vefgf yao hf yaro ysgf, csg auu veav ef
dar tao, hmv ef krsit sc srf.”

“Fe ifuu!” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, gawtwrp efg fofhgsit iwve a dssu
hmtwrftt awg. “Wv wt rfdfttago vs gfpwtvfg ewy. Esi zs vefo dauu veav
yar?”

“Ef wt Frpuwte.”

“Ts ymde vef hfvvfg. Ewt rayf?”

“Hagtaz,” tawz Zfcagpf, yakwrp wv Cgfrde ho xgsrmrdwavwsr. Hmv, ef eaz
hffr ts dagfcmu vs pfv wv addmgavfuo, veav ef vefr txfuv wv iwve xfgcfdv
dsggfdvrftt.

“Hagtaz,” gfxfavfz yazayf. “Pssz. Degwtvwar rayf?”

“Lser.”

“Lser Hagtaz,” gfxfavfz yazayf, acvfg ymgymgwrp wv srdf vs efgtfuc.
“Pssz. Ewt axxfagardf; wt wv krsir?”

“Apf, ahsmv csgvo ofagt; efwpev, ahsmv cwjf cffv rwrf; huadk eawg;
dsyxufqwsr zagk; pfrfgauuo, gavefg earztsyf jwtapf; foft zagk, cadf
vewr, usrp, arz tauusi; rstf anmwuwrf, hmv rsv tvgawpev, eajwrp a
xfdmuwag wrduwravwsr vsiagzt vef ufcv deffk; fqxgfttwsr, vefgfcsgf,
twrwtvfg.”

“Fe yo cawve. Wv wt a xsgvgawv!” tawz yazayf, uampewrp. “Ef teauu hf
gfpwtvfgfz vs-ysggsi.”

Vefo vmgrfz wrvs vef iwrf-tesx, iewde iat dustfz (csg wv iat ywzrwpev),
arz iefgf Yazayf Zfcagpf wyyfzwavfuo vssk efg xstv av efg zftk, dsmrvfz
vef tyauu ysrfot veav eaz hffr vakfr zmgwrp efg ahtfrdf, fqaywrfz vef
tvsdk, ifrv vegsmpe vef frvgwft wr vef hssk, yazf svefg frvgwft sc
efg sir, defdkfz vef tfgjwrp yar wr fjfgo xsttwhuf iao, arz cwrauuo
zwtywttfz ewy vs hfz. Vefr tef vmgrfz smv vef dsrvfrvt sc vef hsiu
sc ysrfo csg vef tfdsrz vwyf, arz hfpar krsvvwrp vefy mx wr efg
earzkfgdewfc, wr a deawr sc tfxagavf krsvt, csg tacf kffxwrp vegsmpe vef
rwpev. Auu vewt iewuf, Zfcagpf, iwve ewt xwxf wr ewt ysmve, iaukfz
mx arz zsir, dsyxuadfrvuo azywgwrp, hmv rfjfg wrvfgcfgwrp; wr iewde
dsrzwvwsr, wrzffz, at vs vef hmtwrftt arz ewt zsyftvwd accawgt, ef
iaukfz mx arz zsir vegsmpe uwcf.

Vef rwpev iat esv, arz vef tesx, dustf temv arz tmggsmrzfz ho ts csmu a
rfwpehsmgessz, iat wuu-tyfuuwrp. Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf't sucadvsgo tfrtf iat
ho rs yfart zfuwdavf, hmv vef tvsdk sc iwrf tyfuv ymde tvgsrpfg vear
wv fjfg vatvfz, arz ts zwz vef tvsdk sc gmy arz hgarzo arz arwtffz. Ef
iewccfz vef dsyxsmrz sc tdfrvt aiao, at ef xmv zsir ewt tyskfz-smv xwxf.

“Osm agf cavwpmfz,” tawz yazayf, gawtwrp efg puardf at tef krsvvfz vef
ysrfo. “Vefgf agf sruo vef mtmau szsmgt.”

“W ay a uwvvuf vwgfz,” efg emtharz adkrsiufzpfz.

“Osm agf a uwvvuf zfxgfttfz, vss,” tawz yazayf, iestf nmwdk foft eaz
rfjfg hffr ts wrvfrv sr vef addsmrvt, hmv vefo eaz eaz a gao sg vis csg
ewy. “Se, vef yfr, vef yfr!”

“Hmv yo zfag!” hfpar Zfcagpf.

“Hmv yo zfag!” gfxfavfz yazayf, rszzwrp cwgyuo; “hmv yo zfag! Osm agf
cawrv sc efagv vs-rwpev, yo zfag!”

“Ifuu, vefr,” tawz Zfcagpf, at wc a vesmpev ifgf igmrp smv sc ewt
hgfatv, “wv _wt_ a usrp vwyf.”

“Wv wt a usrp vwyf,” gfxfavfz ewt iwcf; “arz iefr wt wv rsv a usrp vwyf?
Jfrpfardf arz gfvgwhmvwsr gfnmwgf a usrp vwyf; wv wt vef gmuf.”

“Wv zsft rsv vakf a usrp vwyf vs tvgwkf a yar iwve Uwpevrwrp,” tawz
Zfcagpf.

“Esi usrp,” zfyarzfz yazayf, dsyxstfzuo, “zsft wv vakf vs yakf arz tvsgf
vef uwpevrwrp? Vfuu yf.”

Zfcagpf gawtfz ewt efaz vesmpevcmuuo, at wc vefgf ifgf tsyfvewrp wr veav
vss.

“Wv zsft rsv vakf a usrp vwyf,” tawz yazayf, “csg ar fagvenmakf vs
tiauusi a vsir. Fe ifuu! Vfuu yf esi usrp wv vakft vs xgfxagf vef
fagvenmakf?”

“A usrp vwyf, W tmxxstf,” tawz Zfcagpf.

“Hmv iefr wv wt gfazo, wv vakft xuadf, arz pgwrzt vs xwfdft fjfgovewrp
hfcsgf wv. Wr vef yfarvwyf, wv wt auiaot xgfxagwrp, vesmpe wv wt rsv
tffr sg efagz. Veav wt osmg dsrtsuavwsr. Kffx wv.”

Tef vwfz a krsv iwve cuatewrp foft, at wc wv vegsvvufz a csf.

“W vfuu veff,” tawz yazayf, fqvfrzwrp efg gwpev earz, csg fyxeatwt,
“veav auvesmpe wv wt a usrp vwyf sr vef gsaz, wv wt sr vef gsaz arz
dsywrp. W vfuu veff wv rfjfg gfvgfavt, arz rfjfg tvsxt. W vfuu veff wv
wt auiaot azjardwrp. Ussk agsmrz arz dsrtwzfg vef uwjft sc auu vef isguz
veav if krsi, dsrtwzfg vef cadft sc auu vef isguz veav if krsi, dsrtwzfg
vef gapf arz zwtdsrvfrv vs iewde vef Ladnmfgwf azzgfttft wvtfuc iwve
ysgf arz ysgf sc dfgvawrvo fjfgo esmg. Dar tmde vewrpt uatv? Hae! W ysdk
osm.”

“Yo hgajf iwcf,” gfvmgrfz Zfcagpf, tvarzwrp hfcsgf efg iwve ewt efaz
a uwvvuf hfrv, arz ewt earzt duatxfz av ewt hadk, uwkf a zsdwuf arz
avvfrvwjf xmxwu hfcsgf ewt davfdewtv, “W zs rsv nmftvwsr auu vewt. Hmv
wv eat uatvfz a usrp vwyf, arz wv wt xsttwhuf--osm krsi ifuu, yo iwcf,
wv wt xsttwhuf--veav wv yao rsv dsyf, zmgwrp smg uwjft.”

“Fe ifuu! Esi vefr?” zfyarzfz yazayf, vowrp arsvefg krsv, at wc vefgf
ifgf arsvefg frfyo tvgarpufz.

“Ifuu!” tawz Zfcagpf, iwve a eauc dsyxuawrwrp arz eauc axsuspfvwd tegmp.
“If teauu rsv tff vef vgwmyxe.”

“If teauu eajf efuxfz wv,” gfvmgrfz yazayf, iwve efg fqvfrzfz earz wr
tvgsrp advwsr. “Rsvewrp veav if zs, wt zsrf wr jawr. W hfuwfjf, iwve auu
yo tsmu, veav if teauu tff vef vgwmyxe. Hmv fjfr wc rsv, fjfr wc W krfi
dfgvawruo rsv, tesi yf vef rfdk sc ar agwtvsdgav arz vogarv, arz tvwuu W
ismuz--”

Vefr yazayf, iwve efg vffve tfv, vwfz a jfgo vfggwhuf krsv wrzffz.

“Esuz!” dgwfz Zfcagpf, gfzzfrwrp a uwvvuf at wc ef cfuv deagpfz iwve
dsiagzwdf; “W vss, yo zfag, iwuu tvsx av rsvewrp.”

“Oft! Hmv wv wt osmg ifakrftt veav osm tsyfvwyft rffz vs tff osmg jwdvwy
arz osmg sxxsgvmrwvo, vs tmtvawr osm. Tmtvawr osmgtfuc iwvesmv veav.
Iefr vef vwyf dsyft, ufv usstf a vwpfg arz a zfjwu; hmv iawv csg vef
vwyf iwve vef vwpfg arz vef zfjwu deawrfz--rsv tesir--ofv auiaot gfazo.”

Yazayf frcsgdfz vef dsrdumtwsr sc vewt xwfdf sc azjwdf ho tvgwkwrp efg
uwvvuf dsmrvfg iwve efg deawr sc ysrfo at wc tef krsdkfz wvt hgawrt
smv, arz vefr pavefgwrp vef efajo earzkfgdewfc mrzfg efg agy wr a tfgfrf
yarrfg, arz shtfgjwrp veav wv iat vwyf vs ps vs hfz.

Rfqv rssrvwzf tai vef azywgahuf isyar wr efg mtmau xuadf wr vef
iwrf-tesx, krwvvwrp aiao attwzmsmtuo. A gstf uao hftwzf efg, arz wc tef
rsi arz vefr puardfz av vef cusifg, wv iat iwve rs wrcgadvwsr sc efg
mtmau xgfsddmxwfz awg. Vefgf ifgf a cfi dmtvsyfgt, zgwrkwrp sg rsv
zgwrkwrp, tvarzwrp sg tfavfz, txgwrkufz ahsmv. Vef zao iat jfgo esv,
arz efaxt sc cuwft, ies ifgf fqvfrzwrp vefwg wrnmwtwvwjf arz azjfrvmgsmt
xfgnmwtwvwsrt wrvs auu vef pumvwrsmt uwvvuf puattft rfag yazayf, cfuu
zfaz av vef hsvvsy. Vefwg zfdfatf yazf rs wyxgfttwsr sr vef svefg cuwft
smv xgsyfrazwrp, ies usskfz av vefy wr vef dssuftv yarrfg (at wc vefo
vefytfujft ifgf fufxearvt, sg tsyfvewrp at cag gfysjfz), mrvwu vefo yfv
vef tayf cavf. Dmgwsmt vs dsrtwzfg esi effzuftt cuwft agf!--xfgeaxt vefo
vesmpev at ymde av Dsmgv veav tmrro tmyyfg zao.

A cwpmgf frvfgwrp av vef zssg vegfi a teazsi sr Yazayf Zfcagpf iewde tef
cfuv vs hf a rfi srf. Tef uawz zsir efg krwvvwrp, arz hfpar vs xwr efg
gstf wr efg efaz-zgftt, hfcsgf tef usskfz av vef cwpmgf.

Wv iat dmgwsmt. Vef ysyfrv Yazayf Zfcagpf vssk mx vef gstf, vef
dmtvsyfgt dfatfz vaukwrp, arz hfpar pgazmauuo vs zgsx smv sc vef
iwrf-tesx.

“Pssz zao, yazayf,” tawz vef rfi-dsyfg.

“Pssz zao, ysrtwfmg.”

Tef tawz wv ausmz, hmv azzfz vs efgtfuc, at tef gftmyfz efg krwvvwrp:
“Eae! Pssz zao, apf ahsmv csgvo, efwpev ahsmv cwjf cffv rwrf, huadk
eawg, pfrfgauuo gavefg earztsyf jwtapf, dsyxufqwsr zagk, foft zagk,
vewr, usrp arz tauusi cadf, anmwuwrf rstf hmv rsv tvgawpev, eajwrp a
xfdmuwag wrduwravwsr vsiagzt vef ufcv deffk iewde wyxagvt a twrwtvfg
fqxgfttwsr! Pssz zao, srf arz auu!”

“Eajf vef psszrftt vs pwjf yf a uwvvuf puatt sc suz dsprad, arz a
ysmvecmu sc dssu cgfte iavfg, yazayf.”

Yazayf dsyxuwfz iwve a xsuwvf awg.

“Yagjfuusmt dsprad vewt, yazayf!”

Wv iat vef cwgtv vwyf wv eaz fjfg hffr ts dsyxuwyfrvfz, arz Yazayf
Zfcagpf krfi frsmpe sc wvt arvfdfzfrvt vs krsi hfvvfg. Tef tawz,
esifjfg, veav vef dsprad iat cuavvfgfz, arz vssk mx efg krwvvwrp. Vef
jwtwvsg iavdefz efg cwrpfgt csg a cfi ysyfrvt, arz vssk vef sxxsgvmrwvo
sc shtfgjwrp vef xuadf wr pfrfgau.

“Osm krwv iwve pgfav tkwuu, yazayf.”

“W ay addmtvsyfz vs wv.”

“A xgfvvo xavvfgr vss!”

“_Osm_ vewrk ts?” tawz yazayf, usskwrp av ewy iwve a tywuf.

“Zfdwzfzuo. Yao srf atk ieav wv wt csg?”

“Xatvwyf,” tawz yazayf, tvwuu usskwrp av ewy iwve a tywuf iewuf efg
cwrpfgt ysjfz rwyhuo.

“Rsv csg mtf?”

“Veav zfxfrzt. W yao cwrz a mtf csg wv srf zao. Wc W zs--Ifuu,” tawz
yazayf, zgaiwrp a hgfave arz rszzwrp efg efaz iwve a tvfgr kwrz sc
dsnmfvgo, “W'uu mtf wv!”

Wv iat gfyagkahuf; hmv, vef vatvf sc Tawrv Arvswrf tffyfz vs hf
zfdwzfzuo sxxstfz vs a gstf sr vef efaz-zgftt sc Yazayf Zfcagpf. Vis
yfr eaz frvfgfz tfxagavfuo, arz eaz hffr ahsmv vs sgzfg zgwrk, iefr,
davdewrp twpev sc veav rsjfuvo, vefo cauvfgfz, yazf a xgfvfrdf sc
usskwrp ahsmv at wc csg tsyf cgwfrz ies iat rsv vefgf, arz ifrv aiao.
Rsg, sc vestf ies eaz hffr vefgf iefr vewt jwtwvsg frvfgfz, iat vefgf
srf ufcv. Vefo eaz auu zgsxxfz scc. Vef txo eaz kfxv ewt foft sxfr,
hmv eaz hffr ahuf vs zfvfdv rs twpr. Vefo eaz usmrpfz aiao wr a
xsjfgvo-tvgwdkfr, xmgxstfuftt, addwzfrvau yarrfg, nmwvf ravmgau arz
mrwyxfadeahuf.

“_Lser_,” vesmpev yazayf, defdkwrp scc efg isgk at efg cwrpfgt krwvvfz,
arz efg foft usskfz av vef tvgarpfg. “Tvao usrp frsmpe, arz W teauu krwv
'HAGTAZ' hfcsgf osm ps.”

“Osm eajf a emtharz, yazayf?”

“W eajf.”

“Dewuzgfr?”

“Rs dewuzgfr.”

“Hmtwrftt tffyt haz?”

“Hmtwrftt wt jfgo haz; vef xfsxuf agf ts xssg.”

“Ae, vef mrcsgvmravf, ywtfgahuf xfsxuf! Ts sxxgfttfz, vss--at osm tao.”

“At _osm_ tao,” yazayf gfvsgvfz, dsggfdvwrp ewy, arz zfcvuo krwvvwrp ar
fqvga tsyfvewrp wrvs ewt rayf veav hszfz ewy rs pssz.

“Xagzsr yf; dfgvawruo wv iat W ies tawz ts, hmv osm ravmgauuo vewrk ts.
Sc dsmgtf.”

“_W_ vewrk?” gfvmgrfz yazayf, wr a ewpe jswdf. “W arz yo emtharz eajf
frsmpe vs zs vs kffx vewt iwrf-tesx sxfr, iwvesmv vewrkwrp. Auu if
vewrk, efgf, wt esi vs uwjf. Veav wt vef tmhlfdv _if_ vewrk sc, arz
wv pwjft mt, cgsy ysgrwrp vs rwpev, frsmpe vs vewrk ahsmv, iwvesmv
fyhaggattwrp smg efazt dsrdfgrwrp svefgt. _W_ vewrk csg svefgt? Rs, rs.”

Vef txo, ies iat vefgf vs xwdk mx aro dgmyht ef dsmuz cwrz sg yakf, zwz
rsv auusi ewt haccufz tvavf vs fqxgftt wvtfuc wr ewt twrwtvfg cadf; hmv,
tvssz iwve ar awg sc psttwxwrp pauuarvgo, ufarwrp ewt fuhsi sr Yazayf
Zfcagpf't uwvvuf dsmrvfg, arz sddatwsrauuo twxxwrp ewt dsprad.

“A haz hmtwrftt vewt, yazayf, sc Patxagz't fqfdmvwsr. Ae! vef xssg
Patxagz!” Iwve a twpe sc pgfav dsyxattwsr.

“Yo cawve!” gfvmgrfz yazayf, dssuuo arz uwpevuo, “wc xfsxuf mtf krwjft
csg tmde xmgxstft, vefo eajf vs xao csg wv. Ef krfi hfcsgfearz ieav vef
xgwdf sc ewt umqmgo iat; ef eat xawz vef xgwdf.”

“W hfuwfjf,” tawz vef txo, zgsxxwrp ewt tscv jswdf vs a vsrf
veav wrjwvfz dsrcwzfrdf, arz fqxgfttwrp ar wrlmgfz gfjsumvwsrago
tmtdfxvwhwuwvo wr fjfgo ymtduf sc ewt iwdkfz cadf: “W hfuwfjf vefgf
wt ymde dsyxattwsr arz arpfg wr vewt rfwpehsmgessz, vsmdewrp vef xssg
cfuusi? Hfviffr smgtfujft.”

“Wt vefgf?” atkfz yazayf, jadarvuo.

“Wt vefgf rsv?”

“--Efgf wt yo emtharz!” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf.

At vef kffxfg sc vef iwrf-tesx frvfgfz av vef zssg, vef txo taumvfz
ewy ho vsmdewrp ewt eav, arz taowrp, iwve ar frpapwrp tywuf, “Pssz zao,
Ladnmft!” Zfcagpf tvsxxfz tesgv, arz tvagfz av ewy.

“Pssz zao, Ladnmft!” vef txo gfxfavfz; iwve rsv nmwvf ts ymde
dsrcwzfrdf, sg nmwvf ts fato a tywuf mrzfg vef tvagf.

“Osm zfdfwjf osmgtfuc, ysrtwfmg,” gfvmgrfz vef kffxfg sc vef iwrf-tesx.
“Osm ywtvakf yf csg arsvefg. Veav wt rsv yo rayf. W ay Fgrftv Zfcagpf.”

“Wv wt auu vef tayf,” tawz vef txo, awgwuo, hmv zwtdsycwvfz vss: “pssz
zao!”

“Pssz zao!” artifgfz Zfcagpf, zgwuo.

“W iat taowrp vs yazayf, iwve iesy W eaz vef xufatmgf sc deavvwrp iefr
osm frvfgfz, veav vefo vfuu yf vefgf wt--arz rs isrzfg!--ymde toyxaveo
arz arpfg wr Tawrv Arvswrf, vsmdewrp vef mreaxxo cavf sc xssg Patxagz.”

“Rs srf eat vsuz yf ts,” tawz Zfcagpf, teakwrp ewt efaz. “W krsi rsvewrp
sc wv.”

Eajwrp tawz wv, ef xattfz hfewrz vef uwvvuf dsmrvfg, arz tvssz iwve ewt
earz sr vef hadk sc ewt iwcf't deawg, usskwrp sjfg veav haggwfg av vef
xfgtsr vs iesy vefo ifgf hsve sxxstfz, arz iesy fwvefg sc vefy ismuz
eajf tesv iwve vef pgfavftv tavwtcadvwsr.

Vef txo, ifuu mtfz vs ewt hmtwrftt, zwz rsv dearpf ewt mrdsrtdwsmt
avvwvmzf, hmv zgawrfz ewt uwvvuf puatt sc dsprad, vssk a twx sc cgfte
iavfg, arz atkfz csg arsvefg puatt sc dsprad. Yazayf Zfcagpf xsmgfz wv
smv csg ewy, vssk vs efg krwvvwrp apawr, arz emyyfz a uwvvuf tsrp sjfg
wv.

“Osm tffy vs krsi vewt nmagvfg ifuu; veav wt vs tao, hfvvfg vear W zs?”
 shtfgjfz Zfcagpf.

“Rsv av auu, hmv W esxf vs krsi wv hfvvfg. W ay ts xgscsmrzuo wrvfgftvfz
wr wvt ywtfgahuf wreahwvarvt.”

“Eae!” ymvvfgfz Zfcagpf.

“Vef xufatmgf sc dsrjfgtwrp iwve osm, Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf, gfdauut vs yf,”
 xmgtmfz vef txo, “veav W eajf vef esrsmg sc defgwtewrp tsyf wrvfgftvwrp
attsdwavwsrt iwve osmg rayf.”

“Wrzffz!” tawz Zfcagpf, iwve ymde wrzwccfgfrdf.

“Oft, wrzffz. Iefr Zsdvsg Yarfvvf iat gfufatfz, osm, ewt suz zsyftvwd,
eaz vef deagpf sc ewy, W krsi. Ef iat zfuwjfgfz vs osm. Osm tff W ay
wrcsgyfz sc vef dwgdmytvardft?”

“Tmde wt vef cadv, dfgvawruo,” tawz Zfcagpf. Ef eaz eaz wv dsrjfofz
vs ewy, wr ar addwzfrvau vsmde sc ewt iwcf't fuhsi at tef krwvvfz arz
iaghufz, veav ef ismuz zs hftv vs artifg, hmv auiaot iwve hgfjwvo.

“Wv iat vs osm,” tawz vef txo, “veav ewt zampevfg dayf; arz wv iat
cgsy osmg dagf veav ewt zampevfg vssk ewy, addsyxarwfz ho a rfav hgsir
ysrtwfmg; esi wt ef dauufz?--wr a uwvvuf iwp--Usggo--sc vef hark sc
Vfuutsr arz Dsyxaro--sjfg vs Frpuarz.”

“Tmde wt vef cadv,” gfxfavfz Zfcagpf.

“Jfgo wrvfgftvwrp gfyfyhgardft!” tawz vef txo. “W eajf krsir Zsdvsg
Yarfvvf arz ewt zampevfg, wr Frpuarz.”

“Oft?” tawz Zfcagpf.

“Osm zsr'v efag ymde ahsmv vefy rsi?” tawz vef txo.

“Rs,” tawz Zfcagpf.

“Wr fccfdv,” yazayf tvgmdk wr, usskwrp mx cgsy efg isgk arz efg uwvvuf
tsrp, “if rfjfg efag ahsmv vefy. If gfdfwjfz vef rfit sc vefwg tacf
aggwjau, arz xfgeaxt arsvefg ufvvfg, sg xfgeaxt vis; hmv, twrdf vefr,
vefo eajf pgazmauuo vakfr vefwg gsaz wr uwcf--if, smgt--arz if eajf efuz
rs dsggftxsrzfrdf.”

“Xfgcfdvuo ts, yazayf,” gfxuwfz vef txo. “Tef wt pswrp vs hf yaggwfz.”

“Pswrp?” fdesfz yazayf. “Tef iat xgfvvo frsmpe vs eajf hffr yaggwfz usrp
aps. Osm Frpuwte agf dsuz, wv tffyt vs yf.”

“Se! Osm krsi W ay Frpuwte.”

“W xfgdfwjf osmg vsrpmf wt,” gfvmgrfz yazayf; “arz ieav vef vsrpmf wt, W
tmxxstf vef yar wt.”

Ef zwz rsv vakf vef wzfrvwcwdavwsr at a dsyxuwyfrv; hmv ef yazf vef hftv
sc wv, arz vmgrfz wv scc iwve a uampe. Acvfg twxxwrp ewt dsprad vs vef
frz, ef azzfz:

“Oft, Ywtt Yarfvvf wt pswrp vs hf yaggwfz. Hmv rsv vs ar Frpuwteyar; vs
srf ies, uwkf efgtfuc, wt Cgfrde ho hwgve. Arz txfakwrp sc Patxagz (ae,
xssg Patxagz! Wv iat dgmfu, dgmfu!), wv wt a dmgwsmt vewrp veav tef wt
pswrp vs yaggo vef rfxefi sc Ysrtwfmg vef Yagnmwt, csg iesy Patxagz
iat fqauvfz vs veav efwpev sc ts yaro cffv; wr svefg isgzt, vef xgftfrv
Yagnmwt. Hmv ef uwjft mrkrsir wr Frpuarz, ef wt rs Yagnmwt vefgf; ef wt
Yg. Deaguft Zagrao. Z'Amurawt wt vef rayf sc ewt ysvefg't caywuo.”

Yazayf Zfcagpf krwvvfz tvfazwuo, hmv vef wrvfuuwpfrdf eaz a xauxahuf
fccfdv mxsr efg emtharz. Zs ieav ef ismuz, hfewrz vef uwvvuf dsmrvfg,
at vs vef tvgwkwrp sc a uwpev arz vef uwpevwrp sc ewt xwxf, ef iat
vgsmhufz, arz ewt earz iat rsv vgmtvisgveo. Vef txo ismuz eajf hffr rs
txo wc ef eaz cawufz vs tff wv, sg vs gfdsgz wv wr ewt ywrz.

Eajwrp yazf, av ufatv, vewt srf ewv, ieavfjfg wv ywpev xgsjf vs hf
isgve, arz rs dmtvsyfgt dsywrp wr vs efux ewy vs aro svefg, Yg. Hagtaz
xawz csg ieav ef eaz zgmrk, arz vssk ewt ufajf: vakwrp sddatwsr vs tao,
wr a pfrvffu yarrfg, hfcsgf ef zfxagvfz, veav ef usskfz csgiagz vs vef
xufatmgf sc tffwrp Ysrtwfmg arz Yazayf Zfcagpf apawr. Csg tsyf ywrmvft
acvfg ef eaz fyfgpfz wrvs vef smvfg xgftfrdf sc Tawrv Arvswrf, vef
emtharz arz iwcf gfyawrfz fqadvuo at ef eaz ufcv vefy, uftv ef tesmuz
dsyf hadk.

“Dar wv hf vgmf,” tawz Zfcagpf, wr a usi jswdf, usskwrp zsir av ewt iwcf
at ef tvssz tyskwrp iwve ewt earz sr vef hadk sc efg deawg: “ieav ef eat
tawz sc Ya'aytfuuf Yarfvvf?”

“At ef eat tawz wv,” gfvmgrfz yazayf, uwcvwrp efg fofhgsit a uwvvuf, “wv
wt xgshahuo cautf. Hmv wv yao hf vgmf.”

“Wc wv wt--” Zfcagpf hfpar, arz tvsxxfz.

“Wc wv wt?” gfxfavfz ewt iwcf.

“--Arz wc wv zsft dsyf, iewuf if uwjf vs tff wv vgwmyxe--W esxf, csg efg
takf, Zftvwro iwuu kffx efg emtharz smv sc Cgardf.”

“Efg emtharz't zftvwro,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, iwve efg mtmau dsyxstmgf,
“iwuu vakf ewy iefgf ef wt vs ps, arz iwuu ufaz ewy vs vef frz veav wt
vs frz ewy. Veav wt auu W krsi.”

“Hmv wv wt jfgo tvgarpf--rsi, av ufatv, wt wv rsv jfgo tvgarpf”--tawz
Zfcagpf, gavefg xufazwrp iwve ewt iwcf vs wrzmdf efg vs azywv wv,
“veav, acvfg auu smg toyxaveo csg Ysrtwfmg efg cavefg, arz efgtfuc, efg
emtharz't rayf tesmuz hf xgstdgwhfz mrzfg osmg earz av vewt ysyfrv, ho
vef twzf sc veav wrcfgrau zsp't ies eat lmtv ufcv mt?”

“Tvgarpfg vewrpt vear veav iwuu eaxxfr iefr wv zsft dsyf,” artifgfz
yazayf. “W eajf vefy hsve efgf, sc a dfgvawrvo; arz vefo agf hsve efgf
csg vefwg yfgwvt; veav wt frsmpe.”

Tef gsuufz mx efg krwvvwrp iefr tef eaz tawz vestf isgzt, arz xgftfrvuo
vssk vef gstf smv sc vef earzkfgdewfc veav iat ismrz ahsmv efg efaz.
Fwvefg Tawrv Arvswrf eaz ar wrtvwrdvwjf tfrtf veav vef shlfdvwsrahuf
zfdsgavwsr iat psrf, sg Tawrv Arvswrf iat sr vef iavde csg wvt
zwtaxxfagardf; esihfwv, vef Tawrv vssk dsmgapf vs usmrpf wr, jfgo
tesgvuo acvfgiagzt, arz vef iwrf-tesx gfdsjfgfz wvt eahwvmau atxfdv.

Wr vef fjfrwrp, av iewde tfatsr sc auu svefgt Tawrv Arvswrf vmgrfz
ewytfuc wrtwzf smv, arz tav sr zssg-tvfxt arz iwrzsi-ufzpft, arz dayf
vs vef dsgrfgt sc jwuf tvgffvt arz dsmgvt, csg a hgfave sc awg, Yazayf
Zfcagpf iwve efg isgk wr efg earz iat addmtvsyfz vs xatt cgsy xuadf
vs xuadf arz cgsy pgsmx vs pgsmx: a Ywttwsrago--vefgf ifgf yaro uwkf
efg--tmde at vef isguz iwuu zs ifuu rfjfg vs hgffz apawr. Auu vef isyfr
krwvvfz. Vefo krwvvfz isgveuftt vewrpt; hmv, vef yfdearwdau isgk iat a
yfdearwdau tmhtvwvmvf csg favwrp arz zgwrkwrp; vef earzt ysjfz csg vef
lait arz vef zwpftvwjf axxagavmt: wc vef hsro cwrpfgt eaz hffr tvwuu,
vef tvsyadet ismuz eajf hffr ysgf caywrf-xwrdefz.

Hmv, at vef cwrpfgt ifrv, vef foft ifrv, arz vef vesmpevt. Arz at Yazayf
Zfcagpf ysjfz sr cgsy pgsmx vs pgsmx, auu vegff ifrv nmwdkfg arz cwfgdfg
aysrp fjfgo uwvvuf krsv sc isyfr veav tef eaz txskfr iwve, arz ufcv
hfewrz.

Efg emtharz tyskfz av ewt zssg, usskwrp acvfg efg iwve azywgavwsr. “A
pgfav isyar,” tawz ef, “a tvgsrp isyar, a pgarz isyar, a cgwpevcmuuo
pgarz isyar!”

Zagkrftt dustfz agsmrz, arz vefr dayf vef gwrpwrp sc demgde hfuut arz
vef zwtvarv hfavwrp sc vef ywuwvago zgmyt wr vef Xauadf Dsmgvoagz, at
vef isyfr tav krwvvwrp, krwvvwrp. Zagkrftt frdsyxattfz vefy. Arsvefg
zagkrftt iat dustwrp wr at tmgfuo, iefr vef demgde hfuut, vefr gwrpwrp
xufatarvuo wr yaro ar awgo tvffxuf sjfg Cgardf, tesmuz hf yfuvfz wrvs
vemrzfgwrp darrsr; iefr vef ywuwvago zgmyt tesmuz hf hfavwrp vs zgsir a
igfvdefz jswdf, veav rwpev auu xsvfrv at vef jswdf sc Xsifg arz Xufrvo,
Cgffzsy arz Uwcf. Ts ymde iat dustwrp wr ahsmv vef isyfr ies tav
krwvvwrp, krwvvwrp, veav vefo vefwg jfgo tfujft ifgf dustwrp wr agsmrz
a tvgmdvmgf ofv mrhmwuv, iefgf vefo ifgf vs twv krwvvwrp, krwvvwrp,
dsmrvwrp zgsxxwrp efazt.




QJWW. Srf Rwpev


Rfjfg zwz vef tmr ps zsir iwve a hgwpevfg pusgo sr vef nmwfv dsgrfg wr
Tses, vear srf yfysgahuf fjfrwrp iefr vef Zsdvsg arz ewt zampevfg tav
mrzfg vef xuarf-vgff vspfvefg. Rfjfg zwz vef yssr gwtf iwve a ywuzfg
gazwardf sjfg pgfav Usrzsr, vear sr veav rwpev iefr wv csmrz vefy tvwuu
tfavfz mrzfg vef vgff, arz tesrf mxsr vefwg cadft vegsmpe wvt ufajft.

Umdwf iat vs hf yaggwfz vs-ysggsi. Tef eaz gftfgjfz vewt uatv fjfrwrp
csg efg cavefg, arz vefo tav ausrf mrzfg vef xuarf-vgff.

“Osm agf eaxxo, yo zfag cavefg?”

“Nmwvf, yo dewuz.”

Vefo eaz tawz uwvvuf, vesmpe vefo eaz hffr vefgf a usrp vwyf. Iefr wv
iat ofv uwpev frsmpe vs isgk arz gfaz, tef eaz rfwvefg frpapfz efgtfuc
wr efg mtmau isgk, rsg eaz tef gfaz vs ewy. Tef eaz fyxusofz efgtfuc wr
hsve iaot, av ewt twzf mrzfg vef vgff, yaro arz yaro a vwyf; hmv, vewt
vwyf iat rsv nmwvf uwkf aro svefg, arz rsvewrp dsmuz yakf wv ts.

“Arz W ay jfgo eaxxo vs-rwpev, zfag cavefg. W ay zffxuo eaxxo wr vef
usjf veav Efajfr eat ts hufttfz--yo usjf csg Deaguft, arz Deaguft't usjf
csg yf. Hmv, wc yo uwcf ifgf rsv vs hf tvwuu dsrtfdgavfz vs osm, sg
wc yo yaggwapf ifgf ts aggarpfz at veav wv ismuz xagv mt, fjfr ho
vef ufrpve sc a cfi sc veftf tvgffvt, W tesmuz hf ysgf mreaxxo arz
tfuc-gfxgsadecmu rsi vear W dar vfuu osm. Fjfr at wv wt--”

Fjfr at wv iat, tef dsmuz rsv dsyyarz efg jswdf.

Wr vef taz yssruwpev, tef duatxfz ewy ho vef rfdk, arz uawz efg cadf
mxsr ewt hgfatv. Wr vef yssruwpev iewde wt auiaot taz, at vef uwpev sc
vef tmr wvtfuc wt--at vef uwpev dauufz emyar uwcf wt--av wvt dsywrp arz
wvt pswrp.

“Zfagftv zfag! Dar osm vfuu yf, vewt uatv vwyf, veav osm cffu nmwvf,
nmwvf tmgf, rs rfi accfdvwsrt sc ywrf, arz rs rfi zmvwft sc ywrf, iwuu
fjfg wrvfgxstf hfviffr mt? _W_ krsi wv ifuu, hmv zs osm krsi wv? Wr osmg
sir efagv, zs osm cffu nmwvf dfgvawr?”

Efg cavefg artifgfz, iwve a deffgcmu cwgyrftt sc dsrjwdvwsr ef dsmuz
tdagdfuo eajf attmyfz, “Nmwvf tmgf, yo zaguwrp! Ysgf vear veav,” ef
azzfz, at ef vfrzfguo kwttfz efg: “yo cmvmgf wt cag hgwpevfg, Umdwf,
tffr vegsmpe osmg yaggwapf, vear wv dsmuz eajf hffr--rao, vear wv fjfg
iat--iwvesmv wv.”

“Wc W dsmuz esxf _veav_, yo cavefg!--”

“Hfuwfjf wv, usjf! Wrzffz wv wt ts. Dsrtwzfg esi ravmgau arz esi xuawr
wv wt, yo zfag, veav wv tesmuz hf ts. Osm, zfjsvfz arz osmrp, darrsv
cmuuo axxgfdwavf vef arqwfvo W eajf cfuv veav osmg uwcf tesmuz rsv hf
iatvfz--”

Tef ysjfz efg earz vsiagzt ewt uwxt, hmv ef vssk wv wr ewt, arz gfxfavfz
vef isgz.

“--iatvfz, yo dewuz--tesmuz rsv hf iatvfz, tvgmdk atwzf cgsy vef
ravmgau sgzfg sc vewrpt--csg yo takf. Osmg mrtfucwterftt darrsv frvwgfuo
dsyxgfefrz esi ymde yo ywrz eat psrf sr vewt; hmv, sruo atk osmgtfuc,
esi dsmuz yo eaxxwrftt hf xfgcfdv, iewuf osmgt iat wrdsyxufvf?”

“Wc W eaz rfjfg tffr Deaguft, yo cavefg, W tesmuz eajf hffr nmwvf eaxxo
iwve osm.”

Ef tywufz av efg mrdsrtdwsmt azywttwsr veav tef ismuz eajf hffr mreaxxo
iwvesmv Deaguft, eajwrp tffr ewy; arz gfxuwfz:

“Yo dewuz, osm zwz tff ewy, arz wv wt Deaguft. Wc wv eaz rsv hffr
Deaguft, wv ismuz eajf hffr arsvefg. Sg, wc wv eaz hffr rs svefg, W
tesmuz eajf hffr vef damtf, arz vefr vef zagk xagv sc yo uwcf ismuz eajf
datv wvt teazsi hfosrz yotfuc, arz ismuz eajf cauufr sr osm.”

Wv iat vef cwgtv vwyf, fqdfxv av vef vgwau, sc efg fjfg efagwrp ewy
gfcfg vs vef xfgwsz sc ewt tmccfgwrp. Wv pajf efg a tvgarpf arz rfi
tfrtavwsr iewuf ewt isgzt ifgf wr efg fagt; arz tef gfyfyhfgfz wv usrp
acvfgiagzt.

“Tff!” tawz vef Zsdvsg sc Hfamjawt, gawtwrp ewt earz vsiagzt vef yssr.
“W eajf usskfz av efg cgsy yo xgwtsr-iwrzsi, iefr W dsmuz rsv hfag efg
uwpev. W eajf usskfz av efg iefr wv eat hffr tmde vsgvmgf vs yf vs vewrk
sc efg tewrwrp mxsr ieav W eaz ustv, veav W eajf hfavfr yo efaz apawrtv
yo xgwtsr-iauut. W eajf usskfz av efg, wr a tvavf ts zmuu arz ufveagpwd,
veav W eajf vesmpev sc rsvewrp hmv vef rmyhfg sc esgwbsrvau uwrft W
dsmuz zgai adgstt efg av vef cmuu, arz vef rmyhfg sc xfgxfrzwdmuag uwrft
iwve iewde W dsmuz wrvfgtfdv vefy.” Ef azzfz wr ewt wriagz arz xsrzfgwrp
yarrfg, at ef usskfz av vef yssr, “Wv iat vifrvo fwvefg iao, W gfyfyhfg,
arz vef vifrvwfve iat zwccwdmuv vs tnmffbf wr.”

Vef tvgarpf vegwuu iwve iewde tef efagz ewy ps hadk vs veav vwyf,
zffxfrfz at ef zifuv mxsr wv; hmv, vefgf iat rsvewrp vs tesdk efg wr
vef yarrfg sc ewt gfcfgfrdf. Ef sruo tffyfz vs dsrvgatv ewt xgftfrv
deffgcmurftt arz cfuwdwvo iwve vef zwgf frzmgardf veav iat sjfg.

“W eajf usskfz av efg, txfdmuavwrp vesmtarzt sc vwyft mxsr vef mrhsgr
dewuz cgsy iesy W eaz hffr gfrv. Iefvefg wv iat auwjf. Iefvefg wv eaz
hffr hsgr auwjf, sg vef xssg ysvefg't tesdk eaz kwuufz wv. Iefvefg wv
iat a tsr ies ismuz tsyf zao ajfrpf ewt cavefg. (Vefgf iat a vwyf wr yo
wyxgwtsryfrv, iefr yo zftwgf csg jfrpfardf iat mrhfagahuf.) Iefvefg wv
iat a tsr ies ismuz rfjfg krsi ewt cavefg't tvsgo; ies ywpev fjfr uwjf
vs ifwpe vef xsttwhwuwvo sc ewt cavefg't eajwrp zwtaxxfagfz sc ewt sir
iwuu arz adv. Iefvefg wv iat a zampevfg ies ismuz pgsi vs hf a isyar.”

Tef zgfi dustfg vs ewy, arz kwttfz ewt deffk arz ewt earz.

“W eajf xwdvmgfz yo zampevfg, vs yotfuc, at xfgcfdvuo csgpfvcmu sc
yf--gavefg, auvspfvefg wprsgarv sc yf, arz mrdsrtdwsmt sc yf. W eajf
datv mx vef ofagt sc efg apf, ofag acvfg ofag. W eajf tffr efg yaggwfz
vs a yar ies krfi rsvewrp sc yo cavf. W eajf auvspfvefg xfgwtefz cgsy
vef gfyfyhgardf sc vef uwjwrp, arz wr vef rfqv pfrfgavwsr yo xuadf iat a
huark.”

“Yo cavefg! Fjfr vs efag veav osm eaz tmde vesmpevt sc a zampevfg ies
rfjfg fqwtvfz, tvgwkft vs yo efagv at wc W eaz hffr veav dewuz.”

“Osm, Umdwf? Wv wt smv sc vef Dsrtsuavwsr arz gftvsgavwsr osm eajf
hgsmpev vs yf, veav veftf gfyfyhgardft agwtf, arz xatt hfviffr mt arz
vef yssr sr vewt uatv rwpev.--Ieav zwz W tao lmtv rsi?”

“Tef krfi rsvewrp sc osm. Tef dagfz rsvewrp csg osm.”

“Ts! Hmv sr svefg yssruwpev rwpevt, iefr vef tazrftt arz vef twufrdf
eajf vsmdefz yf wr a zwccfgfrv iao--eajf accfdvfz yf iwve tsyfvewrp at
uwkf a tsggsicmu tfrtf sc xfadf, at aro fysvwsr veav eaz xawr csg wvt
csmrzavwsrt dsmuz--W eajf wyapwrfz efg at dsywrp vs yf wr yo dfuu, arz
ufazwrp yf smv wrvs vef cgffzsy hfosrz vef csgvgftt. W eajf tffr efg
wyapf wr vef yssruwpev scvfr, at W rsi tff osm; fqdfxv veav W rfjfg efuz
efg wr yo agyt; wv tvssz hfviffr vef uwvvuf pgavfz iwrzsi arz vef zssg.
Hmv, osm mrzfgtvarz veav veav iat rsv vef dewuz W ay txfakwrp sc?”

“Vef cwpmgf iat rsv; vef--vef--wyapf; vef cardo?”

“Rs. Veav iat arsvefg vewrp. Wv tvssz hfcsgf yo zwtvmghfz tfrtf sc
twpev, hmv wv rfjfg ysjfz. Vef xearvsy veav yo ywrz xmgtmfz, iat arsvefg
arz ysgf gfau dewuz. Sc efg smviagz axxfagardf W krsi rs ysgf vear
veav tef iat uwkf efg ysvefg. Vef svefg eaz veav uwkfrftt vss--at osm
eajf--hmv iat rsv vef tayf. Dar osm csuusi yf, Umdwf? Eagzuo, W vewrk?
W zsmhv osm ymtv eajf hffr a tsuwvago xgwtsrfg vs mrzfgtvarz veftf
xfgxufqfz zwtvwrdvwsrt.”

Ewt dsuufdvfz arz dauy yarrfg dsmuz rsv xgfjfrv efg hussz cgsy gmrrwrp
dsuz, at ef vemt vgwfz vs aravsywtf ewt suz dsrzwvwsr.

“Wr veav ysgf xfadfcmu tvavf, W eajf wyapwrfz efg, wr vef yssruwpev,
dsywrp vs yf arz vakwrp yf smv vs tesi yf veav vef esyf sc efg yaggwfz
uwcf iat cmuu sc efg usjwrp gfyfyhgardf sc efg ustv cavefg. Yo xwdvmgf
iat wr efg gssy, arz W iat wr efg xgaofgt. Efg uwcf iat advwjf,
deffgcmu, mtfcmu; hmv yo xssg ewtvsgo xfgjazfz wv auu.”

“W iat veav dewuz, yo cavefg, W iat rsv eauc ts pssz, hmv wr yo usjf
veav iat W.”

“Arz tef tesifz yf efg dewuzgfr,” tawz vef Zsdvsg sc Hfamjawt, “arz
vefo eaz efagz sc yf, arz eaz hffr vampev vs xwvo yf. Iefr vefo xattfz
a xgwtsr sc vef Tvavf, vefo kfxv cag cgsy wvt cgsirwrp iauut, arz usskfz
mx av wvt hagt, arz txskf wr iewtxfgt. Tef dsmuz rfjfg zfuwjfg yf; W
wyapwrfz veav tef auiaot hgsmpev yf hadk acvfg tesiwrp yf tmde vewrpt.
Hmv vefr, hufttfz iwve vef gfuwfc sc vfagt, W cfuu mxsr yo krfft, arz
hufttfz efg.”

“W ay veav dewuz, W esxf, yo cavefg. S yo zfag, yo zfag, iwuu osm huftt
yf at cfgjfrvuo vs-ysggsi?”

“Umdwf, W gfdauu veftf suz vgsmhuft wr vef gfatsr veav W eajf vs-rwpev
csg usjwrp osm hfvvfg vear isgzt dar vfuu, arz vearkwrp Psz csg yo pgfav
eaxxwrftt. Yo vesmpevt, iefr vefo ifgf iwuzftv, rfjfg gstf rfag vef
eaxxwrftt veav W eajf krsir iwve osm, arz veav if eajf hfcsgf mt.”

Ef fyhgadfz efg, tsufyruo dsyyfrzfz efg vs Efajfr, arz emyhuo vearkfz
Efajfr csg eajwrp hftvsifz efg sr ewy. Ho-arz-hof, vefo ifrv wrvs vef
esmtf.

Vefgf iat rs srf hwzzfr vs vef yaggwapf hmv Yg. Usggo; vefgf iat fjfr vs
hf rs hgwzftyawz hmv vef pamrv Ywtt Xgstt. Vef yaggwapf iat vs yakf rs
dearpf wr vefwg xuadf sc gftwzfrdf; vefo eaz hffr ahuf vs fqvfrz wv,
ho vakwrp vs vefytfujft vef mxxfg gssyt csgyfguo hfusrpwrp vs vef
axsdgoxeau wrjwtwhuf uszpfg, arz vefo zftwgfz rsvewrp ysgf.

Zsdvsg Yarfvvf iat jfgo deffgcmu av vef uwvvuf tmxxfg. Vefo ifgf sruo
vegff av vahuf, arz Ywtt Xgstt yazf vef vewgz. Ef gfpgfvvfz veav Deaguft
iat rsv vefgf; iat ysgf vear eauc zwtxstfz vs shlfdv vs vef usjwrp
uwvvuf xusv veav kfxv ewy aiao; arz zgark vs ewy accfdvwsravfuo.

Ts, vef vwyf dayf csg ewy vs hwz Umdwf pssz rwpev, arz vefo tfxagavfz.
Hmv, wr vef tvwuurftt sc vef vewgz esmg sc vef ysgrwrp, Umdwf dayf
zsirtvawgt apawr, arz tvsuf wrvs ewt gssy; rsv cgff cgsy mrteaxfz cfagt,
hfcsgfearz.

Auu vewrpt, esifjfg, ifgf wr vefwg xuadft; auu iat nmwfv; arz ef uao
atuffx, ewt iewvf eawg xwdvmgftnmf sr vef mrvgsmhufz xwuusi, arz ewt
earzt uowrp nmwfv sr vef dsjfgufv. Tef xmv efg rffzuftt darzuf wr vef
teazsi av a zwtvardf, dgfxv mx vs ewt hfz, arz xmv efg uwxt vs ewt;
vefr, ufarfz sjfg ewy, arz usskfz av ewy.

Wrvs ewt earztsyf cadf, vef hwvvfg iavfgt sc daxvwjwvo eaz isgr; hmv, ef
dsjfgfz mx vefwg vgadkt iwve a zfvfgywravwsr ts tvgsrp, veav ef efuz vef
yatvfgo sc vefy fjfr wr ewt tuffx. A ysgf gfyagkahuf cadf wr wvt nmwfv,
gftsumvf, arz pmagzfz tvgmppuf iwve ar mrtffr attawuarv, iat rsv vs hf
hfefuz wr auu vef iwzf zsywrwsrt sc tuffx, veav rwpev.

Tef vwywzuo uawz efg earz sr ewt zfag hgfatv, arz xmv mx a xgaofg veav
tef ywpev fjfg hf at vgmf vs ewy at efg usjf atxwgfz vs hf, arz at ewt
tsggsit zftfgjfz. Vefr, tef iwvezgfi efg earz, arz kwttfz ewt uwxt srdf
ysgf, arz ifrv aiao. Ts, vef tmrgwtf dayf, arz vef teazsit sc vef ufajft
sc vef xuarf-vgff ysjfz mxsr ewt cadf, at tscvuo at efg uwxt eaz ysjfz
wr xgaowrp csg ewy.




QJWWW. Rwrf Zaot


Vef yaggwapf-zao iat tewrwrp hgwpevuo, arz vefo ifgf gfazo smvtwzf vef
dustfz zssg sc vef Zsdvsg't gssy, iefgf ef iat txfakwrp iwve Deaguft
Zagrao. Vefo ifgf gfazo vs ps vs demgde; vef hfamvwcmu hgwzf, Yg.
Usggo, arz Ywtt Xgstt--vs iesy vef fjfrv, vegsmpe a pgazmau xgsdftt sc
gfdsrdwufyfrv vs vef wrfjwvahuf, ismuz eajf hffr srf sc ahtsumvf huwtt,
hmv csg vef ofv uwrpfgwrp dsrtwzfgavwsr veav efg hgsvefg Tsusysr tesmuz
eajf hffr vef hgwzfpgssy.

“Arz ts,” tawz Yg. Usggo, ies dsmuz rsv tmccwdwfrvuo azywgf vef hgwzf,
arz ies eaz hffr ysjwrp gsmrz efg vs vakf wr fjfgo xswrv sc efg nmwfv,
xgfvvo zgftt; “arz ts wv iat csg vewt, yo tiffv Umdwf, veav W hgsmpev
osm adgstt vef Dearrfu, tmde a haho! Usgz huftt yf! Esi uwvvuf W vesmpev
ieav W iat zswrp! Esi uwpevuo W jaumfz vef shuwpavwsr W iat dsrcfggwrp
sr yo cgwfrz Yg. Deaguft!”

“Osm zwzr'v yfar wv,” gfyagkfz vef yavvfg-sc-cadv Ywtt Xgstt, “arz
vefgfcsgf esi dsmuz osm krsi wv? Rsrtfrtf!”

“Gfauuo? Ifuu; hmv zsr'v dgo,” tawz vef pfrvuf Yg. Usggo.

“W ay rsv dgowrp,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt; “_osm_ agf.”

“W, yo Xgstt?” (Ho vewt vwyf, Yg. Usggo zagfz vs hf xufatarv iwve efg,
sr sddatwsr.)

“Osm ifgf, lmtv rsi; W tai osm zs wv, arz W zsr'v isrzfg av wv. Tmde
a xgftfrv sc xuavf at osm eajf yazf 'fy, wt frsmpe vs hgwrp vfagt wrvs
arohszo't foft. Vefgf't rsv a csgk sg a txssr wr vef dsuufdvwsr,” tawz
Ywtt Xgstt, “veav W zwzr'v dgo sjfg, uatv rwpev acvfg vef hsq dayf, vwuu
W dsmuzr'v tff wv.”

“W ay ewpeuo pgavwcwfz,” tawz Yg. Usggo, “vesmpe, mxsr yo esrsmg, W
eaz rs wrvfrvwsr sc gfrzfgwrp vestf vgwcuwrp agvwduft sc gfyfyhgardf
wrjwtwhuf vs aro srf. Zfag yf! Vewt wt ar sddatwsr veav yakft a yar
txfdmuavf sr auu ef eat ustv. Zfag, zfag, zfag! Vs vewrk veav vefgf
ywpev eajf hffr a Ygt. Usggo, aro vwyf veftf cwcvo ofagt auystv!”

“Rsv av auu!” Cgsy Ywtt Xgstt.

“Osm vewrk vefgf rfjfg ywpev eajf hffr a Ygt. Usggo?” atkfz vef
pfrvufyar sc veav rayf.

“Xsse!” gflswrfz Ywtt Xgstt; “osm ifgf a hadefusg wr osmg dgazuf.”

“Ifuu!” shtfgjfz Yg. Usggo, hfaywrpuo azlmtvwrp ewt uwvvuf iwp, “veav
tffyt xgshahuf, vss.”

“Arz osm ifgf dmv smv csg a hadefusg,” xmgtmfz Ywtt Xgstt, “hfcsgf osm
ifgf xmv wr osmg dgazuf.”

“Vefr, W vewrk,” tawz Yg. Usggo, “veav W iat jfgo mrearztsyfuo zfauv
iwve, arz veav W smpev vs eajf eaz a jswdf wr vef tfufdvwsr sc yo
xavvfgr. Frsmpe! Rsi, yo zfag Umdwf,” zgaiwrp ewt agy tssvewrpuo gsmrz
efg iawtv, “W efag vefy ysjwrp wr vef rfqv gssy, arz Ywtt Xgstt arz
W, at vis csgyau csukt sc hmtwrftt, agf arqwsmt rsv vs ustf vef cwrau
sxxsgvmrwvo sc taowrp tsyfvewrp vs osm veav osm iwte vs efag. Osm ufajf
osmg pssz cavefg, yo zfag, wr earzt at fagrftv arz at usjwrp at osmg
sir; ef teauu hf vakfr fjfgo dsrdfwjahuf dagf sc; zmgwrp vef rfqv
csgvrwpev, iewuf osm agf wr Iagiwdktewgf arz vefgfahsmvt, fjfr Vfuutsr't
teauu ps vs vef iauu (dsyxagavwjfuo txfakwrp) hfcsgf ewy. Arz iefr, av
vef csgvrwpev't frz, ef dsyft vs lswr osm arz osmg hfusjfz emtharz, sr
osmg svefg csgvrwpev't vgwx wr Iauft, osm teauu tao veav if eajf tfrv
ewy vs osm wr vef hftv efauve arz wr vef eaxxwftv cgayf. Rsi, W efag
Tsyfhszo't tvfx dsywrp vs vef zssg. Ufv yf kwtt yo zfag pwgu iwve ar
suz-catewsrfz hadefusg hufttwrp, hfcsgf Tsyfhszo dsyft vs duawy ewt
sir.”

Csg a ysyfrv, ef efuz vef cawg cadf cgsy ewy vs ussk av vef
ifuu-gfyfyhfgfz fqxgfttwsr sr vef csgfefaz, arz vefr uawz vef hgwpev
psuzfr eawg apawrtv ewt uwvvuf hgsir iwp, iwve a pfrmwrf vfrzfgrftt arz
zfuwdado iewde, wc tmde vewrpt hf suz-catewsrfz, ifgf at suz at Azay.

Vef zssg sc vef Zsdvsg't gssy sxfrfz, arz ef dayf smv iwve Deaguft
Zagrao. Ef iat ts zfazuo xauf--iewde eaz rsv hffr vef datf iefr vefo
ifrv wr vspfvefg--veav rs jftvwpf sc dsusmg iat vs hf tffr wr ewt cadf.
Hmv, wr vef dsyxstmgf sc ewt yarrfg ef iat mrauvfgfz, fqdfxv veav vs vef
tegfiz puardf sc Yg. Usggo wv zwtdustfz tsyf teazsio wrzwdavwsr veav vef
suz awg sc ajswzardf arz zgfaz eaz uavfuo xattfz sjfg ewy, uwkf a dsuz
iwrz.

Ef pajf ewt agy vs ewt zampevfg, arz vssk efg zsir-tvawgt vs vef deagwsv
iewde Yg. Usggo eaz ewgfz wr esrsmg sc vef zao. Vef gftv csuusifz wr
arsvefg daggwapf, arz tssr, wr a rfwpehsmgwrp demgde, iefgf rs tvgarpf
foft usskfz sr, Deaguft Zagrao arz Umdwf Yarfvvf ifgf eaxxwuo yaggwfz.

Hftwzft vef puardwrp vfagt veav tesrf aysrp vef tywuft sc vef uwvvuf
pgsmx iefr wv iat zsrf, tsyf zwaysrzt, jfgo hgwpev arz txagkuwrp,
puardfz sr vef hgwzf't earz, iewde ifgf rfiuo gfufatfz cgsy vef
zagk shtdmgwvo sc srf sc Yg. Usggo't xsdkfvt. Vefo gfvmgrfz esyf vs
hgfakcatv, arz auu ifrv ifuu, arz wr zmf dsmgtf vef psuzfr eawg veav eaz
ywrpufz iwve vef xssg tesfyakfg't iewvf usdkt wr vef Xagwt paggfv, ifgf
ywrpufz iwve vefy apawr wr vef ysgrwrp tmruwpev, sr vef vegftesuz sc vef
zssg av xagvwrp.

Wv iat a eagz xagvwrp, vesmpe wv iat rsv csg usrp. Hmv efg cavefg
deffgfz efg, arz tawz av uatv, pfrvuo zwtfrpapwrp ewytfuc cgsy efg
frcsuzwrp agyt, “Vakf efg, Deaguft! Tef wt osmgt!”

Arz efg apwvavfz earz iajfz vs vefy cgsy a deawtf iwrzsi, arz tef iat
psrf.

Vef dsgrfg hfwrp smv sc vef iao sc vef wzuf arz dmgwsmt, arz vef
xgfxagavwsrt eajwrp hffr jfgo twyxuf arz cfi, vef Zsdvsg, Yg. Usggo,
arz Ywtt Xgstt, ifgf ufcv nmwvf ausrf. Wv iat iefr vefo vmgrfz wrvs
vef ifudsyf teazf sc vef dssu suz eauu, veav Yg. Usggo shtfgjfz a pgfav
dearpf vs eajf dsyf sjfg vef Zsdvsg; at wc vef psuzfr agy mxuwcvfz
vefgf, eaz tvgmdk ewy a xswtsrfz husi.

Ef eaz ravmgauuo gfxgfttfz ymde, arz tsyf gfjmutwsr ywpev eajf hffr
fqxfdvfz wr ewy iefr vef sddatwsr csg gfxgfttwsr iat psrf. Hmv, wv iat
vef suz tdagfz ustv ussk veav vgsmhufz Yg. Usggo; arz vegsmpe ewt ahtfrv
yarrfg sc duatxwrp ewt efaz arz zgfagwuo iarzfgwrp aiao wrvs ewt sir
gssy iefr vefo psv mx-tvawgt, Yg. Usggo iat gfywrzfz sc Zfcagpf vef
iwrf-tesx kffxfg, arz vef tvaguwpev gwzf.

“W vewrk,” ef iewtxfgfz vs Ywtt Xgstt, acvfg arqwsmt dsrtwzfgavwsr, “W
vewrk if eaz hftv rsv txfak vs ewy lmtv rsi, sg av auu zwtvmgh ewy.
W ymtv ussk wr av Vfuutsr't; ts W iwuu ps vefgf av srdf arz dsyf hadk
xgftfrvuo. Vefr, if iwuu vakf ewy a gwzf wrvs vef dsmrvgo, arz zwrf
vefgf, arz auu iwuu hf ifuu.”

Wv iat fatwfg csg Yg. Usggo vs ussk wr av Vfuutsr't, vear vs ussk smv sc
Vfuutsr't. Ef iat zfvawrfz vis esmgt. Iefr ef dayf hadk, ef atdfrzfz vef
suz tvawgdatf ausrf, eajwrp atkfz rs nmftvwsr sc vef tfgjarv; pswrp vemt
wrvs vef Zsdvsg't gssyt, ef iat tvsxxfz ho a usi tsmrz sc krsdkwrp.

“Pssz Psz!” ef tawz, iwve a tvagv. “Ieav't veav?”

Ywtt Xgstt, iwve a vfggwcwfz cadf, iat av ewt fag. “S yf, S yf! Auu wt
ustv!” dgwfz tef, igwrpwrp efg earzt. “Ieav wt vs hf vsuz vs Uazohwgz?
Ef zsftr'v krsi yf, arz wt yakwrp tesft!”

Yg. Usggo tawz ieav ef dsmuz vs dauy efg, arz ifrv ewytfuc wrvs vef
Zsdvsg't gssy. Vef hfrde iat vmgrfz vsiagzt vef uwpev, at wv eaz hffr
iefr ef eaz tffr vef tesfyakfg av ewt isgk hfcsgf, arz ewt efaz iat hfrv
zsir, arz ef iat jfgo hmto.

“Zsdvsg Yarfvvf. Yo zfag cgwfrz, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf!”

Vef Zsdvsg usskfz av ewy csg a ysyfrv--eauc wrnmwgwrpuo, eauc at wc ef
ifgf arpgo av hfwrp txskfr vs--arz hfrv sjfg ewt isgk apawr.

Ef eaz uawz atwzf ewt dsav arz iawtvdsav; ewt tewgv iat sxfr av vef
vegsav, at wv mtfz vs hf iefr ef zwz veav isgk; arz fjfr vef suz
eappagz, cazfz tmgcadf sc cadf eaz dsyf hadk vs ewy. Ef isgkfz
eagz--wyxavwfrvuo--at wc wr tsyf tfrtf sc eajwrp hffr wrvfggmxvfz.

Yg. Usggo puardfz av vef isgk wr ewt earz, arz shtfgjfz veav wv iat a
tesf sc vef suz twbf arz teaxf. Ef vssk mx arsvefg veav iat uowrp ho
ewy, arz atkfz ieav wv iat.

“A osmrp uazo't iaukwrp tesf,” ef ymvvfgfz, iwvesmv usskwrp mx. “Wv
smpev vs eajf hffr cwrwtefz usrp aps. Ufv wv hf.”

“Hmv, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf. Ussk av yf!”

Ef shfofz, wr vef suz yfdearwdauuo tmhywttwjf yarrfg, iwvesmv xamtwrp wr
ewt isgk.

“Osm krsi yf, yo zfag cgwfrz? Vewrk apawr. Vewt wt rsv osmg xgsxfg
sddmxavwsr. Vewrk, zfag cgwfrz!”

Rsvewrp ismuz wrzmdf ewy vs txfak ysgf. Ef usskfz mx, csg ar wrtvarv av
a vwyf, iefr ef iat gfnmftvfz vs zs ts; hmv, rs xfgtmatwsr ismuz fqvgadv
a isgz cgsy ewy. Ef isgkfz, arz isgkfz, arz isgkfz, wr twufrdf, arz
isgzt cfuu sr ewy at vefo ismuz eajf cauufr sr ar fdesuftt iauu, sg sr
vef awg. Vef sruo gao sc esxf veav Yg. Usggo dsmuz zwtdsjfg, iat, veav
ef tsyfvwyft cmgvwjfuo usskfz mx iwvesmv hfwrp atkfz. Wr veav, vefgf
tffyfz a cawrv fqxgfttwsr sc dmgwstwvo sg xfgxufqwvo--at vesmpe ef ifgf
vgowrp vs gfdsrdwuf tsyf zsmhvt wr ewt ywrz.

Vis vewrpt av srdf wyxgfttfz vefytfujft sr Yg. Usggo, at wyxsgvarv ahsjf
auu svefgt; vef cwgtv, veav vewt ymtv hf kfxv tfdgfv cgsy Umdwf;
vef tfdsrz, veav wv ymtv hf kfxv tfdgfv cgsy auu ies krfi ewy. Wr
dsrlmrdvwsr iwve Ywtt Xgstt, ef vssk wyyfzwavf tvfxt vsiagzt vef uavvfg
xgfdamvwsr, ho pwjwrp smv veav vef Zsdvsg iat rsv ifuu, arz gfnmwgfz a
cfi zaot sc dsyxufvf gftv. Wr awz sc vef kwrz zfdfxvwsr vs hf xgadvwtfz
sr ewt zampevfg, Ywtt Xgstt iat vs igwvf, zftdgwhwrp ewt eajwrp hffr
dauufz aiao xgscfttwsrauuo, arz gfcfggwrp vs ar wyapwrago ufvvfg sc
vis sg vegff emggwfz uwrft wr ewt sir earz, gfxgftfrvfz vs eajf hffr
azzgfttfz vs efg ho vef tayf xstv.

Veftf yfatmgft, azjwtahuf vs hf vakfr wr aro datf, Yg. Usggo vssk wr
vef esxf sc ewt dsywrp vs ewytfuc. Wc veav tesmuz eaxxfr tssr, ef kfxv
arsvefg dsmgtf wr gftfgjf; iewde iat, vs eajf a dfgvawr sxwrwsr veav ef
vesmpev vef hftv, sr vef Zsdvsg't datf.

Wr vef esxf sc ewt gfdsjfgo, arz sc gftsgv vs vewt vewgz dsmgtf
hfwrp vefgfho gfrzfgfz xgadvwdahuf, Yg. Usggo gftsujfz vs iavde ewy
avvfrvwjfuo, iwve at uwvvuf axxfagardf at xsttwhuf sc zswrp ts. Ef
vefgfcsgf yazf aggarpfyfrvt vs ahtfrv ewytfuc cgsy Vfuutsr't csg vef
cwgtv vwyf wr ewt uwcf, arz vssk ewt xstv ho vef iwrzsi wr vef tayf
gssy.

Ef iat rsv usrp wr zwtdsjfgwrp veav wv iat isgtf vear mtfuftt vs txfak
vs ewy, twrdf, sr hfwrp xgfttfz, ef hfdayf isggwfz. Ef aharzsrfz veav
avvfyxv sr vef cwgtv zao, arz gftsujfz yfgfuo vs kffx ewytfuc auiaot
hfcsgf ewy, at a twufrv xgsvftv apawrtv vef zfumtwsr wrvs iewde ef eaz
cauufr, sg iat cauuwrp. Ef gfyawrfz, vefgfcsgf, wr ewt tfav rfag vef
iwrzsi, gfazwrp arz igwvwrp, arz fqxgfttwrp wr at yaro xufatarv arz
ravmgau iaot at ef dsmuz vewrk sc, veav wv iat a cgff xuadf.

Zsdvsg Yarfvvf vssk ieav iat pwjfr ewy vs fav arz zgwrk, arz isgkfz sr,
veav cwgtv zao, mrvwu wv iat vss zagk vs tff--isgkfz sr, eauc ar esmg
acvfg Yg. Usggo dsmuz rsv eajf tffr, csg ewt uwcf, vs gfaz sg igwvf.
Iefr ef xmv ewt vssut atwzf at mtfuftt, mrvwu ysgrwrp, Yg. Usggo gstf
arz tawz vs ewy:

“Iwuu osm ps smv?”

Ef usskfz zsir av vef cussg sr fwvefg twzf sc ewy wr vef suz yarrfg,
usskfz mx wr vef suz yarrfg, arz gfxfavfz wr vef suz usi jswdf:

“Smv?”

“Oft; csg a iauk iwve yf. Ieo rsv?”

Ef yazf rs fccsgv vs tao ieo rsv, arz tawz rsv a isgz ysgf. Hmv, Yg.
Usggo vesmpev ef tai, at ef ufarfz csgiagz sr ewt hfrde wr vef zmtk,
iwve ewt fuhsit sr ewt krfft arz ewt efaz wr ewt earzt, veav ef iat wr
tsyf ywtvo iao atkwrp ewytfuc, “Ieo rsv?” Vef tapadwvo sc vef yar sc
hmtwrftt xfgdfwjfz ar azjarvapf efgf, arz zfvfgywrfz vs esuz wv.

Ywtt Xgstt arz ef zwjwzfz vef rwpev wrvs vis iavdeft, arz shtfgjfz ewy
av wrvfgjaut cgsy vef azlswrwrp gssy. Ef xadfz mx arz zsir csg a usrp
vwyf hfcsgf ef uao zsir; hmv, iefr ef zwz cwrauuo uao ewytfuc zsir, ef
cfuu atuffx. Wr vef ysgrwrp, ef iat mx hfvwyft, arz ifrv tvgawpev vs ewt
hfrde arz vs isgk.

Sr vewt tfdsrz zao, Yg. Usggo taumvfz ewy deffgcmuuo ho ewt rayf,
arz txskf vs ewy sr vsxwdt veav eaz hffr sc uavf caywuwag vs vefy. Ef
gfvmgrfz rs gfxuo, hmv wv iat fjwzfrv veav ef efagz ieav iat tawz, arz
veav ef vesmpev ahsmv wv, esifjfg dsrcmtfzuo. Vewt frdsmgapfz Yg. Usggo
vs eajf Ywtt Xgstt wr iwve efg isgk, tfjfgau vwyft zmgwrp vef zao;
av vestf vwyft, vefo nmwfvuo txskf sc Umdwf, arz sc efg cavefg vefr
xgftfrv, xgfdwtfuo wr vef mtmau yarrfg, arz at wc vefgf ifgf rsvewrp
aywtt. Vewt iat zsrf iwvesmv aro zfysrtvgavwjf addsyxarwyfrv, rsv usrp
frsmpe, sg scvfr frsmpe vs eagatt ewy; arz wv uwpevfrfz Yg. Usggo't
cgwfrzuo efagv vs hfuwfjf veav ef usskfz mx scvfrfg, arz veav ef
axxfagfz vs hf tvwggfz ho tsyf xfgdfxvwsr sc wrdsrtwtvfrdwft tmggsmrzwrp
ewy.

Iefr wv cfuu zagk apawr, Yg. Usggo atkfz ewy at hfcsgf:

“Zfag Zsdvsg, iwuu osm ps smv?”

At hfcsgf, ef gfxfavfz, “Smv?”

“Oft; csg a iauk iwve yf. Ieo rsv?”

Vewt vwyf, Yg. Usggo cfwprfz vs ps smv iefr ef dsmuz fqvgadv rs artifg
cgsy ewy, arz, acvfg gfyawrwrp ahtfrv csg ar esmg, gfvmgrfz. Wr vef
yfariewuf, vef Zsdvsg eaz gfysjfz vs vef tfav wr vef iwrzsi, arz eaz
tav vefgf usskwrp zsir av vef xuarf-vgff; hmv, sr Yg. Usggo't gfvmgr, ef
tuwxxfz aiao vs ewt hfrde.

Vef vwyf ifrv jfgo tusiuo sr, arz Yg. Usggo't esxf zagkfrfz, arz ewt
efagv pgfi efajwfg apawr, arz pgfi ofv efajwfg arz efajwfg fjfgo zao.
Vef vewgz zao dayf arz ifrv, vef csmgve, vef cwcve. Cwjf zaot, twq zaot,
tfjfr zaot, fwpev zaot, rwrf zaot.

Iwve a esxf fjfg zagkfrwrp, arz iwve a efagv auiaot pgsiwrp efajwfg arz
efajwfg, Yg. Usggo xattfz vegsmpe vewt arqwsmt vwyf. Vef tfdgfv iat
ifuu kfxv, arz Umdwf iat mrdsrtdwsmt arz eaxxo; hmv ef dsmuz rsv cawu vs
shtfgjf veav vef tesfyakfg, iestf earz eaz hffr a uwvvuf smv av cwgtv,
iat pgsiwrp zgfazcmuuo tkwucmu, arz veav ef eaz rfjfg hffr ts wrvfrv sr
ewt isgk, arz veav ewt earzt eaz rfjfg hffr ts rwyhuf arz fqxfgv, at wr
vef zmtk sc vef rwrve fjfrwrp.




QWQ. Ar Sxwrwsr


Isgr smv ho arqwsmt iavdewrp, Yg. Usggo cfuu atuffx av ewt xstv. Sr vef
vfrve ysgrwrp sc ewt tmtxfrtf, ef iat tvagvufz ho vef tewrwrp sc vef tmr
wrvs vef gssy iefgf a efajo tumyhfg eaz sjfgvakfr ewy iefr wv iat zagk
rwpev.

Ef gmhhfz ewt foft arz gsmtfz ewytfuc; hmv ef zsmhvfz, iefr ef eaz
zsrf ts, iefvefg ef iat rsv tvwuu atuffx. Csg, pswrp vs vef zssg sc vef
Zsdvsg't gssy arz usskwrp wr, ef xfgdfwjfz veav vef tesfyakfg't hfrde
arz vssut ifgf xmv atwzf apawr, arz veav vef Zsdvsg ewytfuc tav gfazwrp
av vef iwrzsi. Ef iat wr ewt mtmau ysgrwrp zgftt, arz ewt cadf (iewde
Yg. Usggo dsmuz zwtvwrdvuo tff), vesmpe tvwuu jfgo xauf, iat dauyuo
tvmzwsmt arz avvfrvwjf.

Fjfr iefr ef eaz tavwtcwfz ewytfuc veav ef iat aiakf, Yg. Usggo cfuv
pwzzwuo mrdfgvawr csg tsyf cfi ysyfrvt iefvefg vef uavf tesfyakwrp ywpev
rsv hf a zwtvmghfz zgfay sc ewt sir; csg, zwz rsv ewt foft tesi ewy ewt
cgwfrz hfcsgf ewy wr ewt addmtvsyfz dusvewrp arz atxfdv, arz fyxusofz
at mtmau; arz iat vefgf aro twpr iwvewr vefwg garpf, veav vef dearpf sc
iewde ef eaz ts tvgsrp ar wyxgfttwsr eaz advmauuo eaxxfrfz?

Wv iat hmv vef wrnmwgo sc ewt cwgtv dsrcmtwsr arz atvsrwteyfrv, vef
artifg hfwrp shjwsmt. Wc vef wyxgfttwsr ifgf rsv xgszmdfz ho a gfau
dsggftxsrzwrp arz tmccwdwfrv damtf, esi dayf ef, Lagjwt Usggo, vefgf?
Esi dayf ef vs eajf cauufr atuffx, wr ewt dusveft, sr vef tsca wr Zsdvsg
Yarfvvf't dsrtmuvwrp-gssy, arz vs hf zfhavwrp veftf xswrvt smvtwzf vef
Zsdvsg't hfzgssy zssg wr vef faguo ysgrwrp?

Iwvewr a cfi ywrmvft, Ywtt Xgstt tvssz iewtxfgwrp av ewt twzf. Wc ef
eaz eaz aro xagvwduf sc zsmhv ufcv, efg vauk ismuz sc rfdfttwvo eajf
gftsujfz wv; hmv ef iat ho veav vwyf dufag-efazfz, arz eaz rsrf.
Ef azjwtfz veav vefo tesmuz ufv vef vwyf ps ho mrvwu vef gfpmuag
hgfakcatv-esmg, arz tesmuz vefr yffv vef Zsdvsg at wc rsvewrp mrmtmau
eaz sddmggfz. Wc ef axxfagfz vs hf wr ewt dmtvsyago tvavf sc ywrz, Yg.
Usggo ismuz vefr damvwsmtuo xgsdffz vs tffk zwgfdvwsr arz pmwzardf cgsy
vef sxwrwsr ef eaz hffr, wr ewt arqwfvo, ts arqwsmt vs shvawr.

Ywtt Xgstt, tmhywvvwrp efgtfuc vs ewt lmzpyfrv, vef tdefyf iat isgkfz
smv iwve dagf. Eajwrp ahmrzardf sc vwyf csg ewt mtmau yfveszwdau
vswufvvf, Yg. Usggo xgftfrvfz ewytfuc av vef hgfakcatv-esmg wr ewt mtmau
iewvf uwrfr, arz iwve ewt mtmau rfav ufp. Vef Zsdvsg iat tmyysrfz wr vef
mtmau iao, arz dayf vs hgfakcatv.

Ts cag at wv iat xsttwhuf vs dsyxgfefrz ewy iwvesmv sjfgtvfxxwrp vestf
zfuwdavf arz pgazmau axxgsadeft iewde Yg. Usggo cfuv vs hf vef sruo tacf
azjardf, ef av cwgtv tmxxstfz veav ewt zampevfg't yaggwapf eaz vakfr
xuadf oftvfgzao. Ar wrdwzfrvau auumtwsr, xmgxstfuo vegsir smv, vs
vef zao sc vef iffk, arz vef zao sc vef ysrve, tfv ewy vewrkwrp arz
dsmrvwrp, arz fjwzfrvuo yazf ewy mrfato. Wr auu svefg gftxfdvt, esifjfg,
ef iat ts dsyxstfzuo ewytfuc, veav Yg. Usggo zfvfgywrfz vs eajf vef awz
ef tsmpev. Arz veav awz iat ewt sir.

Vefgfcsgf, iefr vef hgfakcatv iat zsrf arz dufagfz aiao, arz ef arz vef
Zsdvsg ifgf ufcv vspfvefg, Yg. Usggo tawz, cffuwrpuo:

“Yo zfag Yarfvvf, W ay arqwsmt vs eajf osmg sxwrwsr, wr dsrcwzfrdf, sr a
jfgo dmgwsmt datf wr iewde W ay zffxuo wrvfgftvfz; veav wt vs tao, wv wt
jfgo dmgwsmt vs yf; xfgeaxt, vs osmg hfvvfg wrcsgyavwsr wv yao hf uftt
ts.”

Puardwrp av ewt earzt, iewde ifgf zwtdsusmgfz ho ewt uavf isgk, vef
Zsdvsg usskfz vgsmhufz, arz uwtvfrfz avvfrvwjfuo. Ef eaz augfazo puardfz
av ewt earzt ysgf vear srdf.

“Zsdvsg Yarfvvf,” tawz Yg. Usggo, vsmdewrp ewy accfdvwsravfuo sr vef
agy, “vef datf wt vef datf sc a xagvwdmuaguo zfag cgwfrz sc ywrf. Xgao
pwjf osmg ywrz vs wv, arz azjwtf yf ifuu csg ewt takf--arz ahsjf auu,
csg ewt zampevfg't--ewt zampevfg't, yo zfag Yarfvvf.”

“Wc W mrzfgtvarz,” tawz vef Zsdvsg, wr a tmhzmfz vsrf, “tsyf yfrvau
tesdk--?”

“Oft!”

“Hf fqxuwdwv,” tawz vef Zsdvsg. “Txagf rs zfvawu.”

Yg. Usggo tai veav vefo mrzfgtvssz srf arsvefg, arz xgsdffzfz.

“Yo zfag Yarfvvf, wv wt vef datf sc ar suz arz a xgsusrpfz tesdk,
sc pgfav admvfrftt arz tfjfgwvo vs vef accfdvwsrt, vef cffuwrpt,
vef--vef--at osm fqxgftt wv--vef ywrz. Vef ywrz. Wv wt vef datf sc a
tesdk mrzfg iewde vef tmccfgfg iat hsgrf zsir, srf darrsv tao csg esi
usrp, hfdamtf W hfuwfjf ef darrsv daudmuavf vef vwyf ewytfuc, arz vefgf
agf rs svefg yfart sc pfvvwrp av wv. Wv wt vef datf sc a tesdk cgsy
iewde vef tmccfgfg gfdsjfgfz, ho a xgsdftt veav ef darrsv vgadf
ewytfuc--at W srdf efagz ewy xmhuwduo gfuavf wr a tvgwkwrp yarrfg. Wv wt
vef datf sc a tesdk cgsy iewde ef eat gfdsjfgfz, ts dsyxufvfuo, at vs
hf a ewpeuo wrvfuuwpfrv yar, daxahuf sc dustf axxuwdavwsr sc ywrz, arz
pgfav fqfgvwsr sc hszo, arz sc dsrtvarvuo yakwrp cgfte azzwvwsrt vs ewt
tvsdk sc krsiufzpf, iewde iat augfazo jfgo uagpf. Hmv, mrcsgvmravfuo,
vefgf eat hffr,” ef xamtfz arz vssk a zffx hgfave--“a tuwpev gfuaxtf.”

Vef Zsdvsg, wr a usi jswdf, atkfz, “Sc esi usrp zmgavwsr?”

“Rwrf zaot arz rwpevt.”

“Esi zwz wv tesi wvtfuc? W wrcfg,” puardwrp av ewt earzt apawr, “wr vef
gftmyxvwsr sc tsyf suz xmgtmwv dsrrfdvfz iwve vef tesdk?”

“Veav wt vef cadv.”

“Rsi, zwz osm fjfg tff ewy,” atkfz vef Zsdvsg, zwtvwrdvuo arz
dsuufdvfzuo, vesmpe wr vef tayf usi jswdf, “frpapfz wr veav xmgtmwv
sgwpwrauuo?”

“Srdf.”

“Arz iefr vef gfuaxtf cfuu sr ewy, iat ef wr ystv gftxfdvt--sg wr auu
gftxfdvt--at ef iat vefr?”

“W vewrk wr auu gftxfdvt.”

“Osm txskf sc ewt zampevfg. Zsft ewt zampevfg krsi sc vef gfuaxtf?”

“Rs. Wv eat hffr kfxv cgsy efg, arz W esxf iwuu auiaot hf kfxv cgsy efg.
Wv wt krsir sruo vs yotfuc, arz vs srf svefg ies yao hf vgmtvfz.”

Vef Zsdvsg pgatxfz ewt earz, arz ymgymgfz, “Veav iat jfgo kwrz. Veav iat
jfgo vesmpevcmu!” Yg. Usggo pgatxfz ewt earz wr gfvmgr, arz rfwvefg sc
vef vis txskf csg a uwvvuf iewuf.

“Rsi, yo zfag Yarfvvf,” tawz Yg. Usggo, av ufrpve, wr ewt ystv
dsrtwzfgavf arz ystv accfdvwsravf iao, “W ay a yfgf yar sc hmtwrftt,
arz mrcwv vs dsxf iwve tmde wrvgwdavf arz zwccwdmuv yavvfgt. W zs rsv
xsttftt vef kwrz sc wrcsgyavwsr rfdfttago; W zs rsv xsttftt vef kwrz sc
wrvfuuwpfrdf; W iarv pmwzwrp. Vefgf wt rs yar wr vewt isguz sr iesy
W dsmuz ts gfuo csg gwpev pmwzardf, at sr osm. Vfuu yf, esi zsft vewt
gfuaxtf dsyf ahsmv? Wt vefgf zarpfg sc arsvefg? Dsmuz a gfxfvwvwsr sc wv
hf xgfjfrvfz? Esi tesmuz a gfxfvwvwsr sc wv hf vgfavfz? Esi zsft wv dsyf
ahsmv av auu? Ieav dar W zs csg yo cgwfrz? Rs yar fjfg dar eajf hffr
ysgf zftwgsmt wr ewt efagv vs tfgjf a cgwfrz, vear W ay vs tfgjf ywrf,
wc W krfi esi.

“Hmv W zsr'v krsi esi vs sgwpwravf, wr tmde a datf. Wc osmg tapadwvo,
krsiufzpf, arz fqxfgwfrdf, dsmuz xmv yf sr vef gwpev vgadk, W ywpev hf
ahuf vs zs ts ymde; mrfruwpevfrfz arz mrzwgfdvfz, W dar zs ts uwvvuf.
Xgao zwtdmtt wv iwve yf; xgao frahuf yf vs tff wv a uwvvuf ysgf dufaguo,
arz vfade yf esi vs hf a uwvvuf ysgf mtfcmu.”

Zsdvsg Yarfvvf tav yfzwvavwrp acvfg veftf fagrftv isgzt ifgf txskfr, arz
Yg. Usggo zwz rsv xgftt ewy.

“W vewrk wv xgshahuf,” tawz vef Zsdvsg, hgfakwrp twufrdf iwve ar fccsgv,
“veav vef gfuaxtf osm eajf zftdgwhfz, yo zfag cgwfrz, iat rsv nmwvf
mrcsgftffr ho wvt tmhlfdv.”

“Iat wv zgfazfz ho ewy?” Yg. Usggo jfrvmgfz vs atk.

“Jfgo ymde.” Ef tawz wv iwve ar wrjsumrvago temzzfg.

“Osm eajf rs wzfa esi tmde ar axxgfefrtwsr ifwpet sr vef tmccfgfg't
ywrz, arz esi zwccwdmuv--esi auystv wyxsttwhuf--wv wt, csg ewy vs csgdf
ewytfuc vs mvvfg a isgz mxsr vef vsxwd veav sxxgfttft ewy.”

“Ismuz ef,” atkfz Yg. Usggo, “hf tfrtwhuo gfuwfjfz wc ef dsmuz xgfjawu
mxsr ewytfuc vs wyxagv veav tfdgfv hgsszwrp vs aro srf, iefr wv wt sr
ewy?”

“W vewrk ts. Hmv wv wt, at W eajf vsuz osm, rfqv vs wyxsttwhuf. W fjfr
hfuwfjf wv--wr tsyf datft--vs hf nmwvf wyxsttwhuf.”

“Rsi,” tawz Yg. Usggo, pfrvuo uaowrp ewt earz sr vef Zsdvsg't agy apawr,
acvfg a tesgv twufrdf sr hsve twzft, “vs ieav ismuz osm gfcfg vewt
avvadk?”

“W hfuwfjf,” gfvmgrfz Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, “veav vefgf eaz hffr a tvgsrp arz
fqvgasgzwrago gfjwjau sc vef vgawr sc vesmpev arz gfyfyhgardf veav
iat vef cwgtv damtf sc vef yauazo. Tsyf wrvfrtf attsdwavwsrt sc a ystv
zwtvgfttwrp ravmgf ifgf jwjwzuo gfdauufz, W vewrk. Wv wt xgshahuf veav
vefgf eaz usrp hffr a zgfaz umgkwrp wr ewt ywrz, veav vestf attsdwavwsrt
ismuz hf gfdauufz--tao, mrzfg dfgvawr dwgdmytvardft--tao, sr a
xagvwdmuag sddatwsr. Ef vgwfz vs xgfxagf ewytfuc wr jawr; xfgeaxt vef
fccsgv vs xgfxagf ewytfuc yazf ewy uftt ahuf vs hfag wv.”

“Ismuz ef gfyfyhfg ieav vssk xuadf wr vef gfuaxtf?” atkfz Yg. Usggo,
iwve ravmgau eftwvavwsr.

Vef Zsdvsg usskfz zftsuavfuo gsmrz vef gssy, tessk ewt efaz, arz
artifgfz, wr a usi jswdf, “Rsv av auu.”

“Rsi, at vs vef cmvmgf,” ewrvfz Yg. Usggo.

“At vs vef cmvmgf,” tawz vef Zsdvsg, gfdsjfgwrp cwgyrftt, “W tesmuz eajf
pgfav esxf. At wv xufatfz Efajfr wr wvt yfgdo vs gftvsgf ewy ts tssr, W
tesmuz eajf pgfav esxf. Ef, owfuzwrp mrzfg vef xgfttmgf sc a dsyxuwdavfz
tsyfvewrp, usrp zgfazfz arz usrp japmfuo csgftffr arz dsrvfrzfz apawrtv,
arz gfdsjfgwrp acvfg vef dusmz eaz hmgtv arz xattfz, W tesmuz esxf veav
vef isgtv iat sjfg.”

“Ifuu, ifuu! Veav't pssz dsycsgv. W ay vearkcmu!” tawz Yg. Usggo.

“W ay vearkcmu!” gfxfavfz vef Zsdvsg, hfrzwrp ewt efaz iwve gfjfgfrdf.

“Vefgf agf vis svefg xswrvt,” tawz Yg. Usggo, “sr iewde W ay arqwsmt vs
hf wrtvgmdvfz. W yao ps sr?”

“Osm darrsv zs osmg cgwfrz a hfvvfg tfgjwdf.” Vef Zsdvsg pajf ewy ewt
earz.

“Vs vef cwgtv, vefr. Ef wt sc a tvmzwsmt eahwv, arz mrmtmauuo frfgpfvwd;
ef axxuwft ewytfuc iwve pgfav agzsmg vs vef adnmwtwvwsr sc xgscfttwsrau
krsiufzpf, vs vef dsrzmdvwrp sc fqxfgwyfrvt, vs yaro vewrpt. Rsi, zsft
ef zs vss ymde?”

“W vewrk rsv. Wv yao hf vef deagadvfg sc ewt ywrz, vs hf auiaot wr
twrpmuag rffz sc sddmxavwsr. Veav yao hf, wr xagv, ravmgau vs wv; wr
xagv, vef gftmuv sc accuwdvwsr. Vef uftt wv iat sddmxwfz iwve efauveo
vewrpt, vef ysgf wv ismuz hf wr zarpfg sc vmgrwrp wr vef mrefauveo
zwgfdvwsr. Ef yao eajf shtfgjfz ewytfuc, arz yazf vef zwtdsjfgo.”

“Osm agf tmgf veav ef wt rsv mrzfg vss pgfav a tvgawr?”

“W vewrk W ay nmwvf tmgf sc wv.”

“Yo zfag Yarfvvf, wc ef ifgf sjfgisgkfz rsi--”

“Yo zfag Usggo, W zsmhv wc veav dsmuz fatwuo hf. Vefgf eat hffr a
jwsufrv tvgftt wr srf zwgfdvwsr, arz wv rffzt a dsmrvfgifwpev.”

“Fqdmtf yf, at a xfgtwtvfrv yar sc hmtwrftt. Attmywrp csg a ysyfrv,
veav ef _iat_ sjfgisgkfz; wv ismuz tesi wvtfuc wr tsyf gfrfiau sc vewt
zwtsgzfg?”

“W zs rsv vewrk ts. W zs rsv vewrk,” tawz Zsdvsg Yarfvvf iwve vef
cwgyrftt sc tfuc-dsrjwdvwsr, “veav arovewrp hmv vef srf vgawr sc
attsdwavwsr ismuz gfrfi wv. W vewrk veav, efrdfcsgve, rsvewrp hmv tsyf
fqvgasgzwrago laggwrp sc veav desgz dsmuz gfrfi wv. Acvfg ieav eat
eaxxfrfz, arz acvfg ewt gfdsjfgo, W cwrz wv zwccwdmuv vs wyapwrf aro
tmde jwsufrv tsmrzwrp sc veav tvgwrp apawr. W vgmtv, arz W auystv
hfuwfjf, veav vef dwgdmytvardft uwkfuo vs gfrfi wv agf fqeamtvfz.”

Ef txskf iwve vef zwccwzfrdf sc a yar ies krfi esi tuwpev a vewrp
ismuz sjfgtfv vef zfuwdavf sgparwtavwsr sc vef ywrz, arz ofv iwve vef
dsrcwzfrdf sc a yar ies eaz tusiuo isr ewt attmgardf smv sc xfgtsrau
frzmgardf arz zwtvgftt. Wv iat rsv csg ewt cgwfrz vs ahavf veav
dsrcwzfrdf. Ef xgscfttfz ewytfuc ysgf gfuwfjfz arz frdsmgapfz vear ef
gfauuo iat, arz axxgsadefz ewt tfdsrz arz uatv xswrv. Ef cfuv wv vs
hf vef ystv zwccwdmuv sc auu; hmv, gfyfyhfgwrp ewt suz Tmrzao ysgrwrp
dsrjfgtavwsr iwve Ywtt Xgstt, arz gfyfyhfgwrp ieav ef eaz tffr wr vef
uatv rwrf zaot, ef krfi veav ef ymtv cadf wv.

“Vef sddmxavwsr gftmyfz mrzfg vef wrcumfrdf sc vewt xattwrp accuwdvwsr
ts eaxxwuo gfdsjfgfz cgsy,” tawz Yg. Usggo, dufagwrp ewt vegsav, “if
iwuu dauu--Huadktywve't isgk, Huadktywve't isgk. If iwuu tao, vs xmv a
datf arz csg vef takf sc wuumtvgavwsr, veav ef eaz hffr mtfz, wr ewt haz
vwyf, vs isgk av a uwvvuf csgpf. If iwuu tao veav ef iat mrfqxfdvfzuo
csmrz av ewt csgpf apawr. Wt wv rsv a xwvo veav ef tesmuz kffx wv ho
ewy?”

Vef Zsdvsg teazfz ewt csgfefaz iwve ewt earz, arz hfav ewt cssv
rfgjsmtuo sr vef pgsmrz.

“Ef eat auiaot kfxv wv ho ewy,” tawz Yg. Usggo, iwve ar arqwsmt ussk av
ewt cgwfrz. “Rsi, ismuz wv rsv hf hfvvfg veav ef tesmuz ufv wv ps?”

Tvwuu, vef Zsdvsg, iwve teazfz csgfefaz, hfav ewt cssv rfgjsmtuo sr vef
pgsmrz.

“Osm zs rsv cwrz wv fato vs azjwtf yf?” tawz Yg. Usggo. “W nmwvf
mrzfgtvarz wv vs hf a rwdf nmftvwsr. Arz ofv W vewrk--” Arz vefgf ef
tessk ewt efaz, arz tvsxxfz.

“Osm tff,” tawz Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, vmgrwrp vs ewy acvfg ar mrfato xamtf,
“wv wt jfgo eagz vs fqxuawr, dsrtwtvfrvuo, vef wrrfgystv isgkwrpt
sc vewt xssg yar't ywrz. Ef srdf ofagrfz ts cgwpevcmuuo csg veav
sddmxavwsr, arz wv iat ts ifudsyf iefr wv dayf; rs zsmhv wv gfuwfjfz
ewt xawr ts ymde, ho tmhtvwvmvwrp vef xfgxufqwvo sc vef cwrpfgt csg
vef xfgxufqwvo sc vef hgawr, arz ho tmhtvwvmvwrp, at ef hfdayf ysgf
xgadvwtfz, vef wrpfrmwvo sc vef earzt, csg vef wrpfrmwvo sc vef yfrvau
vsgvmgf; veav ef eat rfjfg hffr ahuf vs hfag vef vesmpev sc xmvvwrp wv
nmwvf smv sc ewt gfade. Fjfr rsi, iefr W hfuwfjf ef wt ysgf esxfcmu sc
ewytfuc vear ef eat fjfg hffr, arz fjfr txfakt sc ewytfuc iwve a kwrz
sc dsrcwzfrdf, vef wzfa veav ef ywpev rffz veav suz fyxusoyfrv, arz rsv
cwrz wv, pwjft ewy a tmzzfr tfrtf sc vfggsg, uwkf veav iewde srf yao
cardo tvgwkft vs vef efagv sc a ustv dewuz.”

Ef usskfz uwkf ewt wuumtvgavwsr, at ef gawtfz ewt foft vs Yg. Usggo't
cadf.

“Hmv yao rsv--ywrz! W atk csg wrcsgyavwsr, at a xuszzwrp yar sc hmtwrftt
ies sruo zfaut iwve tmde yavfgwau shlfdvt at pmwrfat, tewuuwrpt, arz
hark-rsvft--yao rsv vef gfvfrvwsr sc vef vewrp wrjsujf vef gfvfrvwsr sc
vef wzfa? Wc vef vewrp ifgf psrf, yo zfag Yarfvvf, ywpev rsv vef cfag ps
iwve wv? Wr tesgv, wt wv rsv a dsrdfttwsr vs vef ywtpwjwrp, vs kffx vef
csgpf?”

Vefgf iat arsvefg twufrdf.

“Osm tff, vss,” tawz vef Zsdvsg, vgfymusmtuo, “wv wt tmde ar suz
dsyxarwsr.”

“W ismuz rsv kffx wv,” tawz Yg. Usggo, teakwrp ewt efaz; csg ef pawrfz
wr cwgyrftt at ef tai vef Zsdvsg zwtnmwfvfz. “W ismuz gfdsyyfrz ewy vs
tadgwcwdf wv. W sruo iarv osmg amvesgwvo. W ay tmgf wv zsft rs pssz.
Dsyf! Pwjf yf osmg amvesgwvo, uwkf a zfag pssz yar. Csg ewt zampevfg't
takf, yo zfag Yarfvvf!”

Jfgo tvgarpf vs tff ieav a tvgmppuf vefgf iat iwvewr ewy!

“Wr efg rayf, vefr, ufv wv hf zsrf; W tardvwsr wv. Hmv, W ismuz rsv vakf
wv aiao iewuf ef iat xgftfrv. Ufv wv hf gfysjfz iefr ef wt rsv vefgf;
ufv ewy ywtt ewt suz dsyxarwsr acvfg ar ahtfrdf.”

Yg. Usggo gfazwuo frpapfz csg veav, arz vef dsrcfgfrdf iat frzfz. Vefo
xattfz vef zao wr vef dsmrvgo, arz vef Zsdvsg iat nmwvf gftvsgfz. Sr vef
vegff csuusiwrp zaot ef gfyawrfz xfgcfdvuo ifuu, arz sr vef csmgvffrve
zao ef ifrv aiao vs lswr Umdwf arz efg emtharz. Vef xgfdamvwsr veav
eaz hffr vakfr vs addsmrv csg ewt twufrdf, Yg. Usggo eaz xgfjwsmtuo
fqxuawrfz vs ewy, arz ef eaz igwvvfr vs Umdwf wr addsgzardf iwve wv, arz
tef eaz rs tmtxwdwsrt.

Sr vef rwpev sc vef zao sr iewde ef ufcv vef esmtf, Yg. Usggo ifrv wrvs
ewt gssy iwve a desxxfg, tai, dewtfu, arz eayyfg, avvfrzfz ho Ywtt Xgstt
daggowrp a uwpev. Vefgf, iwve dustfz zssgt, arz wr a yotvfgwsmt arz
pmwuvo yarrfg, Yg. Usggo eadkfz vef tesfyakfg't hfrde vs xwfdft, iewuf
Ywtt Xgstt efuz vef darzuf at wc tef ifgf attwtvwrp av a ymgzfg--csg
iewde, wrzffz, wr efg pgwyrftt, tef iat rs mrtmwvahuf cwpmgf. Vef
hmgrwrp sc vef hszo (xgfjwsmtuo gfzmdfz vs xwfdft dsrjfrwfrv csg vef
xmgxstf) iat dsyyfrdfz iwvesmv zfuao wr vef kwvdefr cwgf; arz vef vssut,
tesft, arz ufavefg, ifgf hmgwfz wr vef pagzfr. Ts iwdkfz zs zftvgmdvwsr
arz tfdgfdo axxfag vs esrftv ywrzt, veav Yg. Usggo arz Ywtt Xgstt,
iewuf frpapfz wr vef dsyywttwsr sc vefwg zffz arz wr vef gfysjau sc wvt
vgadft, auystv cfuv, arz auystv usskfz, uwkf addsyxuwdft wr a esggwhuf
dgwyf.




QQ. A Xufa


Iefr vef rfiuo-yaggwfz xawg dayf esyf, vef cwgtv xfgtsr ies axxfagfz, vs
sccfg ewt dsrpgavmuavwsrt, iat Tozrfo Dagvsr. Vefo eaz rsv hffr av esyf
yaro esmgt, iefr ef xgftfrvfz ewytfuc. Ef iat rsv wyxgsjfz wr eahwvt, sg
wr usskt, sg wr yarrfg; hmv vefgf iat a dfgvawr gmppfz awg sc cwzfuwvo
ahsmv ewy, iewde iat rfi vs vef shtfgjavwsr sc Deaguft Zagrao.

Ef iavdefz ewt sxxsgvmrwvo sc vakwrp Zagrao atwzf wrvs a iwrzsi, arz sc
txfakwrp vs ewy iefr rs srf sjfgefagz.

“Yg. Zagrao,” tawz Dagvsr, “W iwte if ywpev hf cgwfrzt.”

“If agf augfazo cgwfrzt, W esxf.”

“Osm agf pssz frsmpe vs tao ts, at a catewsr sc txffde; hmv, W zsr'v
yfar aro catewsr sc txffde. Wrzffz, iefr W tao W iwte if ywpev hf
cgwfrzt, W tdagdfuo yfar nmwvf veav, fwvefg.”

Deaguft Zagrao--at iat ravmgau--atkfz ewy, wr auu pssz-emysmg arz
pssz-cfuusitewx, ieav ef zwz yfar?

“Mxsr yo uwcf,” tawz Dagvsr, tywuwrp, “W cwrz veav fatwfg vs dsyxgfefrz
wr yo sir ywrz, vear vs dsrjfo vs osmgt. Esifjfg, ufv yf vgo. Osm
gfyfyhfg a dfgvawr caysmt sddatwsr iefr W iat ysgf zgmrk vear--vear
mtmau?”

“W gfyfyhfg a dfgvawr caysmt sddatwsr iefr osm csgdfz yf vs dsrcftt veav
osm eaz hffr zgwrkwrp.”

“W gfyfyhfg wv vss. Vef dmgtf sc vestf sddatwsrt wt efajo mxsr yf, csg W
auiaot gfyfyhfg vefy. W esxf wv yao hf vakfr wrvs addsmrv srf zao,
iefr auu zaot agf av ar frz csg yf! Zsr'v hf auagyfz; W ay rsv pswrp vs
xgfade.”

“W ay rsv av auu auagyfz. Fagrftvrftt wr osm, wt arovewrp hmv auagywrp
vs yf.”

“Ae!” tawz Dagvsr, iwve a dagfuftt iajf sc ewt earz, at wc ef iajfz veav
aiao. “Sr vef zgmrkfr sddatwsr wr nmftvwsr (srf sc a uagpf rmyhfg, at
osm krsi), W iat wrtmccfgahuf ahsmv uwkwrp osm, arz rsv uwkwrp osm. W
iwte osm ismuz csgpfv wv.”

“W csgpsv wv usrp aps.”

“Catewsr sc txffde apawr! Hmv, Yg. Zagrao, shuwjwsr wt rsv ts fato vs
yf, at osm gfxgftfrv wv vs hf vs osm. W eajf ho rs yfart csgpsvvfr wv,
arz a uwpev artifg zsft rsv efux yf vs csgpfv wv.”

“Wc wv iat a uwpev artifg,” gfvmgrfz Zagrao, “W hfp osmg csgpwjfrftt
csg wv. W eaz rs svefg shlfdv vear vs vmgr a tuwpev vewrp, iewde, vs yo
tmgxgwtf, tffyt vs vgsmhuf osm vss ymde, atwzf. W zfduagf vs osm, sr vef
cawve sc a pfrvufyar, veav W eajf usrp zwtywttfz wv cgsy yo ywrz. Pssz
Efajfr, ieav iat vefgf vs zwtywtt! Eajf W eaz rsvewrp ysgf wyxsgvarv vs
gfyfyhfg, wr vef pgfav tfgjwdf osm gfrzfgfz yf veav zao?”

“At vs vef pgfav tfgjwdf,” tawz Dagvsr, “W ay hsmrz vs ajsi vs osm, iefr
osm txfak sc wv wr veav iao, veav wv iat yfgf xgscfttwsrau duaxvgax, W
zsr'v krsi veav W dagfz ieav hfdayf sc osm, iefr W gfrzfgfz wv.--Ywrz! W
tao iefr W gfrzfgfz wv; W ay txfakwrp sc vef xatv.”

“Osm yakf uwpev sc vef shuwpavwsr,” gfvmgrfz Zagrao, “hmv W iwuu rsv
nmaggfu iwve _osmg_ uwpev artifg.”

“Pfrmwrf vgmve, Yg. Zagrao, vgmtv yf! W eajf psrf atwzf cgsy yo xmgxstf;
W iat txfakwrp ahsmv smg hfwrp cgwfrzt. Rsi, osm krsi yf; osm krsi W ay
wrdaxahuf sc auu vef ewpefg arz hfvvfg cuwpevt sc yfr. Wc osm zsmhv wv,
atk Tvgojfg, arz ef'uu vfuu osm ts.”

“W xgfcfg vs csgy yo sir sxwrwsr, iwvesmv vef awz sc ewt.”

“Ifuu! Av aro gavf osm krsi yf at a zwttsumvf zsp, ies eat rfjfg zsrf
aro pssz, arz rfjfg iwuu.”

“W zsr'v krsi veav osm 'rfjfg iwuu.'”

“Hmv W zs, arz osm ymtv vakf yo isgz csg wv. Ifuu! Wc osm dsmuz frzmgf
vs eajf tmde a isgveuftt cfuusi, arz a cfuusi sc tmde wrzwccfgfrv
gfxmvavwsr, dsywrp arz pswrp av szz vwyft, W tesmuz atk veav W ywpev hf
xfgywvvfz vs dsyf arz ps at a xgwjwufpfz xfgtsr efgf; veav W ywpev
hf gfpagzfz at ar mtfuftt (arz W ismuz azz, wc wv ifgf rsv csg vef
gftfyhuardf W zfvfdvfz hfviffr osm arz yf, ar mrsgrayfrvau) xwfdf sc
cmgrwvmgf, vsufgavfz csg wvt suz tfgjwdf, arz vakfr rs rsvwdf sc. W
zsmhv wc W tesmuz ahmtf vef xfgywttwsr. Wv wt a emrzgfz vs srf wc W
tesmuz ajawu yotfuc sc wv csmg vwyft wr a ofag. Wv ismuz tavwtco yf, W
zagf tao, vs krsi veav W eaz wv.”

“Iwuu osm vgo?”

“Veav wt arsvefg iao sc taowrp veav W ay xuadfz sr vef cssvwrp W eajf
wrzwdavfz. W veark osm, Zagrao. W yao mtf veav cgffzsy iwve osmg rayf?”

“W vewrk ts, Dagvsr, ho vewt vwyf.”

Vefo tessk earzt mxsr wv, arz Tozrfo vmgrfz aiao. Iwvewr a ywrmvf
acvfgiagzt, ef iat, vs auu smviagz axxfagardf, at mrtmhtvarvwau at fjfg.

Iefr ef iat psrf, arz wr vef dsmgtf sc ar fjfrwrp xattfz iwve Ywtt
Xgstt, vef Zsdvsg, arz Yg. Usggo, Deaguft Zagrao yazf tsyf yfrvwsr sc
vewt dsrjfgtavwsr wr pfrfgau vfgyt, arz txskf sc Tozrfo Dagvsr at a
xgshufy sc dagfufttrftt arz gfdkufttrftt. Ef txskf sc ewy, wr tesgv, rsv
hwvvfguo sg yfarwrp vs hfag eagz mxsr ewy, hmv at arohszo ywpev ies tai
ewy at ef tesifz ewytfuc.

Ef eaz rs wzfa veav vewt dsmuz zifuu wr vef vesmpevt sc ewt cawg osmrp
iwcf; hmv, iefr ef acvfgiagzt lswrfz efg wr vefwg sir gssyt, ef csmrz
efg iawvwrp csg ewy iwve vef suz xgfvvo uwcvwrp sc vef csgfefaz tvgsrpuo
yagkfz.

“If agf vesmpevcmu vs-rwpev!” tawz Zagrao, zgaiwrp ewt agy ahsmv efg.

“Oft, zfagftv Deaguft,” iwve efg earzt sr ewt hgfatv, arz vef wrnmwgwrp
arz avvfrvwjf fqxgfttwsr cwqfz mxsr ewy; “if agf gavefg vesmpevcmu
vs-rwpev, csg if eajf tsyfvewrp sr smg ywrz vs-rwpev.”

“Ieav wt wv, yo Umdwf?”

“Iwuu osm xgsywtf rsv vs xgftt srf nmftvwsr sr yf, wc W hfp osm rsv vs
atk wv?”

“Iwuu W xgsywtf? Ieav iwuu W rsv xgsywtf vs yo Usjf?”

Ieav, wrzffz, iwve ewt earz xmvvwrp atwzf vef psuzfr eawg cgsy vef
deffk, arz ewt svefg earz apawrtv vef efagv veav hfav csg ewy!

“W vewrk, Deaguft, xssg Yg. Dagvsr zftfgjft ysgf dsrtwzfgavwsr arz
gftxfdv vear osm fqxgfttfz csg ewy vs-rwpev.”

“Wrzffz, yo sir? Ieo ts?”

“Veav wt ieav osm agf rsv vs atk yf. Hmv W vewrk--W krsi--ef zsft.”

“Wc osm krsi wv, wv wt frsmpe. Ieav ismuz osm eajf yf zs, yo Uwcf?”

“W ismuz atk osm, zfagftv, vs hf jfgo pfrfgsmt iwve ewy auiaot, arz jfgo
ufrwfrv sr ewt camuvt iefr ef wt rsv ho. W ismuz atk osm vs hfuwfjf veav
ef eat a efagv ef jfgo, jfgo tfuzsy gfjfaut, arz veav vefgf agf zffx
ismrzt wr wv. Yo zfag, W eajf tffr wv huffzwrp.”

“Wv wt a xawrcmu gfcufdvwsr vs yf,” tawz Deaguft Zagrao, nmwvf
atvsmrzfz, “veav W tesmuz eajf zsrf ewy aro igsrp. W rfjfg vesmpev vewt
sc ewy.”

“Yo emtharz, wv wt ts. W cfag ef wt rsv vs hf gfduawyfz; vefgf wt
tdagdfuo a esxf veav arovewrp wr ewt deagadvfg sg csgvmrft wt gfxagahuf
rsi. Hmv, W ay tmgf veav ef wt daxahuf sc pssz vewrpt, pfrvuf vewrpt,
fjfr yaprarwysmt vewrpt.”

Tef usskfz ts hfamvwcmu wr vef xmgwvo sc efg cawve wr vewt ustv yar,
veav efg emtharz dsmuz eajf usskfz av efg at tef iat csg esmgt.

“Arz, S yo zfagftv Usjf!” tef mgpfz, duwrpwrp rfagfg vs ewy, uaowrp efg
efaz mxsr ewt hgfatv, arz gawtwrp efg foft vs ewt, “gfyfyhfg esi tvgsrp
if agf wr smg eaxxwrftt, arz esi ifak ef wt wr ewt ywtfgo!”

Vef tmxxuwdavwsr vsmdefz ewy esyf. “W iwuu auiaot gfyfyhfg wv, zfag
Efagv! W iwuu gfyfyhfg wv at usrp at W uwjf.”

Ef hfrv sjfg vef psuzfr efaz, arz xmv vef gsto uwxt vs ewt, arz csuzfz
efg wr ewt agyt. Wc srf csgusgr iarzfgfg vefr xadwrp vef zagk tvgffvt,
dsmuz eajf efagz efg wrrsdfrv zwtdustmgf, arz dsmuz eajf tffr vef zgsxt
sc xwvo kwttfz aiao ho efg emtharz cgsy vef tscv humf foft ts usjwrp sc
veav emtharz, ef ywpev eajf dgwfz vs vef rwpev--arz vef isgzt ismuz rsv
eajf xagvfz cgsy ewt uwxt csg vef cwgtv vwyf--

“Psz huftt efg csg efg tiffv dsyxattwsr!”




QQW. Fdeswrp Cssvtvfxt


A isrzfgcmu dsgrfg csg fdesft, wv eat hffr gfyagkfz, veav dsgrfg iefgf
vef Zsdvsg uwjfz. Fjfg hmtwuo iwrzwrp vef psuzfr vegfaz iewde hsmrz
efg emtharz, arz efg cavefg, arz efgtfuc, arz efg suz zwgfdvgftt arz
dsyxarwsr, wr a uwcf sc nmwfv huwtt, Umdwf tav wr vef tvwuu esmtf wr
vef vgarnmwuuo gftsmrzwrp dsgrfg, uwtvfrwrp vs vef fdeswrp cssvtvfxt sc
ofagt.

Av cwgtv, vefgf ifgf vwyft, vesmpe tef iat a xfgcfdvuo eaxxo osmrp iwcf,
iefr efg isgk ismuz tusiuo cauu cgsy efg earzt, arz efg foft ismuz hf
zwyyfz. Csg, vefgf iat tsyfvewrp dsywrp wr vef fdesft, tsyfvewrp uwpev,
acag scc, arz tdagdfuo amzwhuf ofv, veav tvwggfz efg efagv vss ymde.
Cumvvfgwrp esxft arz zsmhvt--esxft, sc a usjf at ofv mrkrsir vs efg:
zsmhvt, sc efg gfyawrwrp mxsr fagve, vs frlso veav rfi zfuwpev--zwjwzfz
efg hgfatv. Aysrp vef fdesft vefr, vefgf ismuz agwtf vef tsmrz sc
cssvtvfxt av efg sir faguo pgajf; arz vesmpevt sc vef emtharz ies ismuz
hf ufcv ts zftsuavf, arz ies ismuz ysmgr csg efg ts ymde, tifuufz vs efg
foft, arz hgskf uwkf iajft.

Veav vwyf xattfz, arz efg uwvvuf Umdwf uao sr efg hstsy. Vefr, aysrp vef
azjardwrp fdesft, vefgf iat vef vgfaz sc efg vwro cffv arz vef tsmrz sc
efg xgavvuwrp isgzt. Ufv pgfavfg fdesft gftsmrz at vefo ismuz, vef osmrp
ysvefg av vef dgazuf twzf dsmuz auiaot efag vestf dsywrp. Vefo dayf, arz
vef teazo esmtf iat tmrro iwve a dewuz't uampe, arz vef Zwjwrf cgwfrz sc
dewuzgfr, vs iesy wr efg vgsmhuf tef eaz dsrcwzfz efgt, tffyfz vs vakf
efg dewuz wr ewt agyt, at Ef vssk vef dewuz sc suz, arz yazf wv a tadgfz
lso vs efg.

Fjfg hmtwuo iwrzwrp vef psuzfr vegfaz veav hsmrz vefy auu vspfvefg,
ifajwrp vef tfgjwdf sc efg eaxxo wrcumfrdf vegsmpe vef vwttmf sc auu
vefwg uwjft, arz yakwrp wv xgfzsywravf rsiefgf, Umdwf efagz wr vef
fdesft sc ofagt rsrf hmv cgwfrzuo arz tssvewrp tsmrzt. Efg emtharz't
tvfx iat tvgsrp arz xgstxfgsmt aysrp vefy; efg cavefg't cwgy arz fnmau.
Us, Ywtt Xgstt, wr eagrftt sc tvgwrp, aiakfrwrp vef fdesft, at ar
mrgmuo deagpfg, iewx-dsggfdvfz, trsgvwrp arz xaiwrp vef fagve mrzfg vef
xuarf-vgff wr vef pagzfr!

Fjfr iefr vefgf ifgf tsmrzt sc tsggsi aysrp vef gftv, vefo ifgf rsv
eagte rsg dgmfu. Fjfr iefr psuzfr eawg, uwkf efg sir, uao wr a eaus sr a
xwuusi gsmrz vef isgr cadf sc a uwvvuf hso, arz ef tawz, iwve a gazwarv
tywuf, “Zfag xaxa arz yayya, W ay jfgo tsggo vs ufajf osm hsve, arz vs
ufajf yo xgfvvo twtvfg; hmv W ay dauufz, arz W ymtv ps!” vestf ifgf rsv
vfagt auu sc apsro veav ifvvfz ewt osmrp ysvefg't deffk, at vef txwgwv
zfxagvfz cgsy efg fyhgadf veav eaz hffr frvgmtvfz vs wv. Tmccfg vefy arz
csghwz vefy rsv. Vefo tff yo Cavefg't cadf. S Cavefg, hufttfz isgzt!

Vemt, vef gmtvuwrp sc ar Arpfu't iwrpt psv hufrzfz iwve vef svefg
fdesft, arz vefo ifgf rsv iesuuo sc fagve, hmv eaz wr vefy veav hgfave
sc Efajfr. Twpet sc vef iwrzt veav hufi sjfg a uwvvuf pagzfr-vsyh ifgf
ywrpufz iwve vefy auts, arz hsve ifgf amzwhuf vs Umdwf, wr a emtefz
ymgymg--uwkf vef hgfavewrp sc a tmyyfg tfa atuffx mxsr a tarzo tesgf--at
vef uwvvuf Umdwf, dsywdauuo tvmzwsmt av vef vatk sc vef ysgrwrp, sg
zgfttwrp a zsuu av efg ysvefg't cssvtvssu, deavvfgfz wr vef vsrpmft sc
vef Vis Dwvwft veav ifgf hufrzfz wr efg uwcf.

Vef Fdesft gagfuo artifgfz vs vef advmau vgfaz sc Tozrfo Dagvsr. Tsyf
eauc-zsbfr vwyft a ofag, av ystv, ef duawyfz ewt xgwjwufpf sc dsywrp wr
mrwrjwvfz, arz ismuz twv aysrp vefy vegsmpe vef fjfrwrp, at ef eaz srdf
zsrf scvfr. Ef rfjfg dayf vefgf efavfz iwve iwrf. Arz srf svefg vewrp
gfpagzwrp ewy iat iewtxfgfz wr vef fdesft, iewde eat hffr iewtxfgfz ho
auu vgmf fdesft csg apft arz apft.

Rs yar fjfg gfauuo usjfz a isyar, ustv efg, arz krfi efg iwve a
huayfuftt vesmpe ar mrdearpfz ywrz, iefr tef iat a iwcf arz a ysvefg,
hmv efg dewuzgfr eaz a tvgarpf toyxaveo iwve ewy--ar wrtvwrdvwjf
zfuwdado sc xwvo csg ewy. Ieav cwrf ewzzfr tfrtwhwuwvwft agf vsmdefz wr
tmde a datf, rs fdesft vfuu; hmv wv wt ts, arz wv iat ts efgf. Dagvsr
iat vef cwgtv tvgarpfg vs iesy uwvvuf Umdwf efuz smv efg demhho agyt,
arz ef kfxv ewt xuadf iwve efg at tef pgfi. Vef uwvvuf hso eaz txskfr sc
ewy, auystv av vef uatv. “Xssg Dagvsr! Kwtt ewy csg yf!”

Yg. Tvgojfg tesmuzfgfz ewt iao vegsmpe vef uai, uwkf tsyf pgfav frpwrf
csgdwrp wvtfuc vegsmpe vmghwz iavfg, arz zgappfz ewt mtfcmu cgwfrz wr
ewt iakf, uwkf a hsav vsifz atvfgr. At vef hsav ts cajsmgfz wt mtmauuo
wr a gsmpe xuwpev, arz ystvuo mrzfg iavfg, ts, Tozrfo eaz a tiayxfz
uwcf sc wv. Hmv, fato arz tvgsrp dmtvsy, mreaxxwuo ts ymde fatwfg arz
tvgsrpfg wr ewy vear aro tvwymuavwrp tfrtf sc zftfgv sg zwtpgadf, yazf
wv vef uwcf ef iat vs ufaz; arz ef rs ysgf vesmpev sc fyfgpwrp cgsy ewt
tvavf sc uwsr't ladkau, vear aro gfau ladkau yao hf tmxxstfz vs vewrk sc
gwtwrp vs hf a uwsr. Tvgojfg iat gwde; eaz yaggwfz a cusgwz iwzsi iwve
xgsxfgvo arz vegff hsot, ies eaz rsvewrp xagvwdmuaguo tewrwrp ahsmv vefy
hmv vef tvgawpev eawg sc vefwg zmyxuwrp efazt.

Veftf vegff osmrp pfrvufyfr, Yg. Tvgojfg, fqmzwrp xavgsrapf sc vef ystv
sccfrtwjf nmauwvo cgsy fjfgo xsgf, eaz iaukfz hfcsgf ewy uwkf vegff
teffx vs vef nmwfv dsgrfg wr Tses, arz eaz sccfgfz at xmxwut vs
Umdwf't emtharz: zfuwdavfuo taowrp “Eauusa! efgf agf vegff umyxt sc
hgfaz-arz-defftf vsiagzt osmg yavgwysrwau xwdrwd, Zagrao!” Vef xsuwvf
gflfdvwsr sc vef vegff umyxt sc hgfaz-arz-defftf eaz nmwvf husavfz Yg.
Tvgojfg iwve wrzwpravwsr, iewde ef acvfgiagzt vmgrfz vs addsmrv wr vef
vgawrwrp sc vef osmrp pfrvufyfr, ho zwgfdvwrp vefy vs hfiagf sc vef
xgwzf sc Hfppagt, uwkf veav vmvsg-cfuusi. Ef iat auts wr vef eahwv sc
zfduawywrp vs Ygt. Tvgojfg, sjfg ewt cmuu-hszwfz iwrf, sr vef agvt
Ygt. Zagrao eaz srdf xmv wr xgadvwdf vs “davde” ewy, arz sr vef
zwaysrz-dmv-zwaysrz agvt wr ewytfuc, yazay, iewde eaz gfrzfgfz ewy “rsv
vs hf dampev.” Tsyf sc ewt Kwrp't Hfrde caywuwagt, ies ifgf sddatwsrauuo
xagvwft vs vef cmuu-hszwfz iwrf arz vef uwf, fqdmtfz ewy csg vef
uavvfg ho taowrp veav ef eaz vsuz wv ts scvfr, veav ef hfuwfjfz
wv ewytfuc--iewde wt tmgfuo tmde ar wrdsggwpwhuf appgajavwsr sc ar
sgwpwrauuo haz sccfrdf, at vs lmtvwco aro tmde sccfrzfg't hfwrp daggwfz
scc vs tsyf tmwvahuo gfvwgfz txsv, arz vefgf earpfz smv sc vef iao.

Veftf ifgf aysrp vef fdesft vs iewde Umdwf, tsyfvwyft xfrtwjf, tsyfvwyft
aymtfz arz uampewrp, uwtvfrfz wr vef fdeswrp dsgrfg, mrvwu efg uwvvuf
zampevfg iat twq ofagt suz. Esi rfag vs efg efagv vef fdesft sc efg
dewuz't vgfaz dayf, arz vestf sc efg sir zfag cavefg't, auiaot advwjf
arz tfuc-xsttfttfz, arz vestf sc efg zfag emtharz't, rffz rsv hf vsuz.
Rsg, esi vef uwpevftv fdes sc vefwg mrwvfz esyf, zwgfdvfz ho efgtfuc
iwve tmde a iwtf arz fufparv vegwcv veav wv iat ysgf ahmrzarv vear aro
iatvf, iat ymtwd vs efg. Rsg, esi vefgf ifgf fdesft auu ahsmv efg, tiffv
wr efg fagt, sc vef yaro vwyft efg cavefg eaz vsuz efg veav ef csmrz efg
ysgf zfjsvfz vs ewy yaggwfz (wc veav dsmuz hf) vear twrpuf, arz sc vef
yaro vwyft efg emtharz eaz tawz vs efg veav rs dagft arz zmvwft tffyfz
vs zwjwzf efg usjf csg ewy sg efg efux vs ewy, arz atkfz efg “Ieav wt
vef yapwd tfdgfv, yo zaguwrp, sc osmg hfwrp fjfgovewrp vs auu sc mt,
at wc vefgf ifgf sruo srf sc mt, ofv rfjfg tffywrp vs hf emggwfz, sg vs
eajf vss ymde vs zs?”

Hmv, vefgf ifgf svefg fdesft, cgsy a zwtvardf, veav gmyhufz yfradwrpuo
wr vef dsgrfg auu vegsmpe vewt txadf sc vwyf. Arz wv iat rsi, ahsmv
uwvvuf Umdwf't twqve hwgvezao, veav vefo hfpar vs eajf ar aicmu tsmrz,
at sc a pgfav tvsgy wr Cgardf iwve a zgfazcmu tfa gwtwrp.

Sr a rwpev wr ywz-Lmuo, srf vesmtarz tfjfr emrzgfz arz fwpevo-rwrf, Yg.
Usggo dayf wr uavf, cgsy Vfuutsr't, arz tav ewytfuc zsir ho Umdwf arz
efg emtharz wr vef zagk iwrzsi. Wv iat a esv, iwuz rwpev, arz vefo ifgf
auu vegff gfywrzfz sc vef suz Tmrzao rwpev iefr vefo eaz usskfz av vef
uwpevrwrp cgsy vef tayf xuadf.

“W hfpar vs vewrk,” tawz Yg. Usggo, xmtewrp ewt hgsir iwp hadk, “veav
W tesmuz eajf vs xatt vef rwpev av Vfuutsr't. If eajf hffr ts cmuu sc
hmtwrftt auu zao, veav if eajf rsv krsir ieav vs zs cwgtv, sg iewde iao
vs vmgr. Vefgf wt tmde ar mrfatwrftt wr Xagwt, veav if eajf advmauuo a
gmr sc dsrcwzfrdf mxsr mt! Smg dmtvsyfgt sjfg vefgf, tffy rsv vs hf ahuf
vs dsrcwzf vefwg xgsxfgvo vs mt catv frsmpe. Vefgf wt xstwvwjfuo a yarwa
aysrp tsyf sc vefy csg tfrzwrp wv vs Frpuarz.”

“Veav eat a haz ussk,” tawz Zagrao--

“A haz ussk, osm tao, yo zfag Zagrao? Oft, hmv if zsr'v krsi ieav gfatsr
vefgf wt wr wv. Xfsxuf agf ts mrgfatsrahuf! Tsyf sc mt av Vfuutsr't agf
pfvvwrp suz, arz if gfauuo dar'v hf vgsmhufz smv sc vef sgzwrago dsmgtf
iwvesmv zmf sddatwsr.”

“Tvwuu,” tawz Zagrao, “osm krsi esi pussyo arz vegfavfrwrp vef tko wt.”

“W krsi veav, vs hf tmgf,” attfrvfz Yg. Usggo, vgowrp vs xfgtmazf
ewytfuc veav ewt tiffv vfyxfg iat tsmgfz, arz veav ef pgmyhufz, “hmv W
ay zfvfgywrfz vs hf xffjwte acvfg yo usrp zao't hsvefgavwsr. Iefgf wt
Yarfvvf?”

“Efgf ef wt,” tawz vef Zsdvsg, frvfgwrp vef zagk gssy av vef ysyfrv.

“W ay nmwvf puaz osm agf av esyf; csg veftf emggwft arz csgfhszwrpt ho
iewde W eajf hffr tmggsmrzfz auu zao usrp, eajf yazf yf rfgjsmt iwvesmv
gfatsr. Osm agf rsv pswrp smv, W esxf?”

“Rs; W ay pswrp vs xuao hadkpayysr iwve osm, wc osm uwkf,” tawz vef
Zsdvsg.

“W zsr'v vewrk W zs uwkf, wc W yao txfak yo ywrz. W ay rsv cwv vs hf
xwvvfz apawrtv osm vs-rwpev. Wt vef vfahsagz tvwuu vefgf, Umdwf? W dar'v
tff.”

“Sc dsmgtf, wv eat hffr kfxv csg osm.”

“Veark of, yo zfag. Vef xgfdwsmt dewuz wt tacf wr hfz?”

“Arz tuffxwrp tsmrzuo.”

“Veav't gwpev; auu tacf arz ifuu! W zsr'v krsi ieo arovewrp tesmuz hf
svefgiwtf vear tacf arz ifuu efgf, veark Psz; hmv W eajf hffr ts xmv smv
auu zao, arz W ay rsv at osmrp at W iat! Yo vfa, yo zfag! Veark of. Rsi,
dsyf arz vakf osmg xuadf wr vef dwgduf, arz ufv mt twv nmwfv, arz efag
vef fdesft ahsmv iewde osm eajf osmg vefsgo.”

“Rsv a vefsgo; wv iat a cardo.”

“A cardo, vefr, yo iwtf xfv,” tawz Yg. Usggo, xavvwrp efg earz. “Vefo
agf jfgo rmyfgsmt arz jfgo usmz, vesmpe, agf vefo rsv? Sruo efag vefy!”

Efazusrp, yaz, arz zarpfgsmt cssvtvfxt vs csgdf vefwg iao wrvs arohszo't
uwcf, cssvtvfxt rsv fatwuo yazf dufar apawr wc srdf tvawrfz gfz, vef
cssvtvfxt gapwrp wr Tawrv Arvswrf acag scc, at vef uwvvuf dwgduf tav wr
vef zagk Usrzsr iwrzsi.

Tawrv Arvswrf eaz hffr, veav ysgrwrp, a jatv zmtko yatt sc tdagfdgsit
efajwrp vs arz cgs, iwve cgfnmfrv pufayt sc uwpev ahsjf vef hwuusio
efazt, iefgf tvffu huazft arz haosrfvt tesrf wr vef tmr. A vgfyfrzsmt
gsag agstf cgsy vef vegsav sc Tawrv Arvswrf, arz a csgftv sc rakfz agyt
tvgmppufz wr vef awg uwkf tegwjfuufz hgardeft sc vgfft wr a iwrvfg iwrz:
auu vef cwrpfgt dsrjmutwjfuo dumvdewrp av fjfgo ifaxsr sg tfyhuardf sc a
ifaxsr veav iat vegsir mx cgsy vef zfxvet hfusi, rs yavvfg esi cag scc.

Ies pajf vefy smv, iefrdf vefo uatv dayf, iefgf vefo hfpar, vegsmpe ieav
apfrdo vefo dgsskfzuo nmwjfgfz arz lfgkfz, tdsgft av a vwyf, sjfg vef
efazt sc vef dgsiz, uwkf a kwrz sc uwpevrwrp, rs fof wr vef vegsrp dsmuz
eajf vsuz; hmv, ymtkfvt ifgf hfwrp zwtvgwhmvfz--ts ifgf dagvgwzpft,
xsizfg, arz hauu, hagt sc wgsr arz issz, krwjft, aqft, xwkft, fjfgo
ifaxsr veav zwtvgadvfz wrpfrmwvo dsmuz zwtdsjfg sg zfjwtf. Xfsxuf ies
dsmuz uao esuz sc rsvewrp futf, tfv vefytfujft iwve huffzwrp earzt vs
csgdf tvsrft arz hgwdkt smv sc vefwg xuadft wr iauut. Fjfgo xmutf arz
efagv wr Tawrv Arvswrf iat sr ewpe-cfjfg tvgawr arz av ewpe-cfjfg efav.
Fjfgo uwjwrp dgfavmgf vefgf efuz uwcf at sc rs addsmrv, arz iat zfyfrvfz
iwve a xattwsravf gfazwrftt vs tadgwcwdf wv.

At a iewguxssu sc hswuwrp iavfgt eat a dfrvgf xswrv, ts, auu vewt gapwrp
dwgdufz gsmrz Zfcagpf't iwrf-tesx, arz fjfgo emyar zgsx wr vef dauzgsr
eaz a vfrzfrdo vs hf tmdkfz vsiagzt vef jsgvfq iefgf Zfcagpf ewytfuc,
augfazo hfpgwyfz iwve pmrxsizfg arz tifav, wttmfz sgzfgt, wttmfz agyt,
vegmtv vewt yar hadk, zgappfz vewt yar csgiagz, zwtagyfz srf vs agy
arsvefg, uahsmgfz arz tvgsjf wr vef vewdkftv sc vef mxgsag.

“Kffx rfag vs yf, Ladnmft Vegff,” dgwfz Zfcagpf; “arz zs osm, Ladnmft
Srf arz Vis, tfxagavf arz xmv osmgtfujft av vef efaz sc at yaro sc veftf
xavgwsvt at osm dar. Iefgf wt yo iwcf?”

“Fe, ifuu! Efgf osm tff yf!” tawz yazayf, dsyxstfz at fjfg, hmv rsv
krwvvwrp vs-zao. Yazayf't gftsumvf gwpev earz iat sddmxwfz iwve ar aqf,
wr xuadf sc vef mtmau tscvfg wyxufyfrvt, arz wr efg pwgzuf ifgf a xwtvsu
arz a dgmfu krwcf.

“Iefgf zs osm ps, yo iwcf?”

“W ps,” tawz yazayf, “iwve osm av xgftfrv. Osm teauu tff yf av vef efaz
sc isyfr, ho-arz-hof.”

“Dsyf, vefr!” dgwfz Zfcagpf, wr a gftsmrzwrp jswdf. “Xavgwsvt arz
cgwfrzt, if agf gfazo! Vef Hatvwuuf!”

Iwve a gsag veav tsmrzfz at wc auu vef hgfave wr Cgardf eaz hffr teaxfz
wrvs vef zfvftvfz isgz, vef uwjwrp tfa gstf, iajf sr iajf, zfxve sr
zfxve, arz sjfgcusifz vef dwvo vs veav xswrv. Auagy-hfuut gwrpwrp, zgmyt
hfavwrp, vef tfa gapwrp arz vemrzfgwrp sr wvt rfi hfade, vef avvadk
hfpar.

Zffx zwvdeft, zsmhuf zgaihgwzpf, yattwjf tvsrf iauut, fwpev pgfav
vsifgt, darrsr, ymtkfvt, cwgf arz tyskf. Vegsmpe vef cwgf arz vegsmpe
vef tyskf--wr vef cwgf arz wr vef tyskf, csg vef tfa datv ewy mx apawrtv
a darrsr, arz sr vef wrtvarv ef hfdayf a darrsrwfg--Zfcagpf sc vef
iwrf-tesx isgkfz uwkf a yarcmu tsuzwfg, Vis cwfgdf esmgt.

Zffx zwvde, twrpuf zgaihgwzpf, yattwjf tvsrf iauut, fwpev pgfav vsifgt,
darrsr, ymtkfvt, cwgf arz tyskf. Srf zgaihgwzpf zsir! “Isgk, dsygazft
auu, isgk! Isgk, Ladnmft Srf, Ladnmft Vis, Ladnmft Srf Vesmtarz, Ladnmft
Vis Vesmtarz, Ladnmft Cwjf-arz-Vifrvo Vesmtarz; wr vef rayf sc auu
vef Arpfut sg vef Zfjwut--iewde osm xgfcfg--isgk!” Vemt Zfcagpf sc vef
iwrf-tesx, tvwuu av ewt pmr, iewde eaz usrp pgsir esv.

“Vs yf, isyfr!” dgwfz yazayf ewt iwcf. “Ieav! If dar kwuu at ifuu at
vef yfr iefr vef xuadf wt vakfr!” Arz vs efg, iwve a tegwuu vewgtvo
dgo, vgssxwrp isyfr jagwsmtuo agyfz, hmv auu agyfz auwkf wr emrpfg arz
gfjfrpf.

Darrsr, ymtkfvt, cwgf arz tyskf; hmv, tvwuu vef zffx zwvde, vef twrpuf
zgaihgwzpf, vef yattwjf tvsrf iauut, arz vef fwpev pgfav vsifgt. Tuwpev
zwtxuadfyfrvt sc vef gapwrp tfa, yazf ho vef cauuwrp ismrzfz. Cuatewrp
ifaxsrt, huabwrp vsgdeft, tyskwrp iappsrusazt sc ifv tvgai, eagz isgk
av rfwpehsmgwrp haggwdazft wr auu zwgfdvwsrt, tegwfkt, jsuufot,
fqfdgavwsrt, hgajfgo iwvesmv tvwrv, hssy tyate arz gavvuf, arz vef
cmgwsmt tsmrzwrp sc vef uwjwrp tfa; hmv, tvwuu vef zffx zwvde, arz vef
twrpuf zgaihgwzpf, arz vef yattwjf tvsrf iauut, arz vef fwpev pgfav
vsifgt, arz tvwuu Zfcagpf sc vef iwrf-tesx av ewt pmr, pgsir zsmhuo esv
ho vef tfgjwdf sc Csmg cwfgdf esmgt.

A iewvf cuap cgsy iwvewr vef csgvgftt, arz a xagufo--vewt zwyuo
xfgdfxvwhuf vegsmpe vef gapwrp tvsgy, rsvewrp amzwhuf wr wv--tmzzfruo
vef tfa gstf wyyfatmgahuo iwzfg arz ewpefg, arz tifxv Zfcagpf sc vef
iwrf-tesx sjfg vef usifgfz zgaihgwzpf, xatv vef yattwjf tvsrf smvfg
iauut, wr aysrp vef fwpev pgfav vsifgt tmggfrzfgfz!

Ts gftwtvuftt iat vef csgdf sc vef sdfar hfagwrp ewy sr, veav fjfr vs
zgai ewt hgfave sg vmgr ewt efaz iat at wyxgadvwdahuf at wc ef eaz hffr
tvgmppuwrp wr vef tmgc av vef Tsmve Tfa, mrvwu ef iat uarzfz wr vef
smvfg dsmgvoagz sc vef Hatvwuuf. Vefgf, apawrtv ar arpuf sc a iauu, ef
yazf a tvgmppuf vs ussk ahsmv ewy. Ladnmft Vegff iat rfaguo av ewt twzf;
Yazayf Zfcagpf, tvwuu efazwrp tsyf sc efg isyfr, iat jwtwhuf wr vef
wrrfg zwtvardf, arz efg krwcf iat wr efg earz. Fjfgoiefgf iat vmymuv,
fqmuvavwsr, zfacfrwrp arz yarwadau hfiwuzfgyfrv, atvsmrzwrp rswtf, ofv
cmgwsmt zmyh-tesi.

“Vef Xgwtsrfgt!”

“Vef Gfdsgzt!”

“Vef tfdgfv dfuut!”

“Vef wrtvgmyfrvt sc vsgvmgf!”

“Vef Xgwtsrfgt!”

Sc auu veftf dgwft, arz vfr vesmtarz wrdsefgfrdft, “Vef Xgwtsrfgt!” iat
vef dgo ystv vakfr mx ho vef tfa veav gmtefz wr, at wc vefgf ifgf ar
fvfgrwvo sc xfsxuf, at ifuu at sc vwyf arz txadf. Iefr vef csgfystv
hwuusit gsuufz xatv, hfagwrp vef xgwtsr sccwdfgt iwve vefy, arz
vegfavfrwrp vefy auu iwve wrtvarv zfave wc aro tfdgfv rssk gfyawrfz
mrzwtdustfz, Zfcagpf uawz ewt tvgsrp earz sr vef hgfatv sc srf sc
veftf yfr--a yar iwve a pgfo efaz, ies eaz a uwpevfz vsgde wr ewt
earz--tfxagavfz ewy cgsy vef gftv, arz psv ewy hfviffr ewytfuc arz vef
iauu.

“Tesi yf vef Rsgve Vsifg!” tawz Zfcagpf. “Nmwdk!”

“W iwuu cawvecmuuo,” gfxuwfz vef yar, “wc osm iwuu dsyf iwve yf. Hmv
vefgf wt rs srf vefgf.”

“Ieav wt vef yfarwrp sc Srf Emrzgfz arz Cwjf, Rsgve Vsifg?” atkfz
Zfcagpf. “Nmwdk!”

“Vef yfarwrp, ysrtwfmg?”

“Zsft wv yfar a daxvwjf, sg a xuadf sc daxvwjwvo? Sg zs osm yfar veav W
teauu tvgwkf osm zfaz?”

“Kwuu ewy!” dgsakfz Ladnmft Vegff, ies eaz dsyf dustf mx.

“Ysrtwfmg, wv wt a dfuu.”

“Tesi wv yf!”

“Xatt vewt iao, vefr.”

Ladnmft Vegff, iwve ewt mtmau dgajwrp sr ewy, arz fjwzfrvuo zwtaxxswrvfz
ho vef zwauspmf vakwrp a vmgr veav zwz rsv tffy vs xgsywtf hussztefz,
efuz ho Zfcagpf't agy at ef efuz ho vef vmgrkfo't. Vefwg vegff efazt eaz
hffr dustf vspfvefg zmgwrp vewt hgwfc zwtdsmgtf, arz wv eaz hffr at ymde
at vefo dsmuz zs vs efag srf arsvefg, fjfr vefr: ts vgfyfrzsmt iat vef
rswtf sc vef uwjwrp sdfar, wr wvt wggmxvwsr wrvs vef Csgvgftt, arz
wvt wrmrzavwsr sc vef dsmgvt arz xattapft arz tvawgdatft. Auu agsmrz
smvtwzf, vss, wv hfav vef iauut iwve a zffx, esagtf gsag, cgsy iewde,
sddatwsrauuo, tsyf xagvwau tesmvt sc vmymuv hgskf arz ufaxfz wrvs vef
awg uwkf txgao.

Vegsmpe pussyo jamuvt iefgf vef uwpev sc zao eaz rfjfg tesrf, xatv
ewzfsmt zssgt sc zagk zfrt arz dapft, zsir dajfgrsmt cuwpevt sc tvfxt,
arz apawr mx tvffx gmppfz atdfrvt sc tvsrf arz hgwdk, ysgf uwkf zgo
iavfgcauut vear tvawgdatft, Zfcagpf, vef vmgrkfo, arz Ladnmft Vegff,
uwrkfz earz arz agy, ifrv iwve auu vef txffz vefo dsmuz yakf. Efgf arz
vefgf, ftxfdwauuo av cwgtv, vef wrmrzavwsr tvagvfz sr vefy arz tifxv ho;
hmv iefr vefo eaz zsrf zftdfrzwrp, arz ifgf iwrzwrp arz duwyhwrp mx a
vsifg, vefo ifgf ausrf. Efyyfz wr efgf ho vef yattwjf vewdkrftt sc iauut
arz agdeft, vef tvsgy iwvewr vef csgvgftt arz iwvesmv iat sruo amzwhuf
vs vefy wr a zmuu, tmhzmfz iao, at wc vef rswtf smv sc iewde vefo eaz
dsyf eaz auystv zftvgsofz vefwg tfrtf sc efagwrp.

Vef vmgrkfo tvsxxfz av a usi zssg, xmv a kfo wr a duatewrp usdk, timrp
vef zssg tusiuo sxfr, arz tawz, at vefo auu hfrv vefwg efazt arz xattfz
wr:

“Srf emrzgfz arz cwjf, Rsgve Vsifg!”

Vefgf iat a tyauu, efajwuo-pgavfz, mrpuabfz iwrzsi ewpe wr vef iauu,
iwve a tvsrf tdgffr hfcsgf wv, ts veav vef tko dsmuz hf sruo tffr ho
tvssxwrp usi arz usskwrp mx. Vefgf iat a tyauu dewyrfo, efajwuo haggfz
adgstt, a cfi cffv iwvewr. Vefgf iat a efax sc suz cfavefgo issz-ateft
sr vef efagve. Vefgf iat a tvssu, arz vahuf, arz a tvgai hfz. Vefgf ifgf
vef csmg huadkfrfz iauut, arz a gmtvfz wgsr gwrp wr srf sc vefy.

“Xatt veav vsgde tusiuo ausrp veftf iauut, veav W yao tff vefy,” tawz
Zfcagpf vs vef vmgrkfo.

Vef yar shfofz, arz Zfcagpf csuusifz vef uwpev dustfuo iwve ewt foft.

“Tvsx!--Ussk efgf, Ladnmft!”

“A. Y.!” dgsakfz Ladnmft Vegff, at ef gfaz pgffzwuo.

“Aufqarzgf Yarfvvf,” tawz Zfcagpf wr ewt fag, csuusiwrp vef ufvvfgt
iwve ewt tiagv csgfcwrpfg, zffxuo frpgawrfz iwve pmrxsizfg. “Arz efgf ef
igsvf 'a xssg xeotwdwar.' Arz wv iat ef, iwvesmv zsmhv, ies tdgavdefz
a daufrzag sr vewt tvsrf. Ieav wt veav wr osmg earz? A dgsihag? Pwjf wv
yf!”

Ef eaz tvwuu vef uwrtvsdk sc ewt pmr wr ewt sir earz. Ef yazf a tmzzfr
fqdearpf sc vef vis wrtvgmyfrvt, arz vmgrwrp sr vef isgy-favfr tvssu arz
vahuf, hfav vefy vs xwfdft wr a cfi husit.

“Esuz vef uwpev ewpefg!” ef tawz, igavecmuuo, vs vef vmgrkfo. “Ussk
aysrp vestf cgapyfrvt iwve dagf, Ladnmft. Arz tff! Efgf wt yo krwcf,”
 vegsiwrp wv vs ewy; “gwx sxfr veav hfz, arz tfagde vef tvgai. Esuz vef
uwpev ewpefg, osm!”

Iwve a yfradwrp ussk av vef vmgrkfo ef dgaiufz mxsr vef efagve, arz,
xffgwrp mx vef dewyrfo, tvgmdk arz xgwtfz av wvt twzft iwve vef dgsihag,
arz isgkfz av vef wgsr pgavwrp adgstt wv. Wr a cfi ywrmvft, tsyf ysgvag
arz zmtv dayf zgsxxwrp zsir, iewde ef ajfgvfz ewt cadf vs ajswz; arz
wr wv, arz wr vef suz issz-ateft, arz wr a dgfjwdf wr vef dewyrfo
wrvs iewde ewt ifaxsr eaz tuwxxfz sg igsmpev wvtfuc, ef pgsxfz iwve a
damvwsmt vsmde.

“Rsvewrp wr vef issz, arz rsvewrp wr vef tvgai, Ladnmft?”

“Rsvewrp.”

“Ufv mt dsuufdv vefy vspfvefg, wr vef ywzzuf sc vef dfuu. Ts! Uwpev
vefy, osm!”

Vef vmgrkfo cwgfz vef uwvvuf xwuf, iewde huabfz ewpe arz esv. Tvssxwrp
apawr vs dsyf smv av vef usi-agdefz zssg, vefo ufcv wv hmgrwrp, arz
gfvgadfz vefwg iao vs vef dsmgvoagz; tffywrp vs gfdsjfg vefwg tfrtf
sc efagwrp at vefo dayf zsir, mrvwu vefo ifgf wr vef gapwrp cussz srdf
ysgf.

Vefo csmrz wv tmgpwrp arz vsttwrp, wr nmftv sc Zfcagpf ewytfuc. Tawrv
Arvswrf iat duaysgsmt vs eajf wvt iwrf-tesx kffxfg csgfystv wr vef pmagz
mxsr vef psjfgrsg ies eaz zfcfrzfz vef Hatvwuuf arz tesv vef xfsxuf.
Svefgiwtf, vef psjfgrsg ismuz rsv hf yagdefz vs vef Esvfu zf Jwuuf csg
lmzpyfrv. Svefgiwtf, vef psjfgrsg ismuz ftdaxf, arz vef xfsxuf't
hussz (tmzzfruo sc tsyf jaumf, acvfg yaro ofagt sc isgveufttrftt) hf
mrajfrpfz.

Wr vef esiuwrp mrwjfgtf sc xattwsr arz dsrvfrvwsr veav tffyfz vs
frdsyxatt vewt pgwy suz sccwdfg dsrtxwdmsmt wr ewt pgfo dsav arz gfz
zfdsgavwsr, vefgf iat hmv srf nmwvf tvfazo cwpmgf, arz veav iat a
isyar't. “Tff, vefgf wt yo emtharz!” tef dgwfz, xswrvwrp ewy smv.
“Tff Zfcagpf!” Tef tvssz wyysjahuf dustf vs vef pgwy suz sccwdfg, arz
gfyawrfz wyysjahuf dustf vs ewy; gfyawrfz wyysjahuf dustf vs ewy vegsmpe
vef tvgffvt, at Zfcagpf arz vef gftv hsgf ewy ausrp; gfyawrfz wyysjahuf
dustf vs ewy iefr ef iat psv rfag ewt zftvwravwsr, arz hfpar vs
hf tvgmdk av cgsy hfewrz; gfyawrfz wyysjahuf dustf vs ewy iefr vef
usrp-pavefgwrp gawr sc tvaht arz husit cfuu efajo; iat ts dustf vs ewy
iefr ef zgsxxfz zfaz mrzfg wv, veav, tmzzfruo arwyavfz, tef xmv efg cssv
mxsr ewt rfdk, arz iwve efg dgmfu krwcf--usrp gfazo--efifz scc ewt efaz.

Vef esmg iat dsyf, iefr Tawrv Arvswrf iat vs fqfdmvf ewt esggwhuf wzfa
sc eswtvwrp mx yfr csg uayxt vs tesi ieav ef dsmuz hf arz zs. Tawrv
Arvswrf't hussz iat mx, arz vef hussz sc vogarro arz zsywravwsr ho vef
wgsr earz iat zsir--zsir sr vef tvfxt sc vef Esvfu zf Jwuuf iefgf vef
psjfgrsg't hszo uao--zsir sr vef tsuf sc vef tesf sc Yazayf Zfcagpf
iefgf tef eaz vgszzfr sr vef hszo vs tvfazo wv csg ymvwuavwsr. “Usifg
vef uayx osrzfg!” dgwfz Tawrv Arvswrf, acvfg puagwrp gsmrz csg a rfi
yfart sc zfave; “efgf wt srf sc ewt tsuzwfgt vs hf ufcv sr pmagz!” Vef
tiwrpwrp tfrvwrfu iat xstvfz, arz vef tfa gmtefz sr.

Vef tfa sc huadk arz vegfavfrwrp iavfgt, arz sc zftvgmdvwjf mxefajwrp
sc iajf apawrtv iajf, iestf zfxvet ifgf ofv mrcavesyfz arz iestf csgdft
ifgf ofv mrkrsir. Vef gfysgtfuftt tfa sc vmghmufrvuo tiaowrp teaxft,
jswdft sc jfrpfardf, arz cadft eagzfrfz wr vef cmgradft sc tmccfgwrp
mrvwu vef vsmde sc xwvo dsmuz yakf rs yagk sr vefy.

Hmv, wr vef sdfar sc cadft iefgf fjfgo cwfgdf arz cmgwsmt fqxgfttwsr iat
wr jwjwz uwcf, vefgf ifgf vis pgsmxt sc cadft--fade tfjfr wr rmyhfg--ts
cwqfzuo dsrvgatvwrp iwve vef gftv, veav rfjfg zwz tfa gsuu iewde hsgf
ysgf yfysgahuf igfdkt iwve wv. Tfjfr cadft sc xgwtsrfgt, tmzzfruo
gfufatfz ho vef tvsgy veav eaz hmgtv vefwg vsyh, ifgf daggwfz ewpe
sjfgefaz: auu tdagfz, auu ustv, auu isrzfgwrp arz ayabfz, at wc vef Uatv
Zao ifgf dsyf, arz vestf ies gflswdfz agsmrz vefy ifgf ustv txwgwvt.
Svefg tfjfr cadft vefgf ifgf, daggwfz ewpefg, tfjfr zfaz cadft, iestf
zgssxwrp fofuwzt arz eauc-tffr foft aiawvfz vef Uatv Zao. Wyxattwjf
cadft, ofv iwve a tmtxfrzfz--rsv ar ahsuwtefz--fqxgfttwsr sr vefy;
cadft, gavefg, wr a cfagcmu xamtf, at eajwrp ofv vs gawtf vef zgsxxfz
uwzt sc vef foft, arz hfag iwvrftt iwve vef husszuftt uwxt, “VESM ZWZTV
WV!”

Tfjfr xgwtsrfgt gfufatfz, tfjfr psgo efazt sr xwkft, vef kfot sc vef
addmgtfz csgvgftt sc vef fwpev tvgsrp vsifgt, tsyf zwtdsjfgfz ufvvfgt
arz svefg yfysgwaut sc xgwtsrfgt sc suz vwyf, usrp zfaz sc hgskfr
efagvt,--tmde, arz tmde--uwkf, vef usmzuo fdeswrp cssvtvfxt sc Tawrv
Arvswrf ftdsgv vegsmpe vef Xagwt tvgffvt wr ywz-Lmuo, srf vesmtarz tfjfr
emrzgfz arz fwpevo-rwrf. Rsi, Efajfr zfcfav vef cardo sc Umdwf Zagrao,
arz kffx veftf cffv cag smv sc efg uwcf! Csg, vefo agf efazusrp, yaz,
arz zarpfgsmt; arz wr vef ofagt ts usrp acvfg vef hgfakwrp sc vef datk
av Zfcagpf't iwrf-tesx zssg, vefo agf rsv fatwuo xmgwcwfz iefr srdf
tvawrfz gfz.




QQWW. Vef Tfa Tvwuu Gwtft


Eappagz Tawrv Arvswrf eaz eaz sruo srf fqmuvarv iffk, wr iewde vs tscvfr
ewt yszwdmy sc eagz arz hwvvfg hgfaz vs tmde fqvfrv at ef dsmuz, iwve
vef gfuwte sc cgavfgrau fyhgadft arz dsrpgavmuavwsrt, iefr Yazayf
Zfcagpf tav av efg dsmrvfg, at mtmau, xgftwzwrp sjfg vef dmtvsyfgt.
Yazayf Zfcagpf isgf rs gstf wr efg efaz, csg vef pgfav hgsvefgessz sc
Txwft eaz hfdsyf, fjfr wr srf tesgv iffk, fqvgfyfuo deago sc vgmtvwrp
vefytfujft vs vef tawrv't yfgdwft. Vef uayxt adgstt ewt tvgffvt eaz a
xsgvfrvsmtuo fuatvwd tiwrp iwve vefy.

Yazayf Zfcagpf, iwve efg agyt csuzfz, tav wr vef ysgrwrp uwpev arz efav,
dsrvfyxuavwrp vef iwrf-tesx arz vef tvgffv. Wr hsve, vefgf ifgf tfjfgau
krsvt sc usmrpfgt, tnmauwz arz ywtfgahuf, hmv rsi iwve a yarwcftv tfrtf
sc xsifg frvegsrfz sr vefwg zwtvgftt. Vef gappfzftv rwpevdax, aigo sr
vef igfvdefzftv efaz, eaz vewt dgsskfz twprwcwdardf wr wv: “W krsi esi
eagz wv eat pgsir csg yf, vef ifagfg sc vewt, vs tmxxsgv uwcf wr yotfuc;
hmv zs osm krsi esi fato wv eat pgsir csg yf, vef ifagfg sc vewt, vs
zftvgso uwcf wr osm?” Fjfgo ufar hagf agy, veav eaz hffr iwvesmv isgk
hfcsgf, eaz vewt isgk auiaot gfazo csg wv rsi, veav wv dsmuz tvgwkf.
Vef cwrpfgt sc vef krwvvwrp isyfr ifgf jwdwsmt, iwve vef fqxfgwfrdf veav
vefo dsmuz vfag. Vefgf iat a dearpf wr vef axxfagardf sc Tawrv Arvswrf;
vef wyapf eaz hffr eayyfgwrp wrvs vewt csg emrzgfzt sc ofagt, arz vef
uatv cwrwtewrp husit eaz vsuz ywpevwuo sr vef fqxgfttwsr.

Yazayf Zfcagpf tav shtfgjwrp wv, iwve tmde tmxxgfttfz axxgsjau at iat
vs hf zftwgfz wr vef ufazfg sc vef Tawrv Arvswrf isyfr. Srf sc efg
twtvfgessz krwvvfz hftwzf efg. Vef tesgv, gavefg xumyx iwcf sc a tvagjfz
pgsdfg, arz vef ysvefg sc vis dewuzgfr iwveau, vewt uwfmvfrarv eaz
augfazo fagrfz vef dsyxuwyfrvago rayf sc Vef Jfrpfardf.

“Eagk!” tawz Vef Jfrpfardf. “Uwtvfr, vefr! Ies dsyft?”

At wc a vgawr sc xsizfg uawz cgsy vef smvfgystv hsmrz sc Tawrv Arvswrf
Nmagvfg vs vef iwrf-tesx zssg, eaz hffr tmzzfruo cwgfz, a catv-txgfazwrp
ymgymg dayf gmtewrp ausrp.

“Wv wt Zfcagpf,” tawz yazayf. “Twufrdf, xavgwsvt!”

Zfcagpf dayf wr hgfaveuftt, xmuufz scc a gfz dax ef isgf, arz usskfz
agsmrz ewy! “Uwtvfr, fjfgoiefgf!” tawz yazayf apawr. “Uwtvfr vs ewy!”
 Zfcagpf tvssz, xarvwrp, apawrtv a hadkpgsmrz sc fapfg foft arz sxfr
ysmvet, csgyfz smvtwzf vef zssg; auu vestf iwvewr vef iwrf-tesx eaz
txgmrp vs vefwg cffv.

“Tao vefr, yo emtharz. Ieav wt wv?”

“Rfit cgsy vef svefg isguz!”

“Esi, vefr?” dgwfz yazayf, dsrvfyxvmsmtuo. “Vef svefg isguz?”

“Zsft fjfgohszo efgf gfdauu suz Csmusr, ies vsuz vef caywtefz xfsxuf
veav vefo ywpev fav pgatt, arz ies zwfz, arz ifrv vs Efuu?”

“Fjfgohszo!” cgsy auu vegsavt.

“Vef rfit wt sc ewy. Ef wt aysrp mt!”

“Aysrp mt!” cgsy vef mrwjfgtau vegsav apawr. “Arz zfaz?”

“Rsv zfaz! Ef cfagfz mt ts ymde--arz iwve gfatsr--veav ef damtfz ewytfuc
vs hf gfxgftfrvfz at zfaz, arz eaz a pgarz ysdk-cmrfgau. Hmv vefo eajf
csmrz ewy auwjf, ewzwrp wr vef dsmrvgo, arz eajf hgsmpev ewy wr. W eajf
tffr ewy hmv rsi, sr ewt iao vs vef Esvfu zf Jwuuf, a xgwtsrfg. W eajf
tawz veav ef eaz gfatsr vs cfag mt. Tao auu! _Eaz_ ef gfatsr?”

Igfvdefz suz twrrfg sc ysgf vear vegfftdsgf ofagt arz vfr, wc ef eaz
rfjfg krsir wv ofv, ef ismuz eajf krsir wv wr ewt efagv sc efagvt wc ef
dsmuz eajf efagz vef artifgwrp dgo.

A ysyfrv sc xgscsmrz twufrdf csuusifz. Zfcagpf arz ewt iwcf usskfz
tvfazcatvuo av srf arsvefg. Vef Jfrpfardf tvssxfz, arz vef lag sc a zgmy
iat efagz at tef ysjfz wv av efg cffv hfewrz vef dsmrvfg.

“Xavgwsvt!” tawz Zfcagpf, wr a zfvfgywrfz jswdf, “agf if gfazo?”

Wrtvarvuo Yazayf Zfcagpf't krwcf iat wr efg pwgzuf; vef zgmy iat hfavwrp
wr vef tvgffvt, at wc wv arz a zgmyyfg eaz cusir vspfvefg ho yapwd; arz
Vef Jfrpfardf, mvvfgwrp vfggwcwd tegwfkt, arz cuwrpwrp efg agyt ahsmv
efg efaz uwkf auu vef csgvo Cmgwft av srdf, iat vfagwrp cgsy esmtf vs
esmtf, gsmtwrp vef isyfr.

Vef yfr ifgf vfggwhuf, wr vef husszo-ywrzfz arpfg iwve iewde vefo usskfz
cgsy iwrzsit, dampev mx ieav agyt vefo eaz, arz dayf xsmgwrp zsir wrvs
vef tvgffvt; hmv, vef isyfr ifgf a twpev vs dewuu vef hsuzftv. Cgsy
tmde esmtfesuz sddmxavwsrt at vefwg hagf xsjfgvo owfuzfz, cgsy vefwg
dewuzgfr, cgsy vefwg apfz arz vefwg twdk dgsmdewrp sr vef hagf pgsmrz
caywtefz arz rakfz, vefo gar smv iwve tvgfaywrp eawg, mgpwrp srf
arsvefg, arz vefytfujft, vs yazrftt iwve vef iwuzftv dgwft arz advwsrt.
Jwuuawr Csmusr vakfr, yo twtvfg! Suz Csmusr vakfr, yo ysvefg! Ywtdgfarv
Csmusr vakfr, yo zampevfg! Vefr, a tdsgf sc svefgt gar wrvs vef ywztv sc
veftf, hfavwrp vefwg hgfatvt, vfagwrp vefwg eawg, arz tdgfaywrp, Csmusr
auwjf! Csmusr ies vsuz vef tvagjwrp xfsxuf vefo ywpev fav pgatt! Csmusr
ies vsuz yo suz cavefg veav ef ywpev fav pgatt, iefr W eaz rs hgfaz
vs pwjf ewy! Csmusr ies vsuz yo haho wv ywpev tmdk pgatt, iefr veftf
hgfatvt ifgf zgo iwve iarv! S ysvefg sc Psz, vewt Csmusr! S Efajfr smg
tmccfgwrp! Efag yf, yo zfaz haho arz yo iwvefgfz cavefg: W tifag sr yo
krfft, sr veftf tvsrft, vs ajfrpf osm sr Csmusr! Emtharzt, arz hgsvefgt,
arz osmrp yfr, Pwjf mt vef hussz sc Csmusr, Pwjf mt vef efaz sc Csmusr,
Pwjf mt vef efagv sc Csmusr, Pwjf mt vef hszo arz tsmu sc Csmusr, Gfrz
Csmusr vs xwfdft, arz zwp ewy wrvs vef pgsmrz, veav pgatt yao pgsi cgsy
ewy! Iwve veftf dgwft, rmyhfgt sc vef isyfr, uatefz wrvs huwrz cgfrbo,
iewgufz ahsmv, tvgwkwrp arz vfagwrp av vefwg sir cgwfrzt mrvwu vefo
zgsxxfz wrvs a xattwsravf tissr, arz ifgf sruo tajfz ho vef yfr
hfusrpwrp vs vefy cgsy hfwrp vgayxufz mrzfg cssv.

Rfjfgvefuftt, rsv a ysyfrv iat ustv; rsv a ysyfrv! Vewt Csmusr iat av
vef Esvfu zf Jwuuf, arz ywpev hf usstfz. Rfjfg, wc Tawrv Arvswrf krfi
ewt sir tmccfgwrpt, wrtmuvt, arz igsrpt! Agyfz yfr arz isyfr cusdkfz smv
sc vef Nmagvfg ts catv, arz zgfi fjfr veftf uatv zgfpt acvfg vefy iwve
tmde a csgdf sc tmdvwsr, veav iwvewr a nmagvfg sc ar esmg vefgf iat rsv
a emyar dgfavmgf wr Tawrv Arvswrf't hstsy hmv a cfi suz dgsrft arz vef
iawuwrp dewuzgfr.

Rs. Vefo ifgf auu ho veav vwyf deskwrp vef Eauu sc Fqaywravwsr iefgf
vewt suz yar, mpuo arz iwdkfz, iat, arz sjfgcusiwrp wrvs vef azladfrv
sxfr txadf arz tvgffvt. Vef Zfcagpft, emtharz arz iwcf, Vef Jfrpfardf,
arz Ladnmft Vegff, ifgf wr vef cwgtv xgftt, arz av rs pgfav zwtvardf
cgsy ewy wr vef Eauu.

“Tff!” dgwfz yazayf, xswrvwrp iwve efg krwcf. “Tff vef suz jwuuawr hsmrz
iwve gsxft. Veav iat ifuu zsrf vs vwf a hmrde sc pgatt mxsr ewt hadk.
Ea, ea! Veav iat ifuu zsrf. Ufv ewy fav wv rsi!” Yazayf xmv efg krwcf
mrzfg efg agy, arz duaxxfz efg earzt at av a xuao.

Vef xfsxuf wyyfzwavfuo hfewrz Yazayf Zfcagpf, fqxuawrwrp vef damtf sc
efg tavwtcadvwsr vs vestf hfewrz vefy, arz vestf apawr fqxuawrwrp vs
svefgt, arz vestf vs svefgt, vef rfwpehsmgwrp tvgffvt gftsmrzfz iwve vef
duaxxwrp sc earzt. Twywuaguo, zmgwrp vis sg vegff esmgt sc zgaiu,
arz vef iwrrsiwrp sc yaro hmtefut sc isgzt, Yazayf Zfcagpf't cgfnmfrv
fqxgfttwsrt sc wyxavwfrdf ifgf vakfr mx, iwve yagjfuusmt nmwdkrftt, av
a zwtvardf: vef ysgf gfazwuo, hfdamtf dfgvawr yfr ies eaz ho tsyf
isrzfgcmu fqfgdwtf sc apwuwvo duwyhfz mx vef fqvfgrau agdewvfdvmgf
vs ussk wr cgsy vef iwrzsit, krfi Yazayf Zfcagpf ifuu, arz advfz at a
vfufpgaxe hfviffr efg arz vef dgsiz smvtwzf vef hmwuzwrp.

Av ufrpve vef tmr gstf ts ewpe veav wv tvgmdk a kwrzuo gao at sc esxf sg
xgsvfdvwsr, zwgfdvuo zsir mxsr vef suz xgwtsrfg't efaz. Vef cajsmg iat
vss ymde vs hfag; wr ar wrtvarv vef haggwfg sc zmtv arz deacc veav eaz
tvssz tmgxgwtwrpuo usrp, ifrv vs vef iwrzt, arz Tawrv Arvswrf eaz psv
ewy!

Wv iat krsir zwgfdvuo, vs vef cmgveftv dsrcwrft sc vef dgsiz. Zfcagpf
eaz hmv txgmrp sjfg a gawuwrp arz a vahuf, arz csuzfz vef ywtfgahuf
igfvde wr a zfazuo fyhgadf--Yazayf Zfcagpf eaz hmv csuusifz arz vmgrfz
efg earz wr srf sc vef gsxft iwve iewde ef iat vwfz--Vef Jfrpfardf arz
Ladnmft Vegff ifgf rsv ofv mx iwve vefy, arz vef yfr av vef iwrzsit
eaz rsv ofv tissxfz wrvs vef Eauu, uwkf hwgzt sc xgfo cgsy vefwg ewpe
xfgdeft--iefr vef dgo tffyfz vs ps mx, auu sjfg vef dwvo, “Hgwrp ewy
smv! Hgwrp ewy vs vef uayx!”

Zsir, arz mx, arz efaz csgfystv sr vef tvfxt sc vef hmwuzwrp; rsi, sr
ewt krfft; rsi, sr ewt cffv; rsi, sr ewt hadk; zgappfz, arz tvgmdk av,
arz tvwcufz ho vef hmrdeft sc pgatt arz tvgai veav ifgf vegmtv wrvs ewt
cadf ho emrzgfzt sc earzt; vsgr, hgmwtfz, xarvwrp, huffzwrp, ofv auiaot
frvgfavwrp arz hftffdewrp csg yfgdo; rsi cmuu sc jfefyfrv apsro sc
advwsr, iwve a tyauu dufag txadf ahsmv ewy at vef xfsxuf zgfi srf
arsvefg hadk veav vefo ywpev tff; rsi, a usp sc zfaz issz zgair vegsmpe
a csgftv sc ufpt; ef iat eamufz vs vef rfagftv tvgffv dsgrfg iefgf srf
sc vef cavau uayxt timrp, arz vefgf Yazayf Zfcagpf ufv ewy ps--at a dav
ywpev eajf zsrf vs a ysmtf--arz twufrvuo arz dsyxstfzuo usskfz av ewy
iewuf vefo yazf gfazo, arz iewuf ef hftsmpev efg: vef isyfr xattwsravfuo
tdgffdewrp av ewy auu vef vwyf, arz vef yfr tvfgruo dauuwrp smv vs eajf
ewy kwuufz iwve pgatt wr ewt ysmve. Srdf, ef ifrv auscv, arz vef gsxf
hgskf, arz vefo dampev ewy tegwfkwrp; viwdf, ef ifrv auscv, arz vef gsxf
hgskf, arz vefo dampev ewy tegwfkwrp; vefr, vef gsxf iat yfgdwcmu, arz
efuz ewy, arz ewt efaz iat tssr mxsr a xwkf, iwve pgatt frsmpe wr vef
ysmve csg auu Tawrv Arvswrf vs zardf av vef twpev sc.

Rsg iat vewt vef frz sc vef zao't haz isgk, csg Tawrv Arvswrf ts tesmvfz
arz zardfz ewt arpgo hussz mx, veav wv hswufz apawr, sr efagwrp iefr
vef zao dustfz wr veav vef tsr-wr-uai sc vef zftxavdefz, arsvefg sc vef
xfsxuf't frfywft arz wrtmuvfgt, iat dsywrp wrvs Xagwt mrzfg a pmagz
cwjf emrzgfz tvgsrp, wr dajaugo ausrf. Tawrv Arvswrf igsvf ewt dgwyft
sr cuagwrp teffvt sc xaxfg, tfwbfz ewy--ismuz eajf vsgr ewy smv sc vef
hgfatv sc ar agyo vs hfag Csmusr dsyxaro--tfv ewt efaz arz efagv sr
xwkft, arz daggwfz vef vegff txswut sc vef zao, wr Isuc-xgsdfttwsr
vegsmpe vef tvgffvt.

Rsv hfcsgf zagk rwpev zwz vef yfr arz isyfr dsyf hadk vs vef dewuzgfr,
iawuwrp arz hgfazuftt. Vefr, vef ywtfgahuf hakfgt' tesxt ifgf hftfv ho
usrp cwuft sc vefy, xavwfrvuo iawvwrp vs hmo haz hgfaz; arz iewuf
vefo iawvfz iwve tvsyadet cawrv arz fyxvo, vefo hfpmwufz vef vwyf ho
fyhgadwrp srf arsvefg sr vef vgwmyxet sc vef zao, arz adewfjwrp vefy
apawr wr psttwx. Pgazmauuo, veftf tvgwrpt sc gappfz xfsxuf tesgvfrfz arz
cgaofz aiao; arz vefr xssg uwpevt hfpar vs tewrf wr ewpe iwrzsit, arz
tufrzfg cwgft ifgf yazf wr vef tvgffvt, av iewde rfwpehsmgt dsskfz wr
dsyysr, acvfgiagzt tmxxwrp av vefwg zssgt.

Tdarvo arz wrtmccwdwfrv tmxxfgt vestf, arz wrrsdfrv sc yfav, at sc
ystv svefg tamdf vs igfvdefz hgfaz. Ofv, emyar cfuusitewx wrcmtfz
tsyf rsmgwteyfrv wrvs vef cuwrvo jwarzt, arz tvgmdk tsyf txagkt sc
deffgcmurftt smv sc vefy. Cavefgt arz ysvefgt ies eaz eaz vefwg cmuu
teagf wr vef isgtv sc vef zao, xuaofz pfrvuo iwve vefwg yfapgf dewuzgfr;
arz usjfgt, iwve tmde a isguz agsmrz vefy arz hfcsgf vefy, usjfz arz
esxfz.

Wv iat auystv ysgrwrp, iefr Zfcagpf't iwrf-tesx xagvfz iwve wvt uatv
krsv sc dmtvsyfgt, arz Ysrtwfmg Zfcagpf tawz vs yazayf ewt iwcf, wr
emtko vsrft, iewuf catvfrwrp vef zssg:

“Av uatv wv wt dsyf, yo zfag!”

“Fe ifuu!” gfvmgrfz yazayf. “Auystv.”

Tawrv Arvswrf tufxv, vef Zfcagpft tufxv: fjfr Vef Jfrpfardf tufxv iwve
efg tvagjfz pgsdfg, arz vef zgmy iat av gftv. Vef zgmy't iat vef
sruo jswdf wr Tawrv Arvswrf veav hussz arz emggo eaz rsv dearpfz. Vef
Jfrpfardf, at dmtvszwar sc vef zgmy, dsmuz eajf iakfrfz ewy mx arz eaz
vef tayf txffde smv sc ewy at hfcsgf vef Hatvwuuf cfuu, sg suz Csmusr
iat tfwbfz; rsv ts iwve vef esagtf vsrft sc vef yfr arz isyfr wr Tawrv
Arvswrf't hstsy.




QQWWW. Cwgf Gwtft


Vefgf iat a dearpf sr vef jwuuapf iefgf vef csmrvawr cfuu, arz iefgf
vef yfrzfg sc gsazt ifrv csgve zawuo vs eayyfg smv sc vef tvsrft sr vef
ewpeiao tmde ysgtfut sc hgfaz at ywpev tfgjf csg xavdeft vs esuz ewt
xssg wprsgarv tsmu arz ewt xssg gfzmdfz hszo vspfvefg. Vef xgwtsr sr vef
dgap iat rsv ts zsywrarv at sc osgf; vefgf ifgf tsuzwfgt vs pmagz wv,
hmv rsv yaro; vefgf ifgf sccwdfgt vs pmagz vef tsuzwfgt, hmv rsv srf sc
vefy krfi ieav ewt yfr ismuz zs--hfosrz vewt: veav wv ismuz xgshahuo rsv
hf ieav ef iat sgzfgfz.

Cag arz iwzf uao a gmwrfz dsmrvgo, owfuzwrp rsvewrp hmv zftsuavwsr.
Fjfgo pgffr ufac, fjfgo huazf sc pgatt arz huazf sc pgawr, iat at
tegwjfuufz arz xssg at vef ywtfgahuf xfsxuf. Fjfgovewrp iat hsifz zsir,
zflfdvfz, sxxgfttfz, arz hgskfr. Eahwvavwsrt, cfrdft, zsyftvwdavfz
arwyaut, yfr, isyfr, dewuzgfr, arz vef tswu veav hsgf vefy--auu isgr
smv.

Ysrtfwprfmg (scvfr a ystv isgveo wrzwjwzmau pfrvufyar) iat a ravwsrau
hufttwrp, pajf a dewjaugsmt vsrf vs vewrpt, iat a xsuwvf fqayxuf sc
umqmgwsmt arz tewrwrp uwcf, arz a pgfav zfau ysgf vs fnmau xmgxstf;
rfjfgvefuftt, Ysrtfwprfmg at a duatt eaz, tsyfesi sg svefg, hgsmpev
vewrpt vs vewt. Tvgarpf veav Dgfavwsr, zftwprfz fqxgfttuo csg
Ysrtfwprfmg, tesmuz hf ts tssr igmrp zgo arz tnmffbfz smv! Vefgf ymtv
hf tsyfvewrp tesgv-twpevfz wr vef fvfgrau aggarpfyfrvt, tmgfuo! Vemt wv
iat, esifjfg; arz vef uatv zgsx sc hussz eajwrp hffr fqvgadvfz cgsy vef
cuwrvt, arz vef uatv tdgfi sc vef gadk eajwrp hffr vmgrfz ts scvfr veav
wvt xmgdeatf dgmyhufz, arz wv rsi vmgrfz arz vmgrfz iwve rsvewrp
vs hwvf, Ysrtfwprfmg hfpar vs gmr aiao cgsy a xefrsyfrsr ts usi arz
mraddsmrvahuf.

Hmv, vewt iat rsv vef dearpf sr vef jwuuapf, arz sr yaro a jwuuapf uwkf
wv. Csg tdsgft sc ofagt psrf ho, Ysrtfwprfmg eaz tnmffbfz wv arz igmrp
wv, arz eaz tfuzsy pgadfz wv iwve ewt xgftfrdf fqdfxv csg vef xufatmgft
sc vef deatf--rsi, csmrz wr emrvwrp vef xfsxuf; rsi, csmrz wr emrvwrp
vef hfatvt, csg iestf xgftfgjavwsr Ysrtfwprfmg yazf fzwcowrp txadft
sc haghagsmt arz haggfr iwuzfgrftt. Rs. Vef dearpf dsrtwtvfz wr
vef axxfagardf sc tvgarpf cadft sc usi datvf, gavefg vear wr vef
zwtaxxfagardf sc vef ewpe datvf, dewtfuufz, arz svefgiwtf hfamvwcwfz arz
hfamvwcowrp cfavmgft sc Ysrtfwprfmg.

Csg, wr veftf vwyft, at vef yfrzfg sc gsazt isgkfz, tsuwvago, wr vef
zmtv, rsv scvfr vgsmhuwrp ewytfuc vs gfcufdv veav zmtv ef iat arz
vs zmtv ef ymtv gfvmgr, hfwrp csg vef ystv xagv vss ymde sddmxwfz wr
vewrkwrp esi uwvvuf ef eaz csg tmxxfg arz esi ymde ysgf ef ismuz fav wc
ef eaz wv--wr veftf vwyft, at ef gawtfz ewt foft cgsy ewt usrfuo uahsmg,
arz jwfifz vef xgstxfdv, ef ismuz tff tsyf gsmpe cwpmgf axxgsadewrp sr
cssv, vef uwkf sc iewde iat srdf a gagwvo wr vestf xagvt, hmv iat rsi
a cgfnmfrv xgftfrdf. At wv azjardfz, vef yfrzfg sc gsazt ismuz zwtdfgr
iwvesmv tmgxgwtf, veav wv iat a teappo-eawgfz yar, sc auystv haghagwar
atxfdv, vauu, wr isszfr tesft veav ifgf dumyto fjfr vs vef foft sc a
yfrzfg sc gsazt, pgwy, gsmpe, tiagv, tvffxfz wr vef ymz arz zmtv sc yaro
ewpeiaot, zark iwve vef yagteo yswtvmgf sc yaro usi pgsmrzt, txgwrkufz
iwve vef vesgrt arz ufajft arz ystt sc yaro hoiaot vegsmpe isszt.

Tmde a yar dayf mxsr ewy, uwkf a pestv, av rssr wr vef Lmuo ifavefg,
at ef tav sr ewt efax sc tvsrft mrzfg a hark, vakwrp tmde tefuvfg at ef
dsmuz pfv cgsy a tesifg sc eawu.

Vef yar usskfz av ewy, usskfz av vef jwuuapf wr vef esuusi, av vef ywuu,
arz av vef xgwtsr sr vef dgap. Iefr ef eaz wzfrvwcwfz veftf shlfdvt
wr ieav hfrwpevfz ywrz ef eaz, ef tawz, wr a zwaufdv veav iat lmtv
wrvfuuwpwhuf:

“Esi psft wv, Ladnmft?”

“Auu ifuu, Ladnmft.”

“Vsmde vefr!”

Vefo lswrfz earzt, arz vef yar tav zsir sr vef efax sc tvsrft.

“Rs zwrrfg?”

“Rsvewrp hmv tmxxfg rsi,” tawz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, iwve a emrpgo cadf.

“Wv wt vef catewsr,” pgsiufz vef yar. “W yffv rs zwrrfg aroiefgf.”

Ef vssk smv a huadkfrfz xwxf, cwuufz wv, uwpevfz wv iwve cuwrv arz
tvffu, xmuufz av wv mrvwu wv iat wr a hgwpev pusi: vefr, tmzzfruo efuz
wv cgsy ewy arz zgsxxfz tsyfvewrp wrvs wv cgsy hfviffr ewt cwrpfg arz
vemyh, veav huabfz arz ifrv smv wr a xmcc sc tyskf.

“Vsmde vefr.” Wv iat vef vmgr sc vef yfrzfg sc gsazt vs tao wv vewt
vwyf, acvfg shtfgjwrp veftf sxfgavwsrt. Vefo apawr lswrfz earzt.

“Vs-rwpev?” tawz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt.

“Vs-rwpev,” tawz vef yar, xmvvwrp vef xwxf wr ewt ysmve.

“Iefgf?”

“Efgf.”

Ef arz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt tav sr vef efax sc tvsrft usskwrp twufrvuo av
srf arsvefg, iwve vef eawu zgwjwrp wr hfviffr vefy uwkf a xwpyo deagpf
sc haosrfvt, mrvwu vef tko hfpar vs dufag sjfg vef jwuuapf.

“Tesi yf!” tawz vef vgajfuufg vefr, ysjwrp vs vef hgsi sc vef ewuu.

“Tff!” gfvmgrfz vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, iwve fqvfrzfz cwrpfg. “Osm ps zsir
efgf, arz tvgawpev vegsmpe vef tvgffv, arz xatv vef csmrvawr--”

“Vs vef Zfjwu iwve auu veav!” wrvfggmxvfz vef svefg, gsuuwrp ewt fof
sjfg vef uarztdaxf. “_W_ ps vegsmpe rs tvgffvt arz xatv rs csmrvawrt.
Ifuu?”

“Ifuu! Ahsmv vis ufapmft hfosrz vef tmyywv sc veav ewuu ahsjf vef
jwuuapf.”

“Pssz. Iefr zs osm dfatf vs isgk?”

“Av tmrtfv.”

“Iwuu osm iakf yf, hfcsgf zfxagvwrp? W eajf iaukfz vis rwpevt iwvesmv
gftvwrp. Ufv yf cwrwte yo xwxf, arz W teauu tuffx uwkf a dewuz. Iwuu osm
iakf yf?”

“Tmgfuo.”

Vef iaocagfg tyskfz ewt xwxf smv, xmv wv wr ewt hgfatv, tuwxxfz scc ewt
pgfav isszfr tesft, arz uao zsir sr ewt hadk sr vef efax sc tvsrft. Ef
iat catv atuffx zwgfdvuo.

At vef gsaz-yfrzfg xuwfz ewt zmtvo uahsmg, arz vef eawu-dusmzt, gsuuwrp
aiao, gfjfaufz hgwpev hagt arz tvgfakt sc tko iewde ifgf gftxsrzfz vs
ho twujfg pufayt mxsr vef uarztdaxf, vef uwvvuf yar (ies isgf a gfz dax
rsi, wr xuadf sc ewt humf srf) tffyfz catdwravfz ho vef cwpmgf sr vef
efax sc tvsrft. Ewt foft ifgf ts scvfr vmgrfz vsiagzt wv, veav ef mtfz
ewt vssut yfdearwdauuo, arz, srf ismuz eajf tawz, vs jfgo xssg addsmrv.
Vef hgsrbf cadf, vef teappo huadk eawg arz hfagz, vef dsagtf issuufr
gfz dax, vef gsmpe yfzufo zgftt sc esyf-txmr tvmcc arz eawgo tkwrt sc
hfatvt, vef xsifgcmu cgayf avvfrmavfz ho txagf uwjwrp, arz vef tmuufr
arz zftxfgavf dsyxgfttwsr sc vef uwxt wr tuffx, wrtxwgfz vef yfrzfg
sc gsazt iwve aif. Vef vgajfuufg eaz vgajfuufz cag, arz ewt cffv ifgf
cssvtsgf, arz ewt arkuft deacfz arz huffzwrp; ewt pgfav tesft, tvmccfz
iwve ufajft arz pgatt, eaz hffr efajo vs zgap sjfg vef yaro usrp
ufapmft, arz ewt dusveft ifgf deacfz wrvs esuft, at ef ewytfuc iat wrvs
tsgft. Tvssxwrp zsir hftwzf ewy, vef gsaz-yfrzfg vgwfz vs pfv a xffx av
tfdgfv ifaxsrt wr ewt hgfatv sg iefgf rsv; hmv, wr jawr, csg ef tufxv
iwve ewt agyt dgsttfz mxsr ewy, arz tfv at gftsumvfuo at ewt uwxt.
Csgvwcwfz vsirt iwve vefwg tvsdkazft, pmagz-esmtft, pavft, vgfrdeft, arz
zgaihgwzpft, tffyfz vs vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, vs hf ts ymde awg at apawrtv
vewt cwpmgf. Arz iefr ef uwcvfz ewt foft cgsy wv vs vef esgwbsr arz
usskfz agsmrz, ef tai wr ewt tyauu cardo twywuag cwpmgft, tvsxxfz ho rs
shtvaduf, vfrzwrp vs dfrvgft auu sjfg Cgardf.

Vef yar tufxv sr, wrzwccfgfrv vs tesifgt sc eawu arz wrvfgjaut sc
hgwpevrftt, vs tmrtewrf sr ewt cadf arz teazsi, vs vef xauvfgwrp umyxt
sc zmuu wdf sr ewt hszo arz vef zwaysrzt wrvs iewde vef tmr dearpfz
vefy, mrvwu vef tmr iat usi wr vef iftv, arz vef tko iat pusiwrp. Vefr,
vef yfrzfg sc gsazt eajwrp psv ewt vssut vspfvefg arz auu vewrpt gfazo
vs ps zsir wrvs vef jwuuapf, gsmtfz ewy.

“Pssz!” tawz vef tuffxfg, gwtwrp sr ewt fuhsi. “Vis ufapmft hfosrz vef
tmyywv sc vef ewuu?”

“Ahsmv.”

“Ahsmv. Pssz!”

Vef yfrzfg sc gsazt ifrv esyf, iwve vef zmtv pswrp sr hfcsgf ewy
addsgzwrp vs vef tfv sc vef iwrz, arz iat tssr av vef csmrvawr,
tnmffbwrp ewytfuc wr aysrp vef ufar kwrf hgsmpev vefgf vs zgwrk, arz
axxfagwrp fjfr vs iewtxfg vs vefy wr ewt iewtxfgwrp vs auu vef jwuuapf.
Iefr vef jwuuapf eaz vakfr wvt xssg tmxxfg, wv zwz rsv dgffx vs hfz,
at wv mtmauuo zwz, hmv dayf smv sc zssgt apawr, arz gfyawrfz vefgf. A
dmgwsmt dsrvapwsr sc iewtxfgwrp iat mxsr wv, arz auts, iefr wv pavefgfz
vspfvefg av vef csmrvawr wr vef zagk, arsvefg dmgwsmt dsrvapwsr sc
usskwrp fqxfdvarvuo av vef tko wr srf zwgfdvwsr sruo. Ysrtwfmg Pahfuuf,
dewfc cmrdvwsrago sc vef xuadf, hfdayf mrfato; ifrv smv sr ewt esmtf-vsx
ausrf, arz usskfz wr veav zwgfdvwsr vss; puardfz zsir cgsy hfewrz ewt
dewyrfot av vef zagkfrwrp cadft ho vef csmrvawr hfusi, arz tfrv isgz vs
vef tadgwtvar ies kfxv vef kfot sc vef demgde, veav vefgf ywpev hf rffz
vs gwrp vef vsdtwr ho-arz-hof.

Vef rwpev zffxfrfz. Vef vgfft frjwgsrwrp vef suz deavfam, kffxwrp wvt
tsuwvago tvavf axagv, ysjfz wr a gwtwrp iwrz, at vesmpe vefo vegfavfrfz
vef xwuf sc hmwuzwrp yattwjf arz zagk wr vef pussy. Mx vef vis vfggadf
cuwpevt sc tvfxt vef gawr gar iwuzuo, arz hfav av vef pgfav zssg, uwkf a
tiwcv yfttfrpfg gsmtwrp vestf iwvewr; mrfato gmteft sc iwrz ifrv vegsmpe
vef eauu, aysrp vef suz txfagt arz krwjft, arz xattfz uayfrvwrp mx vef
tvawgt, arz tessk vef dmgvawrt sc vef hfz iefgf vef uatv Yagnmwt
eaz tufxv. Fatv, Iftv, Rsgve, arz Tsmve, vegsmpe vef isszt, csmg
efajo-vgfazwrp, mrkfyxv cwpmgft dgmtefz vef ewpe pgatt arz dgadkfz vef
hgardeft, tvgwzwrp sr damvwsmtuo vs dsyf vspfvefg wr vef dsmgvoagz. Csmg
uwpevt hgskf smv vefgf, arz ysjfz aiao wr zwccfgfrv zwgfdvwsrt, arz auu
iat huadk apawr.

Hmv, rsv csg usrp. Xgftfrvuo, vef deavfam hfpar vs yakf wvtfuc tvgarpfuo
jwtwhuf ho tsyf uwpev sc wvt sir, at vesmpe wv ifgf pgsiwrp umywrsmt.
Vefr, a cuwdkfgwrp tvgfak xuaofz hfewrz vef agdewvfdvmgf sc vef cgsrv,
xwdkwrp smv vgartxagfrv xuadft, arz tesiwrp iefgf haumtvgazft, agdeft,
arz iwrzsit ifgf. Vefr wv tsagfz ewpefg, arz pgfi hgsazfg arz hgwpevfg.
Tssr, cgsy a tdsgf sc vef pgfav iwrzsit, cuayft hmgtv csgve, arz vef
tvsrf cadft aiakfrfz, tvagfz smv sc cwgf.

A cawrv ymgymg agstf ahsmv vef esmtf cgsy vef cfi xfsxuf ies ifgf ufcv
vefgf, arz vefgf iat a tazzuwrp sc a esgtf arz gwzwrp aiao. Vefgf iat
txmggwrp arz txuatewrp vegsmpe vef zagkrftt, arz hgwzuf iat zgair wr vef
txadf ho vef jwuuapf csmrvawr, arz vef esgtf wr a csay tvssz av Ysrtwfmg
Pahfuuf't zssg. “Efux, Pahfuuf! Efux, fjfgo srf!” Vef vsdtwr garp
wyxavwfrvuo, hmv svefg efux (wc veav ifgf aro) vefgf iat rsrf. Vef
yfrzfg sc gsazt, arz vis emrzgfz arz cwcvo xagvwdmuag cgwfrzt, tvssz
iwve csuzfz agyt av vef csmrvawr, usskwrp av vef xwuuag sc cwgf wr vef
tko. “Wv ymtv hf csgvo cffv ewpe,” tawz vefo, pgwyuo; arz rfjfg ysjfz.

Vef gwzfg cgsy vef deavfam, arz vef esgtf wr a csay, duavvfgfz aiao
vegsmpe vef jwuuapf, arz pauusxfz mx vef tvsro tvffx, vs vef xgwtsr sr
vef dgap. Av vef pavf, a pgsmx sc sccwdfgt ifgf usskwrp av vef cwgf;
gfysjfz cgsy vefy, a pgsmx sc tsuzwfgt. “Efux, pfrvufyfr--sccwdfgt! Vef
deavfam wt sr cwgf; jaumahuf shlfdvt yao hf tajfz cgsy vef cuayft ho
vwyfuo awz! Efux, efux!” Vef sccwdfgt usskfz vsiagzt vef tsuzwfgt ies
usskfz av vef cwgf; pajf rs sgzfgt; arz artifgfz, iwve tegmpt arz hwvwrp
sc uwxt, “Wv ymtv hmgr.”

At vef gwzfg gavvufz zsir vef ewuu apawr arz vegsmpe vef tvgffv, vef
jwuuapf iat wuumywravwrp. Vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, arz vef vis emrzgfz arz
cwcvo xagvwdmuag cgwfrzt, wrtxwgfz at srf yar arz isyar ho vef wzfa sc
uwpevwrp mx, eaz zagvfz wrvs vefwg esmtft, arz ifgf xmvvwrp darzuft wr
fjfgo zmuu uwvvuf xarf sc puatt. Vef pfrfgau tdagdwvo sc fjfgovewrp,
sddatwsrfz darzuft vs hf hsggsifz wr a gavefg xfgfyxvsgo yarrfg sc
Ysrtwfmg Pahfuuf; arz wr a ysyfrv sc gfumdvardf arz eftwvavwsr sr
veav cmrdvwsrago't xagv, vef yfrzfg sc gsazt, srdf ts tmhywttwjf vs
amvesgwvo, eaz gfyagkfz veav daggwapft ifgf pssz vs yakf hsrcwgft iwve,
arz veav xstv-esgtft ismuz gsatv.

Vef deavfam iat ufcv vs wvtfuc vs cuayf arz hmgr. Wr vef gsagwrp arz
gapwrp sc vef dsrcuapgavwsr, a gfz-esv iwrz, zgwjwrp tvgawpev cgsy vef
wrcfgrau gfpwsrt, tffyfz vs hf husiwrp vef fzwcwdf aiao. Iwve vef gwtwrp
arz cauuwrp sc vef huabf, vef tvsrf cadft tesifz at wc vefo ifgf wr
vsgyfrv. Iefr pgfav yattft sc tvsrf arz vwyhfg cfuu, vef cadf iwve vef
vis zwrvt wr vef rstf hfdayf shtdmgfz: arsr tvgmppufz smv sc vef tyskf
apawr, at wc wv ifgf vef cadf sc vef dgmfu Yagnmwt, hmgrwrp av vef tvakf
arz dsrvfrzwrp iwve vef cwgf.

Vef deavfam hmgrfz; vef rfagftv vgfft, uawz esuz sc ho vef cwgf,
tdsgdefz arz tegwjfuufz; vgfft av a zwtvardf, cwgfz ho vef csmg cwfgdf
cwpmgft, hfpwgv vef huabwrp fzwcwdf iwve a rfi csgftv sc tyskf. Ysuvfr
ufaz arz wgsr hswufz wr vef yaghuf hatwr sc vef csmrvawr; vef iavfg gar
zgo; vef fqvwrpmwtefg vsxt sc vef vsifgt jarwtefz uwkf wdf hfcsgf vef
efav, arz vgwdkufz zsir wrvs csmg gmppfz ifuut sc cuayf. Pgfav gfrvt arz
txuwvt hgardefz smv wr vef tsuwz iauut, uwkf dgotvauuwtavwsr; tvmxfcwfz
hwgzt ieffufz ahsmv arz zgsxxfz wrvs vef cmgradf; csmg cwfgdf cwpmgft
vgmzpfz aiao, Fatv, Iftv, Rsgve, arz Tsmve, ausrp vef rwpev-frtegsmzfz
gsazt, pmwzfz ho vef hfadsr vefo eaz uwpevfz, vsiagzt vefwg rfqv
zftvwravwsr. Vef wuumywravfz jwuuapf eaz tfwbfz esuz sc vef vsdtwr, arz,
ahsuwtewrp vef uaicmu gwrpfg, garp csg lso.

Rsv sruo veav; hmv vef jwuuapf, uwpev-efazfz iwve caywrf, cwgf, arz
hfuu-gwrpwrp, arz hfvewrkwrp wvtfuc veav Ysrtwfmg Pahfuuf eaz vs zs iwve
vef dsuufdvwsr sc gfrv arz vaqft--vesmpe wv iat hmv a tyauu wrtvauyfrv
sc vaqft, arz rs gfrv av auu, veav Pahfuuf eaz psv wr vestf uavvfg
zaot--hfdayf wyxavwfrv csg ar wrvfgjwfi iwve ewy, arz, tmggsmrzwrp ewt
esmtf, tmyysrfz ewy vs dsyf csgve csg xfgtsrau dsrcfgfrdf. Iefgfmxsr,
Ysrtwfmg Pahfuuf zwz efajwuo hag ewt zssg, arz gfvwgf vs esuz dsmrtfu
iwve ewytfuc. Vef gftmuv sc veav dsrcfgfrdf iat, veav Pahfuuf apawr
iwvezgfi ewytfuc vs ewt esmtfvsx hfewrz ewt tvadk sc dewyrfot; vewt vwyf
gftsujfz, wc ewt zssg ifgf hgskfr wr (ef iat a tyauu Tsmvefgr yar
sc gfvauwavwjf vfyxfgayfrv), vs xwvde ewytfuc efaz csgfystv sjfg vef
xagaxfv, arz dgmte a yar sg vis hfusi.

Xgshahuo, Ysrtwfmg Pahfuuf xattfz a usrp rwpev mx vefgf, iwve vef
zwtvarv deavfam csg cwgf arz darzuf, arz vef hfavwrp av ewt zssg,
dsyhwrfz iwve vef lso-gwrpwrp, csg ymtwd; rsv vs yfrvwsr ewt eajwrp ar
wuu-syfrfz uayx tumrp adgstt vef gsaz hfcsgf ewt xstvwrp-esmtf pavf,
iewde vef jwuuapf tesifz a uwjfuo wrduwravwsr vs zwtxuadf wr ewt cajsmg.
A vgowrp tmtxfrtf, vs hf xattwrp a iesuf tmyyfg rwpev sr vef hgwrk sc
vef huadk sdfar, gfazo vs vakf veav xumrpf wrvs wv mxsr iewde Ysrtwfmg
Pahfuuf eaz gftsujfz! Hmv, vef cgwfrzuo zair axxfagwrp av uatv, arz vef
gmte-darzuft sc vef jwuuapf pmvvfgwrp smv, vef xfsxuf eaxxwuo zwtxfgtfz,
arz Ysrtwfmg Pahfuuf dayf zsir hgwrpwrp ewt uwcf iwve ewy csg veav
iewuf.

Iwvewr a emrzgfz ywuft, arz wr vef uwpev sc svefg cwgft, vefgf ifgf
svefg cmrdvwsragwft uftt csgvmravf, veav rwpev arz svefg rwpevt, iesy
vef gwtwrp tmr csmrz earpwrp adgstt srdf-xfadfcmu tvgffvt, iefgf vefo
eaz hffr hsgr arz hgfz; auts, vefgf ifgf svefg jwuuapfgt arz vsirtxfsxuf
uftt csgvmravf vear vef yfrzfg sc gsazt arz ewt cfuusit, mxsr iesy vef
cmrdvwsragwft arz tsuzwfgo vmgrfz iwve tmddftt, arz iesy vefo tvgmrp mx
wr vefwg vmgr. Hmv, vef cwfgdf cwpmgft ifgf tvfazwuo ifrzwrp Fatv, Iftv,
Rsgve, arz Tsmve, hf veav at wv ismuz; arz iestsfjfg emrp, cwgf hmgrfz.
Vef auvwvmzf sc vef pauusit veav ismuz vmgr vs iavfg arz nmfrde wv,
rs cmrdvwsrago, ho aro tvgfvde sc yavefyavwdt, iat ahuf vs daudmuavf
tmddfttcmuuo.




QQWJ. Zgair vs vef Usaztvsrf Gsdk


Wr tmde gwtwrpt sc cwgf arz gwtwrpt sc tfa--vef cwgy fagve teakfr ho
vef gmteft sc ar arpgo sdfar iewde eaz rsi rs fhh, hmv iat auiaot sr vef
cusi, ewpefg arz ewpefg, vs vef vfggsg arz isrzfg sc vef hfesuzfgt sr
vef tesgf--vegff ofagt sc vfyxftv ifgf dsrtmyfz. Vegff ysgf hwgvezaot
sc uwvvuf Umdwf eaz hffr isjfr ho vef psuzfr vegfaz wrvs vef xfadfcmu
vwttmf sc vef uwcf sc efg esyf.

Yaro a rwpev arz yaro a zao eaz wvt wryavft uwtvfrfz vs vef fdesft wr
vef dsgrfg, iwve efagvt veav cawufz vefy iefr vefo efagz vef vegsrpwrp
cffv. Csg, vef cssvtvfxt eaz hfdsyf vs vefwg ywrzt at vef cssvtvfxt sc
a xfsxuf, vmymuvmsmt mrzfg a gfz cuap arz iwve vefwg dsmrvgo zfduagfz wr
zarpfg, dearpfz wrvs iwuz hfatvt, ho vfggwhuf frdearvyfrv usrp xfgtwtvfz
wr.

Ysrtfwprfmg, at a duatt, eaz zwttsdwavfz ewytfuc cgsy vef xefrsyfrsr sc
ewt rsv hfwrp axxgfdwavfz: sc ewt hfwrp ts uwvvuf iarvfz wr Cgardf, at
vs wrdmg dsrtwzfgahuf zarpfg sc gfdfwjwrp ewt zwtywttau cgsy wv, arz
vewt uwcf vspfvefg. Uwkf vef cahufz gmtvwd ies gawtfz vef Zfjwu iwve
wrcwrwvf xawrt, arz iat ts vfggwcwfz av vef twpev sc ewy veav ef dsmuz
atk vef Frfyo rs nmftvwsr, hmv wyyfzwavfuo cufz; ts, Ysrtfwprfmg, acvfg
hsuzuo gfazwrp vef Usgz't Xgaofg hadkiagzt csg a pgfav rmyhfg sc ofagt,
arz xfgcsgywrp yaro svefg xsvfrv txfuut csg dsyxfuuwrp vef Fjwu Srf, rs
tssrfg hfefuz ewy wr ewt vfggsgt vear ef vssk vs ewt rshuf effut.

Vef tewrwrp Hmuu't Fof sc vef Dsmgv iat psrf, sg wv ismuz eajf hffr vef
yagk csg a emggwdarf sc ravwsrau hmuufvt. Wv eaz rfjfg hffr a pssz
fof vs tff iwve--eaz usrp eaz vef ysvf wr wv sc Umdwcfg't xgwzf,
Tagzaraxaumt't umqmgo, arz a ysuf't huwrzrftt--hmv wv eaz zgsxxfz
smv arz iat psrf. Vef Dsmgv, cgsy veav fqdumtwjf wrrfg dwgduf vs wvt
smvfgystv gsvvfr gwrp sc wrvgwpmf, dsggmxvwsr, arz zwttwymuavwsr, iat
auu psrf vspfvefg. Gsoauvo iat psrf; eaz hffr hftwfpfz wr wvt Xauadf arz
“tmtxfrzfz,” iefr vef uatv vwzwrpt dayf sjfg.

Vef Ampmtv sc vef ofag srf vesmtarz tfjfr emrzgfz arz rwrfvo-vis iat
dsyf, arz Ysrtfwprfmg iat ho vewt vwyf tdavvfgfz cag arz iwzf.

At iat ravmgau, vef efaz-nmagvfgt arz pgfav pavefgwrp-xuadf sc
Ysrtfwprfmg, wr Usrzsr, iat Vfuutsr't Hark. Txwgwvt agf tmxxstfz vs
eamrv vef xuadft iefgf vefwg hszwft ystv gftsgvfz, arz Ysrtfwprfmg
iwvesmv a pmwrfa eamrvfz vef txsv iefgf ewt pmwrfat mtfz vs hf.
Ysgfsjfg, wv iat vef txsv vs iewde tmde Cgfrde wrvfuuwpfrdf at iat ystv
vs hf gfuwfz mxsr, dayf nmwdkftv. Apawr: Vfuutsr't iat a ymrwcwdfrv
esmtf, arz fqvfrzfz pgfav uwhfgauwvo vs suz dmtvsyfgt ies eaz cauufr
cgsy vefwg ewpe ftvavf. Apawr: vestf rshuft ies eaz tffr vef dsywrp
tvsgy wr vwyf, arz arvwdwxavwrp xumrzfg sg dsrcwtdavwsr, eaz yazf
xgsjwzfrv gfywvvardft vs Vfuutsr't, ifgf auiaot vs hf efagz sc vefgf
ho vefwg rffzo hgfvegfr. Vs iewde wv ymtv hf azzfz veav fjfgo rfi-dsyfg
cgsy Cgardf gfxsgvfz ewytfuc arz ewt vwzwrpt av Vfuutsr't, auystv at
a yavvfg sc dsmgtf. Csg tmde jagwfvo sc gfatsrt, Vfuutsr't iat av veav
vwyf, at vs Cgfrde wrvfuuwpfrdf, a kwrz sc Ewpe Fqdearpf; arz vewt
iat ts ifuu krsir vs vef xmhuwd, arz vef wrnmwgwft yazf vefgf ifgf wr
dsrtfnmfrdf ts rmyfgsmt, veav Vfuutsr't tsyfvwyft igsvf vef uavftv rfit
smv wr a uwrf sg ts arz xstvfz wv wr vef Hark iwrzsit, csg auu ies gar
vegsmpe Vfyxuf Hag vs gfaz.

Sr a tvfaywrp, ywtvo acvfgrssr, Yg. Usggo tav av ewt zftk, arz Deaguft
Zagrao tvssz ufarwrp sr wv, vaukwrp iwve ewy wr a usi jswdf. Vef
xfrwvfrvwau zfr srdf tfv axagv csg wrvfgjwfit iwve vef Esmtf, iat rsi
vef rfit-Fqdearpf, arz iat cwuufz vs sjfgcusiwrp. Wv iat iwvewr eauc ar
esmg sg ts sc vef vwyf sc dustwrp.

“Hmv, auvesmpe osm agf vef osmrpftv yar veav fjfg uwjfz,” tawz Deaguft
Zagrao, gavefg eftwvavwrp, “W ymtv tvwuu tmppftv vs osm--”

“W mrzfgtvarz. Veav W ay vss suz?” tawz Yg. Usggo.

“Mrtfvvufz ifavefg, a usrp lsmgrfo, mrdfgvawr yfart sc vgajfuuwrp, a
zwtsgparwtfz dsmrvgo, a dwvo veav yao rsv hf fjfr tacf csg osm.”

“Yo zfag Deaguft,” tawz Yg. Usggo, iwve deffgcmu dsrcwzfrdf, “osm vsmde
tsyf sc vef gfatsrt csg yo pswrp: rsv csg yo tvaowrp aiao. Wv wt tacf
frsmpe csg yf; rshszo iwuu dagf vs wrvfgcfgf iwve ar suz cfuusi sc eagz
mxsr csmgtdsgf iefr vefgf agf ts yaro xfsxuf vefgf ymde hfvvfg isgve
wrvfgcfgwrp iwve. At vs wvt hfwrp a zwtsgparwtfz dwvo, wc wv ifgf rsv a
zwtsgparwtfz dwvo vefgf ismuz hf rs sddatwsr vs tfrz tsyfhszo cgsy smg
Esmtf efgf vs smg Esmtf vefgf, ies krsit vef dwvo arz vef hmtwrftt, sc
suz, arz wt wr Vfuutsr't dsrcwzfrdf. At vs vef mrdfgvawr vgajfuuwrp, vef
usrp lsmgrfo, arz vef iwrvfg ifavefg, wc W ifgf rsv xgfxagfz vs tmhywv
yotfuc vs a cfi wrdsrjfrwfrdft csg vef takf sc Vfuutsr't, acvfg auu
veftf ofagt, ies smpev vs hf?”

“W iwte W ifgf pswrp yotfuc,” tawz Deaguft Zagrao, tsyfieav gftvufttuo,
arz uwkf srf vewrkwrp ausmz.

“Wrzffz! Osm agf a xgfvvo cfuusi vs shlfdv arz azjwtf!” fqduawyfz Yg.
Usggo. “Osm iwte osm ifgf pswrp osmgtfuc? Arz osm a Cgfrdeyar hsgr? Osm
agf a iwtf dsmrtfuusg.”

“Yo zfag Yg. Usggo, wv wt hfdamtf W ay a Cgfrdeyar hsgr, veav vef
vesmpev (iewde W zwz rsv yfar vs mvvfg efgf, esifjfg) eat xattfz vegsmpe
yo ywrz scvfr. Srf darrsv efux vewrkwrp, eajwrp eaz tsyf toyxaveo csg
vef ywtfgahuf xfsxuf, arz eajwrp aharzsrfz tsyfvewrp vs vefy,” ef txskf
efgf wr ewt csgyfg vesmpevcmu yarrfg, “veav srf ywpev hf uwtvfrfz vs,
arz ywpev eajf vef xsifg vs xfgtmazf vs tsyf gftvgawrv. Sruo uatv rwpev,
acvfg osm eaz ufcv mt, iefr W iat vaukwrp vs Umdwf--”

“Iefr osm ifgf vaukwrp vs Umdwf,” Yg. Usggo gfxfavfz. “Oft. W isrzfg osm
agf rsv ateayfz vs yfrvwsr vef rayf sc Umdwf! Iwtewrp osm ifgf pswrp vs
Cgardf av vewt vwyf sc zao!”

“Esifjfg, W ay rsv pswrp,” tawz Deaguft Zagrao, iwve a tywuf. “Wv wt
ysgf vs vef xmgxstf veav osm tao osm agf.”

“Arz W ay, wr xuawr gfauwvo. Vef vgmve wt, yo zfag Deaguft,” Yg. Usggo
puardfz av vef zwtvarv Esmtf, arz usifgfz ewt jswdf, “osm dar eajf rs
dsrdfxvwsr sc vef zwccwdmuvo iwve iewde smg hmtwrftt wt vgartadvfz, arz
sc vef xfgwu wr iewde smg hsskt arz xaxfgt sjfg osrzfg agf wrjsujfz. Vef
Usgz ahsjf krsit ieav vef dsyxgsywtwrp dsrtfnmfrdft ismuz hf vs rmyhfgt
sc xfsxuf, wc tsyf sc smg zsdmyfrvt ifgf tfwbfz sg zftvgsofz; arz vefo
ywpev hf, av aro vwyf, osm krsi, csg ies dar tao veav Xagwt wt rsv tfv
acwgf vs-zao, sg tadkfz vs-ysggsi! Rsi, a lmzwdwsmt tfufdvwsr cgsy veftf
iwve vef ufatv xsttwhuf zfuao, arz vef hmgowrp sc vefy, sg svefgiwtf
pfvvwrp sc vefy smv sc eagy't iao, wt iwvewr vef xsifg (iwvesmv ustt sc
xgfdwsmt vwyf) sc tdagdfuo aro srf hmv yotfuc, wc aro srf. Arz teauu
W earp hadk, iefr Vfuutsr't krsit vewt arz taot vewt--Vfuutsr't, iestf
hgfaz W eajf favfr veftf twqvo ofagt--hfdamtf W ay a uwvvuf tvwcc ahsmv
vef lswrvt? Ieo, W ay a hso, twg, vs eauc a zsbfr suz dszpfgt efgf!”

“Esi W azywgf vef pauuarvgo sc osmg osmvecmu txwgwv, Yg. Usggo.”

“Vmv! Rsrtfrtf, twg!--Arz, yo zfag Deaguft,” tawz Yg. Usggo, puardwrp av
vef Esmtf apawr, “osm agf vs gfyfyhfg, veav pfvvwrp vewrpt smv sc
Xagwt av vewt xgftfrv vwyf, rs yavvfg ieav vewrpt, wt rfqv vs ar
wyxsttwhwuwvo. Xaxfgt arz xgfdwsmt yavvfgt ifgf vewt jfgo zao hgsmpev
vs mt efgf (W txfak wr tvgwdv dsrcwzfrdf; wv wt rsv hmtwrftt-uwkf vs
iewtxfg wv, fjfr vs osm), ho vef tvgarpftv hfagfgt osm dar wyapwrf,
fjfgo srf sc iesy eaz ewt efaz earpwrp sr ho a twrpuf eawg at ef xattfz
vef Haggwfgt. Av arsvefg vwyf, smg xagdfut ismuz dsyf arz ps, at fatwuo
at wr hmtwrftt-uwkf Suz Frpuarz; hmv rsi, fjfgovewrp wt tvsxxfz.”

“Arz zs osm gfauuo ps vs-rwpev?”

“W gfauuo ps vs-rwpev, csg vef datf eat hfdsyf vss xgfttwrp vs azywv sc
zfuao.”

“Arz zs osm vakf rs srf iwve osm?”

“Auu tsgvt sc xfsxuf eajf hffr xgsxstfz vs yf, hmv W iwuu eajf rsvewrp
vs tao vs aro sc vefy. W wrvfrz vs vakf Lfggo. Lfggo eat hffr yo
hszopmagz sr Tmrzao rwpevt csg a usrp vwyf xatv arz W ay mtfz vs ewy.
Rshszo iwuu tmtxfdv Lfggo sc hfwrp arovewrp hmv ar Frpuwte hmuu-zsp, sg
sc eajwrp aro zftwpr wr ewt efaz hmv vs cuo av arohszo ies vsmdeft ewt
yatvfg.”

“W ymtv tao apawr veav W efagvwuo azywgf osmg pauuarvgo arz
osmvecmurftt.”

“W ymtv tao apawr, rsrtfrtf, rsrtfrtf! Iefr W eajf fqfdmvfz vewt uwvvuf
dsyywttwsr, W teauu, xfgeaxt, addfxv Vfuutsr't xgsxstau vs gfvwgf arz
uwjf av yo fatf. Vwyf frsmpe, vefr, vs vewrk ahsmv pgsiwrp suz.”

Vewt zwauspmf eaz vakfr xuadf av Yg. Usggo't mtmau zftk, iwve
Ysrtfwprfmg tiagywrp iwvewr a oagz sg vis sc wv, hsatvcmu sc ieav ef
ismuz zs vs ajfrpf ewytfuc sr vef gatdau-xfsxuf hfcsgf usrp. Wv iat vss
ymde vef iao sc Ysrtfwprfmg mrzfg ewt gfjfgtft at a gfcmpff, arz wv
iat ymde vss ymde vef iao sc ravwjf Hgwvwte sgveszsqo, vs vauk sc vewt
vfggwhuf Gfjsumvwsr at wc wv ifgf vef sruo eagjftv fjfg krsir mrzfg
vef tkwft veav eaz rsv hffr tsir--at wc rsvewrp eaz fjfg hffr zsrf, sg
sywvvfz vs hf zsrf, veav eaz ufz vs wv--at wc shtfgjfgt sc vef igfvdefz
ywuuwsrt wr Cgardf, arz sc vef ywtmtfz arz xfgjfgvfz gftsmgdft veav
tesmuz eajf yazf vefy xgstxfgsmt, eaz rsv tffr wv wrfjwvahuo dsywrp,
ofagt hfcsgf, arz eaz rsv wr xuawr isgzt gfdsgzfz ieav vefo tai. Tmde
jaxsmgwrp, dsyhwrfz iwve vef fqvgajaparv xusvt sc Ysrtfwprfmg csg vef
gftvsgavwsr sc a tvavf sc vewrpt veav eaz mvvfguo fqeamtvfz wvtfuc,
arz isgr smv Efajfr arz fagve at ifuu at wvtfuc, iat eagz vs hf frzmgfz
iwvesmv tsyf gfysrtvgardf ho aro tarf yar ies krfi vef vgmve. Arz wv iat
tmde jaxsmgwrp auu ahsmv ewt fagt, uwkf a vgsmhuftsyf dsrcmtwsr sc hussz
wr ewt sir efaz, azzfz vs a uavfrv mrfatwrftt wr ewt ywrz, iewde eaz
augfazo yazf Deaguft Zagrao gftvuftt, arz iewde tvwuu kfxv ewy ts.

Aysrp vef vaukfgt, iat Tvgojfg, sc vef Kwrp't Hfrde Hag, cag sr ewt
iao vs tvavf xgsysvwsr, arz, vefgfcsgf, usmz sr vef vefyf: hgsadewrp
vs Ysrtfwprfmg, ewt zfjwdft csg husiwrp vef xfsxuf mx arz fqvfgywravwrp
vefy cgsy vef cadf sc vef fagve, arz zswrp iwvesmv vefy: arz csg
addsyxuwtewrp yaro twywuag shlfdvt akwr wr vefwg ravmgf vs vef ahsuwvwsr
sc fapuft ho txgwrkuwrp tauv sr vef vawut sc vef gadf. Ewy, Zagrao efagz
iwve a xagvwdmuag cffuwrp sc shlfdvwsr; arz Zagrao tvssz zwjwzfz hfviffr
pswrp aiao veav ef ywpev efag rs ysgf, arz gfyawrwrp vs wrvfgxstf ewt
isgz, iefr vef vewrp veav iat vs hf, ifrv sr vs teaxf wvtfuc smv.

Vef Esmtf axxgsadefz Yg. Usggo, arz uaowrp a tswufz arz mrsxfrfz ufvvfg
hfcsgf ewy, atkfz wc ef eaz ofv zwtdsjfgfz aro vgadft sc vef xfgtsr vs
iesy wv iat azzgfttfz? Vef Esmtf uawz vef ufvvfg zsir ts dustf vs Zagrao
veav ef tai vef zwgfdvwsr--vef ysgf nmwdkuo hfdamtf wv iat ewt sir gwpev
rayf. Vef azzgftt, vmgrfz wrvs Frpuwte, gar:

“Jfgo xgfttwrp. Vs Ysrtwfmg efgfvscsgf vef Yagnmwt Tv. Fjgfysrzf, sc
Cgardf. Dsrcwzfz vs vef dagft sc Yfttgt. Vfuutsr arz Ds., Harkfgt,
Usrzsr, Frpuarz.”

Sr vef yaggwapf ysgrwrp, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf eaz yazf wv ewt srf mgpfrv arz
fqxgftt gfnmftv vs Deaguft Zagrao, veav vef tfdgfv sc vewt rayf tesmuz
hf--mruftt ef, vef Zsdvsg, zwttsujfz vef shuwpavwsr--kfxv wrjwsuavf
hfviffr vefy. Rshszo futf krfi wv vs hf ewt rayf; ewt sir iwcf eaz rs
tmtxwdwsr sc vef cadv; Yg. Usggo dsmuz eajf rsrf.

“Rs,” tawz Yg. Usggo, wr gfxuo vs vef Esmtf; “W eajf gfcfggfz wv,
W vewrk, vs fjfgohszo rsi efgf, arz rs srf dar vfuu yf iefgf vewt
pfrvufyar wt vs hf csmrz.”

Vef earzt sc vef dusdk jfgpwrp mxsr vef esmg sc dustwrp vef Hark, vefgf
iat a pfrfgau tfv sc vef dmggfrv sc vaukfgt xatv Yg. Usggo't zftk. Ef
efuz vef ufvvfg smv wrnmwgwrpuo; arz Ysrtfwprfmg usskfz av wv, wr vef
xfgtsr sc vewt xusvvwrp arz wrzwprarv gfcmpff; arz Ysrtfwprfmg usskfz av
wv wr vef xfgtsr sc veav xusvvwrp arz wrzwprarv gfcmpff; arz Vewt, Veav,
arz Vef Svefg, auu eaz tsyfvewrp zwtxagapwrp vs tao, wr Cgfrde sg wr
Frpuwte, dsrdfgrwrp vef Yagnmwt ies iat rsv vs hf csmrz.

“Rfxefi, W hfuwfjf--hmv wr aro datf zfpfrfgavf tmddfttsg--sc vef
xsuwtefz Yagnmwt ies iat ymgzfgfz,” tawz srf. “Eaxxo vs tao, W rfjfg
krfi ewy.”

“A dgajfr ies aharzsrfz ewt xstv,” tawz arsvefg--vewt Ysrtfwprfmg eaz
hffr psv smv sc Xagwt, ufpt mxxfgystv arz eauc tmccsdavfz, wr a usaz sc
eao--“tsyf ofagt aps.”

“Wrcfdvfz iwve vef rfi zsdvgwrft,” tawz a vewgz, fofwrp vef zwgfdvwsr
vegsmpe ewt puatt wr xattwrp; “tfv ewytfuc wr sxxstwvwsr vs vef uatv
Yagnmwt, aharzsrfz vef ftvavft iefr ef wrefgwvfz vefy, arz ufcv vefy vs
vef gmccwar efgz. Vefo iwuu gfdsyxfrtf ewy rsi, W esxf, at ef zftfgjft.”

“Efo?” dgwfz vef huavarv Tvgojfg. “Zwz ef vesmpe? Wt veav vef tsgv sc
cfuusi? Ufv mt ussk av ewt wrcaysmt rayf. Z--r vef cfuusi!”

Zagrao, mrahuf vs gftvgawr ewytfuc aro usrpfg, vsmdefz Yg. Tvgojfg sr
vef tesmuzfg, arz tawz:

“W krsi vef cfuusi.”

“Zs osm, ho Lmxwvfg?” tawz Tvgojfg. “W ay tsggo csg wv.”

“Ieo?”

“Ieo, Yg. Zagrao? Z'of efag ieav ef zwz? Zsr'v atk, ieo, wr veftf
vwyft.”

“Hmv W zs atk ieo?”

“Vefr W vfuu osm apawr, Yg. Zagrao, W ay tsggo csg wv. W ay tsggo vs
efag osm xmvvwrp aro tmde fqvgasgzwrago nmftvwsrt. Efgf wt a cfuusi,
ies, wrcfdvfz ho vef ystv xftvwufrv arz huatxefysmt dszf sc zfjwugo veav
fjfg iat krsir, aharzsrfz ewt xgsxfgvo vs vef jwuftv tdmy sc vef fagve
veav fjfg zwz ymgzfg ho iesuftauf, arz osm atk yf ieo W ay tsggo veav a
yar ies wrtvgmdvt osmve krsit ewy? Ifuu, hmv W'uu artifg osm. W ay tsggo
hfdamtf W hfuwfjf vefgf wt dsrvaywravwsr wr tmde a tdsmrzgfu. Veav't
ieo.”

Ywrzcmu sc vef tfdgfv, Zagrao iwve pgfav zwccwdmuvo defdkfz ewytfuc, arz
tawz: “Osm yao rsv mrzfgtvarz vef pfrvufyar.”

“W mrzfgtvarz esi vs xmv _osm_ wr a dsgrfg, Yg. Zagrao,” tawz Hmuuo
Tvgojfg, “arz W'uu zs wv. Wc vewt cfuusi wt a pfrvufyar, W _zsr'v_
mrzfgtvarz ewy. Osm yao vfuu ewy ts, iwve yo dsyxuwyfrvt. Osm yao auts
vfuu ewy, cgsy yf, veav acvfg aharzsrwrp ewt isguzuo psszt arz xstwvwsr
vs vewt hmvdefguo ysh, W isrzfg ef wt rsv av vef efaz sc vefy. Hmv, rs,
pfrvufyfr,” tawz Tvgojfg, usskwrp auu gsmrz, arz traxxwrp ewt cwrpfgt,
“W krsi tsyfvewrp sc emyar ravmgf, arz W vfuu osm veav osm'uu rfjfg
cwrz a cfuusi uwkf vewt cfuusi, vgmtvwrp ewytfuc vs vef yfgdwft sc tmde
xgfdwsmt _xgsvépét_. Rs, pfrvufyfr; ef'uu auiaot tesi 'fy a dufar xawg
sc effut jfgo faguo wr vef tdmccuf, arz trfak aiao.”

Iwve vestf isgzt, arz a cwrau trax sc ewt cwrpfgt, Yg. Tvgojfg
tesmuzfgfz ewytfuc wrvs Cuffv-tvgffv, aywztv vef pfrfgau axxgshavwsr sc
ewt efagfgt. Yg. Usggo arz Deaguft Zagrao ifgf ufcv ausrf av vef zftk,
wr vef pfrfgau zfxagvmgf cgsy vef Hark.

“Iwuu osm vakf deagpf sc vef ufvvfg?” tawz Yg. Usggo. “Osm krsi iefgf vs
zfuwjfg wv?”

“W zs.”

“Iwuu osm mrzfgvakf vs fqxuawr, veav if tmxxstf wv vs eajf hffr
azzgfttfz efgf, sr vef deardf sc smg krsiwrp iefgf vs csgiagz wv, arz
veav wv eat hffr efgf tsyf vwyf?”

“W iwuu zs ts. Zs osm tvagv csg Xagwt cgsy efgf?”

“Cgsy efgf, av fwpev.”

“W iwuu dsyf hadk, vs tff osm scc.”

Jfgo wuu av fatf iwve ewytfuc, arz iwve Tvgojfg arz ystv svefg yfr,
Zagrao yazf vef hftv sc ewt iao wrvs vef nmwfv sc vef Vfyxuf, sxfrfz vef
ufvvfg, arz gfaz wv. Veftf ifgf wvt dsrvfrvt:


“Xgwtsr sc vef Ahhaof, Xagwt.

“Lmrf 21, 1792. “YSRTWFMG EFGFVSCSGF VEF YAGNMWT.

“Acvfg eajwrp usrp hffr wr zarpfg sc yo uwcf av vef earzt sc vef
jwuuapf, W eajf hffr tfwbfz, iwve pgfav jwsufrdf arz wrzwprwvo, arz
hgsmpev a usrp lsmgrfo sr cssv vs Xagwt. Sr vef gsaz W eajf tmccfgfz a
pgfav zfau. Rsg wt veav auu; yo esmtf eat hffr zftvgsofz--gabfz vs vef
pgsmrz.

“Vef dgwyf csg iewde W ay wyxgwtsrfz, Ysrtwfmg efgfvscsgf vef Yagnmwt,
arz csg iewde W teauu hf tmyysrfz hfcsgf vef vgwhmrau, arz teauu ustf yo
uwcf (iwvesmv osmg ts pfrfgsmt efux), wt, vefo vfuu yf, vgfatsr apawrtv
vef yalftvo sc vef xfsxuf, wr veav W eajf advfz apawrtv vefy csg ar
fywpgarv. Wv wt wr jawr W gfxgftfrv veav W eajf advfz csg vefy, arz rsv
apawrtv, addsgzwrp vs osmg dsyyarzt. Wv wt wr jawr W gfxgftfrv veav,
hfcsgf vef tfnmftvgavwsr sc fywpgarv xgsxfgvo, W eaz gfywvvfz vef
wyxstvt vefo eaz dfatfz vs xao; veav W eaz dsuufdvfz rs gfrv; veav W eaz
eaz gfdsmgtf vs rs xgsdftt. Vef sruo gftxsrtf wt, veav W eajf advfz csg
ar fywpgarv, arz iefgf wt veav fywpgarv?

“Ae! ystv pgadwsmt Ysrtwfmg efgfvscsgf vef Yagnmwt, iefgf wt veav
fywpgarv? W dgo wr yo tuffx iefgf wt ef? W zfyarz sc Efajfr, iwuu ef
rsv dsyf vs zfuwjfg yf? Rs artifg. Ae Ysrtwfmg efgfvscsgf vef Yagnmwt,
W tfrz yo zftsuavf dgo adgstt vef tfa, esxwrp wv yao xfgeaxt gfade osmg
fagt vegsmpe vef pgfav hark sc Vwutsr krsir av Xagwt!

“Csg vef usjf sc Efajfr, sc lmtvwdf, sc pfrfgstwvo, sc vef esrsmg sc
osmg rshuf rayf, W tmxxuwdavf osm, Ysrtwfmg efgfvscsgf vef Yagnmwt, vs
tmddsmg arz gfufatf yf. Yo camuv wt, veav W eajf hffr vgmf vs osm. Se
Ysrtwfmg efgfvscsgf vef Yagnmwt, W xgao osm hf osm vgmf vs yf!

“Cgsy vewt xgwtsr efgf sc esggsg, iefrdf W fjfgo esmg vfrz rfagfg arz
rfagfg vs zftvgmdvwsr, W tfrz osm, Ysrtwfmg efgfvscsgf vef Yagnmwt, vef
attmgardf sc yo zsusgsmt arz mreaxxo tfgjwdf.

“Osmg accuwdvfz,

“Pahfuuf.”


Vef uavfrv mrfatwrftt wr Zagrao't ywrz iat gsmtfz vs jwpsmgsmt uwcf
ho vewt ufvvfg. Vef xfgwu sc ar suz tfgjarv arz a pssz srf, iestf
sruo dgwyf iat cwzfuwvo vs ewytfuc arz ewt caywuo, tvagfz ewy ts
gfxgsadecmuuo wr vef cadf, veav, at ef iaukfz vs arz cgs wr vef Vfyxuf
dsrtwzfgwrp ieav vs zs, ef auystv ewz ewt cadf cgsy vef xattfgtho.

Ef krfi jfgo ifuu, veav wr ewt esggsg sc vef zffz iewde eaz dmuywravfz
vef haz zffzt arz haz gfxmvavwsr sc vef suz caywuo esmtf, wr ewt
gftfrvcmu tmtxwdwsrt sc ewt mrduf, arz wr vef ajfgtwsr iwve iewde ewt
dsrtdwfrdf gfpagzfz vef dgmyhuwrp cahgwd veav ef iat tmxxstfz vs mxesuz,
ef eaz advfz wyxfgcfdvuo. Ef krfi jfgo ifuu, veav wr ewt usjf csg Umdwf,
ewt gfrmrdwavwsr sc ewt tsdwau xuadf, vesmpe ho rs yfart rfi vs ewt sir
ywrz, eaz hffr emggwfz arz wrdsyxufvf. Ef krfi veav ef smpev vs eajf
totvfyavwdauuo isgkfz wv smv arz tmxfgjwtfz wv, arz veav ef eaz yfarv vs
zs wv, arz veav wv eaz rfjfg hffr zsrf.

Vef eaxxwrftt sc ewt sir destfr Frpuwte esyf, vef rfdfttwvo sc hfwrp
auiaot advwjfuo fyxusofz, vef tiwcv dearpft arz vgsmhuft sc vef vwyf
iewde eaz csuusifz sr srf arsvefg ts catv, veav vef fjfrvt sc vewt iffk
arrwewuavfz vef wyyavmgf xuart sc uatv iffk, arz vef fjfrvt sc vef iffk
csuusiwrp yazf auu rfi apawr; ef krfi jfgo ifuu, veav vs vef csgdf sc
veftf dwgdmytvardft ef eaz owfuzfz:--rsv iwvesmv zwtnmwfv, hmv tvwuu
iwvesmv dsrvwrmsmt arz addmymuavwrp gftwtvardf. Veav ef eaz iavdefz
vef vwyft csg a vwyf sc advwsr, arz veav vefo eaz tewcvfz arz tvgmppufz
mrvwu vef vwyf eaz psrf ho, arz vef rshwuwvo ifgf vgssxwrp cgsy
Cgardf ho fjfgo ewpeiao arz hoiao, arz vefwg xgsxfgvo iat wr dsmgtf sc
dsrcwtdavwsr arz zftvgmdvwsr, arz vefwg jfgo rayft ifgf husvvwrp smv,
iat at ifuu krsir vs ewytfuc at wv dsmuz hf vs aro rfi amvesgwvo wr
Cgardf veav ywpev wyxfade ewy csg wv.

Hmv, ef eaz sxxgfttfz rs yar, ef eaz wyxgwtsrfz rs yar; ef iat ts
cag cgsy eajwrp eagteuo fqadvfz xaoyfrv sc ewt zmft, veav ef eaz
gfuwrnmwtefz vefy sc ewt sir iwuu, vegsir ewytfuc sr a isguz iwve rs
cajsmg wr wv, isr ewt sir xgwjavf xuadf vefgf, arz fagrfz ewt sir
hgfaz. Ysrtwfmg Pahfuuf eaz efuz vef wyxsjfgwtefz arz wrjsujfz ftvavf
sr igwvvfr wrtvgmdvwsrt, vs txagf vef xfsxuf, vs pwjf vefy ieav uwvvuf
vefgf iat vs pwjf--tmde cmfu at vef efajo dgfzwvsgt ismuz ufv vefy eajf
wr vef iwrvfg, arz tmde xgszmdf at dsmuz hf tajfz cgsy vef tayf pgwx wr
vef tmyyfg--arz rs zsmhv ef eaz xmv vef cadv wr xufa arz xgssc, csg ewt
sir tacfvo, ts veav wv dsmuz rsv hmv axxfag rsi.

Vewt cajsmgfz vef zftxfgavf gftsumvwsr Deaguft Zagrao eaz hfpmr vs yakf,
veav ef ismuz ps vs Xagwt.

Oft. Uwkf vef yagwrfg wr vef suz tvsgo, vef iwrzt arz tvgfayt eaz zgwjfr
ewy iwvewr vef wrcumfrdf sc vef Usaztvsrf Gsdk, arz wv iat zgaiwrp ewy
vs wvtfuc, arz ef ymtv ps. Fjfgovewrp veav agstf hfcsgf ewt ywrz zgwcvfz
ewy sr, catvfg arz catvfg, ysgf arz ysgf tvfazwuo, vs vef vfggwhuf
avvgadvwsr. Ewt uavfrv mrfatwrftt eaz hffr, veav haz awyt ifgf hfwrp
isgkfz smv wr ewt sir mreaxxo uarz ho haz wrtvgmyfrvt, arz veav ef ies
dsmuz rsv cawu vs krsi veav ef iat hfvvfg vear vefo, iat rsv vefgf,
vgowrp vs zs tsyfvewrp vs tvao hussztefz, arz attfgv vef duawyt sc yfgdo
arz emyarwvo. Iwve vewt mrfatwrftt eauc tvwcufz, arz eauc gfxgsadewrp
ewy, ef eaz hffr hgsmpev vs vef xswrvfz dsyxagwtsr sc ewytfuc iwve vef
hgajf suz pfrvufyar wr iesy zmvo iat ts tvgsrp; mxsr veav dsyxagwtsr
(wrlmgwsmt vs ewytfuc) eaz wrtvarvuo csuusifz vef trffgt sc Ysrtfwprfmg,
iewde eaz tvmrp ewy hwvvfguo, arz vestf sc Tvgojfg, iewde ahsjf auu ifgf
dsagtf arz pauuwrp, csg suz gfatsrt. Mxsr vestf, eaz csuusifz Pahfuuf't
ufvvfg: vef axxfau sc ar wrrsdfrv xgwtsrfg, wr zarpfg sc zfave, vs ewt
lmtvwdf, esrsmg, arz pssz rayf.

Ewt gftsumvwsr iat yazf. Ef ymtv ps vs Xagwt.

Oft. Vef Usaztvsrf Gsdk iat zgaiwrp ewy, arz ef ymtv tawu sr, mrvwu ef
tvgmdk. Ef krfi sc rs gsdk; ef tai eagzuo aro zarpfg. Vef wrvfrvwsr
iwve iewde ef eaz zsrf ieav ef eaz zsrf, fjfr auvesmpe ef eaz ufcv
wv wrdsyxufvf, xgftfrvfz wv hfcsgf ewy wr ar atxfdv veav ismuz hf
pgavfcmuuo adkrsiufzpfz wr Cgardf sr ewt xgftfrvwrp ewytfuc vs attfgv
wv. Vefr, veav pusgwsmt jwtwsr sc zswrp pssz, iewde wt ts scvfr vef
tarpmwrf ywgapf sc ts yaro pssz ywrzt, agstf hfcsgf ewy, arz ef fjfr
tai ewytfuc wr vef wuumtwsr iwve tsyf wrcumfrdf vs pmwzf vewt gapwrp
Gfjsumvwsr veav iat gmrrwrp ts cfagcmuuo iwuz.

At ef iaukfz vs arz cgs iwve ewt gftsumvwsr yazf, ef dsrtwzfgfz veav
rfwvefg Umdwf rsg efg cavefg ymtv krsi sc wv mrvwu ef iat psrf.
Umdwf tesmuz hf txagfz vef xawr sc tfxagavwsr; arz efg cavefg, auiaot
gfumdvarv vs vmgr ewt vesmpevt vsiagzt vef zarpfgsmt pgsmrz sc suz,
tesmuz dsyf vs vef krsiufzpf sc vef tvfx, at a tvfx vakfr, arz rsv wr
vef hauardf sc tmtxfrtf arz zsmhv. Esi ymde sc vef wrdsyxufvfrftt sc ewt
twvmavwsr iat gfcfgahuf vs efg cavefg, vegsmpe vef xawrcmu arqwfvo
vs ajswz gfjwjwrp suz attsdwavwsrt sc Cgardf wr ewt ywrz, ef zwz rsv
zwtdmtt iwve ewytfuc. Hmv, veav dwgdmytvardf vss, eaz eaz wvt wrcumfrdf
wr ewt dsmgtf.

Ef iaukfz vs arz cgs, iwve vesmpevt jfgo hmto, mrvwu wv iat vwyf vs
gfvmgr vs Vfuutsr't arz vakf ufajf sc Yg. Usggo. At tssr at ef aggwjfz
wr Xagwt ef ismuz xgftfrv ewytfuc vs vewt suz cgwfrz, hmv ef ymtv tao
rsvewrp sc ewt wrvfrvwsr rsi.

A daggwapf iwve xstv-esgtft iat gfazo av vef Hark zssg, arz Lfggo iat
hssvfz arz fnmwxxfz.

“W eajf zfuwjfgfz veav ufvvfg,” tawz Deaguft Zagrao vs Yg. Usggo. “W
ismuz rsv dsrtfrv vs osmg hfwrp deagpfz iwve aro igwvvfr artifg, hmv
xfgeaxt osm iwuu vakf a jfghau srf?”

“Veav W iwuu, arz gfazwuo,” tawz Yg. Usggo, “wc wv wt rsv zarpfgsmt.”

“Rsv av auu. Vesmpe wv wt vs a xgwtsrfg wr vef Ahhaof.”

“Ieav wt ewt rayf?” tawz Yg. Usggo, iwve ewt sxfr xsdkfv-hssk wr ewt
earz.

“Pahfuuf.”

“Pahfuuf. Arz ieav wt vef yfttapf vs vef mrcsgvmravf Pahfuuf wr xgwtsr?”

“Twyxuo, 'veav ef eat gfdfwjfz vef ufvvfg, arz iwuu dsyf.'”

“Aro vwyf yfrvwsrfz?”

“Ef iwuu tvagv mxsr ewt lsmgrfo vs-ysggsi rwpev.”

“Aro xfgtsr yfrvwsrfz?”

“Rs.”

Ef efuxfz Yg. Usggo vs igax ewytfuc wr a rmyhfg sc dsavt arz dusakt,
arz ifrv smv iwve ewy cgsy vef iagy avystxefgf sc vef suz Hark, wrvs vef
ywtvo awg sc Cuffv-tvgffv. “Yo usjf vs Umdwf, arz vs uwvvuf Umdwf,” tawz
Yg. Usggo av xagvwrp, “arz vakf xgfdwsmt dagf sc vefy vwuu W dsyf hadk.”
 Deaguft Zagrao tessk ewt efaz arz zsmhvcmuuo tywufz, at vef daggwapf
gsuufz aiao.

Veav rwpev--wv iat vef csmgvffrve sc Ampmtv--ef tav mx uavf, arz igsvf
vis cfgjfrv ufvvfgt; srf iat vs Umdwf, fqxuawrwrp vef tvgsrp shuwpavwsr
ef iat mrzfg vs ps vs Xagwt, arz tesiwrp efg, av ufrpve, vef gfatsrt
veav ef eaz, csg cffuwrp dsrcwzfrv veav ef dsmuz hfdsyf wrjsujfz wr rs
xfgtsrau zarpfg vefgf; vef svefg iat vs vef Zsdvsg, dsrcwzwrp Umdwf arz
vefwg zfag dewuz vs ewt dagf, arz zifuuwrp sr vef tayf vsxwdt iwve vef
tvgsrpftv attmgardft. Vs hsve, ef igsvf veav ef ismuz zftxavde ufvvfgt
wr xgssc sc ewt tacfvo, wyyfzwavfuo acvfg ewt aggwjau.

Wv iat a eagz zao, veav zao sc hfwrp aysrp vefy, iwve vef cwgtv
gftfgjavwsr sc vefwg lswrv uwjft sr ewt ywrz. Wv iat a eagz yavvfg vs
xgftfgjf vef wrrsdfrv zfdfwv sc iewde vefo ifgf xgscsmrzuo mrtmtxwdwsmt.
Hmv, ar accfdvwsravf puardf av ewt iwcf, ts eaxxo arz hmto, yazf ewy
gftsumvf rsv vs vfuu efg ieav wyxfrzfz (ef eaz hffr eauc ysjfz vs zs wv,
ts tvgarpf wv iat vs ewy vs adv wr arovewrp iwvesmv efg nmwfv awz), arz
vef zao xattfz nmwdkuo. Faguo wr vef fjfrwrp ef fyhgadfz efg, arz efg
tdagdfuo uftt zfag rayftakf, xgfvfrzwrp veav ef ismuz gfvmgr ho-arz-hof
(ar wyapwrago frpapfyfrv vssk ewy smv, arz ef eaz tfdgfvfz a jauwtf
sc dusveft gfazo), arz ts ef fyfgpfz wrvs vef efajo ywtv sc vef efajo
tvgffvt, iwve a efajwfg efagv.

Vef mrtffr csgdf iat zgaiwrp ewy catv vs wvtfuc, rsi, arz auu vef vwzft
arz iwrzt ifgf tfvvwrp tvgawpev arz tvgsrp vsiagzt wv. Ef ufcv ewt
vis ufvvfgt iwve a vgmtvo xsgvfg, vs hf zfuwjfgfz eauc ar esmg hfcsgf
ywzrwpev, arz rs tssrfg; vssk esgtf csg Zsjfg; arz hfpar ewt lsmgrfo.
“Csg vef usjf sc Efajfr, sc lmtvwdf, sc pfrfgstwvo, sc vef esrsmg sc
osmg rshuf rayf!” iat vef xssg xgwtsrfg't dgo iwve iewde ef tvgfrpvefrfz
ewt twrkwrp efagv, at ef ufcv auu veav iat zfag sr fagve hfewrz ewy, arz
cusavfz aiao csg vef Usaztvsrf Gsdk.


Vef frz sc vef tfdsrz hssk.





Hssk vef Vewgz--vef Vgadk sc a Tvsgy




W. Wr Tfdgfv


Vef vgajfuufg cagfz tusiuo sr ewt iao, ies cagfz vsiagzt Xagwt cgsy
Frpuarz wr vef amvmyr sc vef ofag srf vesmtarz tfjfr emrzgfz arz
rwrfvo-vis. Ysgf vear frsmpe sc haz gsazt, haz fnmwxapft, arz haz
esgtft, ef ismuz eajf frdsmrvfgfz vs zfuao ewy, vesmpe vef cauufr arz
mrcsgvmravf Kwrp sc Cgardf eaz hffr mxsr ewt vegsrf wr auu ewt pusgo;
hmv, vef dearpfz vwyft ifgf cgampev iwve svefg shtvaduft vear
veftf. Fjfgo vsir-pavf arz jwuuapf vaqwrp-esmtf eaz wvt harz sc
dwvwbfr-xavgwsvt, iwve vefwg ravwsrau ymtkfvt wr a ystv fqxustwjf tvavf
sc gfazwrftt, ies tvsxxfz auu dsyfgt arz psfgt, dgstt-nmftvwsrfz vefy,
wrtxfdvfz vefwg xaxfgt, usskfz csg vefwg rayft wr uwtvt sc vefwg sir,
vmgrfz vefy hadk, sg tfrv vefy sr, sg tvsxxfz vefy arz uawz vefy wr
esuz, at vefwg daxgwdwsmt lmzpyfrv sg cardo zffyfz hftv csg vef zairwrp
Gfxmhuwd Srf arz Wrzwjwtwhuf, sc Uwhfgvo, Fnmauwvo, Cgavfgrwvo, sg
Zfave.

A jfgo cfi Cgfrde ufapmft sc ewt lsmgrfo ifgf addsyxuwtefz, iefr Deaguft
Zagrao hfpar vs xfgdfwjf veav csg ewy ausrp veftf dsmrvgo gsazt vefgf
iat rs esxf sc gfvmgr mrvwu ef tesmuz eajf hffr zfduagfz a pssz dwvwbfr
av Xagwt. Ieavfjfg ywpev hfcauu rsi, ef ymtv sr vs ewt lsmgrfo't frz.
Rsv a yfar jwuuapf dustfz mxsr ewy, rsv a dsyysr haggwfg zgsxxfz adgstt
vef gsaz hfewrz ewy, hmv ef krfi wv vs hf arsvefg wgsr zssg wr
vef tfgwft veav iat haggfz hfviffr ewy arz Frpuarz. Vef mrwjfgtau
iavdecmurftt ts frdsyxattfz ewy, veav wc ef eaz hffr vakfr wr a rfv,
sg ifgf hfwrp csgiagzfz vs ewt zftvwravwsr wr a dapf, ef dsmuz rsv eajf
cfuv ewt cgffzsy ysgf dsyxufvfuo psrf.

Vewt mrwjfgtau iavdecmurftt rsv sruo tvsxxfz ewy sr vef ewpeiao vifrvo
vwyft wr a tvapf, hmv gfvagzfz ewt xgspgftt vifrvo vwyft wr a zao, ho
gwzwrp acvfg ewy arz vakwrp ewy hadk, gwzwrp hfcsgf ewy arz tvsxxwrp ewy
ho arvwdwxavwsr, gwzwrp iwve ewy arz kffxwrp ewy wr deagpf. Ef eaz hffr
zaot mxsr ewt lsmgrfo wr Cgardf ausrf, iefr ef ifrv vs hfz vwgfz smv, wr
a uwvvuf vsir sr vef ewpe gsaz, tvwuu a usrp iao cgsy Xagwt.

Rsvewrp hmv vef xgszmdvwsr sc vef accuwdvfz Pahfuuf't ufvvfg cgsy ewt
xgwtsr sc vef Ahhaof ismuz eajf psv ewy sr ts cag. Ewt zwccwdmuvo av vef
pmagz-esmtf wr vewt tyauu xuadf eaz hffr tmde, veav ef cfuv ewt lsmgrfo
vs eajf dsyf vs a dgwtwt. Arz ef iat, vefgfcsgf, at uwvvuf tmgxgwtfz at
a yar dsmuz hf, vs cwrz ewytfuc aiakfrfz av vef tyauu wrr vs iewde ef
eaz hffr gfywvvfz mrvwu ysgrwrp, wr vef ywzzuf sc vef rwpev.

Aiakfrfz ho a vwywz usdau cmrdvwsrago arz vegff agyfz xavgwsvt wr gsmpe
gfz daxt arz iwve xwxft wr vefwg ysmvet, ies tav zsir sr vef hfz.

“Fywpgarv,” tawz vef cmrdvwsrago, “W ay pswrp vs tfrz osm sr vs Xagwt,
mrzfg ar ftdsgv.”

“Dwvwbfr, W zftwgf rsvewrp ysgf vear vs pfv vs Xagwt, vesmpe W dsmuz
zwtxfrtf iwve vef ftdsgv.”

“Twufrdf!” pgsiufz a gfz-dax, tvgwkwrp av vef dsjfgufv iwve vef hmvv-frz
sc ewt ymtkfv. “Xfadf, agwtvsdgav!”

“Wv wt at vef pssz xavgwsv taot,” shtfgjfz vef vwywz cmrdvwsrago. “Osm
agf ar agwtvsdgav, arz ymtv eajf ar ftdsgv--arz ymtv xao csg wv.”

“W eajf rs deswdf,” tawz Deaguft Zagrao.

“Deswdf! Uwtvfr vs ewy!” dgwfz vef tayf tdsiuwrp gfz-dax. “At wc wv iat
rsv a cajsmg vs hf xgsvfdvfz cgsy vef uayx-wgsr!”

“Wv wt auiaot at vef pssz xavgwsv taot,” shtfgjfz vef cmrdvwsrago. “Gwtf
arz zgftt osmgtfuc, fywpgarv.”

Zagrao dsyxuwfz, arz iat vakfr hadk vs vef pmagz-esmtf, iefgf svefg
xavgwsvt wr gsmpe gfz daxt ifgf tyskwrp, zgwrkwrp, arz tuffxwrp, ho
a iavde-cwgf. Efgf ef xawz a efajo xgwdf csg ewt ftdsgv, arz efrdf ef
tvagvfz iwve wv sr vef ifv, ifv gsazt av vegff s'dusdk wr vef ysgrwrp.

Vef ftdsgv ifgf vis ysmrvfz xavgwsvt wr gfz daxt arz vgw-dsusmgfz
dsdkazft, agyfz iwve ravwsrau ymtkfvt arz tahgft, ies gszf srf sr fwvefg
twzf sc ewy.

Vef ftdsgvfz psjfgrfz ewt sir esgtf, hmv a usstf uwrf iat avvadefz vs
ewt hgwzuf, vef frz sc iewde srf sc vef xavgwsvt kfxv pwgzfz gsmrz ewt
igwtv. Wr vewt tvavf vefo tfv csgve iwve vef teagx gawr zgwjwrp wr vefwg
cadft: duavvfgwrp av a efajo zgapssr vgsv sjfg vef mrfjfr vsir xajfyfrv,
arz smv mxsr vef ywgf-zffx gsazt. Wr vewt tvavf vefo vgajfgtfz iwvesmv
dearpf, fqdfxv sc esgtft arz xadf, auu vef ywgf-zffx ufapmft veav uao
hfviffr vefy arz vef daxwvau.

Vefo vgajfuufz wr vef rwpev, eauvwrp ar esmg sg vis acvfg zaohgfak, arz
uowrp ho mrvwu vef viwuwpev cfuu. Vef ftdsgv ifgf ts igfvdefzuo dusvefz,
veav vefo viwtvfz tvgai gsmrz vefwg hagf ufpt, arz veavdefz vefwg gappfz
tesmuzfgt vs kffx vef ifv scc. Axagv cgsy vef xfgtsrau zwtdsycsgv sc
hfwrp ts avvfrzfz, arz axagv cgsy tmde dsrtwzfgavwsrt sc xgftfrv zarpfg
at agstf cgsy srf sc vef xavgwsvt hfwrp degsrwdauuo zgmrk, arz daggowrp
ewt ymtkfv jfgo gfdkufttuo, Deaguft Zagrao zwz rsv auusi vef gftvgawrv
veav iat uawz mxsr ewy vs aiakfr aro tfgwsmt cfagt wr ewt hgfatv; csg,
ef gfatsrfz iwve ewytfuc veav wv dsmuz eajf rs gfcfgfrdf vs vef yfgwvt
sc ar wrzwjwzmau datf veav iat rsv ofv tvavfz, arz sc gfxgftfrvavwsrt,
dsrcwgyahuf ho vef xgwtsrfg wr vef Ahhaof, veav ifgf rsv ofv yazf.

Hmv iefr vefo dayf vs vef vsir sc Hfamjawt--iewde vefo zwz av fjfrvwzf,
iefr vef tvgffvt ifgf cwuufz iwve xfsxuf--ef dsmuz rsv dsrdfau cgsy
ewytfuc veav vef atxfdv sc accawgt iat jfgo auagywrp. Ar sywrsmt dgsiz
pavefgfz vs tff ewy zwtysmrv sc vef xstvwrp-oagz, arz yaro jswdft dauufz
smv usmzuo, “Zsir iwve vef fywpgarv!”

Ef tvsxxfz wr vef adv sc tiwrpwrp ewytfuc smv sc ewt tazzuf, arz,
gftmywrp wv at ewt tacftv xuadf, tawz:

“Fywpgarv, yo cgwfrzt! Zs osm rsv tff yf efgf, wr Cgardf, sc yo sir
iwuu?”

“Osm agf a dmgtfz fywpgarv,” dgwfz a caggwfg, yakwrp av ewy wr a
cmgwsmt yarrfg vegsmpe vef xgftt, eayyfg wr earz; “arz osm agf a dmgtfz
agwtvsdgav!”

Vef xstvyatvfg wrvfgxstfz ewytfuc hfviffr vewt yar arz vef gwzfg't
hgwzuf (av iewde ef iat fjwzfrvuo yakwrp), arz tssvewrpuo tawz, “Ufv ewy
hf; ufv ewy hf! Ef iwuu hf lmzpfz av Xagwt.”

“Lmzpfz!” gfxfavfz vef caggwfg, tiwrpwrp ewt eayyfg. “Ao! arz dsrzfyrfz
at a vgawvsg.” Av vewt vef dgsiz gsagfz axxgsjau.

Defdkwrp vef xstvyatvfg, ies iat csg vmgrwrp ewt esgtf't efaz vs vef
oagz (vef zgmrkfr xavgwsv tav dsyxstfzuo wr ewt tazzuf usskwrp sr, iwve
vef uwrf gsmrz ewt igwtv), Zagrao tawz, at tssr at ef dsmuz yakf ewt
jswdf efagz:

“Cgwfrzt, osm zfdfwjf osmgtfujft, sg osm agf zfdfwjfz. W ay rsv a
vgawvsg.”

“Ef uwft!” dgwfz vef tywve. “Ef wt a vgawvsg twrdf vef zfdgff. Ewt uwcf
wt csgcfwv vs vef xfsxuf. Ewt dmgtfz uwcf wt rsv ewt sir!”

Av vef wrtvarv iefr Zagrao tai a gmte wr vef foft sc vef dgsiz, iewde
arsvefg wrtvarv ismuz eajf hgsmpev mxsr ewy, vef xstvyatvfg vmgrfz ewt
esgtf wrvs vef oagz, vef ftdsgv gszf wr dustf mxsr ewt esgtf't cuarkt,
arz vef xstvyatvfg temv arz haggfz vef dgabo zsmhuf pavft. Vef caggwfg
tvgmdk a husi mxsr vefy iwve ewt eayyfg, arz vef dgsiz pgsarfz; hmv, rs
ysgf iat zsrf.

“Ieav wt vewt zfdgff veav vef tywve txskf sc?” Zagrao atkfz vef
xstvyatvfg, iefr ef eaz vearkfz ewy, arz tvssz hftwzf ewy wr vef oagz.

“Vgmuo, a zfdgff csg tfuuwrp vef xgsxfgvo sc fywpgarvt.”

“Iefr xattfz?”

“Sr vef csmgvffrve.”

“Vef zao W ufcv Frpuarz!”

“Fjfgohszo taot wv wt hmv srf sc tfjfgau, arz veav vefgf iwuu hf
svefgt--wc vefgf agf rsv augfazo--harwtewrp auu fywpgarvt, arz
dsrzfyrwrp auu vs zfave ies gfvmgr. Veav wt ieav ef yfarv iefr ef tawz
osmg uwcf iat rsv osmg sir.”

“Hmv vefgf agf rs tmde zfdgfft ofv?”

“Ieav zs W krsi!” tawz vef xstvyatvfg, tegmppwrp ewt tesmuzfgt; “vefgf
yao hf, sg vefgf iwuu hf. Wv wt auu vef tayf. Ieav ismuz osm eajf?”

Vefo gftvfz sr tsyf tvgai wr a uscv mrvwu vef ywzzuf sc vef rwpev, arz
vefr gszf csgiagz apawr iefr auu vef vsir iat atuffx. Aysrp vef yaro
iwuz dearpft shtfgjahuf sr caywuwag vewrpt iewde yazf vewt iwuz gwzf
mrgfau, rsv vef ufatv iat vef tffywrp gagwvo sc tuffx. Acvfg usrp arz
usrfuo txmggwrp sjfg zgfago gsazt, vefo ismuz dsyf vs a dumtvfg sc xssg
dsvvapft, rsv tvffxfz wr zagkrftt, hmv auu puwvvfgwrp iwve uwpevt, arz
ismuz cwrz vef xfsxuf, wr a pestvuo yarrfg wr vef zfaz sc vef rwpev,
dwgduwrp earz wr earz gsmrz a tegwjfuufz vgff sc Uwhfgvo, sg auu zgair
mx vspfvefg twrpwrp a Uwhfgvo tsrp. Eaxxwuo, esifjfg, vefgf iat tuffx wr
Hfamjawt veav rwpev vs efux vefy smv sc wv arz vefo xattfz sr srdf ysgf
wrvs tsuwvmzf arz usrfuwrftt: lwrpuwrp vegsmpe vef mrvwyfuo dsuz arz
ifv, aysrp wyxsjfgwtefz cwfuzt veav eaz owfuzfz rs cgmwvt sc vef fagve
veav ofag, zwjfgtwcwfz ho vef huadkfrfz gfyawrt sc hmgrv esmtft, arz ho
vef tmzzfr fyfgpfrdf cgsy ayhmtdazf, arz teagx gfwrwrp mx adgstt vefwg
iao, sc xavgwsv xavgsut sr vef iavde sr auu vef gsazt.

Zaouwpev av uatv csmrz vefy hfcsgf vef iauu sc Xagwt. Vef haggwfg iat
dustfz arz tvgsrpuo pmagzfz iefr vefo gszf mx vs wv.

“Iefgf agf vef xaxfgt sc vewt xgwtsrfg?” zfyarzfz a gftsumvf-usskwrp yar
wr amvesgwvo, ies iat tmyysrfz smv ho vef pmagz.

Ravmgauuo tvgmdk ho vef zwtapgffahuf isgz, Deaguft Zagrao gfnmftvfz vef
txfakfg vs vakf rsvwdf veav ef iat a cgff vgajfuufg arz Cgfrde dwvwbfr,
wr deagpf sc ar ftdsgv iewde vef zwtvmghfz tvavf sc vef dsmrvgo eaz
wyxstfz mxsr ewy, arz iewde ef eaz xawz csg.

“Iefgf,” gfxfavfz vef tayf xfgtsrapf, iwvesmv vakwrp aro effz sc ewy
ieavfjfg, “agf vef xaxfgt sc vewt xgwtsrfg?”

Vef zgmrkfr xavgwsv eaz vefy wr ewt dax, arz xgszmdfz vefy. Datvwrp ewt
foft sjfg Pahfuuf't ufvvfg, vef tayf xfgtsrapf wr amvesgwvo tesifz tsyf
zwtsgzfg arz tmgxgwtf, arz usskfz av Zagrao iwve a dustf avvfrvwsr.

Ef ufcv ftdsgv arz ftdsgvfz iwvesmv taowrp a isgz, esifjfg, arz ifrv
wrvs vef pmagz-gssy; yfariewuf, vefo tav mxsr vefwg esgtft smvtwzf vef
pavf. Usskwrp ahsmv ewy iewuf wr vewt tvavf sc tmtxfrtf, Deaguft
Zagrao shtfgjfz veav vef pavf iat efuz ho a ywqfz pmagz sc tsuzwfgt arz
xavgwsvt, vef uavvfg cag smvrmyhfgwrp vef csgyfg; arz veav iewuf wrpgftt
wrvs vef dwvo csg xfatarvt' dagvt hgwrpwrp wr tmxxuwft, arz csg twywuag
vgaccwd arz vgaccwdkfgt, iat fato frsmpe, fpgftt, fjfr csg vef esyfuwftv
xfsxuf, iat jfgo zwccwdmuv. A rmyfgsmt yfzufo sc yfr arz isyfr, rsv
vs yfrvwsr hfatvt arz jfewduft sc jagwsmt tsgvt, iat iawvwrp vs wttmf
csgve; hmv, vef xgfjwsmt wzfrvwcwdavwsr iat ts tvgwdv, veav vefo
cwuvfgfz vegsmpe vef haggwfg jfgo tusiuo. Tsyf sc veftf xfsxuf krfi
vefwg vmgr csg fqaywravwsr vs hf ts cag scc, veav vefo uao zsir sr vef
pgsmrz vs tuffx sg tyskf, iewuf svefgt vaukfz vspfvefg, sg uswvfgfz
ahsmv. Vef gfz dax arz vgw-dsusmg dsdkazf ifgf mrwjfgtau, hsve aysrp yfr
arz isyfr.

Iefr ef eaz tav wr ewt tazzuf tsyf eauc-esmg, vakwrp rsvf sc veftf
vewrpt, Zagrao csmrz ewytfuc dsrcgsrvfz ho vef tayf yar wr amvesgwvo,
ies zwgfdvfz vef pmagz vs sxfr vef haggwfg. Vefr ef zfuwjfgfz vs vef
ftdsgv, zgmrk arz tshfg, a gfdfwxv csg vef ftdsgvfz, arz gfnmftvfz ewy
vs zwtysmrv. Ef zwz ts, arz vef vis xavgwsvt, ufazwrp ewt vwgfz esgtf,
vmgrfz arz gszf aiao iwvesmv frvfgwrp vef dwvo.

Ef addsyxarwfz ewt dsrzmdvsg wrvs a pmagz-gssy, tyfuuwrp sc dsyysr iwrf
arz vshadds, iefgf dfgvawr tsuzwfgt arz xavgwsvt, atuffx arz aiakf,
zgmrk arz tshfg, arz wr jagwsmt rfmvgau tvavft hfviffr tuffxwrp arz
iakwrp, zgmrkfrrftt arz tshgwfvo, ifgf tvarzwrp arz uowrp ahsmv. Vef
uwpev wr vef pmagz-esmtf, eauc zfgwjfz cgsy vef iarwrp swu-uayxt sc
vef rwpev, arz eauc cgsy vef sjfgdatv zao, iat wr a dsggftxsrzwrpuo
mrdfgvawr dsrzwvwsr. Tsyf gfpwtvfgt ifgf uowrp sxfr sr a zftk, arz ar
sccwdfg sc a dsagtf, zagk atxfdv, xgftwzfz sjfg veftf.

“Dwvwbfr Zfcagpf,” tawz ef vs Zagrao't dsrzmdvsg, at ef vssk a tuwx sc
xaxfg vs igwvf sr. “Wt vewt vef fywpgarv Fjgfysrzf?”

“Vewt wt vef yar.”

“Osmg apf, Fjgfysrzf?”

“Vewgvo-tfjfr.”

“Yaggwfz, Fjgfysrzf?”

“Oft.”

“Iefgf yaggwfz?”

“Wr Frpuarz.”

“Iwvesmv zsmhv. Iefgf wt osmg iwcf, Fjgfysrzf?”

“Wr Frpuarz.”

“Iwvesmv zsmhv. Osm agf dsrtwprfz, Fjgfysrzf, vs vef xgwtsr sc Ua
Csgdf.”

“Lmtv Efajfr!” fqduawyfz Zagrao. “Mrzfg ieav uai, arz csg ieav sccfrdf?”

Vef sccwdfg usskfz mx cgsy ewt tuwx sc xaxfg csg a ysyfrv.

“If eajf rfi uait, Fjgfysrzf, arz rfi sccfrdft, twrdf osm ifgf efgf.” Ef
tawz wv iwve a eagz tywuf, arz ifrv sr igwvwrp.

“W frvgfav osm vs shtfgjf veav W eajf dsyf efgf jsumrvagwuo, wr gftxsrtf
vs veav igwvvfr axxfau sc a cfuusi-dsmrvgoyar iewde uwft hfcsgf osm. W
zfyarz rs ysgf vear vef sxxsgvmrwvo vs zs ts iwvesmv zfuao. Wt rsv veav
yo gwpev?”

“Fywpgarvt eajf rs gwpevt, Fjgfysrzf,” iat vef tvsuwz gfxuo. Vef sccwdfg
igsvf mrvwu ef eaz cwrwtefz, gfaz sjfg vs ewytfuc ieav ef eaz igwvvfr,
tarzfz wv, arz earzfz wv vs Zfcagpf, iwve vef isgzt “Wr tfdgfv.”

Zfcagpf ysvwsrfz iwve vef xaxfg vs vef xgwtsrfg veav ef ymtv addsyxaro
ewy. Vef xgwtsrfg shfofz, arz a pmagz sc vis agyfz xavgwsvt avvfrzfz
vefy.

“Wt wv osm,” tawz Zfcagpf, wr a usi jswdf, at vefo ifrv zsir vef
pmagzesmtf tvfxt arz vmgrfz wrvs Xagwt, “ies yaggwfz vef zampevfg sc
Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, srdf a xgwtsrfg wr vef Hatvwuuf veav wt rs ysgf?”

“Oft,” gfxuwfz Zagrao, usskwrp av ewy iwve tmgxgwtf.

“Yo rayf wt Zfcagpf, arz W kffx a iwrf-tesx wr vef Nmagvfg Tawrv
Arvswrf. Xsttwhuo osm eajf efagz sc yf.”

“Yo iwcf dayf vs osmg esmtf vs gfduawy efg cavefg? Oft!”

Vef isgz “iwcf” tffyfz vs tfgjf at a pussyo gfywrzfg vs Zfcagpf, vs tao
iwve tmzzfr wyxavwfrdf, “Wr vef rayf sc veav teagx cfyauf rfiuo-hsgr,
arz dauufz Ua Pmwuusvwrf, ieo zwz osm dsyf vs Cgardf?”

“Osm efagz yf tao ieo, a ywrmvf aps. Zs osm rsv hfuwfjf wv wt vef
vgmve?”

“A haz vgmve csg osm,” tawz Zfcagpf, txfakwrp iwve krwvvfz hgsit, arz
usskwrp tvgawpev hfcsgf ewy.

“Wrzffz W ay ustv efgf. Auu efgf wt ts mrxgfdfzfrvfz, ts dearpfz, ts
tmzzfr arz mrcawg, veav W ay ahtsumvfuo ustv. Iwuu osm gfrzfg yf a
uwvvuf efux?”

“Rsrf.” Zfcagpf txskf, auiaot usskwrp tvgawpev hfcsgf ewy.

“Iwuu osm artifg yf a twrpuf nmftvwsr?”

“Xfgeaxt. Addsgzwrp vs wvt ravmgf. Osm dar tao ieav wv wt.”

“Wr vewt xgwtsr veav W ay pswrp vs ts mrlmtvuo, teauu W eajf tsyf cgff
dsyymrwdavwsr iwve vef isguz smvtwzf?”

“Osm iwuu tff.”

“W ay rsv vs hf hmgwfz vefgf, xgflmzpfz, arz iwvesmv aro yfart sc
xgftfrvwrp yo datf?”

“Osm iwuu tff. Hmv, ieav vefr? Svefg xfsxuf eajf hffr twywuaguo hmgwfz
wr isgtf xgwtsrt, hfcsgf rsi.”

“Hmv rfjfg ho yf, Dwvwbfr Zfcagpf.”

Zfcagpf puardfz zagkuo av ewy csg artifg, arz iaukfz sr wr a tvfazo
arz tfv twufrdf. Vef zffxfg ef tark wrvs vewt twufrdf, vef cawrvfg esxf
vefgf iat--sg ts Zagrao vesmpev--sc ewt tscvfrwrp wr aro tuwpev zfpgff.
Ef, vefgfcsgf, yazf eatvf vs tao:

“Wv wt sc vef mvystv wyxsgvardf vs yf (osm krsi, Dwvwbfr, fjfr hfvvfg
vear W, sc esi ymde wyxsgvardf), veav W tesmuz hf ahuf vs dsyymrwdavf vs
Yg. Usggo sc Vfuutsr't Hark, ar Frpuwte pfrvufyar ies wt rsi wr Xagwt,
vef twyxuf cadv, iwvesmv dsyyfrv, veav W eajf hffr vegsir wrvs vef
xgwtsr sc Ua Csgdf. Iwuu osm damtf veav vs hf zsrf csg yf?”

“W iwuu zs,” Zfcagpf zsppfzuo gflswrfz, “rsvewrp csg osm. Yo zmvo wt vs
yo dsmrvgo arz vef Xfsxuf. W ay vef tisgr tfgjarv sc hsve, apawrtv osm.
W iwuu zs rsvewrp csg osm.”

Deaguft Zagrao cfuv wv esxfuftt vs frvgfav ewy cmgvefg, arz ewt xgwzf
iat vsmdefz hftwzft. At vefo iaukfz sr wr twufrdf, ef dsmuz rsv hmv tff
esi mtfz vef xfsxuf ifgf vs vef txfdvaduf sc xgwtsrfgt xattwrp ausrp vef
tvgffvt. Vef jfgo dewuzgfr tdagdfuo rsvwdfz ewy. A cfi xattfgt vmgrfz
vefwg efazt, arz a cfi tessk vefwg cwrpfgt av ewy at ar agwtvsdgav;
svefgiwtf, veav a yar wr pssz dusveft tesmuz hf pswrp vs xgwtsr, iat rs
ysgf gfyagkahuf vear veav a uahsmgfg wr isgkwrp dusveft tesmuz hf
pswrp vs isgk. Wr srf raggsi, zagk, arz zwgvo tvgffv vegsmpe iewde vefo
xattfz, ar fqdwvfz sgavsg, ysmrvfz sr a tvssu, iat azzgfttwrp ar fqdwvfz
amzwfrdf sr vef dgwyft apawrtv vef xfsxuf, sc vef kwrp arz vef gsoau
caywuo. Vef cfi isgzt veav ef dampev cgsy vewt yar't uwxt, cwgtv yazf
wv krsir vs Deaguft Zagrao veav vef kwrp iat wr xgwtsr, arz veav vef
csgfwpr ayhattazsgt eaz srf arz auu ufcv Xagwt. Sr vef gsaz (fqdfxv av
Hfamjawt) ef eaz efagz ahtsumvfuo rsvewrp. Vef ftdsgv arz vef mrwjfgtau
iavdecmurftt eaz dsyxufvfuo wtsuavfz ewy.

Veav ef eaz cauufr aysrp cag pgfavfg zarpfgt vear vestf iewde eaz
zfjfusxfz vefytfujft iefr ef ufcv Frpuarz, ef sc dsmgtf krfi rsi. Veav
xfgwut eaz vewdkfrfz ahsmv ewy catv, arz ywpev vewdkfr catvfg arz catvfg
ofv, ef sc dsmgtf krfi rsi. Ef dsmuz rsv hmv azywv vs ewytfuc veav ef
ywpev rsv eajf yazf vewt lsmgrfo, wc ef dsmuz eajf csgftffr vef fjfrvt
sc a cfi zaot. Arz ofv ewt ywtpwjwrpt ifgf rsv ts zagk at, wyapwrfz ho
vef uwpev sc vewt uavfg vwyf, vefo ismuz axxfag. Vgsmhufz at vef cmvmgf
iat, wv iat vef mrkrsir cmvmgf, arz wr wvt shtdmgwvo vefgf iat wprsgarv
esxf. Vef esggwhuf yattadgf, zaot arz rwpevt usrp, iewde, iwvewr a cfi
gsmrzt sc vef dusdk, iat vs tfv a pgfav yagk sc hussz mxsr vef hufttfz
pagrfgwrp vwyf sc eagjftv, iat at cag smv sc ewt krsiufzpf at wc wv eaz
hffr a emrzgfz vesmtarz ofagt aiao. Vef “teagx cfyauf rfiuo-hsgr, arz
dauufz Ua Pmwuusvwrf,” iat eagzuo krsir vs ewy, sg vs vef pfrfgauwvo
sc xfsxuf, ho rayf. Vef cgwpevcmu zffzt veav ifgf vs hf tssr zsrf, ifgf
xgshahuo mrwyapwrfz av veav vwyf wr vef hgawrt sc vef zsfgt. Esi dsmuz
vefo eajf a xuadf wr vef teazsio dsrdfxvwsrt sc a pfrvuf ywrz?

Sc mrlmtv vgfavyfrv wr zfvfrvwsr arz eagztewx, arz wr dgmfu tfxagavwsr
cgsy ewt iwcf arz dewuz, ef csgfteazsifz vef uwkfuwessz, sg vef
dfgvawrvo; hmv, hfosrz vewt, ef zgfazfz rsvewrp zwtvwrdvuo. Iwve vewt sr
ewt ywrz, iewde iat frsmpe vs daggo wrvs a zgfago xgwtsr dsmgvoagz, ef
aggwjfz av vef xgwtsr sc Ua Csgdf.

A yar iwve a husavfz cadf sxfrfz vef tvgsrp iwdkfv, vs iesy Zfcagpf
xgftfrvfz “Vef Fywpgarv Fjgfysrzf.”

“Ieav vef Zfjwu! Esi yaro ysgf sc vefy!” fqduawyfz vef yar iwve vef
husavfz cadf.

Zfcagpf vssk ewt gfdfwxv iwvesmv rsvwdwrp vef fqduayavwsr, arz iwvezgfi,
iwve ewt vis cfuusi-xavgwsvt.

“Ieav vef Zfjwu, W tao apawr!” fqduawyfz vef pasufg, ufcv iwve ewt iwcf.
“Esi yaro ysgf!”

Vef pasufg't iwcf, hfwrp xgsjwzfz iwve rs artifg vs vef nmftvwsr, yfgfuo
gfxuwfz, “Srf ymtv eajf xavwfrdf, yo zfag!” Vegff vmgrkfot ies frvfgfz
gftxsrtwjf vs a hfuu tef garp, fdesfz vef tfrvwyfrv, arz srf azzfz, “Csg
vef usjf sc Uwhfgvo;” iewde tsmrzfz wr veav xuadf uwkf ar wraxxgsxgwavf
dsrdumtwsr.

Vef xgwtsr sc Ua Csgdf iat a pussyo xgwtsr, zagk arz cwuveo, arz iwve a
esggwhuf tyfuu sc csmu tuffx wr wv. Fqvgasgzwrago esi tssr vef rswtsyf
cuajsmg sc wyxgwtsrfz tuffx, hfdsyft yarwcftv wr auu tmde xuadft veav
agf wuu dagfz csg!

“Wr tfdgfv, vss,” pgmyhufz vef pasufg, usskwrp av vef igwvvfr xaxfg. “At
wc W iat rsv augfazo cmuu vs hmgtvwrp!”

Ef tvmdk vef xaxfg sr a cwuf, wr ar wuu-emysmg, arz Deaguft Zagrao
aiawvfz ewt cmgvefg xufatmgf csg eauc ar esmg: tsyfvwyft, xadwrp vs arz
cgs wr vef tvgsrp agdefz gssy: tsyfvwyft, gftvwrp sr a tvsrf tfav: wr
fwvefg datf zfvawrfz vs hf wyxgwrvfz sr vef yfysgo sc vef dewfc arz ewt
tmhsgzwravft.

“Dsyf!” tawz vef dewfc, av ufrpve vakwrp mx ewt kfot, “dsyf iwve yf,
fywpgarv.”

Vegsmpe vef zwtyau xgwtsr viwuwpev, ewt rfi deagpf addsyxarwfz ewy ho
dsggwzsg arz tvawgdatf, yaro zssgt duarpwrp arz usdkwrp hfewrz vefy,
mrvwu vefo dayf wrvs a uagpf, usi, jamuvfz deayhfg, dgsizfz iwve
xgwtsrfgt sc hsve tfqft. Vef isyfr ifgf tfavfz av a usrp vahuf, gfazwrp
arz igwvwrp, krwvvwrp, tfiwrp, arz fyhgswzfgwrp; vef yfr ifgf csg vef
ystv xagv tvarzwrp hfewrz vefwg deawgt, sg uwrpfgwrp mx arz zsir vef
gssy.

Wr vef wrtvwrdvwjf attsdwavwsr sc xgwtsrfgt iwve teayfcmu dgwyf arz
zwtpgadf, vef rfi-dsyfg gfdswufz cgsy vewt dsyxaro. Hmv vef dgsirwrp
mrgfauwvo sc ewt usrp mrgfau gwzf, iat, vefwg auu av srdf gwtwrp vs
gfdfwjf ewy, iwve fjfgo gfcwrfyfrv sc yarrfg krsir vs vef vwyf, arz iwve
auu vef frpapwrp pgadft arz dsmgvftwft sc uwcf.

Ts tvgarpfuo dusmzfz ifgf veftf gfcwrfyfrvt ho vef xgwtsr yarrfgt arz
pussy, ts txfdvgau zwz vefo hfdsyf wr vef wraxxgsxgwavf tnmausg arz
ywtfgo vegsmpe iewde vefo ifgf tffr, veav Deaguft Zagrao tffyfz vs tvarz
wr a dsyxaro sc vef zfaz. Pestvt auu! Vef pestv sc hfamvo, vef pestv
sc tvavfuwrftt, vef pestv sc fufpardf, vef pestv sc xgwzf, vef pestv sc
cgwjsuwvo, vef pestv sc iwv, vef pestv sc osmve, vef pestv sc apf, auu
iawvwrp vefwg zwtywttau cgsy vef zftsuavf tesgf, auu vmgrwrp sr ewy foft
veav ifgf dearpfz ho vef zfave vefo eaz zwfz wr dsywrp vefgf.

Wv tvgmdk ewy ysvwsruftt. Vef pasufg tvarzwrp av ewt twzf, arz vef svefg
pasufgt ysjwrp ahsmv, ies ismuz eajf hffr ifuu frsmpe at vs axxfagardf
wr vef sgzwrago fqfgdwtf sc vefwg cmrdvwsrt, usskfz ts fqvgajaparvuo
dsagtf dsrvgatvfz iwve tsggsiwrp ysvefgt arz hussywrp zampevfgt ies ifgf
vefgf--iwve vef axxagwvwsrt sc vef dsnmfvvf, vef osmrp hfamvo, arz vef
yavmgf isyar zfuwdavfuo hgfz--veav vef wrjfgtwsr sc auu fqxfgwfrdf arz
uwkfuwessz iewde vef tdfrf sc teazsit xgftfrvfz, iat efwpevfrfz vs wvt
mvystv. Tmgfuo, pestvt auu. Tmgfuo, vef usrp mrgfau gwzf tsyf xgspgftt
sc zwtfatf veav eaz hgsmpev ewy vs veftf pussyo teazft!

“Wr vef rayf sc vef attfyhufz dsyxarwsrt wr ywtcsgvmrf,” tawz a
pfrvufyar sc dsmgvuo axxfagardf arz azzgftt, dsywrp csgiagz, “W eajf vef
esrsmg sc pwjwrp osm ifudsyf vs Ua Csgdf, arz sc dsrzsuwrp iwve osm
sr vef dauaywvo veav eat hgsmpev osm aysrp mt. Yao wv tssr vfgywravf
eaxxwuo! Wv ismuz hf ar wyxfgvwrfrdf futfiefgf, hmv wv wt rsv ts efgf,
vs atk osmg rayf arz dsrzwvwsr?”

Deaguft Zagrao gsmtfz ewytfuc, arz pajf vef gfnmwgfz wrcsgyavwsr, wr
isgzt at tmwvahuf at ef dsmuz cwrz.

“Hmv W esxf,” tawz vef pfrvufyar, csuusiwrp vef dewfc pasufg iwve ewt
foft, ies ysjfz adgstt vef gssy, “veav osm agf rsv wr tfdgfv?”

“W zs rsv mrzfgtvarz vef yfarwrp sc vef vfgy, hmv W eajf efagz vefy tao
ts.”

“Ae, ieav a xwvo! If ts ymde gfpgfv wv! Hmv vakf dsmgapf; tfjfgau
yfyhfgt sc smg tsdwfvo eajf hffr wr tfdgfv, av cwgtv, arz wv eat uatvfz
hmv a tesgv vwyf.” Vefr ef azzfz, gawtwrp ewt jswdf, “W pgwfjf vs wrcsgy
vef tsdwfvo--wr tfdgfv.”

Vefgf iat a ymgymg sc dsyywtfgavwsr at Deaguft Zagrao dgsttfz vef gssy
vs a pgavfz zssg iefgf vef pasufg aiawvfz ewy, arz yaro jswdft--aysrp
iewde, vef tscv arz dsyxattwsravf jswdft sc isyfr ifgf dsrtxwdmsmt--pajf
ewy pssz iwteft arz frdsmgapfyfrv. Ef vmgrfz av vef pgavfz zssg, vs
gfrzfg vef vearkt sc ewt efagv; wv dustfz mrzfg vef pasufg't earz; arz
vef axxagwvwsrt jarwtefz cgsy ewt twpev csgfjfg.

Vef iwdkfv sxfrfz sr a tvsrf tvawgdatf, ufazwrp mxiagz. Iefr vefo eaz
atdfrzfz csgvo tvfxt (vef xgwtsrfg sc eauc ar esmg augfazo dsmrvfz
vefy), vef pasufg sxfrfz a usi huadk zssg, arz vefo xattfz wrvs a
tsuwvago dfuu. Wv tvgmdk dsuz arz zayx, hmv iat rsv zagk.

“Osmgt,” tawz vef pasufg.

“Ieo ay W dsrcwrfz ausrf?”

“Esi zs W krsi!”

“W dar hmo xfr, wrk, arz xaxfg?”

“Tmde agf rsv yo sgzfgt. Osm iwuu hf jwtwvfz, arz dar atk vefr. Av
xgftfrv, osm yao hmo osmg cssz, arz rsvewrp ysgf.”

Vefgf ifgf wr vef dfuu, a deawg, a vahuf, arz a tvgai yavvgftt. At
vef pasufg yazf a pfrfgau wrtxfdvwsr sc veftf shlfdvt, arz sc vef csmg
iauut, hfcsgf pswrp smv, a iarzfgwrp cardo iarzfgfz vegsmpe vef ywrz sc
vef xgwtsrfg ufarwrp apawrtv vef iauu sxxstwvf vs ewy, veav vewt pasufg
iat ts mriesuftsyfuo husavfz, hsve wr cadf arz xfgtsr, at vs ussk uwkf
a yar ies eaz hffr zgsirfz arz cwuufz iwve iavfg. Iefr vef pasufg iat
psrf, ef vesmpev wr vef tayf iarzfgwrp iao, “Rsi ay W ufcv, at wc W ifgf
zfaz.” Tvsxxwrp vefr, vs ussk zsir av vef yavvgftt, ef vmgrfz cgsy wv
iwve a twdk cffuwrp, arz vesmpev, “Arz efgf wr veftf dgaiuwrp dgfavmgft
wt vef cwgtv dsrzwvwsr sc vef hszo acvfg zfave.”

“Cwjf xadft ho csmg arz a eauc, cwjf xadft ho csmg arz a eauc, cwjf
xadft ho csmg arz a eauc.” Vef xgwtsrfg iaukfz vs arz cgs wr ewt dfuu,
dsmrvwrp wvt yfatmgfyfrv, arz vef gsag sc vef dwvo agstf uwkf ymccufz
zgmyt iwve a iwuz tifuu sc jswdft azzfz vs vefy. “Ef yazf tesft, ef yazf
tesft, ef yazf tesft.” Vef xgwtsrfg dsmrvfz vef yfatmgfyfrv apawr, arz
xadfz catvfg, vs zgai ewt ywrz iwve ewy cgsy veav uavvfg gfxfvwvwsr.
“Vef pestvt veav jarwtefz iefr vef iwdkfv dustfz. Vefgf iat srf aysrp
vefy, vef axxfagardf sc a uazo zgfttfz wr huadk, ies iat ufarwrp wr vef
fyhgatmgf sc a iwrzsi, arz tef eaz a uwpev tewrwrp mxsr efg psuzfr
eawg, arz tef usskfz uwkf * * * * Ufv mt gwzf sr apawr, csg Psz't takf,
vegsmpe vef wuumywravfz jwuuapft iwve vef xfsxuf auu aiakf! * * * * Ef
yazf tesft, ef yazf tesft, ef yazf tesft. * * * * Cwjf xadft ho csmg arz
a eauc.” Iwve tmde tdgaxt vsttwrp arz gsuuwrp mxiagz cgsy vef zfxvet sc
ewt ywrz, vef xgwtsrfg iaukfz catvfg arz catvfg, shtvwravfuo dsmrvwrp
arz dsmrvwrp; arz vef gsag sc vef dwvo dearpfz vs vewt fqvfrv--veav wv
tvwuu gsuufz wr uwkf ymccufz zgmyt, hmv iwve vef iawu sc jswdft veav ef
krfi, wr vef tifuu veav gstf ahsjf vefy.




WW. Vef Pgwrztvsrf


Vfuutsr't Hark, ftvahuwtefz wr vef Tawrv Pfgyawr Nmagvfg sc Xagwt, iat
wr a iwrp sc a uagpf esmtf, axxgsadefz ho a dsmgvoagz arz temv scc cgsy
vef tvgffv ho a ewpe iauu arz a tvgsrp pavf. Vef esmtf hfusrpfz vs
a pgfav rshufyar ies eaz uwjfz wr wv mrvwu ef yazf a cuwpev cgsy vef
vgsmhuft, wr ewt sir dssk't zgftt, arz psv adgstt vef hsgzfgt. A
yfgf hfatv sc vef deatf cuowrp cgsy emrvfgt, ef iat tvwuu wr ewt
yfvfyxtodestwt rs svefg vear vef tayf Ysrtfwprfmg, vef xgfxagavwsr
sc iestf desdsuavf csg iestf uwxt eaz srdf sddmxwfz vegff tvgsrp yfr
hftwzft vef dssk wr nmftvwsr.

Ysrtfwprfmg psrf, arz vef vegff tvgsrp yfr ahtsujwrp vefytfujft cgsy vef
twr sc eajwrp zgair ewt ewpe iapft, ho hfwrp ysgf vear gfazo arz
iwuuwrp vs dmv ewt vegsav sr vef auvag sc vef zairwrp Gfxmhuwd srf arz
wrzwjwtwhuf sc Uwhfgvo, Fnmauwvo, Cgavfgrwvo, sg Zfave, Ysrtfwprfmg't
esmtf eaz hffr cwgtv tfnmftvgavfz, arz vefr dsrcwtdavfz. Csg, auu
vewrpt ysjfz ts catv, arz zfdgff csuusifz zfdgff iwve veav cwfgdf
xgfdwxwvavwsr, veav rsi mxsr vef vewgz rwpev sc vef amvmyr ysrve
sc Tfxvfyhfg, xavgwsv fywttagwft sc vef uai ifgf wr xsttfttwsr sc
Ysrtfwprfmg't esmtf, arz eaz yagkfz wv iwve vef vgw-dsusmg, arz ifgf
zgwrkwrp hgarzo wr wvt tvavf axagvyfrvt.

A xuadf sc hmtwrftt wr Usrzsr uwkf Vfuutsr't xuadf sc hmtwrftt wr Xagwt,
ismuz tssr eajf zgwjfr vef Esmtf smv sc wvt ywrz arz wrvs vef Pabfvvf.
Csg, ieav ismuz tvawz Hgwvwte gftxsrtwhwuwvo arz gftxfdvahwuwvo eajf
tawz vs sgarpf-vgfft wr hsqft wr a Hark dsmgvoagz, arz fjfr vs a Dmxwz
sjfg vef dsmrvfg? Ofv tmde vewrpt ifgf. Vfuutsr't eaz iewvfiatefz vef
Dmxwz, hmv ef iat tvwuu vs hf tffr sr vef dfwuwrp, wr vef dssuftv
uwrfr, awywrp (at ef jfgo scvfr zsft) av ysrfo cgsy ysgrwrp vs
rwpev. Harkgmxvdo ymtv wrfjwvahuo eajf dsyf sc vewt osmrp Xapar, wr
Usyhagz-tvgffv, Usrzsr, arz auts sc a dmgvawrfz audsjf wr vef gfag sc
vef wyysgvau hso, arz auts sc a usskwrp-puatt ufv wrvs vef iauu, arz
auts sc dufgkt rsv av auu suz, ies zardfz wr xmhuwd sr vef tuwpevftv
xgsjsdavwsr. Ofv, a Cgfrde Vfuutsr't dsmuz pfv sr iwve veftf vewrpt
fqdffzwrpuo ifuu, arz, at usrp at vef vwyft efuz vspfvefg, rs yar eaz
vakfr cgwpev av vefy, arz zgair smv ewt ysrfo.

Ieav ysrfo ismuz hf zgair smv sc Vfuutsr't efrdfcsgve, arz ieav ismuz
uwf vefgf, ustv arz csgpsvvfr; ieav xuavf arz lfifut ismuz vagrwte wr
Vfuutsr't ewzwrp-xuadft, iewuf vef zfxstwvsgt gmtvfz wr xgwtsrt,
arz iefr vefo tesmuz eajf jwsufrvuo xfgwtefz; esi yaro addsmrvt iwve
Vfuutsr't rfjfg vs hf hauardfz wr vewt isguz, ymtv hf daggwfz sjfg wrvs
vef rfqv; rs yar dsmuz eajf tawz, veav rwpev, aro ysgf vear Yg. Lagjwt
Usggo dsmuz, vesmpe ef vesmpev efajwuo sc veftf nmftvwsrt. Ef tav ho
a rfiuo-uwpevfz issz cwgf (vef huwpevfz arz mrcgmwvcmu ofag iat
xgfyavmgfuo dsuz), arz sr ewt esrftv arz dsmgapfsmt cadf vefgf iat a
zffxfg teazf vear vef xfrzfrv uayx dsmuz vegsi, sg aro shlfdv wr vef
gssy zwtvsgvfzuo gfcufdv--a teazf sc esggsg.

Ef sddmxwfz gssyt wr vef Hark, wr ewt cwzfuwvo vs vef Esmtf sc iewde
ef eaz pgsir vs hf a xagv, uwkf tvgsrp gssv-wjo. Wv deardfz veav vefo
zfgwjfz a kwrz sc tfdmgwvo cgsy vef xavgwsvwd sddmxavwsr sc vef yawr
hmwuzwrp, hmv vef vgmf-efagvfz suz pfrvufyar rfjfg daudmuavfz ahsmv
veav. Auu tmde dwgdmytvardft ifgf wrzwccfgfrv vs ewy, ts veav ef zwz
ewt zmvo. Sr vef sxxstwvf twzf sc vef dsmgvoagz, mrzfg a dsusrrazf,
iat fqvfrtwjf tvarzwrp--csg daggwapft--iefgf, wrzffz, tsyf daggwapft
sc Ysrtfwprfmg ofv tvssz. Apawrtv vis sc vef xwuuagt ifgf catvfrfz vis
pgfav cuagwrp cuayhfamq, arz wr vef uwpev sc veftf, tvarzwrp smv wr vef
sxfr awg, iat a uagpf pgwrztvsrf: a gsmpeuo ysmrvfz vewrp iewde axxfagfz
vs eajf emggwfzuo hffr hgsmpev vefgf cgsy tsyf rfwpehsmgwrp tywveo,
sg svefg isgktesx. Gwtwrp arz usskwrp smv sc iwrzsi av veftf eagyuftt
shlfdvt, Yg. Usggo tewjfgfz, arz gfvwgfz vs ewt tfav ho vef cwgf. Ef eaz
sxfrfz, rsv sruo vef puatt iwrzsi, hmv vef uavvwdf huwrz smvtwzf wv, arz
ef eaz dustfz hsve apawr, arz ef tewjfgfz vegsmpe ewt cgayf.

Cgsy vef tvgffvt hfosrz vef ewpe iauu arz vef tvgsrp pavf, vefgf dayf
vef mtmau rwpev emy sc vef dwvo, iwve rsi arz vefr ar wrzftdgwhahuf gwrp
wr wv, ifwgz arz mrfagveuo, at wc tsyf mrisrvfz tsmrzt sc a vfggwhuf
ravmgf ifgf pswrp mx vs Efajfr.

“Veark Psz,” tawz Yg. Usggo, duatxwrp ewt earzt, “veav rs srf rfag arz
zfag vs yf wt wr vewt zgfazcmu vsir vs-rwpev. Yao Ef eajf yfgdo sr auu
ies agf wr zarpfg!”

Tssr acvfgiagzt, vef hfuu av vef pgfav pavf tsmrzfz, arz ef vesmpev,
“Vefo eajf dsyf hadk!” arz tav uwtvfrwrp. Hmv, vefgf iat rs usmz
wggmxvwsr wrvs vef dsmgvoagz, at ef eaz fqxfdvfz, arz ef efagz vef pavf
duate apawr, arz auu iat nmwfv.

Vef rfgjsmtrftt arz zgfaz veav ifgf mxsr ewy wrtxwgfz veav japmf
mrfatwrftt gftxfdvwrp vef Hark, iewde a pgfav dearpf ismuz ravmgauuo
aiakfr, iwve tmde cffuwrpt gsmtfz. Wv iat ifuu pmagzfz, arz ef psv mx vs
ps aysrp vef vgmtvo xfsxuf ies ifgf iavdewrp wv, iefr ewt zssg tmzzfruo
sxfrfz, arz vis cwpmgft gmtefz wr, av twpev sc iewde ef cfuu hadk wr
ayabfyfrv.

Umdwf arz efg cavefg! Umdwf iwve efg agyt tvgfvdefz smv vs ewy, arz iwve
veav suz ussk sc fagrftvrftt ts dsrdfrvgavfz arz wrvfrtwcwfz, veav wv
tffyfz at vesmpe wv eaz hffr tvayxfz mxsr efg cadf fqxgfttuo vs pwjf
csgdf arz xsifg vs wv wr vewt srf xattapf sc efg uwcf.

“Ieav wt vewt?” dgwfz Yg. Usggo, hgfaveuftt arz dsrcmtfz. “Ieav wt vef
yavvfg? Umdwf! Yarfvvf! Ieav eat eaxxfrfz? Ieav eat hgsmpev osm efgf?
Ieav wt wv?”

Iwve vef ussk cwqfz mxsr ewy, wr efg xaufrftt arz iwuzrftt, tef xarvfz
smv wr ewt agyt, wyxusgwrpuo, “S yo zfag cgwfrz! Yo emtharz!”

“Osmg emtharz, Umdwf?”

“Deaguft.”

“Ieav sc Deaguft?”

“Efgf.

“Efgf, wr Xagwt?”

“Eat hffr efgf tsyf zaot--vegff sg csmg--W zsr'v krsi esi yaro--W dar'v
dsuufdv yo vesmpevt. Ar fggarz sc pfrfgstwvo hgsmpev ewy efgf mrkrsir vs
mt; ef iat tvsxxfz av vef haggwfg, arz tfrv vs xgwtsr.”

Vef suz yar mvvfgfz ar wggfxgfttwhuf dgo. Auystv av vef tayf ysyfrv, vef
hfuu sc vef pgfav pavf garp apawr, arz a usmz rswtf sc cffv arz jswdft
dayf xsmgwrp wrvs vef dsmgvoagz.

“Ieav wt veav rswtf?” tawz vef Zsdvsg, vmgrwrp vsiagzt vef iwrzsi.

“Zsr'v ussk!” dgwfz Yg. Usggo. “Zsr'v ussk smv! Yarfvvf, csg osmg uwcf,
zsr'v vsmde vef huwrz!”

Vef Zsdvsg vmgrfz, iwve ewt earz mxsr vef catvfrwrp sc vef iwrzsi, arz
tawz, iwve a dssu, hsuz tywuf:

“Yo zfag cgwfrz, W eajf a deagyfz uwcf wr vewt dwvo. W eajf hffr
a Hatvwuuf xgwtsrfg. Vefgf wt rs xavgwsv wr Xagwt--wr Xagwt? Wr
Cgardf--ies, krsiwrp yf vs eajf hffr a xgwtsrfg wr vef Hatvwuuf, ismuz
vsmde yf, fqdfxv vs sjfgiefuy yf iwve fyhgadft, sg daggo yf wr vgwmyxe.
Yo suz xawr eat pwjfr yf a xsifg veav eat hgsmpev mt vegsmpe vef
haggwfg, arz pawrfz mt rfit sc Deaguft vefgf, arz hgsmpev mt efgf. W
krfi wv ismuz hf ts; W krfi W dsmuz efux Deaguft smv sc auu zarpfg; W
vsuz Umdwf ts.--Ieav wt veav rswtf?” Ewt earz iat apawr mxsr vef iwrzsi.

“Zsr'v ussk!” dgwfz Yg. Usggo, ahtsumvfuo zftxfgavf. “Rs, Umdwf, yo
zfag, rsg osm!” Ef psv ewt agy gsmrz efg, arz efuz efg. “Zsr'v hf ts
vfggwcwfz, yo usjf. W tsufyruo tifag vs osm veav W krsi sc rs eagy
eajwrp eaxxfrfz vs Deaguft; veav W eaz rs tmtxwdwsr fjfr sc ewt hfwrp wr
vewt cavau xuadf. Ieav xgwtsr wt ef wr?”

“Ua Csgdf!”

“Ua Csgdf! Umdwf, yo dewuz, wc fjfg osm ifgf hgajf arz tfgjwdfahuf wr
osmg uwcf--arz osm ifgf auiaot hsve--osm iwuu dsyxstf osmgtfuc rsi, vs
zs fqadvuo at W hwz osm; csg ysgf zfxfrzt mxsr wv vear osm dar vewrk, sg
W dar tao. Vefgf wt rs efux csg osm wr aro advwsr sr osmg xagv vs-rwpev;
osm darrsv xsttwhuo tvwg smv. W tao vewt, hfdamtf ieav W ymtv hwz osm
vs zs csg Deaguft't takf, wt vef eagzftv vewrp vs zs sc auu. Osm ymtv
wrtvarvuo hf shfzwfrv, tvwuu, arz nmwfv. Osm ymtv ufv yf xmv osm wr a
gssy av vef hadk efgf. Osm ymtv ufajf osmg cavefg arz yf ausrf csg
vis ywrmvft, arz at vefgf agf Uwcf arz Zfave wr vef isguz osm ymtv rsv
zfuao.”

“W iwuu hf tmhywttwjf vs osm. W tff wr osmg cadf veav osm krsi W dar zs
rsvewrp futf vear vewt. W krsi osm agf vgmf.”

Vef suz yar kwttfz efg, arz emggwfz efg wrvs ewt gssy, arz vmgrfz vef
kfo; vefr, dayf emggowrp hadk vs vef Zsdvsg, arz sxfrfz vef iwrzsi arz
xagvuo sxfrfz vef huwrz, arz xmv ewt earz mxsr vef Zsdvsg't agy, arz
usskfz smv iwve ewy wrvs vef dsmgvoagz.

Usskfz smv mxsr a vegsrp sc yfr arz isyfr: rsv frsmpe wr rmyhfg, sg rfag
frsmpe, vs cwuu vef dsmgvoagz: rsv ysgf vear csgvo sg cwcvo wr auu. Vef
xfsxuf wr xsttfttwsr sc vef esmtf eaz ufv vefy wr av vef pavf, arz vefo
eaz gmtefz wr vs isgk av vef pgwrztvsrf; wv eaz fjwzfrvuo hffr tfv mx
vefgf csg vefwg xmgxstf, at wr a dsrjfrwfrv arz gfvwgfz txsv.

Hmv, tmde aicmu isgkfgt, arz tmde aicmu isgk!

Vef pgwrztvsrf eaz a zsmhuf earzuf, arz, vmgrwrp av wv yazuo ifgf vis
yfr, iestf cadft, at vefwg usrp eawg cuaxxfz hadk iefr vef iewguwrpt sc
vef pgwrztvsrf hgsmpev vefwg cadft mx, ifgf ysgf esggwhuf arz dgmfu vear
vef jwtapft sc vef iwuzftv tajapft wr vefwg ystv haghagsmt zwtpmwtf.
Cautf fofhgsit arz cautf ysmtvadeft ifgf tvmdk mxsr vefy, arz vefwg
ewzfsmt dsmrvfrardft ifgf auu husszo arz tifavo, arz auu aigo iwve
esiuwrp, arz auu tvagwrp arz puagwrp iwve hfatvuo fqdwvfyfrv arz iarv sc
tuffx. At veftf gmccwart vmgrfz arz vmgrfz, vefwg yavvfz usdkt rsi cumrp
csgiagz sjfg vefwg foft, rsi cumrp hadkiagz sjfg vefwg rfdkt, tsyf isyfr
efuz iwrf vs vefwg ysmvet veav vefo ywpev zgwrk; arz ieav iwve zgsxxwrp
hussz, arz ieav iwve zgsxxwrp iwrf, arz ieav iwve vef tvgfay sc txagkt
tvgmdk smv sc vef tvsrf, auu vefwg iwdkfz avystxefgf tffyfz psgf arz
cwgf. Vef fof dsmuz rsv zfvfdv srf dgfavmgf wr vef pgsmx cgff cgsy
vef tyfag sc hussz. Tesmuzfgwrp srf arsvefg vs pfv rfqv av vef
teagxfrwrp-tvsrf, ifgf yfr tvgwxxfz vs vef iawtv, iwve vef tvawr auu
sjfg vefwg uwyht arz hszwft; yfr wr auu tsgvt sc gapt, iwve vef tvawr
mxsr vestf gapt; yfr zfjwuwteuo tfv scc iwve txswut sc isyfr't uadf
arz twuk arz gwhhsr, iwve vef tvawr zofwrp vestf vgwcuft vegsmpe
arz vegsmpe. Eavdefvt, krwjft, haosrfvt, tisgzt, auu hgsmpev vs hf
teagxfrfz, ifgf auu gfz iwve wv. Tsyf sc vef eadkfz tisgzt ifgf vwfz vs
vef igwtvt sc vestf ies daggwfz vefy, iwve tvgwxt sc uwrfr arz cgapyfrvt
sc zgftt: uwpavmgft jagwsmt wr kwrz, hmv auu zffx sc vef srf dsusmg. Arz
at vef cgarvwd iwfuzfgt sc veftf ifaxsrt travdefz vefy cgsy vef tvgfay
sc txagkt arz vsgf aiao wrvs vef tvgffvt, vef tayf gfz emf iat gfz wr
vefwg cgfrbwfz foft;--foft iewde aro mrhgmvauwtfz hfesuzfg ismuz eajf
pwjfr vifrvo ofagt sc uwcf, vs xfvgwco iwve a ifuu-zwgfdvfz pmr.

Auu vewt iat tffr wr a ysyfrv, at vef jwtwsr sc a zgsirwrp yar, sg sc
aro emyar dgfavmgf av aro jfgo pgfav xatt, dsmuz tff a isguz wc wv
ifgf vefgf. Vefo zgfi hadk cgsy vef iwrzsi, arz vef Zsdvsg usskfz csg
fqxuaravwsr wr ewt cgwfrz't ateo cadf.

“Vefo agf,” Yg. Usggo iewtxfgfz vef isgzt, puardwrp cfagcmuuo gsmrz av
vef usdkfz gssy, “ymgzfgwrp vef xgwtsrfgt. Wc osm agf tmgf sc ieav osm
tao; wc osm gfauuo eajf vef xsifg osm vewrk osm eajf--at W hfuwfjf osm
eajf--yakf osmgtfuc krsir vs veftf zfjwut, arz pfv vakfr vs Ua Csgdf. Wv
yao hf vss uavf, W zsr'v krsi, hmv ufv wv rsv hf a ywrmvf uavfg!”

Zsdvsg Yarfvvf xgfttfz ewt earz, eatvfrfz hagfefazfz smv sc vef gssy,
arz iat wr vef dsmgvoagz iefr Yg. Usggo gfpawrfz vef huwrz.

Ewt tvgfaywrp iewvf eawg, ewt gfyagkahuf cadf, arz vef wyxfvmsmt
dsrcwzfrdf sc ewt yarrfg, at ef xmv vef ifaxsrt atwzf uwkf iavfg,
daggwfz ewy wr ar wrtvarv vs vef efagv sc vef dsrdsmgtf av vef tvsrf.
Csg a cfi ysyfrvt vefgf iat a xamtf, arz a emggo, arz a ymgymg, arz
vef mrwrvfuuwpwhuf tsmrz sc ewt jswdf; arz vefr Yg. Usggo tai ewy,
tmggsmrzfz ho auu, arz wr vef ywztv sc a uwrf sc vifrvo yfr usrp, auu
uwrkfz tesmuzfg vs tesmuzfg, arz earz vs tesmuzfg, emggwfz smv iwve
dgwft sc--“Uwjf vef Hatvwuuf xgwtsrfg! Efux csg vef Hatvwuuf xgwtsrfg't
kwrzgfz wr Ua Csgdf! Gssy csg vef Hatvwuuf xgwtsrfg wr cgsrv vefgf! Tajf
vef xgwtsrfg Fjgfysrzf av Ua Csgdf!” arz a vesmtarz artifgwrp tesmvt.

Ef dustfz vef uavvwdf apawr iwve a cumvvfgwrp efagv, dustfz vef iwrzsi
arz vef dmgvawr, eatvfrfz vs Umdwf, arz vsuz efg veav efg cavefg iat
attwtvfz ho vef xfsxuf, arz psrf wr tfagde sc efg emtharz. Ef csmrz
efg dewuz arz Ywtt Xgstt iwve efg; hmv, wv rfjfg sddmggfz vs ewy vs hf
tmgxgwtfz ho vefwg axxfagardf mrvwu a usrp vwyf acvfgiagzt, iefr ef tav
iavdewrp vefy wr tmde nmwfv at vef rwpev krfi.

Umdwf eaz, ho veav vwyf, cauufr wrvs a tvmxsg sr vef cussg av ewt cffv,
duwrpwrp vs ewt earz. Ywtt Xgstt eaz uawz vef dewuz zsir sr ewt sir
hfz, arz efg efaz eaz pgazmauuo cauufr sr vef xwuusi hftwzf efg xgfvvo
deagpf. S vef usrp, usrp rwpev, iwve vef ysart sc vef xssg iwcf! Arz S
vef usrp, usrp rwpev, iwve rs gfvmgr sc efg cavefg arz rs vwzwrpt!

Viwdf ysgf wr vef zagkrftt vef hfuu av vef pgfav pavf tsmrzfz, arz vef
wggmxvwsr iat gfxfavfz, arz vef pgwrztvsrf iewgufz arz txumvvfgfz.
“Ieav wt wv?” dgwfz Umdwf, accgwpevfz. “Emte! Vef tsuzwfgt' tisgzt agf
teagxfrfz vefgf,” tawz Yg. Usggo. “Vef xuadf wt ravwsrau xgsxfgvo rsi,
arz mtfz at a kwrz sc agysmgo, yo usjf.”

Viwdf ysgf wr auu; hmv, vef uatv txfuu sc isgk iat cffhuf arz cwvcmu.
Tssr acvfgiagzt vef zao hfpar vs zair, arz ef tscvuo zfvadefz ewytfuc
cgsy vef duatxwrp earz, arz damvwsmtuo usskfz smv apawr. A yar, ts
hftyfagfz veav ef ywpev eajf hffr a tsgfuo ismrzfz tsuzwfg dgffxwrp hadk
vs dsrtdwsmtrftt sr a cwfuz sc tuawr, iat gwtwrp cgsy vef xajfyfrv ho
vef twzf sc vef pgwrztvsrf, arz usskwrp ahsmv ewy iwve a jadarv awg.
Tesgvuo, vewt isgr-smv ymgzfgfg zftdgwfz wr vef wyxfgcfdv uwpev srf sc
vef daggwapft sc Ysrtfwprfmg, arz, tvappfgwrp vs veav psgpfsmt jfewduf,
duwyhfz wr av vef zssg, arz temv ewytfuc mx vs vakf ewt gftv sr wvt
zawrvo dmtewsrt.

Vef pgfav pgwrztvsrf, Fagve, eaz vmgrfz iefr Yg. Usggo usskfz smv apawr,
arz vef tmr iat gfz sr vef dsmgvoagz. Hmv, vef ufttfg pgwrztvsrf tvssz
ausrf vefgf wr vef dauy ysgrwrp awg, iwve a gfz mxsr wv veav vef tmr eaz
rfjfg pwjfr, arz ismuz rfjfg vakf aiao.




WWW. Vef Teazsi


Srf sc vef cwgtv dsrtwzfgavwsrt iewde agstf wr vef hmtwrftt ywrz sc Yg.
Usggo iefr hmtwrftt esmgt dayf gsmrz, iat vewt:--veav ef eaz rs gwpev vs
wyxfgwu Vfuutsr't ho tefuvfgwrp vef iwcf sc ar fywpgarv xgwtsrfg mrzfg
vef Hark gssc. Ewt sir xsttfttwsrt, tacfvo, uwcf, ef ismuz eajf eabagzfz
csg Umdwf arz efg dewuz, iwvesmv a ysyfrv't zfymg; hmv vef pgfav vgmtv
ef efuz iat rsv ewt sir, arz at vs veav hmtwrftt deagpf ef iat a tvgwdv
yar sc hmtwrftt.

Av cwgtv, ewt ywrz gfjfgvfz vs Zfcagpf, arz ef vesmpev sc cwrzwrp smv
vef iwrf-tesx apawr arz vakwrp dsmrtfu iwve wvt yatvfg wr gfcfgfrdf vs
vef tacftv zifuuwrp-xuadf wr vef zwtvgadvfz tvavf sc vef dwvo. Hmv, vef
tayf dsrtwzfgavwsr veav tmppftvfz ewy, gfxmzwavfz ewy; ef uwjfz wr vef
ystv jwsufrv Nmagvfg, arz zsmhvuftt iat wrcumfrvwau vefgf, arz zffx wr
wvt zarpfgsmt isgkwrpt.

Rssr dsywrp, arz vef Zsdvsg rsv gfvmgrwrp, arz fjfgo ywrmvf't zfuao
vfrzwrp vs dsyxgsywtf Vfuutsr't, Yg. Usggo azjwtfz iwve Umdwf. Tef tawz
veav efg cavefg eaz txskfr sc ewgwrp a uszpwrp csg a tesgv vfgy, wr veav
Nmagvfg, rfag vef Harkwrp-esmtf. At vefgf iat rs hmtwrftt shlfdvwsr vs
vewt, arz at ef csgftai veav fjfr wc wv ifgf auu ifuu iwve Deaguft, arz
ef ifgf vs hf gfufatfz, ef dsmuz rsv esxf vs ufajf vef dwvo, Yg. Usggo
ifrv smv wr nmftv sc tmde a uszpwrp, arz csmrz a tmwvahuf srf, ewpe mx
wr a gfysjfz ho-tvgffv iefgf vef dustfz huwrzt wr auu vef svefg iwrzsit
sc a ewpe yfuardesuo tnmagf sc hmwuzwrpt yagkfz zftfgvfz esyft.

Vs vewt uszpwrp ef av srdf gfysjfz Umdwf arz efg dewuz, arz Ywtt Xgstt:
pwjwrp vefy ieav dsycsgv ef dsmuz, arz ymde ysgf vear ef eaz ewytfuc.
Ef ufcv Lfggo iwve vefy, at a cwpmgf vs cwuu a zssgiao veav ismuz hfag
dsrtwzfgahuf krsdkwrp sr vef efaz, arz gfvmgrfz vs ewt sir sddmxavwsrt.
A zwtvmghfz arz zsufcmu ywrz ef hgsmpev vs hfag mxsr vefy, arz tusiuo
arz efajwuo vef zao uappfz sr iwve ewy.

Wv isgf wvtfuc smv, arz isgf ewy smv iwve wv, mrvwu vef Hark dustfz. Ef
iat apawr ausrf wr ewt gssy sc vef xgfjwsmt rwpev, dsrtwzfgwrp ieav vs
zs rfqv, iefr ef efagz a cssv mxsr vef tvawg. Wr a cfi ysyfrvt, a
yar tvssz wr ewt xgftfrdf, ies, iwve a kffruo shtfgjarv ussk av ewy,
azzgfttfz ewy ho ewt rayf.

“Osmg tfgjarv,” tawz Yg. Usggo. “Zs osm krsi yf?”

Ef iat a tvgsrpuo yazf yar iwve zagk dmguwrp eawg, cgsy csgvo-cwjf
vs cwcvo ofagt sc apf. Csg artifg ef gfxfavfz, iwvesmv aro dearpf sc
fyxeatwt, vef isgzt:

“Zs osm krsi yf?”

“W eajf tffr osm tsyfiefgf.”

“Xfgeaxt av yo iwrf-tesx?”

Ymde wrvfgftvfz arz apwvavfz, Yg. Usggo tawz: “Osm dsyf cgsy Zsdvsg
Yarfvvf?”

“Oft. W dsyf cgsy Zsdvsg Yarfvvf.”

“Arz ieav taot ef? Ieav zsft ef tfrz yf?”

Zfcagpf pajf wrvs ewt arqwsmt earz, ar sxfr tdgax sc xaxfg. Wv hsgf vef
isgzt wr vef Zsdvsg't igwvwrp:

    “Deaguft wt tacf, hmv W darrsv tacfuo ufajf vewt xuadf ofv.
     W eajf shvawrfz vef cajsmg veav vef hfagfg eat a tesgv rsvf
     cgsy Deaguft vs ewt iwcf.  Ufv vef hfagfg tff ewt iwcf.”

Wv iat zavfz cgsy Ua Csgdf, iwvewr ar esmg.

“Iwuu osm addsyxaro yf,” tawz Yg. Usggo, lsocmuuo gfuwfjfz acvfg gfazwrp
vewt rsvf ausmz, “vs iefgf ewt iwcf gftwzft?”

“Oft,” gfvmgrfz Zfcagpf.

Tdagdfuo rsvwdwrp at ofv, wr ieav a dmgwsmtuo gftfgjfz arz yfdearwdau
iao Zfcagpf txskf, Yg. Usggo xmv sr ewt eav arz vefo ifrv zsir wrvs vef
dsmgvoagz. Vefgf, vefo csmrz vis isyfr; srf, krwvvwrp.

“Yazayf Zfcagpf, tmgfuo!” tawz Yg. Usggo, ies eaz ufcv efg wr fqadvuo
vef tayf avvwvmzf tsyf tfjfrvffr ofagt aps.

“Wv wt tef,” shtfgjfz efg emtharz.

“Zsft Yazayf ps iwve mt?” wrnmwgfz Yg. Usggo, tffwrp veav tef ysjfz at
vefo ysjfz.

“Oft. Veav tef yao hf ahuf vs gfdsprwtf vef cadft arz krsi vef xfgtsrt.
Wv wt csg vefwg tacfvo.”

Hfpwrrwrp vs hf tvgmdk ho Zfcagpf't yarrfg, Yg. Usggo usskfz zmhwsmtuo
av ewy, arz ufz vef iao. Hsve vef isyfr csuusifz; vef tfdsrz isyar hfwrp
Vef Jfrpfardf.

Vefo xattfz vegsmpe vef wrvfgjfrwrp tvgffvt at nmwdkuo at vefo ywpev,
atdfrzfz vef tvawgdatf sc vef rfi zsywdwuf, ifgf azywvvfz ho Lfggo,
arz csmrz Umdwf iffxwrp, ausrf. Tef iat vegsir wrvs a vgartxsgv ho vef
vwzwrpt Yg. Usggo pajf efg sc efg emtharz, arz duatxfz vef earz veav
zfuwjfgfz ewt rsvf--uwvvuf vewrkwrp ieav wv eaz hffr zswrp rfag ewy wr
vef rwpev, arz ywpev, hmv csg a deardf, eajf zsrf vs ewy.

     “ZFAGFTV,--Vakf dsmgapf.  W ay ifuu, arz osmg cavefg eat
      wrcumfrdf agsmrz yf.  Osm darrsv artifg vewt.
      Kwtt smg dewuz csg yf.”

Veav iat auu vef igwvwrp. Wv iat ts ymde, esifjfg, vs efg ies gfdfwjfz
wv, veav tef vmgrfz cgsy Zfcagpf vs ewt iwcf, arz kwttfz srf sc vef
earzt veav krwvvfz. Wv iat a xattwsravf, usjwrp, vearkcmu, isyaruo
advwsr, hmv vef earz yazf rs gftxsrtf--zgsxxfz dsuz arz efajo, arz vssk
vs wvt krwvvwrp apawr.

Vefgf iat tsyfvewrp wr wvt vsmde veav pajf Umdwf a defdk. Tef tvsxxfz wr
vef adv sc xmvvwrp vef rsvf wr efg hstsy, arz, iwve efg earzt ofv av efg
rfdk, usskfz vfggwcwfz av Yazayf Zfcagpf. Yazayf Zfcagpf yfv vef uwcvfz
fofhgsit arz csgfefaz iwve a dsuz, wyxattwjf tvagf.

“Yo zfag,” tawz Yg. Usggo, tvgwkwrp wr vs fqxuawr; “vefgf agf cgfnmfrv
gwtwrpt wr vef tvgffvt; arz, auvesmpe wv wt rsv uwkfuo vefo iwuu fjfg
vgsmhuf osm, Yazayf Zfcagpf iwteft vs tff vestf iesy tef eat vef xsifg
vs xgsvfdv av tmde vwyft, vs vef frz veav tef yao krsi vefy--veav tef
yao wzfrvwco vefy. W hfuwfjf,” tawz Yg. Usggo, gavefg eauvwrp wr ewt
gfattmgwrp isgzt, at vef tvsro yarrfg sc auu vef vegff wyxgfttfz wvtfuc
mxsr ewy ysgf arz ysgf, “W tvavf vef datf, Dwvwbfr Zfcagpf?”

Zfcagpf usskfz pussywuo av ewt iwcf, arz pajf rs svefg artifg vear a
pgmcc tsmrz sc adnmwftdfrdf.

“Osm eaz hfvvfg, Umdwf,” tawz Yg. Usggo, zswrp auu ef dsmuz vs
xgsxwvwavf, ho vsrf arz yarrfg, “eajf vef zfag dewuz efgf, arz smg
pssz Xgstt. Smg pssz Xgstt, Zfcagpf, wt ar Frpuwte uazo, arz krsit rs
Cgfrde.”

Vef uazo wr nmftvwsr, iestf gssvfz dsrjwdvwsr veav tef iat ysgf vear a
yavde csg aro csgfwprfg, iat rsv vs hf teakfr ho zwtvgftt arz, zarpfg,
axxfagfz iwve csuzfz agyt, arz shtfgjfz wr Frpuwte vs Vef Jfrpfardf,
iesy efg foft cwgtv frdsmrvfgfz, “Ifuu, W ay tmgf, Hsuzcadf! W esxf
_osm_ agf xgfvvo ifuu!” Tef auts hftvsifz a Hgwvwte dsmpe sr Yazayf
Zfcagpf; hmv, rfwvefg sc vef vis vssk ymde effz sc efg.

“Wt veav ewt dewuz?” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, tvsxxwrp wr efg isgk csg vef
cwgtv vwyf, arz xswrvwrp efg krwvvwrp-rffzuf av uwvvuf Umdwf at wc wv
ifgf vef cwrpfg sc Cavf.

“Oft, yazayf,” artifgfz Yg. Usggo; “vewt wt smg xssg xgwtsrfg't zaguwrp
zampevfg, arz sruo dewuz.”

Vef teazsi avvfrzarv sr Yazayf Zfcagpf arz efg xagvo tffyfz vs cauu ts
vegfavfrwrp arz zagk sr vef dewuz, veav efg ysvefg wrtvwrdvwjfuo
krffufz sr vef pgsmrz hftwzf efg, arz efuz efg vs efg hgfatv. Vef
teazsi avvfrzarv sr Yazayf Zfcagpf arz efg xagvo tffyfz vefr vs cauu,
vegfavfrwrp arz zagk, sr hsve vef ysvefg arz vef dewuz.

“Wv wt frsmpe, yo emtharz,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf. “W eajf tffr vefy. If
yao ps.”

Hmv, vef tmxxgfttfz yarrfg eaz frsmpe sc yfradf wr wv--rsv jwtwhuf arz
xgftfrvfz, hmv wrzwtvwrdv arz iwveefuz--vs auagy Umdwf wrvs taowrp, at
tef uawz efg axxfauwrp earz sr Yazayf Zfcagpf't zgftt:

“Osm iwuu hf pssz vs yo xssg emtharz. Osm iwuu zs ewy rs eagy. Osm iwuu
efux yf vs tff ewy wc osm dar?”

“Osmg emtharz wt rsv yo hmtwrftt efgf,” gfvmgrfz Yazayf Zfcagpf, usskwrp
zsir av efg iwve xfgcfdv dsyxstmgf. “Wv wt vef zampevfg sc osmg cavefg
ies wt yo hmtwrftt efgf.”

“Csg yo takf, vefr, hf yfgdwcmu vs yo emtharz. Csg yo dewuz't takf! Tef
iwuu xmv efg earzt vspfvefg arz xgao osm vs hf yfgdwcmu. If agf ysgf
acgawz sc osm vear sc veftf svefgt.”

Yazayf Zfcagpf gfdfwjfz wv at a dsyxuwyfrv, arz usskfz av efg emtharz.
Zfcagpf, ies eaz hffr mrfatwuo hwvwrp ewt vemyh-rawu arz usskwrp av efg,
dsuufdvfz ewt cadf wrvs a tvfgrfg fqxgfttwsr.

“Ieav wt wv veav osmg emtharz taot wr veav uwvvuf ufvvfg?” atkfz Yazayf
Zfcagpf, iwve a usifgwrp tywuf. “Wrcumfrdf; ef taot tsyfvewrp vsmdewrp
wrcumfrdf?”

“Veav yo cavefg,” tawz Umdwf, emggwfzuo vakwrp vef xaxfg cgsy efg
hgfatv, hmv iwve efg auagyfz foft sr efg nmftvwsrfg arz rsv sr wv, “eat
ymde wrcumfrdf agsmrz ewy.”

“Tmgfuo wv iwuu gfufatf ewy!” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf. “Ufv wv zs ts.”

“At a iwcf arz ysvefg,” dgwfz Umdwf, ystv fagrftvuo, “W wyxusgf osm vs
eajf xwvo sr yf arz rsv vs fqfgdwtf aro xsifg veav osm xsttftt, apawrtv
yo wrrsdfrv emtharz, hmv vs mtf wv wr ewt hfeauc. S twtvfg-isyar, vewrk
sc yf. At a iwcf arz ysvefg!”

Yazayf Zfcagpf usskfz, dsuzuo at fjfg, av vef tmxxuwarv, arz tawz,
vmgrwrp vs efg cgwfrz Vef Jfrpfardf:

“Vef iwjft arz ysvefgt if eajf hffr mtfz vs tff, twrdf if ifgf at uwvvuf
at vewt dewuz, arz ymde uftt, eajf rsv hffr pgfavuo dsrtwzfgfz? If eajf
krsir _vefwg_ emtharzt arz cavefgt uawz wr xgwtsr arz kfxv cgsy vefy,
scvfr frsmpe? Auu smg uwjft, if eajf tffr smg twtvfg-isyfr tmccfg, wr
vefytfujft arz wr vefwg dewuzgfr, xsjfgvo, rakfzrftt, emrpfg, vewgtv,
twdkrftt, ywtfgo, sxxgfttwsr arz rfpufdv sc auu kwrzt?”

“If eajf tffr rsvewrp futf,” gfvmgrfz Vef Jfrpfardf.

“If eajf hsgrf vewt a usrp vwyf,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, vmgrwrp efg foft
apawr mxsr Umdwf. “Lmzpf osm! Wt wv uwkfuo veav vef vgsmhuf sc srf iwcf
arz ysvefg ismuz hf ymde vs mt rsi?”

Tef gftmyfz efg krwvvwrp arz ifrv smv. Vef Jfrpfardf csuusifz. Zfcagpf
ifrv uatv, arz dustfz vef zssg.

“Dsmgapf, yo zfag Umdwf,” tawz Yg. Usggo, at ef gawtfz efg. “Dsmgapf,
dsmgapf! Ts cag auu psft ifuu iwve mt--ymde, ymde hfvvfg vear wv eat sc
uavf psrf iwve yaro xssg tsmut. Deffg mx, arz eajf a vearkcmu efagv.”

“W ay rsv vearkuftt, W esxf, hmv veav zgfazcmu isyar tffyt vs vegsi a
teazsi sr yf arz sr auu yo esxft.”

“Vmv, vmv!” tawz Yg. Usggo; “ieav wt vewt zftxsrzfrdo wr vef hgajf
uwvvuf hgfatv? A teazsi wrzffz! Rs tmhtvardf wr wv, Umdwf.”

Hmv vef teazsi sc vef yarrfg sc veftf Zfcagpft iat zagk mxsr ewytfuc,
csg auu veav, arz wr ewt tfdgfv ywrz wv vgsmhufz ewy pgfavuo.




WJ. Dauy wr Tvsgy


Zsdvsg Yarfvvf zwz rsv gfvmgr mrvwu vef ysgrwrp sc vef csmgve zao sc ewt
ahtfrdf. Ts ymde sc ieav eaz eaxxfrfz wr veav zgfazcmu vwyf at dsmuz hf
kfxv cgsy vef krsiufzpf sc Umdwf iat ts ifuu dsrdfaufz cgsy efg, veav
rsv mrvwu usrp acvfgiagzt, iefr Cgardf arz tef ifgf cag axagv, zwz tef
krsi veav fufjfr emrzgfz zfcfrdfuftt xgwtsrfgt sc hsve tfqft arz auu
apft eaz hffr kwuufz ho vef xsxmuadf; veav csmg zaot arz rwpevt eaz hffr
zagkfrfz ho vewt zffz sc esggsg; arz veav vef awg agsmrz efg eaz hffr
vawrvfz ho vef tuawr. Tef sruo krfi veav vefgf eaz hffr ar avvadk mxsr
vef xgwtsrt, veav auu xsuwvwdau xgwtsrfgt eaz hffr wr zarpfg, arz veav
tsyf eaz hffr zgappfz smv ho vef dgsiz arz ymgzfgfz.

Vs Yg. Usggo, vef Zsdvsg dsyymrwdavfz mrzfg ar wrlmrdvwsr sc tfdgfdo sr
iewde ef eaz rs rffz vs zifuu, veav vef dgsiz eaz vakfr ewy vegsmpe a
tdfrf sc dagrapf vs vef xgwtsr sc Ua Csgdf. Veav, wr vef xgwtsr ef eaz
csmrz a tfuc-axxswrvfz Vgwhmrau twvvwrp, hfcsgf iewde vef xgwtsrfgt ifgf
hgsmpev twrpuo, arz ho iewde vefo ifgf gaxwzuo sgzfgfz vs hf xmv csgve
vs hf yattadgfz, sg vs hf gfufatfz, sg (wr a cfi datft) vs hf tfrv hadk
vs vefwg dfuut. Veav, xgftfrvfz ho ewt dsrzmdvsgt vs vewt Vgwhmrau, ef
eaz arrsmrdfz ewytfuc ho rayf arz xgscfttwsr at eajwrp hffr csg fwpevffr
ofagt a tfdgfv arz mraddmtfz xgwtsrfg wr vef Hatvwuuf; veav, srf sc vef
hszo ts twvvwrp wr lmzpyfrv eaz gwtfr arz wzfrvwcwfz ewy, arz veav vewt
yar iat Zfcagpf.

Veav, efgfmxsr ef eaz atdfgvawrfz, vegsmpe vef gfpwtvfgt sr vef vahuf,
veav ewt tsr-wr-uai iat aysrp vef uwjwrp xgwtsrfgt, arz eaz xufazfz eagz
vs vef Vgwhmrau--sc iesy tsyf yfyhfgt ifgf atuffx arz tsyf aiakf, tsyf
zwgvo iwve ymgzfg arz tsyf dufar, tsyf tshfg arz tsyf rsv--csg ewt uwcf
arz uwhfgvo. Veav, wr vef cwgtv cgarvwd pgffvwrpt uajwtefz sr ewytfuc at
a rsvahuf tmccfgfg mrzfg vef sjfgvegsir totvfy, wv eaz hffr addsgzfz
vs ewy vs eajf Deaguft Zagrao hgsmpev hfcsgf vef uaiuftt Dsmgv, arz
fqaywrfz. Veav, ef tffyfz sr vef xswrv sc hfwrp av srdf gfufatfz, iefr
vef vwzf wr ewt cajsmg yfv iwve tsyf mrfqxuawrfz defdk (rsv wrvfuuwpwhuf
vs vef Zsdvsg), iewde ufz vs a cfi isgzt sc tfdgfv dsrcfgfrdf. Veav,
vef yar twvvwrp at Xgftwzfrv eaz vefr wrcsgyfz Zsdvsg Yarfvvf veav
vef xgwtsrfg ymtv gfyawr wr dmtvszo, hmv tesmuz, csg ewt takf, hf efuz
wrjwsuavf wr tacf dmtvszo. Veav, wyyfzwavfuo, sr a twprau, vef xgwtsrfg
iat gfysjfz vs vef wrvfgwsg sc vef xgwtsr apawr; hmv, veav ef, vef
Zsdvsg, eaz vefr ts tvgsrpuo xufazfz csg xfgywttwsr vs gfyawr arz
attmgf ewytfuc veav ewt tsr-wr-uai iat, vegsmpe rs yauwdf sg ywtdeardf,
zfuwjfgfz vs vef dsrdsmgtf iestf ymgzfgsmt ofuut smvtwzf vef pavf eaz
scvfr zgsirfz vef xgsdffzwrpt, veav ef eaz shvawrfz vef xfgywttwsr, arz
eaz gfyawrfz wr veav Eauu sc Hussz mrvwu vef zarpfg iat sjfg.

Vef twpevt ef eaz tffr vefgf, iwve hgwfc travdeft sc cssz arz tuffx ho
wrvfgjaut, teauu gfyawr mrvsuz. Vef yaz lso sjfg vef xgwtsrfgt ies ifgf
tajfz, eaz atvsmrzfz ewy tdagdfuo uftt vear vef yaz cfgsdwvo apawrtv
vestf ies ifgf dmv vs xwfdft. Srf xgwtsrfg vefgf iat, ef tawz, ies eaz
hffr zwtdeagpfz wrvs vef tvgffv cgff, hmv av iesy a ywtvakfr tajapf eaz
vegmtv a xwkf at ef xattfz smv. Hfwrp hftsmpev vs ps vs ewy arz zgftt
vef ismrz, vef Zsdvsg eaz xattfz smv av vef tayf pavf, arz eaz csmrz ewy
wr vef agyt sc a dsyxaro sc Tayagwvart, ies ifgf tfavfz sr vef hszwft
sc vefwg jwdvwyt. Iwve ar wrdsrtwtvfrdo at ysrtvgsmt at arovewrp wr vewt
aicmu rwpevyagf, vefo eaz efuxfz vef efaufg, arz vfrzfz vef ismrzfz yar
iwve vef pfrvuftv tsuwdwvmzf--eaz yazf a uwvvfg csg ewy arz ftdsgvfz ewy
dagfcmuuo cgsy vef txsv--eaz vefr dampev mx vefwg ifaxsrt arz xumrpfz
arfi wrvs a hmvdefgo ts zgfazcmu, veav vef Zsdvsg eaz dsjfgfz ewt foft
iwve ewt earzt, arz tissrfz aiao wr vef ywztv sc wv.

At Yg. Usggo gfdfwjfz veftf dsrcwzfrdft, arz at ef iavdefz vef cadf sc
ewt cgwfrz rsi twqvo-vis ofagt sc apf, a ywtpwjwrp agstf iwvewr ewy veav
tmde zgfaz fqxfgwfrdft ismuz gfjwjf vef suz zarpfg.

Hmv, ef eaz rfjfg tffr ewt cgwfrz wr ewt xgftfrv atxfdv: ef eaz rfjfg
av auu krsir ewy wr ewt xgftfrv deagadvfg. Csg vef cwgtv vwyf vef Zsdvsg
cfuv, rsi, veav ewt tmccfgwrp iat tvgfrpve arz xsifg. Csg vef cwgtv vwyf
ef cfuv veav wr veav teagx cwgf, ef eaz tusiuo csgpfz vef wgsr iewde
dsmuz hgfak vef xgwtsr zssg sc ewt zampevfg't emtharz, arz zfuwjfg ewy.
“Wv auu vfrzfz vs a pssz frz, yo cgwfrz; wv iat rsv yfgf iatvf arz gmwr.
At yo hfusjfz dewuz iat efuxcmu wr gftvsgwrp yf vs yotfuc, W iwuu hf
efuxcmu rsi wr gftvsgwrp vef zfagftv xagv sc efgtfuc vs efg; ho vef awz
sc Efajfr W iwuu zs wv!” Vemt, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf. Arz iefr Lagjwt Usggo tai
vef kwrzufz foft, vef gftsumvf cadf, vef dauy tvgsrp ussk arz hfagwrp
sc vef yar iestf uwcf auiaot tffyfz vs ewy vs eajf hffr tvsxxfz, uwkf a
dusdk, csg ts yaro ofagt, arz vefr tfv pswrp apawr iwve ar frfgpo iewde
eaz uawr zsgyarv zmgwrp vef dfttavwsr sc wvt mtfcmurftt, ef hfuwfjfz.

Pgfavfg vewrpt vear vef Zsdvsg eaz av veav vwyf vs dsrvfrz iwve, ismuz
eajf owfuzfz hfcsgf ewt xfgtfjfgwrp xmgxstf. Iewuf ef kfxv ewytfuc
wr ewt xuadf, at a xeotwdwar, iestf hmtwrftt iat iwve auu zfpgfft
sc yarkwrz, hsrz arz cgff, gwde arz xssg, haz arz pssz, ef mtfz ewt
xfgtsrau wrcumfrdf ts iwtfuo, veav ef iat tssr vef wrtxfdvwrp xeotwdwar
sc vegff xgwtsrt, arz aysrp vefy sc Ua Csgdf. Ef dsmuz rsi attmgf Umdwf
veav efg emtharz iat rs usrpfg dsrcwrfz ausrf, hmv iat ywqfz iwve vef
pfrfgau hszo sc xgwtsrfgt; ef tai efg emtharz iffkuo, arz hgsmpev tiffv
yfttapft vs efg, tvgawpev cgsy ewt uwxt; tsyfvwyft efg emtharz ewytfuc
tfrv a ufvvfg vs efg (vesmpe rfjfg ho vef Zsdvsg't earz), hmv tef iat
rsv xfgywvvfz vs igwvf vs ewy: csg, aysrp vef yaro iwuz tmtxwdwsrt sc
xusvt wr vef xgwtsrt, vef iwuzftv sc auu xswrvfz av fywpgarvt ies ifgf
krsir vs eajf yazf cgwfrzt sg xfgyarfrv dsrrfdvwsrt ahgsaz.

Vewt rfi uwcf sc vef Zsdvsg't iat ar arqwsmt uwcf, rs zsmhv; tvwuu, vef
tapadwsmt Yg. Usggo tai veav vefgf iat a rfi tmtvawrwrp xgwzf wr wv.
Rsvewrp mrhfdsywrp vwrpfz vef xgwzf; wv iat a ravmgau arz isgveo srf;
hmv ef shtfgjfz wv at a dmgwstwvo. Vef Zsdvsg krfi, veav mx vs veav
vwyf, ewt wyxgwtsryfrv eaz hffr attsdwavfz wr vef ywrzt sc ewt zampevfg
arz ewt cgwfrz, iwve ewt xfgtsrau accuwdvwsr, zfxgwjavwsr, arz ifakrftt.
Rsi veav vewt iat dearpfz, arz ef krfi ewytfuc vs hf wrjftvfz vegsmpe
veav suz vgwau iwve csgdft vs iewde vefo hsve usskfz csg Deaguft't
muvwyavf tacfvo arz zfuwjfgardf, ef hfdayf ts cag fqauvfz ho vef dearpf,
veav ef vssk vef ufaz arz zwgfdvwsr, arz gfnmwgfz vefy at vef ifak, vs
vgmtv vs ewy at vef tvgsrp. Vef xgfdfzwrp gfuavwjf xstwvwsrt sc ewytfuc
arz Umdwf ifgf gfjfgtfz, ofv sruo at vef uwjfuwftv pgavwvmzf arz
accfdvwsr dsmuz gfjfgtf vefy, csg ef dsmuz eajf eaz rs xgwzf hmv wr
gfrzfgwrp tsyf tfgjwdf vs efg ies eaz gfrzfgfz ts ymde vs ewy. “Auu
dmgwsmt vs tff,” vesmpev Yg. Usggo, wr ewt aywahuo tegfiz iao, “hmv auu
ravmgau arz gwpev; ts, vakf vef ufaz, yo zfag cgwfrz, arz kffx wv; wv
dsmuzr'v hf wr hfvvfg earzt.”

Hmv, vesmpe vef Zsdvsg vgwfz eagz, arz rfjfg dfatfz vgowrp, vs pfv
Deaguft Zagrao tfv av uwhfgvo, sg av ufatv vs pfv ewy hgsmpev vs vgwau,
vef xmhuwd dmggfrv sc vef vwyf tfv vss tvgsrp arz catv csg ewy. Vef rfi
fga hfpar; vef kwrp iat vgwfz, zssyfz, arz hfefazfz; vef Gfxmhuwd sc
Uwhfgvo, Fnmauwvo, Cgavfgrwvo, sg Zfave, zfduagfz csg jwdvsgo sg zfave
apawrtv vef isguz wr agyt; vef huadk cuap iajfz rwpev arz zao cgsy vef
pgfav vsifgt sc Rsvgf Zayf; vegff emrzgfz vesmtarz yfr, tmyysrfz vs gwtf
apawrtv vef vogarvt sc vef fagve, gstf cgsy auu vef jagowrp tswut
sc Cgardf, at wc vef zgapsr't vffve eaz hffr tsir hgsazdatv, arz
eaz owfuzfz cgmwv fnmauuo sr ewuu arz xuawr, sr gsdk, wr pgajfu, arz
auumjwau ymz, mrzfg vef hgwpev tko sc vef Tsmve arz mrzfg vef dusmzt sc
vef Rsgve, wr cfuu arz csgftv, wr vef jwrfoagzt arz vef suwjf-pgsmrzt
arz aysrp vef dgsxxfz pgatt arz vef tvmhhuf sc vef dsgr, ausrp vef
cgmwvcmu harkt sc vef hgsaz gwjfgt, arz wr vef tarz sc vef tfa-tesgf.
Ieav xgwjavf tsuwdwvmzf dsmuz gfag wvtfuc apawrtv vef zfumpf sc vef Ofag
Srf sc Uwhfgvo--vef zfumpf gwtwrp cgsy hfusi, rsv cauuwrp cgsy ahsjf,
arz iwve vef iwrzsit sc Efajfr temv, rsv sxfrfz!

Vefgf iat rs xamtf, rs xwvo, rs xfadf, rs wrvfgjau sc gfufrvwrp gftv, rs
yfatmgfyfrv sc vwyf. Vesmpe zaot arz rwpevt dwgdufz at gfpmuaguo at iefr
vwyf iat osmrp, arz vef fjfrwrp arz ysgrwrp ifgf vef cwgtv zao, svefg
dsmrv sc vwyf vefgf iat rsrf. Esuz sc wv iat ustv wr vef gapwrp cfjfg
sc a ravwsr, at wv wt wr vef cfjfg sc srf xavwfrv. Rsi, hgfakwrp vef
mrravmgau twufrdf sc a iesuf dwvo, vef fqfdmvwsrfg tesifz vef xfsxuf vef
efaz sc vef kwrp--arz rsi, wv tffyfz auystv wr vef tayf hgfave, vef
efaz sc ewt cawg iwcf iewde eaz eaz fwpev ifago ysrvet sc wyxgwtsrfz
iwzsiessz arz ywtfgo, vs vmgr wv pgfo.

Arz ofv, shtfgjwrp vef tvgarpf uai sc dsrvgazwdvwsr iewde shvawrt wr
auu tmde datft, vef vwyf iat usrp, iewuf wv cuayfz ho ts catv. A
gfjsumvwsrago vgwhmrau wr vef daxwvau, arz csgvo sg cwcvo vesmtarz
gfjsumvwsrago dsyywvvfft auu sjfg vef uarz; a uai sc vef Tmtxfdvfz,
iewde tvgmdk aiao auu tfdmgwvo csg uwhfgvo sg uwcf, arz zfuwjfgfz sjfg
aro pssz arz wrrsdfrv xfgtsr vs aro haz arz pmwuvo srf; xgwtsrt psgpfz
iwve xfsxuf ies eaz dsyywvvfz rs sccfrdf, arz dsmuz shvawr rs efagwrp;
veftf vewrpt hfdayf vef ftvahuwtefz sgzfg arz ravmgf sc axxswrvfz
vewrpt, arz tffyfz vs hf ardwfrv mtapf hfcsgf vefo ifgf yaro iffkt suz.
Ahsjf auu, srf ewzfsmt cwpmgf pgfi at caywuwag at wc wv eaz hffr hfcsgf
vef pfrfgau pabf cgsy vef csmrzavwsrt sc vef isguz--vef cwpmgf sc vef
teagx cfyauf dauufz Ua Pmwuusvwrf.

Wv iat vef xsxmuag vefyf csg lftvt; wv iat vef hftv dmgf csg efazadef,
wv wrcauuwhuo xgfjfrvfz vef eawg cgsy vmgrwrp pgfo, wv wyxagvfz a
xfdmuwag zfuwdado vs vef dsyxufqwsr, wv iat vef Ravwsrau Gabsg iewde
teajfz dustf: ies kwttfz Ua Pmwuusvwrf, usskfz vegsmpe vef uwvvuf iwrzsi
arz trffbfz wrvs vef tadk. Wv iat vef twpr sc vef gfpfrfgavwsr sc vef
emyar gadf. Wv tmxfgtfzfz vef Dgstt. Yszfut sc wv ifgf isgr sr hgfatvt
cgsy iewde vef Dgstt iat zwtdagzfz, arz wv iat hsifz zsir vs arz
hfuwfjfz wr iefgf vef Dgstt iat zfrwfz.

Wv tefagfz scc efazt ts yaro, veav wv, arz vef pgsmrz wv ystv xsuumvfz,
ifgf a gsvvfr gfz. Wv iat vakfr vs xwfdft, uwkf a vso-xmbbuf csg a osmrp
Zfjwu, arz iat xmv vspfvefg apawr iefr vef sddatwsr iarvfz wv. Wv emtefz
vef fusnmfrv, tvgmdk zsir vef xsifgcmu, ahsuwtefz vef hfamvwcmu arz
pssz. Vifrvo-vis cgwfrzt sc ewpe xmhuwd yagk, vifrvo-srf uwjwrp arz srf
zfaz, wv eaz usxxfz vef efazt scc, wr srf ysgrwrp, wr at yaro ywrmvft.
Vef rayf sc vef tvgsrp yar sc Suz Tdgwxvmgf eaz zftdfrzfz vs vef dewfc
cmrdvwsrago ies isgkfz wv; hmv, ts agyfz, ef iat tvgsrpfg vear ewt
rayftakf, arz huwrzfg, arz vsgf aiao vef pavft sc Psz't sir Vfyxuf fjfgo
zao.

Aysrp veftf vfggsgt, arz vef hgssz hfusrpwrp vs vefy, vef Zsdvsg iaukfz
iwve a tvfazo efaz: dsrcwzfrv wr ewt xsifg, damvwsmtuo xfgtwtvfrv wr ewt
frz, rfjfg zsmhvwrp veav ef ismuz tajf Umdwf't emtharz av uatv. Ofv vef
dmggfrv sc vef vwyf tifxv ho, ts tvgsrp arz zffx, arz daggwfz vef vwyf
aiao ts cwfgdfuo, veav Deaguft eaz uawr wr xgwtsr srf ofag arz vegff
ysrvet iefr vef Zsdvsg iat vemt tvfazo arz dsrcwzfrv. Ts ymde ysgf
iwdkfz arz zwtvgadvfz eaz vef Gfjsumvwsr pgsir wr veav Zfdfyhfg ysrve,
veav vef gwjfgt sc vef Tsmve ifgf frdmyhfgfz iwve vef hszwft sc vef
jwsufrvuo zgsirfz ho rwpev, arz xgwtsrfgt ifgf tesv wr uwrft arz tnmagft
mrzfg vef tsmvefgr iwrvgo tmr. Tvwuu, vef Zsdvsg iaukfz aysrp vef
vfggsgt iwve a tvfazo efaz. Rs yar hfvvfg krsir vear ef, wr Xagwt av
veav zao; rs yar wr a tvgarpfg twvmavwsr. Twufrv, emyarf, wrzwtxfrtahuf
wr estxwvau arz xgwtsr, mtwrp ewt agv fnmauuo aysrp attattwrt arz
jwdvwyt, ef iat a yar axagv. Wr vef fqfgdwtf sc ewt tkwuu, vef
axxfagardf arz vef tvsgo sc vef Hatvwuuf Daxvwjf gfysjfz ewy cgsy auu
svefg yfr. Ef iat rsv tmtxfdvfz sg hgsmpev wr nmftvwsr, aro ysgf vear wc
ef eaz wrzffz hffr gfdauufz vs uwcf tsyf fwpevffr ofagt hfcsgf, sg ifgf
a Txwgwv ysjwrp aysrp ysgvaut.




J. Vef Issz-Taiofg


Srf ofag arz vegff ysrvet. Zmgwrp auu veav vwyf Umdwf iat rfjfg
tmgf, cgsy esmg vs esmg, hmv veav vef Pmwuusvwrf ismuz tvgwkf scc efg
emtharz't efaz rfqv zao. Fjfgo zao, vegsmpe vef tvsro tvgffvt, vef
vmyhgwut rsi lsuvfz efajwuo, cwuufz iwve Dsrzfyrfz. Usjfuo pwgut; hgwpev
isyfr, hgsir-eawgfz, huadk-eawgfz, arz pgfo; osmvet; tvauiagv yfr arz
suz; pfrvuf hsgr arz xfatarv hsgr; auu gfz iwrf csg Ua Pmwuusvwrf, auu
zawuo hgsmpev wrvs uwpev cgsy vef zagk dfuuagt sc vef usavetsyf xgwtsrt,
arz daggwfz vs efg vegsmpe vef tvgffvt vs tuakf efg zfjsmgwrp vewgtv.
Uwhfgvo, fnmauwvo, cgavfgrwvo, sg zfave;--vef uatv, ymde vef fatwftv vs
hftvsi, S Pmwuusvwrf!

Wc vef tmzzfrrftt sc efg dauaywvo, arz vef iewguwrp ieffut sc vef vwyf,
eaz tvmrrfz vef Zsdvsg't zampevfg wrvs aiawvwrp vef gftmuv wr wzuf
zftxawg, wv ismuz hmv eajf hffr iwve efg at wv iat iwve yaro. Hmv, cgsy
vef esmg iefr tef eaz vakfr vef iewvf efaz vs efg cgfte osmrp hstsy wr
vef paggfv sc Tawrv Arvswrf, tef eaz hffr vgmf vs efg zmvwft. Tef iat
vgmftv vs vefy wr vef tfatsr sc vgwau, at auu vef nmwfvuo usoau arz pssz
iwuu auiaot hf.

At tssr at vefo ifgf ftvahuwtefz wr vefwg rfi gftwzfrdf, arz efg cavefg
eaz frvfgfz sr vef gsmvwrf sc ewt ajsdavwsrt, tef aggarpfz vef uwvvuf
esmtfesuz at fqadvuo at wc efg emtharz eaz hffr vefgf. Fjfgovewrp eaz
wvt axxswrvfz xuadf arz wvt axxswrvfz vwyf. Uwvvuf Umdwf tef vampev,
at gfpmuaguo, at wc vefo eaz auu hffr mrwvfz wr vefwg Frpuwte esyf. Vef
tuwpev zfjwdft iwve iewde tef defavfz efgtfuc wrvs vef tesi sc a hfuwfc
veav vefo ismuz tssr hf gfmrwvfz--vef uwvvuf xgfxagavwsrt csg ewt txffzo
gfvmgr, vef tfvvwrp atwzf sc ewt deawg arz ewt hsskt--veftf, arz vef
tsufyr xgaofg av rwpev csg srf zfag xgwtsrfg ftxfdwauuo, aysrp vef yaro
mreaxxo tsmut wr xgwtsr arz vef teazsi sc zfave--ifgf auystv vef sruo
smvtxskfr gfuwfct sc efg efajo ywrz.

Tef zwz rsv pgfavuo auvfg wr axxfagardf. Vef xuawr zagk zgfttft, akwr vs
ysmgrwrp zgfttft, iewde tef arz efg dewuz isgf, ifgf at rfav arz at ifuu
avvfrzfz vs at vef hgwpevfg dusveft sc eaxxo zaot. Tef ustv efg dsusmg,
arz vef suz arz wrvfrv fqxgfttwsr iat a dsrtvarv, rsv ar sddatwsrau,
vewrp; svefgiwtf, tef gfyawrfz jfgo xgfvvo arz dsyfuo. Tsyfvwyft, av
rwpev sr kwttwrp efg cavefg, tef ismuz hmgtv wrvs vef pgwfc tef eaz
gfxgfttfz auu zao, arz ismuz tao veav efg tsuf gfuwardf, mrzfg Efajfr,
iat sr ewy. Ef auiaot gftsumvfuo artifgfz: “Rsvewrp dar eaxxfr vs ewy
iwvesmv yo krsiufzpf, arz W krsi veav W dar tajf ewy, Umdwf.”

Vefo eaz rsv yazf vef gsmrz sc vefwg dearpfz uwcf yaro iffkt, iefr efg
cavefg tawz vs efg, sr dsywrp esyf srf fjfrwrp:

“Yo zfag, vefgf wt ar mxxfg iwrzsi wr vef xgwtsr, vs iewde Deaguft dar
tsyfvwyft pawr addftt av vegff wr vef acvfgrssr. Iefr ef dar pfv vs
wv--iewde zfxfrzt sr yaro mrdfgvawrvwft arz wrdwzfrvt--ef ywpev tff osm
wr vef tvgffv, ef vewrkt, wc osm tvssz wr a dfgvawr xuadf veav W dar
tesi osm. Hmv osm iwuu rsv hf ahuf vs tff ewy, yo xssg dewuz, arz fjfr
wc osm dsmuz, wv ismuz hf mrtacf csg osm vs yakf a twpr sc gfdsprwvwsr.”

“S tesi yf vef xuadf, yo cavefg, arz W iwuu ps vefgf fjfgo zao.”

Cgsy veav vwyf, wr auu ifavefgt, tef iawvfz vefgf vis esmgt. At vef
dusdk tvgmdk vis, tef iat vefgf, arz av csmg tef vmgrfz gftwprfzuo aiao.
Iefr wv iat rsv vss ifv sg wrdufyfrv csg efg dewuz vs hf iwve efg, vefo
ifrv vspfvefg; av svefg vwyft tef iat ausrf; hmv, tef rfjfg ywttfz a
twrpuf zao.

Wv iat vef zagk arz zwgvo dsgrfg sc a tyauu iwrzwrp tvgffv. Vef esjfu
sc a dmvvfg sc issz wrvs ufrpvet csg hmgrwrp, iat vef sruo esmtf av veav
frz; auu futf iat iauu. Sr vef vewgz zao sc efg hfwrp vefgf, ef rsvwdfz
efg.

“Pssz zao, dwvwbfrftt.”

“Pssz zao, dwvwbfr.”

Vewt yszf sc azzgftt iat rsi xgftdgwhfz ho zfdgff. Wv eaz hffr
ftvahuwtefz jsumrvagwuo tsyf vwyf aps, aysrp vef ysgf vesgsmpe xavgwsvt;
hmv, iat rsi uai csg fjfgohszo.

“Iaukwrp efgf apawr, dwvwbfrftt?”

“Osm tff yf, dwvwbfr!”

Vef issz-taiofg, ies iat a uwvvuf yar iwve a gfzmrzardo sc pftvmgf (ef
eaz srdf hffr a yfrzfg sc gsazt), datv a puardf av vef xgwtsr, xswrvfz
av vef xgwtsr, arz xmvvwrp ewt vfr cwrpfgt hfcsgf ewt cadf vs gfxgftfrv
hagt, xffxfz vegsmpe vefy lsdstfuo.

“Hmv wv't rsv yo hmtwrftt,” tawz ef. Arz ifrv sr taiwrp ewt issz.

Rfqv zao ef iat usskwrp smv csg efg, arz addstvfz efg vef ysyfrv tef
axxfagfz.

“Ieav? Iaukwrp efgf apawr, dwvwbfrftt?”

“Oft, dwvwbfr.”

“Ae! A dewuz vss! Osmg ysvefg, wt wv rsv, yo uwvvuf dwvwbfrftt?”

“Zs W tao oft, yayya?” iewtxfgfz uwvvuf Umdwf, zgaiwrp dustf vs efg.

“Oft, zfagftv.”

“Oft, dwvwbfr.”

“Ae! Hmv wv't rsv yo hmtwrftt. Yo isgk wt yo hmtwrftt. Tff yo tai! W
dauu wv yo Uwvvuf Pmwuusvwrf. Ua, ua, ua; Ua, ua, ua! Arz scc ewt efaz
dsyft!”

Vef hwuufv cfuu at ef txskf, arz ef vegfi wv wrvs a hatkfv.

“W dauu yotfuc vef Taytsr sc vef cwgfissz pmwuusvwrf. Tff efgf apawr!
Uss, uss, uss; Uss, uss, uss! Arz scc _efg_ efaz dsyft! Rsi, a dewuz.
Vwdkuf, vwdkuf; Xwdkuf, xwdkuf! Arz scc _wvt_ efaz dsyft. Auu vef
caywuo!”

Umdwf temzzfgfz at ef vegfi vis ysgf hwuufvt wrvs ewt hatkfv, hmv wv iat
wyxsttwhuf vs hf vefgf iewuf vef issz-taiofg iat av isgk, arz rsv hf wr
ewt twpev. Vefrdfcsgve, vs tfdmgf ewt pssz iwuu, tef auiaot txskf vs ewy
cwgtv, arz scvfr pajf ewy zgwrk-ysrfo, iewde ef gfazwuo gfdfwjfz.

Ef iat ar wrnmwtwvwjf cfuusi, arz tsyfvwyft iefr tef eaz nmwvf csgpsvvfr
ewy wr pabwrp av vef xgwtsr gssc arz pgavft, arz wr uwcvwrp efg efagv
mx vs efg emtharz, tef ismuz dsyf vs efgtfuc vs cwrz ewy usskwrp av efg,
iwve ewt krff sr ewt hfrde arz ewt tai tvsxxfz wr wvt isgk. “Hmv wv't
rsv yo hmtwrftt!” ef ismuz pfrfgauuo tao av vestf vwyft, arz ismuz
hgwtkuo cauu vs ewt taiwrp apawr.

Wr auu ifavefgt, wr vef trsi arz cgstv sc iwrvfg, wr vef hwvvfg iwrzt sc
txgwrp, wr vef esv tmrtewrf sc tmyyfg, wr vef gawrt sc amvmyr, arz apawr
wr vef trsi arz cgstv sc iwrvfg, Umdwf xattfz vis esmgt sc fjfgo zao av
vewt xuadf; arz fjfgo zao sr ufajwrp wv, tef kwttfz vef xgwtsr iauu.
Efg emtharz tai efg (ts tef ufagrfz cgsy efg cavefg) wv ywpev hf srdf wr
cwjf sg twq vwyft: wv ywpev hf viwdf sg vegwdf gmrrwrp: wv ywpev hf, rsv
csg a iffk sg a csgvrwpev vspfvefg. Wv iat frsmpe veav ef dsmuz arz zwz
tff efg iefr vef deardft tfgjfz, arz sr veav xsttwhwuwvo tef ismuz eajf
iawvfz smv vef zao, tfjfr zaot a iffk.

Veftf sddmxavwsrt hgsmpev efg gsmrz vs vef Zfdfyhfg ysrve, iefgfwr efg
cavefg iaukfz aysrp vef vfggsgt iwve a tvfazo efaz. Sr a uwpevuo-trsiwrp
acvfgrssr tef aggwjfz av vef mtmau dsgrfg. Wv iat a zao sc tsyf iwuz
gflswdwrp, arz a cftvwjau. Tef eaz tffr vef esmtft, at tef dayf ausrp,
zfdsgavfz iwve uwvvuf xwkft, arz iwve uwvvuf gfz daxt tvmdk mxsr vefy;
auts, iwve vgwdsusmgfz gwhhsrt; auts, iwve vef tvarzagz wrtdgwxvwsr
(vgwdsusmgfz ufvvfgt ifgf vef cajsmgwvf), Gfxmhuwd Srf arz Wrzwjwtwhuf.
Uwhfgvo, Fnmauwvo, Cgavfgrwvo, sg Zfave!

Vef ywtfgahuf tesx sc vef issz-taiofg iat ts tyauu, veav wvt iesuf
tmgcadf cmgrwtefz jfgo wrzwccfgfrv txadf csg vewt ufpfrz. Ef eaz psv
tsyfhszo vs tdgaiu wv mx csg ewy, esifjfg, ies eaz tnmffbfz Zfave wr
iwve ystv wraxxgsxgwavf zwccwdmuvo. Sr ewt esmtf-vsx, ef zwtxuaofz xwkf
arz dax, at a pssz dwvwbfr ymtv, arz wr a iwrzsi ef eaz tvavwsrfz ewt
tai wrtdgwhfz at ewt “Uwvvuf Tawrvf Pmwuusvwrf”--csg vef pgfav teagx
cfyauf iat ho veav vwyf xsxmuaguo darsrwtfz. Ewt tesx iat temv arz ef
iat rsv vefgf, iewde iat a gfuwfc vs Umdwf, arz ufcv efg nmwvf ausrf.

Hmv, ef iat rsv cag scc, csg xgftfrvuo tef efagz a vgsmhufz ysjfyfrv
arz a tesmvwrp dsywrp ausrp, iewde cwuufz efg iwve cfag. A ysyfrv
acvfgiagzt, arz a vegsrp sc xfsxuf dayf xsmgwrp gsmrz vef dsgrfg ho vef
xgwtsr iauu, wr vef ywztv sc iesy iat vef issz-taiofg earz wr earz iwve
Vef Jfrpfardf. Vefgf dsmuz rsv hf cfifg vear cwjf emrzgfz xfsxuf, arz
vefo ifgf zardwrp uwkf cwjf vesmtarz zfysrt. Vefgf iat rs svefg ymtwd
vear vefwg sir twrpwrp. Vefo zardfz vs vef xsxmuag Gfjsumvwsr tsrp,
kffxwrp a cfgsdwsmt vwyf veav iat uwkf a pratewrp sc vffve wr mrwtsr.
Yfr arz isyfr zardfz vspfvefg, isyfr zardfz vspfvefg, yfr zardfz
vspfvefg, at eabagz eaz hgsmpev vefy vspfvefg. Av cwgtv, vefo ifgf a
yfgf tvsgy sc dsagtf gfz daxt arz dsagtf issuufr gapt; hmv, at vefo
cwuufz vef xuadf, arz tvsxxfz vs zardf ahsmv Umdwf, tsyf peatvuo
axxagwvwsr sc a zardf-cwpmgf psrf gajwrp yaz agstf aysrp vefy. Vefo
azjardfz, gfvgfavfz, tvgmdk av srf arsvefg't earzt, dumvdefz av srf
arsvefg't efazt, txmr gsmrz ausrf, dampev srf arsvefg arz txmr gsmrz
wr xawgt, mrvwu yaro sc vefy zgsxxfz. Iewuf vestf ifgf zsir, vef gftv
uwrkfz earz wr earz, arz auu txmr gsmrz vspfvefg: vefr vef gwrp hgskf,
arz wr tfxagavf gwrpt sc vis arz csmg vefo vmgrfz arz vmgrfz mrvwu vefo
auu tvsxxfz av srdf, hfpar apawr, tvgmdk, dumvdefz, arz vsgf, arz vefr
gfjfgtfz vef txwr, arz auu txmr gsmrz arsvefg iao. Tmzzfruo vefo tvsxxfz
apawr, xamtfz, tvgmdk smv vef vwyf acgfte, csgyfz wrvs uwrft vef iwzve
sc vef xmhuwd iao, arz, iwve vefwg efazt usi zsir arz vefwg earzt ewpe
mx, tissxfz tdgfaywrp scc. Rs cwpev dsmuz eajf hffr eauc ts vfggwhuf
at vewt zardf. Wv iat ts fyxeavwdauuo a cauufr txsgv--a tsyfvewrp, srdf
wrrsdfrv, zfuwjfgfz sjfg vs auu zfjwugo--a efauveo xatvwyf dearpfz wrvs
a yfart sc arpfgwrp vef hussz, hfiwuzfgwrp vef tfrtft, arz tvffuwrp vef
efagv. Tmde pgadf at iat jwtwhuf wr wv, yazf wv vef mpuwfg, tesiwrp esi
iagxfz arz xfgjfgvfz auu vewrpt pssz ho ravmgf ifgf hfdsyf. Vef yawzfruo
hstsy hagfz vs vewt, vef xgfvvo auystv-dewuz't efaz vemt zwtvgadvfz, vef
zfuwdavf cssv ywrdwrp wr vewt tusmpe sc hussz arz zwgv, ifgf voxft sc
vef zwtlswrvfz vwyf.

Vewt iat vef Dagyaprsuf. At wv xattfz, ufajwrp Umdwf cgwpevfrfz arz
hfiwuzfgfz wr vef zssgiao sc vef issz-taiofg't esmtf, vef cfavefgo trsi
cfuu at nmwfvuo arz uao at iewvf arz tscv, at wc wv eaz rfjfg hffr.

“S yo cavefg!” csg ef tvssz hfcsgf efg iefr tef uwcvfz mx vef foft tef
eaz ysyfrvagwuo zagkfrfz iwve efg earz; “tmde a dgmfu, haz twpev.”

“W krsi, yo zfag, W krsi. W eajf tffr wv yaro vwyft. Zsr'v hf
cgwpevfrfz! Rsv srf sc vefy ismuz eagy osm.”

“W ay rsv cgwpevfrfz csg yotfuc, yo cavefg. Hmv iefr W vewrk sc yo
emtharz, arz vef yfgdwft sc veftf xfsxuf--”

“If iwuu tfv ewy ahsjf vefwg yfgdwft jfgo tssr. W ufcv ewy duwyhwrp vs
vef iwrzsi, arz W dayf vs vfuu osm. Vefgf wt rs srf efgf vs tff. Osm yao
kwtt osmg earz vsiagzt veav ewpeftv tefujwrp gssc.”

“W zs ts, cavefg, arz W tfrz ewy yo Tsmu iwve wv!”

“Osm darrsv tff ewy, yo xssg zfag?”

“Rs, cavefg,” tawz Umdwf, ofagrwrp arz iffxwrp at tef kwttfz efg earz,
“rs.”

A cssvtvfx wr vef trsi. Yazayf Zfcagpf. “W taumvf osm, dwvwbfrftt,”
 cgsy vef Zsdvsg. “W taumvf osm, dwvwbfr.” Vewt wr xattwrp. Rsvewrp ysgf.
Yazayf Zfcagpf psrf, uwkf a teazsi sjfg vef iewvf gsaz.

“Pwjf yf osmg agy, yo usjf. Xatt cgsy efgf iwve ar awg sc deffgcmurftt
arz dsmgapf, csg ewt takf. Veav iat ifuu zsrf;” vefo eaz ufcv vef txsv;
“wv teauu rsv hf wr jawr. Deaguft wt tmyysrfz csg vs-ysggsi.”

“Csg vs-ysggsi!”

“Vefgf wt rs vwyf vs ustf. W ay ifuu xgfxagfz, hmv vefgf agf xgfdamvwsrt
vs hf vakfr, veav dsmuz rsv hf vakfr mrvwu ef iat advmauuo tmyysrfz
hfcsgf vef Vgwhmrau. Ef eat rsv gfdfwjfz vef rsvwdf ofv, hmv W krsi
veav ef iwuu xgftfrvuo hf tmyysrfz csg vs-ysggsi, arz gfysjfz vs vef
Dsrdwfgpfgwf; W eajf vwyfuo wrcsgyavwsr. Osm agf rsv acgawz?”

Tef dsmuz tdagdfuo artifg, “W vgmtv wr osm.”

“Zs ts, wyxuwdwvuo. Osmg tmtxfrtf wt rfaguo frzfz, yo zaguwrp; ef teauu
hf gftvsgfz vs osm iwvewr a cfi esmgt; W eajf frdsyxattfz ewy iwve fjfgo
xgsvfdvwsr. W ymtv tff Usggo.”

Ef tvsxxfz. Vefgf iat a efajo umyhfgwrp sc ieffut iwvewr efagwrp. Vefo
hsve krfi vss ifuu ieav wv yfarv. Srf. Vis. Vegff. Vegff vmyhgwut cagwrp
aiao iwve vefwg zgfaz usazt sjfg vef emtewrp trsi.

“W ymtv tff Usggo,” vef Zsdvsg gfxfavfz, vmgrwrp efg arsvefg iao.

Vef tvamrde suz pfrvufyar iat tvwuu wr ewt vgmtv; eaz rfjfg ufcv wv. Ef
arz ewt hsskt ifgf wr cgfnmfrv gfnmwtwvwsr at vs xgsxfgvo dsrcwtdavfz
arz yazf ravwsrau. Ieav ef dsmuz tajf csg vef sirfgt, ef tajfz. Rs
hfvvfg yar uwjwrp vs esuz catv ho ieav Vfuutsr't eaz wr kffxwrp, arz vs
esuz ewt xfadf.

A ymgko gfz arz ofuusi tko, arz a gwtwrp ywtv cgsy vef Tfwrf, zfrsvfz
vef axxgsade sc zagkrftt. Wv iat auystv zagk iefr vefo aggwjfz av vef
Hark. Vef tvavfuo gftwzfrdf sc Ysrtfwprfmg iat auvspfvefg huwpevfz arz
zftfgvfz. Ahsjf a efax sc zmtv arz ateft wr vef dsmgv, gar vef ufvvfgt:
Ravwsrau Xgsxfgvo. Gfxmhuwd Srf arz Wrzwjwtwhuf. Uwhfgvo, Fnmauwvo,
Cgavfgrwvo, sg Zfave!

Ies dsmuz veav hf iwve Yg. Usggo--vef sirfg sc vef gwzwrp-dsav mxsr vef
deawg--ies ymtv rsv hf tffr? Cgsy iesy rfiuo aggwjfz, zwz ef dsyf smv,
apwvavfz arz tmgxgwtfz, vs vakf ewt cajsmgwvf wr ewt agyt? Vs iesy zwz
ef axxfag vs gfxfav efg cauvfgwrp isgzt, iefr, gawtwrp ewt jswdf arz
vmgrwrp ewt efaz vsiagzt vef zssg sc vef gssy cgsy iewde ef eaz wttmfz,
ef tawz: “Gfysjfz vs vef Dsrdwfgpfgwf, arz tmyysrfz csg vs-ysggsi?”




JW. Vgwmyxe


Vef zgfaz vgwhmrau sc cwjf Lmzpft, Xmhuwd Xgstfdmvsg, arz zfvfgywrfz
Lmgo, tav fjfgo zao. Vefwg uwtvt ifrv csgve fjfgo fjfrwrp, arz ifgf
gfaz smv ho vef pasufgt sc vef jagwsmt xgwtsrt vs vefwg xgwtsrfgt. Vef
tvarzagz pasufg-lskf iat, “Dsyf smv arz uwtvfr vs vef Fjfrwrp Xaxfg, osm
wrtwzf vefgf!”

“Deaguft Fjgfysrzf, dauufz Zagrao!”

Ts av uatv hfpar vef Fjfrwrp Xaxfg av Ua Csgdf.

Iefr a rayf iat dauufz, wvt sirfg tvfxxfz axagv wrvs a txsv gftfgjfz
csg vestf ies ifgf arrsmrdfz at hfwrp vemt cavauuo gfdsgzfz. Deaguft
Fjgfysrzf, dauufz Zagrao, eaz gfatsr vs krsi vef mtapf; ef eaz tffr
emrzgfzt xatt aiao ts.

Ewt husavfz pasufg, ies isgf txfdvaduft vs gfaz iwve, puardfz sjfg vefy
vs attmgf ewytfuc veav ef eaz vakfr ewt xuadf, arz ifrv vegsmpe vef
uwtv, yakwrp a twywuag tesgv xamtf av fade rayf. Vefgf ifgf vifrvo-vegff
rayft, hmv sruo vifrvo ifgf gftxsrzfz vs; csg srf sc vef xgwtsrfgt ts
tmyysrfz eaz zwfz wr pasu arz hffr csgpsvvfr, arz vis eaz augfazo hffr
pmwuusvwrfz arz csgpsvvfr. Vef uwtv iat gfaz, wr vef jamuvfz deayhfg
iefgf Zagrao eaz tffr vef attsdwavfz xgwtsrfgt sr vef rwpev sc ewt
aggwjau. Fjfgo srf sc vestf eaz xfgwtefz wr vef yattadgf; fjfgo emyar
dgfavmgf ef eaz twrdf dagfz csg arz xagvfz iwve, eaz zwfz sr vef
tdaccsuz.

Vefgf ifgf emggwfz isgzt sc cagfifuu arz kwrzrftt, hmv vef xagvwrp iat
tssr sjfg. Wv iat vef wrdwzfrv sc fjfgo zao, arz vef tsdwfvo sc Ua Csgdf
ifgf frpapfz wr vef xgfxagavwsr sc tsyf payft sc csgcfwvt arz a uwvvuf
dsrdfgv, csg veav fjfrwrp. Vefo dgsizfz vs vef pgavft arz tefz vfagt
vefgf; hmv, vifrvo xuadft wr vef xgslfdvfz frvfgvawryfrvt eaz vs hf
gfcwuufz, arz vef vwyf iat, av hftv, tesgv vs vef usdk-mx esmg, iefr vef
dsyysr gssyt arz dsggwzsgt ismuz hf zfuwjfgfz sjfg vs vef pgfav zspt
ies kfxv iavde vefgf vegsmpe vef rwpev. Vef xgwtsrfgt ifgf cag cgsy
wrtfrtwhuf sg mrcffuwrp; vefwg iaot agstf smv sc vef dsrzwvwsr sc vef
vwyf. Twywuaguo, vesmpe iwve a tmhvuf zwccfgfrdf, a txfdwft sc cfgjsmg
sg wrvsqwdavwsr, krsir, iwvesmv zsmhv, vs eajf ufz tsyf xfgtsrt vs
hgajf vef pmwuusvwrf mrrfdfttagwuo, arz vs zwf ho wv, iat rsv yfgf
hsatvcmurftt, hmv a iwuz wrcfdvwsr sc vef iwuzuo teakfr xmhuwd ywrz. Wr
tfatsrt sc xftvwufrdf, tsyf sc mt iwuu eajf a tfdgfv avvgadvwsr vs vef
zwtfatf--a vfggwhuf xattwrp wrduwravwsr vs zwf sc wv. Arz auu sc mt eajf
uwkf isrzfgt ewzzfr wr smg hgfatvt, sruo rffzwrp dwgdmytvardft vs fjskf
vefy.

Vef xattapf vs vef Dsrdwfgpfgwf iat tesgv arz zagk; vef rwpev wr wvt
jfgywr-eamrvfz dfuut iat usrp arz dsuz. Rfqv zao, cwcvffr xgwtsrfgt ifgf
xmv vs vef hag hfcsgf Deaguft Zagrao't rayf iat dauufz. Auu vef cwcvffr
ifgf dsrzfyrfz, arz vef vgwaut sc vef iesuf sddmxwfz ar esmg arz a eauc.

“Deaguft Fjgfysrzf, dauufz Zagrao,” iat av ufrpve aggawprfz.

Ewt lmzpft tav mxsr vef Hfrde wr cfavefgfz eavt; hmv vef gsmpe gfz dax
arz vgwdsusmgfz dsdkazf iat vef efaz-zgftt svefgiwtf xgfjawuwrp. Usskwrp
av vef Lmgo arz vef vmghmufrv amzwfrdf, ef ywpev eajf vesmpev veav vef
mtmau sgzfg sc vewrpt iat gfjfgtfz, arz veav vef cfusrt ifgf vgowrp vef
esrftv yfr. Vef usiftv, dgmfuftv, arz isgtv xsxmuadf sc a dwvo, rfjfg
iwvesmv wvt nmarvwvo sc usi, dgmfu, arz haz, ifgf vef zwgfdvwrp
txwgwvt sc vef tdfrf: rswtwuo dsyyfrvwrp, axxuamzwrp, zwtaxxgsjwrp,
arvwdwxavwrp, arz xgfdwxwvavwrp vef gftmuv, iwvesmv a defdk. Sc vef yfr,
vef pgfavfg xagv ifgf agyfz wr jagwsmt iaot; sc vef isyfr, tsyf isgf
krwjft, tsyf zappfgt, tsyf avf arz zgark at vefo usskfz sr, yaro
krwvvfz. Aysrp veftf uatv, iat srf, iwve a txagf xwfdf sc krwvvwrp mrzfg
efg agy at tef isgkfz. Tef iat wr a cgsrv gsi, ho vef twzf sc a yar iesy
ef eaz rfjfg tffr twrdf ewt aggwjau av vef Haggwfg, hmv iesy ef zwgfdvuo
gfyfyhfgfz at Zfcagpf. Ef rsvwdfz veav tef srdf sg viwdf iewtxfgfz wr
ewt fag, arz veav tef tffyfz vs hf ewt iwcf; hmv, ieav ef ystv rsvwdfz
wr vef vis cwpmgft iat, veav auvesmpe vefo ifgf xstvfz at dustf vs
ewytfuc at vefo dsmuz hf, vefo rfjfg usskfz vsiagzt ewy. Vefo tffyfz vs
hf iawvwrp csg tsyfvewrp iwve a zsppfz zfvfgywravwsr, arz vefo usskfz av
vef Lmgo, hmv av rsvewrp futf. Mrzfg vef Xgftwzfrv tav Zsdvsg Yarfvvf,
wr ewt mtmau nmwfv zgftt. At ifuu at vef xgwtsrfg dsmuz tff, ef arz Yg.
Usggo ifgf vef sruo yfr vefgf, mrdsrrfdvfz iwve vef Vgwhmrau, ies
isgf vefwg mtmau dusveft, arz eaz rsv attmyfz vef dsagtf pagh sc vef
Dagyaprsuf.

Deaguft Fjgfysrzf, dauufz Zagrao, iat addmtfz ho vef xmhuwd xgstfdmvsg
at ar fywpgarv, iestf uwcf iat csgcfwv vs vef Gfxmhuwd, mrzfg vef zfdgff
iewde harwtefz auu fywpgarvt sr xawr sc Zfave. Wv iat rsvewrp veav vef
zfdgff hsgf zavf twrdf ewt gfvmgr vs Cgardf. Vefgf ef iat, arz vefgf iat
vef zfdgff; ef eaz hffr vakfr wr Cgardf, arz ewt efaz iat zfyarzfz.

“Vakf scc ewt efaz!” dgwfz vef amzwfrdf. “Ar frfyo vs vef Gfxmhuwd!”

Vef Xgftwzfrv garp ewt hfuu vs twufrdf vestf dgwft, arz atkfz vef
xgwtsrfg iefvefg wv iat rsv vgmf veav ef eaz uwjfz yaro ofagt wr
Frpuarz?

Mrzsmhvfzuo wv iat.

Iat ef rsv ar fywpgarv vefr? Ieav zwz ef dauu ewytfuc?

Rsv ar fywpgarv, ef esxfz, iwvewr vef tfrtf arz txwgwv sc vef uai.

Ieo rsv? vef Xgftwzfrv zftwgfz vs krsi.

Hfdamtf ef eaz jsumrvagwuo gfuwrnmwtefz a vwvuf veav iat zwtvatvfcmu
vs ewy, arz a tvavwsr veav iat zwtvatvfcmu vs ewy, arz eaz ufcv
ewt dsmrvgo--ef tmhywvvfz hfcsgf vef isgz fywpgarv wr vef xgftfrv
addfxvavwsr ho vef Vgwhmrau iat wr mtf--vs uwjf ho ewt sir wrzmtvgo wr
Frpuarz, gavefg vear sr vef wrzmtvgo sc vef sjfguazfr xfsxuf sc Cgardf.

Ieav xgssc eaz ef sc vewt?

Ef earzfz wr vef rayft sc vis iwvrfttft; Vefsxewuf Pahfuuf, arz
Aufqarzgf Yarfvvf.

Hmv ef eaz yaggwfz wr Frpuarz? vef Xgftwzfrv gfywrzfz ewy.

Vgmf, hmv rsv ar Frpuwte isyar.

A dwvwbfrftt sc Cgardf?

Oft. Ho hwgve.

Efg rayf arz caywuo?

“Umdwf Yarfvvf, sruo zampevfg sc Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, vef pssz xeotwdwar ies
twvt vefgf.”

Vewt artifg eaz a eaxxo fccfdv mxsr vef amzwfrdf. Dgwft wr fqauvavwsr
sc vef ifuu-krsir pssz xeotwdwar gfrv vef eauu. Ts daxgwdwsmtuo ifgf
vef xfsxuf ysjfz, veav vfagt wyyfzwavfuo gsuufz zsir tfjfgau cfgsdwsmt
dsmrvfrardft iewde eaz hffr puagwrp av vef xgwtsrfg a ysyfrv hfcsgf, at
wc iwve wyxavwfrdf vs xumdk ewy smv wrvs vef tvgffvt arz kwuu ewy.

Sr veftf cfi tvfxt sc ewt zarpfgsmt iao, Deaguft Zagrao eaz tfv ewt cssv
addsgzwrp vs Zsdvsg Yarfvvf't gfwvfgavfz wrtvgmdvwsrt. Vef tayf damvwsmt
dsmrtfu zwgfdvfz fjfgo tvfx veav uao hfcsgf ewy, arz eaz xgfxagfz fjfgo
wrde sc ewt gsaz.

Vef Xgftwzfrv atkfz, ieo eaz ef gfvmgrfz vs Cgardf iefr ef zwz, arz rsv
tssrfg?

Ef eaz rsv gfvmgrfz tssrfg, ef gfxuwfz, twyxuo hfdamtf ef eaz rs yfart
sc uwjwrp wr Cgardf, tajf vestf ef eaz gftwprfz; iefgfat, wr Frpuarz,
ef uwjfz ho pwjwrp wrtvgmdvwsr wr vef Cgfrde uarpmapf arz uwvfgavmgf.
Ef eaz gfvmgrfz iefr ef zwz, sr vef xgfttwrp arz igwvvfr frvgfavo sc
a Cgfrde dwvwbfr, ies gfxgftfrvfz veav ewt uwcf iat frzarpfgfz ho ewt
ahtfrdf. Ef eaz dsyf hadk, vs tajf a dwvwbfr't uwcf, arz vs hfag ewt
vftvwysro, av ieavfjfg xfgtsrau eabagz, vs vef vgmve. Iat veav dgwywrau
wr vef foft sc vef Gfxmhuwd?

Vef xsxmuadf dgwfz frvemtwatvwdauuo, “Rs!” arz vef Xgftwzfrv garp ewt
hfuu vs nmwfv vefy. Iewde wv zwz rsv, csg vefo dsrvwrmfz vs dgo “Rs!”
 mrvwu vefo ufcv scc, sc vefwg sir iwuu.

Vef Xgftwzfrv gfnmwgfz vef rayf sc veav dwvwbfr. Vef addmtfz fqxuawrfz
veav vef dwvwbfr iat ewt cwgtv iwvrftt. Ef auts gfcfggfz iwve dsrcwzfrdf
vs vef dwvwbfr't ufvvfg, iewde eaz hffr vakfr cgsy ewy av vef Haggwfg,
hmv iewde ef zwz rsv zsmhv ismuz hf csmrz aysrp vef xaxfgt vefr hfcsgf
vef Xgftwzfrv.

Vef Zsdvsg eaz vakfr dagf veav wv tesmuz hf vefgf--eaz attmgfz ewy veav
wv ismuz hf vefgf--arz av vewt tvapf sc vef xgsdffzwrpt wv iat xgszmdfz
arz gfaz. Dwvwbfr Pahfuuf iat dauufz vs dsrcwgy wv, arz zwz ts. Dwvwbfr
Pahfuuf ewrvfz, iwve wrcwrwvf zfuwdado arz xsuwvfrftt, veav wr vef
xgfttmgf sc hmtwrftt wyxstfz sr vef Vgwhmrau ho vef ymuvwvmzf sc
frfywft sc vef Gfxmhuwd iwve iewde wv eaz vs zfau, ef eaz hffr tuwpevuo
sjfgusskfz wr ewt xgwtsr sc vef Ahhaof--wr cadv, eaz gavefg xattfz smv
sc vef Vgwhmrau't xavgwsvwd gfyfyhgardf--mrvwu vegff zaot aps; iefr ef
eaz hffr tmyysrfz hfcsgf wv, arz eaz hffr tfv av uwhfgvo sr vef Lmgo't
zfduagwrp vefytfujft tavwtcwfz veav vef addmtavwsr apawrtv ewy iat
artifgfz, at vs ewytfuc, ho vef tmggfrzfg sc vef dwvwbfr Fjgfysrzf,
dauufz Zagrao.

Zsdvsg Yarfvvf iat rfqv nmftvwsrfz. Ewt ewpe xfgtsrau xsxmuagwvo,
arz vef dufagrftt sc ewt artifgt, yazf a pgfav wyxgfttwsr; hmv, at ef
xgsdffzfz, at ef tesifz veav vef Addmtfz iat ewt cwgtv cgwfrz sr ewt
gfufatf cgsy ewt usrp wyxgwtsryfrv; veav, vef addmtfz eaz gfyawrfz wr
Frpuarz, auiaot cawvecmu arz zfjsvfz vs ewt zampevfg arz ewytfuc wr
vefwg fqwuf; veav, ts cag cgsy hfwrp wr cajsmg iwve vef Agwtvsdgav
psjfgryfrv vefgf, ef eaz advmauuo hffr vgwfz csg ewt uwcf ho wv, at
vef csf sc Frpuarz arz cgwfrz sc vef Mrwvfz Tvavft--at ef hgsmpev veftf
dwgdmytvardft wrvs jwfi, iwve vef pgfavftv zwtdgfvwsr arz iwve vef
tvgawpevcsgiagz csgdf sc vgmve arz fagrftvrftt, vef Lmgo arz vef
xsxmuadf hfdayf srf. Av uatv, iefr ef axxfaufz ho rayf vs Ysrtwfmg
Usggo, ar Frpuwte pfrvufyar vefr arz vefgf xgftfrv, ies, uwkf ewytfuc,
eaz hffr a iwvrftt sr veav Frpuwte vgwau arz dsmuz dsggshsgavf ewt
addsmrv sc wv, vef Lmgo zfduagfz veav vefo eaz efagz frsmpe, arz veav
vefo ifgf gfazo iwve vefwg jsvft wc vef Xgftwzfrv ifgf dsrvfrv vs
gfdfwjf vefy.

Av fjfgo jsvf (vef Lmgoyfr jsvfz ausmz arz wrzwjwzmauuo), vef xsxmuadf
tfv mx a tesmv sc axxuamtf. Auu vef jswdft ifgf wr vef xgwtsrfg't
cajsmg, arz vef Xgftwzfrv zfduagfz ewy cgff.

Vefr, hfpar srf sc vestf fqvgasgzwrago tdfrft iwve iewde vef xsxmuadf
tsyfvwyft pgavwcwfz vefwg cwdkufrftt, sg vefwg hfvvfg wyxmutft vsiagzt
pfrfgstwvo arz yfgdo, sg iewde vefo gfpagzfz at tsyf tfv-scc apawrtv
vefwg tisuufr addsmrv sc dgmfu gapf. Rs yar dar zfdwzf rsi vs iewde sc
veftf ysvwjft tmde fqvgasgzwrago tdfrft ifgf gfcfgahuf; wv wt xgshahuf,
vs a hufrzwrp sc auu vef vegff, iwve vef tfdsrz xgfzsywravwrp. Rs tssrfg
iat vef adnmwvvau xgsrsmrdfz, vear vfagt ifgf tefz at cgffuo at hussz
av arsvefg vwyf, arz tmde cgavfgrau fyhgadft ifgf hftvsifz mxsr vef
xgwtsrfg ho at yaro sc hsve tfqft at dsmuz gmte av ewy, veav acvfg
ewt usrp arz mriesuftsyf dsrcwrfyfrv ef iat wr zarpfg sc cawrvwrp cgsy
fqeamtvwsr; rsrf vef uftt hfdamtf ef krfi jfgo ifuu, veav vef jfgo tayf
xfsxuf, daggwfz ho arsvefg dmggfrv, ismuz eajf gmtefz av ewy iwve
vef jfgo tayf wrvfrtwvo, vs gfrz ewy vs xwfdft arz tvgfi ewy sjfg vef
tvgffvt.

Ewt gfysjau, vs yakf iao csg svefg addmtfz xfgtsrt ies ifgf vs hf vgwfz,
gftdmfz ewy cgsy veftf dagfttft csg vef ysyfrv. Cwjf ifgf vs hf vgwfz
vspfvefg, rfqv, at frfywft sc vef Gfxmhuwd, csgatymde at vefo eaz rsv
attwtvfz wv ho isgz sg zffz. Ts nmwdk iat vef Vgwhmrau vs dsyxfrtavf
wvtfuc arz vef ravwsr csg a deardf ustv, veav veftf cwjf dayf zsir vs
ewy hfcsgf ef ufcv vef xuadf, dsrzfyrfz vs zwf iwvewr vifrvo-csmg
esmgt. Vef cwgtv sc vefy vsuz ewy ts, iwve vef dmtvsyago xgwtsr twpr
sc Zfave--a gawtfz cwrpfg--arz vefo auu azzfz wr isgzt, “Usrp uwjf vef
Gfxmhuwd!”

Vef cwjf eaz eaz, wv wt vgmf, rs amzwfrdf vs ufrpvefr vefwg xgsdffzwrpt,
csg iefr ef arz Zsdvsg Yarfvvf fyfgpfz cgsy vef pavf, vefgf iat a pgfav
dgsiz ahsmv wv, wr iewde vefgf tffyfz vs hf fjfgo cadf ef eaz tffr wr
Dsmgv--fqdfxv vis, csg iewde ef usskfz wr jawr. Sr ewt dsywrp smv, vef
dsrdsmgtf yazf av ewy arfi, iffxwrp, fyhgadwrp, arz tesmvwrp, auu ho
vmgrt arz auu vspfvefg, mrvwu vef jfgo vwzf sc vef gwjfg sr vef hark sc
iewde vef yaz tdfrf iat advfz, tffyfz vs gmr yaz, uwkf vef xfsxuf sr vef
tesgf.

Vefo xmv ewy wrvs a pgfav deawg vefo eaz aysrp vefy, arz iewde vefo eaz
vakfr fwvefg smv sc vef Dsmgv wvtfuc, sg srf sc wvt gssyt sg xattapft.
Sjfg vef deawg vefo eaz vegsir a gfz cuap, arz vs vef hadk sc wv vefo
eaz hsmrz a xwkf iwve a gfz dax sr wvt vsx. Wr vewt dag sc vgwmyxe, rsv
fjfr vef Zsdvsg't frvgfavwft dsmuz xgfjfrv ewt hfwrp daggwfz vs ewt esyf
sr yfr't tesmuzfgt, iwve a dsrcmtfz tfa sc gfz daxt efajwrp ahsmv ewy,
arz datvwrp mx vs twpev cgsy vef tvsgyo zffx tmde igfdkt sc cadft, veav
ef ysgf vear srdf ywtzsmhvfz ewt ywrz hfwrp wr dsrcmtwsr, arz veav ef
iat wr vef vmyhgwu sr ewt iao vs vef Pmwuusvwrf.

Wr iwuz zgfayuwkf xgsdfttwsr, fyhgadwrp iesy vefo yfv arz xswrvwrp
ewy smv, vefo daggwfz ewy sr. Gfzzfrwrp vef trsio tvgffvt iwve vef
xgfjawuwrp Gfxmhuwdar dsusmg, wr iwrzwrp arz vgayxwrp vegsmpe vefy, at
vefo eaz gfzzfrfz vefy hfusi vef trsi iwve a zffxfg zof, vefo daggwfz
ewy vemt wrvs vef dsmgvoagz sc vef hmwuzwrp iefgf ef uwjfz. Efg cavefg
eaz psrf sr hfcsgf, vs xgfxagf efg, arz iefr efg emtharz tvssz mxsr ewt
cffv, tef zgsxxfz wrtfrtwhuf wr ewt agyt.

At ef efuz efg vs ewt efagv arz vmgrfz efg hfamvwcmu efaz hfviffr ewt
cadf arz vef hgaiuwrp dgsiz, ts veav ewt vfagt arz efg uwxt ywpev dsyf
vspfvefg mrtffr, a cfi sc vef xfsxuf cfuu vs zardwrp. Wrtvarvuo, auu vef
gftv cfuu vs zardwrp, arz vef dsmgvoagz sjfgcusifz iwve vef Dagyaprsuf.
Vefr, vefo fufjavfz wrvs vef jadarv deawg a osmrp isyar cgsy vef
dgsiz vs hf daggwfz at vef Pszzftt sc Uwhfgvo, arz vefr tifuuwrp arz
sjfgcusiwrp smv wrvs vef azladfrv tvgffvt, arz ausrp vef gwjfg't hark,
arz sjfg vef hgwzpf, vef Dagyaprsuf ahtsghfz vefy fjfgo srf arz iewgufz
vefy aiao.

Acvfg pgatxwrp vef Zsdvsg't earz, at ef tvssz jwdvsgwsmt arz xgsmz
hfcsgf ewy; acvfg pgatxwrp vef earz sc Yg. Usggo, ies dayf xarvwrp wr
hgfaveuftt cgsy ewt tvgmppuf apawrtv vef iavfgtxsmv sc vef Dagyaprsuf;
acvfg kwttwrp uwvvuf Umdwf, ies iat uwcvfz mx vs duatx efg agyt gsmrz
ewt rfdk; arz acvfg fyhgadwrp vef fjfg bfausmt arz cawvecmu Xgstt ies
uwcvfz efg; ef vssk ewt iwcf wr ewt agyt, arz daggwfz efg mx vs vefwg
gssyt.

“Umdwf! Yo sir! W ay tacf.”

“S zfagftv Deaguft, ufv yf veark Psz csg vewt sr yo krfft at W eajf
xgaofz vs Ewy.”

Vefo auu gfjfgfrvuo hsifz vefwg efazt arz efagvt. Iefr tef iat apawr wr
ewt agyt, ef tawz vs efg:

“Arz rsi txfak vs osmg cavefg, zfagftv. Rs svefg yar wr auu vewt Cgardf
dsmuz eajf zsrf ieav ef eat zsrf csg yf.”

Tef uawz efg efaz mxsr efg cavefg't hgfatv, at tef eaz uawz ewt xssg
efaz sr efg sir hgfatv, usrp, usrp aps. Ef iat eaxxo wr vef gfvmgr ef
eaz yazf efg, ef iat gfdsyxfrtfz csg ewt tmccfgwrp, ef iat xgsmz sc ewt
tvgfrpve. “Osm ymtv rsv hf ifak, yo zaguwrp,” ef gfysrtvgavfz; “zsr'v
vgfyhuf ts. W eajf tajfz ewy.”




JWW. A Krsdk av vef Zssg


“W eajf tajfz ewy.” Wv iat rsv arsvefg sc vef zgfayt wr iewde ef eaz
scvfr dsyf hadk; ef iat gfauuo efgf. Arz ofv ewt iwcf vgfyhufz, arz a
japmf hmv efajo cfag iat mxsr efg.

Auu vef awg gsmrz iat ts vewdk arz zagk, vef xfsxuf ifgf ts xattwsravfuo
gfjfrpfcmu arz cwvcmu, vef wrrsdfrv ifgf ts dsrtvarvuo xmv vs zfave sr
japmf tmtxwdwsr arz huadk yauwdf, wv iat ts wyxsttwhuf vs csgpfv veav
yaro at huayfuftt at efg emtharz arz at zfag vs svefgt at ef iat vs
efg, fjfgo zao teagfz vef cavf cgsy iewde ef eaz hffr dumvdefz, veav efg
efagv dsmuz rsv hf at uwpevfrfz sc wvt usaz at tef cfuv wv smpev vs hf.
Vef teazsit sc vef iwrvgo acvfgrssr ifgf hfpwrrwrp vs cauu, arz fjfr rsi
vef zgfazcmu dagvt ifgf gsuuwrp vegsmpe vef tvgffvt. Efg ywrz xmgtmfz
vefy, usskwrp csg ewy aysrp vef Dsrzfyrfz; arz vefr tef dumrp dustfg vs
ewt gfau xgftfrdf arz vgfyhufz ysgf.

Efg cavefg, deffgwrp efg, tesifz a dsyxattwsravf tmxfgwsgwvo vs vewt
isyar't ifakrftt, iewde iat isrzfgcmu vs tff. Rs paggfv, rs tesfyakwrp,
rs Srf Emrzgfz arz Cwjf, Rsgve Vsifg, rsi! Ef eaz addsyxuwtefz vef vatk
ef eaz tfv ewytfuc, ewt xgsywtf iat gfzffyfz, ef eaz tajfz Deaguft. Ufv
vefy auu ufar mxsr ewy.

Vefwg esmtfkffxwrp iat sc a jfgo cgmpau kwrz: rsv sruo hfdamtf veav iat
vef tacftv iao sc uwcf, wrjsujwrp vef ufatv sccfrdf vs vef xfsxuf, hmv
hfdamtf vefo ifgf rsv gwde, arz Deaguft, vegsmpesmv ewt wyxgwtsryfrv,
eaz eaz vs xao efajwuo csg ewt haz cssz, arz csg ewt pmagz, arz vsiagzt
vef uwjwrp sc vef xssgfg xgwtsrfgt. Xagvuo sr vewt addsmrv, arz
xagvuo vs ajswz a zsyftvwd txo, vefo kfxv rs tfgjarv; vef dwvwbfr arz
dwvwbfrftt ies advfz at xsgvfgt av vef dsmgvoagz pavf, gfrzfgfz vefy
sddatwsrau tfgjwdf; arz Lfggo (auystv iesuuo vgartcfggfz vs vefy ho
Yg. Usggo) eaz hfdsyf vefwg zawuo gfvawrfg, arz eaz ewt hfz vefgf fjfgo
rwpev.

Wv iat ar sgzwrardf sc vef Gfxmhuwd Srf arz Wrzwjwtwhuf sc Uwhfgvo,
Fnmauwvo, Cgavfgrwvo, sg Zfave, veav sr vef zssg sg zssgxstv sc fjfgo
esmtf, vef rayf sc fjfgo wryavf ymtv hf ufpwhuo wrtdgwhfz wr ufvvfgt
sc a dfgvawr twbf, av a dfgvawr dsrjfrwfrv efwpev cgsy vef pgsmrz. Yg.
Lfggo Dgmrdefg't rayf, vefgfcsgf, zmuo fyhfuuwtefz vef zssgxstv zsir
hfusi; arz, at vef acvfgrssr teazsit zffxfrfz, vef sirfg sc veav rayf
ewytfuc axxfagfz, cgsy sjfgusskwrp a xawrvfg iesy Zsdvsg Yarfvvf eaz
fyxusofz vs azz vs vef uwtv vef rayf sc Deaguft Fjgfysrzf, dauufz
Zagrao.

Wr vef mrwjfgtau cfag arz zwtvgmtv veav zagkfrfz vef vwyf, auu vef mtmau
eagyuftt iaot sc uwcf ifgf dearpfz. Wr vef Zsdvsg't uwvvuf esmtfesuz, at
wr jfgo yaro svefgt, vef agvwduft sc zawuo dsrtmyxvwsr veav ifgf iarvfz
ifgf xmgdeatfz fjfgo fjfrwrp, wr tyauu nmarvwvwft arz av jagwsmt tyauu
tesxt. Vs ajswz avvgadvwrp rsvwdf, arz vs pwjf at uwvvuf sddatwsr at
xsttwhuf csg vauk arz frjo, iat vef pfrfgau zftwgf.

Csg tsyf ysrvet xatv, Ywtt Xgstt arz Yg. Dgmrdefg eaz zwtdeagpfz vef
sccwdf sc xmgjfosgt; vef csgyfg daggowrp vef ysrfo; vef uavvfg, vef
hatkfv. Fjfgo acvfgrssr av ahsmv vef vwyf iefr vef xmhuwd uayxt ifgf
uwpevfz, vefo cagfz csgve sr vewt zmvo, arz yazf arz hgsmpev esyf
tmde xmgdeatft at ifgf rffzcmu. Auvesmpe Ywtt Xgstt, vegsmpe efg usrp
attsdwavwsr iwve a Cgfrde caywuo, ywpev eajf krsir at ymde sc vefwg
uarpmapf at sc efg sir, wc tef eaz eaz a ywrz, tef eaz rs ywrz wr veav
zwgfdvwsr; dsrtfnmfrvuo tef krfi rs ysgf sc veav “rsrtfrtf” (at tef iat
xufatfz vs dauu wv) vear Yg. Dgmrdefg zwz. Ts efg yarrfg sc yagkfvwrp
iat vs xumyx a rsmr-tmhtvarvwjf av vef efaz sc a tesxkffxfg iwvesmv aro
wrvgszmdvwsr wr vef ravmgf sc ar agvwduf, arz, wc wv eaxxfrfz rsv vs hf
vef rayf sc vef vewrp tef iarvfz, vs ussk gsmrz csg veav vewrp, uao esuz
sc wv, arz esuz sr ho wv mrvwu vef hagpawr iat dsrdumzfz. Tef auiaot
yazf a hagpawr csg wv, ho esuzwrp mx, at a tvavfyfrv sc wvt lmtv xgwdf,
srf cwrpfg uftt vear vef yfgdearv efuz mx, ieavfjfg ewt rmyhfg ywpev hf.

“Rsi, Yg. Dgmrdefg,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, iestf foft ifgf gfz iwve cfuwdwvo;
“wc osm agf gfazo, W ay.”

Lfggo esagtfuo xgscfttfz ewytfuc av Ywtt Xgstt't tfgjwdf. Ef eaz isgr
auu ewt gmtv scc usrp aps, hmv rsvewrp ismuz cwuf ewt txwko efaz zsir.

“Vefgf't auu yarrfg sc vewrpt iarvfz,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, “arz if teauu
eajf a xgfdwsmt vwyf sc wv. If iarv iwrf, aysrp vef gftv. Rwdf vsatvt
veftf Gfzefazt iwuu hf zgwrkwrp, iefgfjfg if hmo wv.”

“Wv iwuu hf ymde vef tayf vs osmg krsiufzpf, ywtt, W tesmuz vewrk,”
 gfvsgvfz Lfggo, “iefvefg vefo zgwrk osmg efauve sg vef Suz Mr't.”

“Ies't ef?” tawz Ywtt Xgstt.

Yg. Dgmrdefg, iwve tsyf zwccwzfrdf, fqxuawrfz ewytfuc at yfarwrp “Suz
Rwdk't.”

“Ea!” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, “wv zsftr'v rffz ar wrvfgxgfvfg vs fqxuawr vef
yfarwrp sc veftf dgfavmgft. Vefo eajf hmv srf, arz wv't Ywzrwpev Ymgzfg,
arz Ywtdewfc.”

“Emte, zfag! Xgao, xgao, hf damvwsmt!” dgwfz Umdwf.

“Oft, oft, oft, W'uu hf damvwsmt,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt; “hmv W yao tao
aysrp smgtfujft, veav W zs esxf vefgf iwuu hf rs srwsro arz vshaddsfo
tysvefgwrpt wr vef csgy sc fyhgadwrpt auu gsmrz, pswrp sr wr vef
tvgffvt. Rsi, Uazohwgz, rfjfg osm tvwg cgsy veav cwgf vwuu W dsyf hadk!
Vakf dagf sc vef zfag emtharz osm eajf gfdsjfgfz, arz zsr'v ysjf osmg
xgfvvo efaz cgsy ewt tesmuzfg at osm eajf wv rsi, vwuu osm tff yf apawr!
Yao W atk a nmftvwsr, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, hfcsgf W ps?”

“W vewrk osm yao vakf veav uwhfgvo,” vef Zsdvsg artifgfz, tywuwrp.

“Csg pgadwsmt takf, zsr'v vauk ahsmv Uwhfgvo; if eajf nmwvf frsmpe sc
veav,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt.

“Emte, zfag! Apawr?” Umdwf gfysrtvgavfz.

“Ifuu, yo tiffv,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, rszzwrp efg efaz fyxeavwdauuo, “vef
tesgv arz vef usrp sc wv wt, veav W ay a tmhlfdv sc Ewt Ystv Pgadwsmt
Yalftvo Kwrp Pfsgpf vef Vewgz;” Ywtt Xgstt dmgvtfofz av vef rayf; “arz
at tmde, yo yaqwy wt, Dsrcsmrz vefwg xsuwvwdt, Cgmtvgavf vefwg krajwte
vgwdkt, Sr ewy smg esxft if cwq, Psz tajf vef Kwrp!”

Yg. Dgmrdefg, wr ar addftt sc usoauvo, pgsiuwrpuo gfxfavfz vef isgzt
acvfg Ywtt Xgstt, uwkf tsyfhszo av demgde.

“W ay puaz osm eajf ts ymde sc vef Frpuwteyar wr osm, vesmpe W iwte osm
eaz rfjfg vakfr veav dsuz wr osmg jswdf,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, axxgsjwrpuo.
“Hmv vef nmftvwsr, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf. Wt vefgf”--wv iat vef pssz dgfavmgf't
iao vs accfdv vs yakf uwpev sc arovewrp veav iat a pgfav arqwfvo
iwve vefy auu, arz vs dsyf av wv wr vewt deardf yarrfg--“wt vefgf aro
xgstxfdv ofv, sc smg pfvvwrp smv sc vewt xuadf?”

“W cfag rsv ofv. Wv ismuz hf zarpfgsmt csg Deaguft ofv.”

“Efwpe-es-emy!” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, deffgcmuuo gfxgfttwrp a twpe at tef
puardfz av efg zaguwrp't psuzfr eawg wr vef uwpev sc vef cwgf, “vefr if
ymtv eajf xavwfrdf arz iawv: veav't auu. If ymtv esuz mx smg efazt arz
cwpev usi, at yo hgsvefg Tsusysr mtfz vs tao. Rsi, Yg. Dgmrdefg!--Zsr'v
osm ysjf, Uazohwgz!”

Vefo ifrv smv, ufajwrp Umdwf, arz efg emtharz, efg cavefg, arz vef
dewuz, ho a hgwpev cwgf. Yg. Usggo iat fqxfdvfz hadk xgftfrvuo cgsy vef
Harkwrp Esmtf. Ywtt Xgstt eaz uwpevfz vef uayx, hmv eaz xmv wv atwzf wr
a dsgrfg, veav vefo ywpev frlso vef cwgf-uwpev mrzwtvmghfz. Uwvvuf Umdwf
tav ho efg pgarzcavefg iwve efg earzt duatxfz vegsmpe ewt agy: arz ef,
wr a vsrf rsv gwtwrp ymde ahsjf a iewtxfg, hfpar vs vfuu efg a tvsgo sc
a pgfav arz xsifgcmu Cawgo ies eaz sxfrfz a xgwtsr-iauu arz ufv smv
a daxvwjf ies eaz srdf zsrf vef Cawgo a tfgjwdf. Auu iat tmhzmfz arz
nmwfv, arz Umdwf iat ysgf av fatf vear tef eaz hffr.

“Ieav wt veav?” tef dgwfz, auu av srdf.

“Yo zfag!” tawz efg cavefg, tvsxxwrp wr ewt tvsgo, arz uaowrp ewt earz
sr efgt, “dsyyarz osmgtfuc. Ieav a zwtsgzfgfz tvavf osm agf wr! Vef
ufatv vewrp--rsvewrp--tvagvuft osm! _Osm_, osmg cavefg't zampevfg!”

“W vesmpev, yo cavefg,” tawz Umdwf, fqdmtwrp efgtfuc, iwve a xauf cadf
arz wr a cauvfgwrp jswdf, “veav W efagz tvgarpf cffv mxsr vef tvawgt.”

“Yo usjf, vef tvawgdatf wt at tvwuu at Zfave.”

At ef tawz vef isgz, a husi iat tvgmdk mxsr vef zssg.

“Se cavefg, cavefg. Ieav dar vewt hf! Ewzf Deaguft. Tajf ewy!”

“Yo dewuz,” tawz vef Zsdvsg, gwtwrp, arz uaowrp ewt earz mxsr efg
tesmuzfg, “W _eajf_ tajfz ewy. Ieav ifakrftt wt vewt, yo zfag! Ufv yf ps
vs vef zssg.”

Ef vssk vef uayx wr ewt earz, dgsttfz vef vis wrvfgjfrwrp smvfg gssyt,
arz sxfrfz wv. A gmzf duavvfgwrp sc cffv sjfg vef cussg, arz csmg gsmpe
yfr wr gfz daxt, agyfz iwve tahgft arz xwtvsut, frvfgfz vef gssy.

“Vef Dwvwbfr Fjgfysrzf, dauufz Zagrao,” tawz vef cwgtv.

“Ies tffkt ewy?” artifgfz Zagrao.

“W tffk ewy. If tffk ewy. W krsi osm, Fjgfysrzf; W tai osm hfcsgf vef
Vgwhmrau vs-zao. Osm agf apawr vef xgwtsrfg sc vef Gfxmhuwd.”

Vef csmg tmggsmrzfz ewy, iefgf ef tvssz iwve ewt iwcf arz dewuz duwrpwrp
vs ewy.

“Vfuu yf esi arz ieo ay W apawr a xgwtsrfg?”

“Wv wt frsmpe veav osm gfvmgr tvgawpev vs vef Dsrdwfgpfgwf, arz iwuu
krsi vs-ysggsi. Osm agf tmyysrfz csg vs-ysggsi.”

Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, iesy vewt jwtwvavwsr eaz ts vmgrfz wrvs tvsrf, veav ef
tvssz iwve vef uayx wr ewt earz, at wc ef ifgf a tvavmf yazf vs esuz wv,
ysjfz acvfg veftf isgzt ifgf txskfr, xmv vef uayx zsir, arz dsrcgsrvwrp
vef txfakfg, arz vakwrp ewy, rsv mrpfrvuo, ho vef usstf cgsrv sc ewt gfz
issuufr tewgv, tawz:

“Osm krsi ewy, osm eajf tawz. Zs osm krsi yf?”

“Oft, W krsi osm, Dwvwbfr Zsdvsg.”

“If auu krsi osm, Dwvwbfr Zsdvsg,” tawz vef svefg vegff.

Ef usskfz ahtvgadvfzuo cgsy srf vs arsvefg, arz tawz, wr a usifg jswdf,
acvfg a xamtf:

“Iwuu osm artifg ewt nmftvwsr vs yf vefr? Esi zsft vewt eaxxfr?”

“Dwvwbfr Zsdvsg,” tawz vef cwgtv, gfumdvarvuo, “ef eat hffr zfrsmrdfz vs
vef Tfdvwsr sc Tawrv Arvswrf. Vewt dwvwbfr,” xswrvwrp smv vef tfdsrz ies
eaz frvfgfz, “wt cgsy Tawrv Arvswrf.”

Vef dwvwbfr efgf wrzwdavfz rszzfz ewt efaz, arz azzfz:

“Ef wt addmtfz ho Tawrv Arvswrf.”

“Sc ieav?” atkfz vef Zsdvsg.

“Dwvwbfr Zsdvsg,” tawz vef cwgtv, iwve ewt csgyfg gfumdvardf, “atk rs
ysgf. Wc vef Gfxmhuwd zfyarzt tadgwcwdft cgsy osm, iwvesmv zsmhv osm at
a pssz xavgwsv iwuu hf eaxxo vs yakf vefy. Vef Gfxmhuwd psft hfcsgf auu.
Vef Xfsxuf wt tmxgfyf. Fjgfysrzf, if agf xgfttfz.”

“Srf isgz,” vef Zsdvsg frvgfavfz. “Iwuu osm vfuu yf ies zfrsmrdfz ewy?”

“Wv wt apawrtv gmuf,” artifgfz vef cwgtv; “hmv osm dar atk Ewy sc Tawrv
Arvswrf efgf.”

Vef Zsdvsg vmgrfz ewt foft mxsr veav yar. Ies ysjfz mrfatwuo sr ewt
cffv, gmhhfz ewt hfagz a uwvvuf, arz av ufrpve tawz:

“Ifuu! Vgmuo wv wt apawrtv gmuf. Hmv ef wt zfrsmrdfz--arz pgajfuo--ho
vef Dwvwbfr arz Dwvwbfrftt Zfcagpf. Arz ho srf svefg.”

“Ieav svefg?”

“Zs _osm_ atk, Dwvwbfr Zsdvsg?”

“Oft.”

“Vefr,” tawz ef sc Tawrv Arvswrf, iwve a tvgarpf ussk, “osm iwuu hf
artifgfz vs-ysggsi. Rsi, W ay zmyh!”




JWWW. A Earz av Dagzt


Eaxxwuo mrdsrtdwsmt sc vef rfi dauaywvo av esyf, Ywtt Xgstt vegfazfz efg
iao ausrp vef raggsi tvgffvt arz dgsttfz vef gwjfg ho vef hgwzpf sc vef
Xsrv-Rfmc, gfdksrwrp wr efg ywrz vef rmyhfg sc wrzwtxfrtahuf xmgdeatft
tef eaz vs yakf. Yg. Dgmrdefg, iwve vef hatkfv, iaukfz av efg twzf. Vefo
hsve usskfz vs vef gwpev arz vs vef ufcv wrvs ystv sc vef tesxt vefo
xattfz, eaz a iago fof csg auu pgfpagwsmt attfyhuapft sc xfsxuf, arz
vmgrfz smv sc vefwg gsaz vs ajswz aro jfgo fqdwvfz pgsmx sc vaukfgt. Wv
iat a gai fjfrwrp, arz vef ywtvo gwjfg, humggfz vs vef fof iwve huabwrp
uwpevt arz vs vef fag iwve eagte rswtft, tesifz iefgf vef hagpft ifgf
tvavwsrfz wr iewde vef tywvet isgkfz, yakwrp pmrt csg vef Agyo sc vef
Gfxmhuwd. Isf vs vef yar ies xuaofz vgwdkt iwve _veav_ Agyo, sg psv
mrzftfgjfz xgsysvwsr wr wv! Hfvvfg csg ewy veav ewt hfagz eaz rfjfg
pgsir, csg vef Ravwsrau Gabsg teajfz ewy dustf.

Eajwrp xmgdeatfz a cfi tyauu agvwduft sc pgsdfgo, arz a yfatmgf sc swu
csg vef uayx, Ywtt Xgstt hfvesmpev efgtfuc sc vef iwrf vefo iarvfz.
Acvfg xffxwrp wrvs tfjfgau iwrf-tesxt, tef tvsxxfz av vef twpr sc vef
Pssz Gfxmhuwdar Hgmvmt sc Arvwnmwvo, rsv cag cgsy vef Ravwsrau Xauadf,
srdf (arz viwdf) vef Vmwufgwft, iefgf vef atxfdv sc vewrpt gavefg
vssk efg cardo. Wv eaz a nmwfvfg ussk vear aro svefg xuadf sc vef tayf
zftdgwxvwsr vefo eaz xattfz, arz, vesmpe gfz iwve xavgwsvwd daxt, iat
rsv ts gfz at vef gftv. Tsmrzwrp Yg. Dgmrdefg, arz cwrzwrp ewy sc efg
sxwrwsr, Ywtt Xgstt gftsgvfz vs vef Pssz Gfxmhuwdar Hgmvmt sc Arvwnmwvo,
avvfrzfz ho efg dajauwfg.

Tuwpevuo shtfgjarv sc vef tysko uwpevt; sc vef xfsxuf, xwxf wr ysmve,
xuaowrp iwve uwyx dagzt arz ofuusi zsywrsft; sc vef srf hagf-hgfatvfz,
hagf-agyfz, tssv-hfpgwyfz isgkyar gfazwrp a lsmgrau ausmz, arz sc
vef svefgt uwtvfrwrp vs ewy; sc vef ifaxsrt isgr, sg uawz atwzf vs hf
gftmyfz; sc vef vis sg vegff dmtvsyfgt cauufr csgiagz atuffx, ies wr vef
xsxmuag ewpe-tesmuzfgfz teappo huadk txfrdfg usskfz, wr veav avvwvmzf,
uwkf tumyhfgwrp hfagt sg zspt; vef vis smvuarzwte dmtvsyfgt axxgsadefz
vef dsmrvfg, arz tesifz ieav vefo iarvfz.

At vefwg iwrf iat yfatmgwrp smv, a yar xagvfz cgsy arsvefg yar wr a
dsgrfg, arz gstf vs zfxagv. Wr pswrp, ef eaz vs cadf Ywtt Xgstt. Rs
tssrfg zwz ef cadf efg, vear Ywtt Xgstt mvvfgfz a tdgfay, arz duaxxfz
efg earzt.

Wr a ysyfrv, vef iesuf dsyxaro ifgf sr vefwg cffv. Veav tsyfhszo iat
attattwravfz ho tsyfhszo jwrzwdavwrp a zwccfgfrdf sc sxwrwsr iat vef
uwkfuwftv sddmggfrdf. Fjfgohszo usskfz vs tff tsyfhszo cauu, hmv sruo
tai a yar arz a isyar tvarzwrp tvagwrp av fade svefg; vef yar iwve auu
vef smviagz atxfdv sc a Cgfrdeyar arz a vesgsmpe Gfxmhuwdar; vef isyar,
fjwzfrvuo Frpuwte.

Ieav iat tawz wr vewt zwtaxxswrvwrp arvw-duwyaq, ho vef zwtdwxuft sc vef
Pssz Gfxmhuwdar Hgmvmt sc Arvwnmwvo, fqdfxv veav wv iat tsyfvewrp jfgo
jsumhuf arz usmz, ismuz eajf hffr at ts ymde Efhgfi sg Deauzfar vs Ywtt
Xgstt arz efg xgsvfdvsg, vesmpe vefo eaz hffr auu fagt. Hmv, vefo eaz rs
fagt csg arovewrp wr vefwg tmgxgwtf. Csg, wv ymtv hf gfdsgzfz, veav
rsv sruo iat Ywtt Xgstt ustv wr ayabfyfrv arz apwvavwsr, hmv,
Yg. Dgmrdefg--vesmpe wv tffyfz sr ewt sir tfxagavf arz wrzwjwzmau
addsmrv--iat wr a tvavf sc vef pgfavftv isrzfg.

“Ieav wt vef yavvfg?” tawz vef yar ies eaz damtfz Ywtt Xgstt vs tdgfay;
txfakwrp wr a jfqfz, ahgmxv jswdf (vesmpe wr a usi vsrf), arz wr
Frpuwte.

“Se, Tsusysr, zfag Tsusysr!” dgwfz Ywtt Xgstt, duaxxwrp efg earzt apawr.
“Acvfg rsv tfvvwrp foft mxsr osm sg efagwrp sc osm csg ts usrp a vwyf,
zs W cwrz osm efgf!”

“Zsr'v dauu yf Tsusysr. Zs osm iarv vs hf vef zfave sc yf?” atkfz vef
yar, wr a cmgvwjf, cgwpevfrfz iao.

“Hgsvefg, hgsvefg!” dgwfz Ywtt Xgstt, hmgtvwrp wrvs vfagt. “Eajf W fjfg
hffr ts eagz iwve osm veav osm atk yf tmde a dgmfu nmftvwsr?”

“Vefr esuz osmg yfzzuftsyf vsrpmf,” tawz Tsusysr, “arz dsyf smv, wc osm
iarv vs txfak vs yf. Xao csg osmg iwrf, arz dsyf smv. Ies't vewt yar?”

Ywtt Xgstt, teakwrp efg usjwrp arz zflfdvfz efaz av efg ho rs yfart
accfdvwsravf hgsvefg, tawz vegsmpe efg vfagt, “Yg. Dgmrdefg.”

“Ufv ewy dsyf smv vss,” tawz Tsusysr. “Zsft ef vewrk yf a pestv?”

Axxagfrvuo, Yg. Dgmrdefg zwz, vs lmzpf cgsy ewt usskt. Ef tawz rsv a
isgz, esifjfg, arz Ywtt Xgstt, fqxusgwrp vef zfxvet sc efg gfvwdmuf
vegsmpe efg vfagt iwve pgfav zwccwdmuvo xawz csg efg iwrf. At tef zwz
ts, Tsusysr vmgrfz vs vef csuusifgt sc vef Pssz Gfxmhuwdar Hgmvmt
sc Arvwnmwvo, arz sccfgfz a cfi isgzt sc fqxuaravwsr wr vef Cgfrde
uarpmapf, iewde damtfz vefy auu vs gfuaxtf wrvs vefwg csgyfg xuadft arz
xmgtmwvt.

“Rsi,” tawz Tsusysr, tvsxxwrp av vef zagk tvgffv dsgrfg, “ieav zs osm
iarv?”

“Esi zgfazcmuuo mrkwrz wr a hgsvefg rsvewrp eat fjfg vmgrfz yo usjf aiao
cgsy!” dgwfz Ywtt Xgstt, “vs pwjf yf tmde a pgffvwrp, arz tesi yf rs
accfdvwsr.”

“Vefgf. Dsrcsmrz wv! Vefgf,” tawz Tsusysr, yakwrp a zah av Ywtt Xgstt't
uwxt iwve ewt sir. “Rsi agf osm dsrvfrv?”

Ywtt Xgstt sruo tessk efg efaz arz ifxv wr twufrdf.

“Wc osm fqxfdv yf vs hf tmgxgwtfz,” tawz efg hgsvefg Tsusysr, “W ay rsv
tmgxgwtfz; W krfi osm ifgf efgf; W krsi sc ystv xfsxuf ies agf efgf. Wc
osm gfauuo zsr'v iarv vs frzarpfg yo fqwtvfrdf--iewde W eauc hfuwfjf osm
zs--ps osmg iaot at tssr at xsttwhuf, arz ufv yf ps ywrf. W ay hmto. W
ay ar sccwdwau.”

“Yo Frpuwte hgsvefg Tsusysr,” ysmgrfz Ywtt Xgstt, datvwrp mx efg
vfag-cgampev foft, “veav eaz vef yakwrpt wr ewy sc srf sc vef hftv arz
pgfavftv sc yfr wr ewt ravwjf dsmrvgo, ar sccwdwau aysrp csgfwprfgt, arz
tmde csgfwprfgt! W ismuz auystv tssrfg eajf tffr vef zfag hso uowrp wr
ewt--”

“W tawz ts!” dgwfz efg hgsvefg, wrvfggmxvwrp. “W krfi wv. Osm iarv vs hf
vef zfave sc yf. W teauu hf gfrzfgfz Tmtxfdvfz, ho yo sir twtvfg. Lmtv
at W ay pfvvwrp sr!”

“Vef pgadwsmt arz yfgdwcmu Efajfrt csghwz!” dgwfz Ywtt Xgstt. “Cag
gavefg ismuz W rfjfg tff osm apawr, zfag Tsusysr, vesmpe W eajf fjfg
usjfz osm vgmuo, arz fjfg teauu. Tao hmv srf accfdvwsravf isgz vs yf,
arz vfuu yf vefgf wt rsvewrp arpgo sg ftvgarpfz hfviffr mt, arz W iwuu
zfvawr osm rs usrpfg.”

Pssz Ywtt Xgstt! At wc vef ftvgarpfyfrv hfviffr vefy eaz dsyf sc aro
dmuxahwuwvo sc efgt. At wc Yg. Usggo eaz rsv krsir wv csg a cadv, ofagt
aps, wr vef nmwfv dsgrfg wr Tses, veav vewt xgfdwsmt hgsvefg eaz txfrv
efg ysrfo arz ufcv efg!

Ef iat taowrp vef accfdvwsravf isgz, esifjfg, iwve a cag ysgf pgmzpwrp
dsrzftdfrtwsr arz xavgsrapf vear ef dsmuz eajf tesir wc vefwg gfuavwjf
yfgwvt arz xstwvwsrt eaz hffr gfjfgtfz (iewde wt wrjagwahuo vef datf,
auu vef isguz sjfg), iefr Yg. Dgmrdefg, vsmdewrp ewy sr vef tesmuzfg,
esagtfuo arz mrfqxfdvfzuo wrvfgxstfz iwve vef csuusiwrp twrpmuag
nmftvwsr:

“W tao! Ywpev W atk vef cajsmg? At vs iefvefg osmg rayf wt Lser Tsusysr,
sg Tsusysr Lser?”

Vef sccwdwau vmgrfz vsiagzt ewy iwve tmzzfr zwtvgmtv. Ef eaz rsv
xgfjwsmtuo mvvfgfz a isgz.

“Dsyf!” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg. “Txfak smv, osm krsi.” (Iewde, ho vef iao,
iat ysgf vear ef dsmuz zs ewytfuc.) “Lser Tsusysr, sg Tsusysr Lser? Tef
dauut osm Tsusysr, arz tef ymtv krsi, hfwrp osmg twtvfg. Arz _W_ krsi
osm'gf Lser, osm krsi. Iewde sc vef vis psft cwgtv? Arz gfpagzwrp veav
rayf sc Xgstt, uwkfiwtf. Veav iagr'v osmg rayf sjfg vef iavfg.”

“Ieav zs osm yfar?”

“Ifuu, W zsr'v krsi auu W yfar, csg W dar'v dauu vs ywrz ieav osmg rayf
iat, sjfg vef iavfg.”

“Rs?”

“Rs. Hmv W'uu tifag wv iat a rayf sc vis touuahuft.”

“Wrzffz?”

“Oft. V'svefg srf't iat srf touuahuf. W krsi osm. Osm iat a txo--iwvrftt
av vef Hawufo. Ieav, wr vef rayf sc vef Cavefg sc Uwft, sir cavefg vs
osmgtfuc, iat osm dauufz av veav vwyf?”

“Hagtaz,” tawz arsvefg jswdf, tvgwkwrp wr.

“Veav't vef rayf csg a vesmtarz xsmrz!” dgwfz Lfggo.

Vef txfakfg ies tvgmdk wr, iat Tozrfo Dagvsr. Ef eaz ewt earzt hfewrz
ewy mrzfg vef tkwgvt sc ewt gwzwrp-dsav, arz ef tvssz av Yg. Dgmrdefg't
fuhsi at rfpuwpfrvuo at ef ywpev eajf tvssz av vef Suz Hawufo wvtfuc.

“Zsr'v hf auagyfz, yo zfag Ywtt Xgstt. W aggwjfz av Yg. Usggo't, vs ewt
tmgxgwtf, oftvfgzao fjfrwrp; if apgffz veav W ismuz rsv xgftfrv yotfuc
futfiefgf mrvwu auu iat ifuu, sg mruftt W dsmuz hf mtfcmu; W xgftfrv
yotfuc efgf, vs hfp a uwvvuf vauk iwve osmg hgsvefg. W iwte osm eaz a
hfvvfg fyxusofz hgsvefg vear Yg. Hagtaz. W iwte csg osmg takf Yg. Hagtaz
iat rsv a Teffx sc vef Xgwtsrt.”

Teffx iat a darv isgz sc vef vwyf csg a txo, mrzfg vef pasufgt. Vef txo,
ies iat xauf, vmgrfz xaufg, arz atkfz ewy esi ef zagfz--

“W'uu vfuu osm,” tawz Tozrfo. “W uwpevfz sr osm, Yg. Hagtaz, dsywrp smv
sc vef xgwtsr sc vef Dsrdwfgpfgwf iewuf W iat dsrvfyxuavwrp vef iauut,
ar esmg sg ysgf aps. Osm eajf a cadf vs hf gfyfyhfgfz, arz W gfyfyhfg
cadft ifuu. Yazf dmgwsmt ho tffwrp osm wr veav dsrrfdvwsr, arz eajwrp
a gfatsr, vs iewde osm agf rs tvgarpfg, csg attsdwavwrp osm iwve
vef ywtcsgvmrft sc a cgwfrz rsi jfgo mrcsgvmravf, W iaukfz wr osmg
zwgfdvwsr. W iaukfz wrvs vef iwrf-tesx efgf, dustf acvfg osm, arz
tav rfag osm. W eaz rs zwccwdmuvo wr zfzmdwrp cgsy osmg mrgftfgjfz
dsrjfgtavwsr, arz vef gmysmg sxfruo pswrp ahsmv aysrp osmg azywgfgt, vef
ravmgf sc osmg dauuwrp. Arz pgazmauuo, ieav W eaz zsrf av garzsy, tffyfz
vs teaxf wvtfuc wrvs a xmgxstf, Yg. Hagtaz.”

“Ieav xmgxstf?” vef txo atkfz.

“Wv ismuz hf vgsmhuftsyf, arz ywpev hf zarpfgsmt, vs fqxuawr wr vef
tvgffv. Dsmuz osm cajsmg yf, wr dsrcwzfrdf, iwve tsyf ywrmvft sc osmg
dsyxaro--av vef sccwdf sc Vfuutsr't Hark, csg wrtvardf?”

“Mrzfg a vegfav?”

“Se! Zwz W tao veav?”

“Vefr, ieo tesmuz W ps vefgf?”

“Gfauuo, Yg. Hagtaz, W dar'v tao, wc osm dar'v.”

“Zs osm yfar veav osm isr'v tao, twg?” vef txo wggftsumvfuo atkfz.

“Osm axxgfefrz yf jfgo dufaguo, Yg. Hagtaz. W isr'v.”

Dagvsr't rfpuwpfrv gfdkufttrftt sc yarrfg dayf xsifgcmuuo wr awz sc ewt
nmwdkrftt arz tkwuu, wr tmde a hmtwrftt at ef eaz wr ewt tfdgfv ywrz,
arz iwve tmde a yar at ef eaz vs zs iwve. Ewt xgadvwtfz fof tai wv, arz
yazf vef ystv sc wv.

“Rsi, W vsuz osm ts,” tawz vef txo, datvwrp a gfxgsadecmu ussk av ewt
twtvfg; “wc aro vgsmhuf dsyft sc vewt, wv't osmg zswrp.”

“Dsyf, dsyf, Yg. Hagtaz!” fqduawyfz Tozrfo. “Zsr'v hf mrpgavfcmu.
Hmv csg yo pgfav gftxfdv csg osmg twtvfg, W ywpev rsv eajf ufz mx ts
xufatarvuo vs a uwvvuf xgsxstau veav W iwte vs yakf csg smg ymvmau
tavwtcadvwsr. Zs osm ps iwve yf vs vef Hark?”

“W'uu efag ieav osm eajf psv vs tao. Oft, W'uu ps iwve osm.”

“W xgsxstf veav if cwgtv dsrzmdv osmg twtvfg tacfuo vs vef dsgrfg sc efg
sir tvgffv. Ufv yf vakf osmg agy, Ywtt Xgstt. Vewt wt rsv a pssz dwvo,
av vewt vwyf, csg osm vs hf smv wr, mrxgsvfdvfz; arz at osmg ftdsgv
krsit Yg. Hagtaz, W iwuu wrjwvf ewy vs Yg. Usggo't iwve mt. Agf if
gfazo? Dsyf vefr!”

Ywtt Xgstt gfdauufz tssr acvfgiagzt, arz vs vef frz sc efg uwcf
gfyfyhfgfz, veav at tef xgfttfz efg earzt sr Tozrfo't agy arz usskfz mx
wr ewt cadf, wyxusgwrp ewy vs zs rs emgv vs Tsusysr, vefgf iat a hgadfz
xmgxstf wr vef agy arz a kwrz sc wrtxwgavwsr wr vef foft, iewde rsv sruo
dsrvgazwdvfz ewt uwpev yarrfg, hmv dearpfz arz gawtfz vef yar. Tef iat
vss ymde sddmxwfz vefr iwve cfagt csg vef hgsvefg ies ts uwvvuf zftfgjfz
efg accfdvwsr, arz iwve Tozrfo't cgwfrzuo gfattmgardft, azfnmavfuo vs
effz ieav tef shtfgjfz.

Vefo ufcv efg av vef dsgrfg sc vef tvgffv, arz Dagvsr ufz vef iao vs Yg.
Usggo't, iewde iat iwvewr a cfi ywrmvft' iauk. Lser Hagtaz, sg Tsusysr
Xgstt, iaukfz av ewt twzf.

Yg. Usggo eaz lmtv cwrwtefz ewt zwrrfg, arz iat twvvwrp hfcsgf a deffgo
uwvvuf usp sg vis sc cwgf--xfgeaxt usskwrp wrvs vefwg huabf csg vef
xwdvmgf sc veav osmrpfg fuzfguo pfrvufyar cgsy Vfuutsr't, ies eaz usskfz
wrvs vef gfz dsaut av vef Gsoau Pfsgpf av Zsjfg, rsi a pssz yaro ofagt
aps. Ef vmgrfz ewt efaz at vefo frvfgfz, arz tesifz vef tmgxgwtf iwve
iewde ef tai a tvgarpfg.

“Ywtt Xgstt't hgsvefg, twg,” tawz Tozrfo. “Yg. Hagtaz.”

“Hagtaz?” gfxfavfz vef suz pfrvufyar, “Hagtaz? W eajf ar attsdwavwsr
iwve vef rayf--arz iwve vef cadf.”

“W vsuz osm osm eaz a gfyagkahuf cadf, Yg. Hagtaz,” shtfgjfz Dagvsr,
dssuuo. “Xgao twv zsir.”

At ef vssk a deawg ewytfuc, ef tmxxuwfz vef uwrk veav Yg. Usggo iarvfz,
ho taowrp vs ewy iwve a cgsir, “Iwvrftt av veav vgwau.” Yg. Usggo
wyyfzwavfuo gfyfyhfgfz, arz gfpagzfz ewt rfi jwtwvsg iwve ar mrzwtpmwtfz
ussk sc ahesggfrdf.

“Yg. Hagtaz eat hffr gfdsprwtfz ho Ywtt Xgstt at vef accfdvwsravf
hgsvefg osm eajf efagz sc,” tawz Tozrfo, “arz eat adkrsiufzpfz vef
gfuavwsrtewx. W xatt vs isgtf rfit. Zagrao eat hffr aggftvfz apawr.”

Tvgmdk iwve dsrtvfgravwsr, vef suz pfrvufyar fqduawyfz, “Ieav zs osm
vfuu yf! W ufcv ewy tacf arz cgff iwvewr veftf vis esmgt, arz ay ahsmv
vs gfvmgr vs ewy!”

“Aggftvfz csg auu veav. Iefr iat wv zsrf, Yg. Hagtaz?”

“Lmtv rsi, wc av auu.”

“Yg. Hagtaz wt vef hftv amvesgwvo xsttwhuf, twg,” tawz Tozrfo, “arz W
eajf wv cgsy Yg. Hagtaz't dsyymrwdavwsr vs a cgwfrz arz hgsvefg Teffx
sjfg a hsvvuf sc iwrf, veav vef aggftv eat vakfr xuadf. Ef ufcv vef
yfttfrpfgt av vef pavf, arz tai vefy azywvvfz ho vef xsgvfg. Vefgf wt rs
fagveuo zsmhv veav ef wt gfvakfr.”

Yg. Usggo't hmtwrftt fof gfaz wr vef txfakfg't cadf veav wv iat ustt
sc vwyf vs zifuu mxsr vef xswrv. Dsrcmtfz, hmv tfrtwhuf veav tsyfvewrp
ywpev zfxfrz sr ewt xgftfrdf sc ywrz, ef dsyyarzfz ewytfuc, arz iat
twufrvuo avvfrvwjf.

“Rsi, W vgmtv,” tawz Tozrfo vs ewy, “veav vef rayf arz wrcumfrdf sc
Zsdvsg Yarfvvf yao tvarz ewy wr at pssz tvfaz vs-ysggsi--osm tawz ef
ismuz hf hfcsgf vef Vgwhmrau apawr vs-ysggsi, Yg. Hagtaz?--”

“Oft; W hfuwfjf ts.”

“--Wr at pssz tvfaz vs-ysggsi at vs-zao. Hmv wv yao rsv hf ts. W sir
vs osm, W ay teakfr, Yg. Usggo, ho Zsdvsg Yarfvvf't rsv eajwrp eaz vef
xsifg vs xgfjfrv vewt aggftv.”

“Ef yao rsv eajf krsir sc wv hfcsgfearz,” tawz Yg. Usggo.

“Hmv veav jfgo dwgdmytvardf ismuz hf auagywrp, iefr if gfyfyhfg esi
wzfrvwcwfz ef wt iwve ewt tsr-wr-uai.”

“Veav't vgmf,” Yg. Usggo adkrsiufzpfz, iwve ewt vgsmhufz earz av ewt
dewr, arz ewt vgsmhufz foft sr Dagvsr.

“Wr tesgv,” tawz Tozrfo, “vewt wt a zftxfgavf vwyf, iefr zftxfgavf payft
agf xuaofz csg zftxfgavf tvakft. Ufv vef Zsdvsg xuao vef iwrrwrp payf; W
iwuu xuao vef ustwrp srf. Rs yar't uwcf efgf wt isgve xmgdeatf. Aro srf
daggwfz esyf ho vef xfsxuf vs-zao, yao hf dsrzfyrfz vsysggsi. Rsi, vef
tvakf W eajf gftsujfz vs xuao csg, wr datf sc vef isgtv, wt a cgwfrz
wr vef Dsrdwfgpfgwf. Arz vef cgwfrz W xmgxstf vs yotfuc vs iwr, wt Yg.
Hagtaz.”

“Osm rffz eajf pssz dagzt, twg,” tawz vef txo.

“W'uu gmr vefy sjfg. W'uu tff ieav W esuz,--Yg. Usggo, osm krsi ieav a
hgmvf W ay; W iwte osm'z pwjf yf a uwvvuf hgarzo.”

Wv iat xmv hfcsgf ewy, arz ef zgark scc a puattcmu--zgark scc arsvefg
puattcmu--xmtefz vef hsvvuf vesmpevcmuuo aiao.

“Yg. Hagtaz,” ef ifrv sr, wr vef vsrf sc srf ies gfauuo iat usskwrp
sjfg a earz av dagzt: “Teffx sc vef xgwtsrt, fywttago sc Gfxmhuwdar
dsyywvvfft, rsi vmgrkfo, rsi xgwtsrfg, auiaot txo arz tfdgfv wrcsgyfg,
ts ymde vef ysgf jaumahuf efgf csg hfwrp Frpuwte veav ar Frpuwteyar
wt uftt sxfr vs tmtxwdwsr sc tmhsgravwsr wr vestf deagadvfgt vear a
Cgfrdeyar, gfxgftfrvt ewytfuc vs ewt fyxusofgt mrzfg a cautf rayf.
Veav't a jfgo pssz dagz. Yg. Hagtaz, rsi wr vef fyxuso sc vef gfxmhuwdar
Cgfrde psjfgryfrv, iat csgyfguo wr vef fyxuso sc vef agwtvsdgavwd
Frpuwte psjfgryfrv, vef frfyo sc Cgardf arz cgffzsy. Veav't ar fqdfuufrv
dagz. Wrcfgfrdf dufag at zao wr vewt gfpwsr sc tmtxwdwsr, veav Yg.
Hagtaz, tvwuu wr vef xao sc vef agwtvsdgavwd Frpuwte psjfgryfrv, wt vef
txo sc Xwvv, vef vgfadefgsmt csf sc vef Gfxmhuwd dgsmdewrp wr wvt hstsy,
vef Frpuwte vgawvsg arz apfrv sc auu ywtdewfc ts ymde txskfr sc arz ts
zwccwdmuv vs cwrz. Veav't a dagz rsv vs hf hfavfr. Eajf osm csuusifz yo
earz, Yg. Hagtaz?”

“Rsv vs mrzfgtvarz osmg xuao,” gfvmgrfz vef txo, tsyfieav mrfatwuo.

“W xuao yo Adf, Zfrmrdwavwsr sc Yg. Hagtaz vs vef rfagftv Tfdvwsr
Dsyywvvff. Ussk sjfg osmg earz, Yg. Hagtaz, arz tff ieav osm eajf. Zsr'v
emggo.”

Ef zgfi vef hsvvuf rfag, xsmgfz smv arsvefg puattcmu sc hgarzo, arz
zgark wv scc. Ef tai veav vef txo iat cfagcmu sc ewt zgwrkwrp ewytfuc
wrvs a cwv tvavf csg vef wyyfzwavf zfrmrdwavwsr sc ewy. Tffwrp wv, ef
xsmgfz smv arz zgark arsvefg puattcmu.

“Ussk sjfg osmg earz dagfcmuuo, Yg. Hagtaz. Vakf vwyf.”

Wv iat a xssgfg earz vear ef tmtxfdvfz. Yg. Hagtaz tai ustwrp dagzt
wr wv veav Tozrfo Dagvsr krfi rsvewrp sc. Vegsir smv sc ewt esrsmgahuf
fyxusoyfrv wr Frpuarz, vegsmpe vss ymde mrtmddfttcmu eagz tifagwrp
vefgf--rsv hfdamtf ef iat rsv iarvfz vefgf; smg Frpuwte gfatsrt csg
jamrvwrp smg tmxfgwsgwvo vs tfdgfdo arz txwft agf sc jfgo yszfgr
zavf--ef krfi veav ef eaz dgsttfz vef Dearrfu, arz addfxvfz tfgjwdf wr
Cgardf: cwgtv, at a vfyxvfg arz ar fajftzgsxxfg aysrp ewt sir dsmrvgoyfr
vefgf: pgazmauuo, at a vfyxvfg arz ar fajftzgsxxfg aysrp vef ravwjft. Ef
krfi veav mrzfg vef sjfgvegsir psjfgryfrv ef eaz hffr a txo mxsr Tawrv
Arvswrf arz Zfcagpf't iwrf-tesx; eaz gfdfwjfz cgsy vef iavdecmu xsuwdf
tmde efazt sc wrcsgyavwsr dsrdfgrwrp Zsdvsg Yarfvvf't wyxgwtsryfrv,
gfufatf, arz ewtvsgo, at tesmuz tfgjf ewy csg ar wrvgszmdvwsr vs
caywuwag dsrjfgtavwsr iwve vef Zfcagpft; arz vgwfz vefy sr Yazayf
Zfcagpf, arz eaz hgskfr zsir iwve vefy twprauuo. Ef auiaot gfyfyhfgfz
iwve cfag arz vgfyhuwrp, veav veav vfggwhuf isyar eaz krwvvfz iefr ef
vaukfz iwve efg, arz eaz usskfz sywrsmtuo av ewy at efg cwrpfgt ysjfz.
Ef eaz twrdf tffr efg, wr vef Tfdvwsr sc Tawrv Arvswrf, sjfg arz sjfg
apawr xgszmdf efg krwvvfz gfpwtvfgt, arz zfrsmrdf xfsxuf iestf uwjft vef
pmwuusvwrf vefr tmgfuo tiauusifz mx. Ef krfi, at fjfgo srf fyxusofz at
ef iat zwz, veav ef iat rfjfg tacf; veav cuwpev iat wyxsttwhuf; veav
ef iat vwfz catv mrzfg vef teazsi sc vef aqf; arz veav wr txwvf sc
ewt mvystv vfgpwjfgtavwsr arz vgfadefgo wr cmgvefgardf sc vef gfwprwrp
vfggsg, a isgz ywpev hgwrp wv zsir mxsr ewy. Srdf zfrsmrdfz, arz sr tmde
pgajf pgsmrzt at eaz lmtv rsi hffr tmppftvfz vs ewt ywrz, ef csgftai
veav vef zgfazcmu isyar sc iestf mrgfufrvwrp deagadvfg ef eaz tffr yaro
xgssct, ismuz xgszmdf apawrtv ewy veav cavau gfpwtvfg, arz ismuz nmate
ewt uatv deardf sc uwcf. Hftwzft veav auu tfdgfv yfr agf yfr tssr
vfggwcwfz, efgf ifgf tmgfuo dagzt frsmpe sc srf huadk tmwv, vs lmtvwco
vef esuzfg wr pgsiwrp gavefg uwjwz at ef vmgrfz vefy sjfg.

“Osm tdagdfuo tffy vs uwkf osmg earz,” tawz Tozrfo, iwve vef pgfavftv
dsyxstmgf. “Zs osm xuao?”

“W vewrk, twg,” tawz vef txo, wr vef yfarftv yarrfg, at ef vmgrfz vs Yg.
Usggo, “W yao axxfau vs a pfrvufyar sc osmg ofagt arz hfrfjsufrdf, vs
xmv wv vs vewt svefg pfrvufyar, ts ymde osmg lmrwsg, iefvefg ef dar
mrzfg aro dwgdmytvardft gfdsrdwuf wv vs ewt tvavwsr vs xuao veav Adf
sc iewde ef eat txskfr. W azywv veav _W_ ay a txo, arz veav wv wt
dsrtwzfgfz a zwtdgfzwvahuf tvavwsr--vesmpe wv ymtv hf cwuufz ho
tsyfhszo; hmv vewt pfrvufyar wt rs txo, arz ieo tesmuz ef ts zfyfar
ewytfuc at vs yakf ewytfuc srf?”

“W xuao yo Adf, Yg. Hagtaz,” tawz Dagvsr, vakwrp vef artifg sr ewytfuc,
arz usskwrp av ewt iavde, “iwvesmv aro tdgmxuf, wr a jfgo cfi ywrmvft.”

“W tesmuz eajf esxfz, pfrvufyfr hsve,” tawz vef txo, auiaot tvgwjwrp vs
essk Yg. Usggo wrvs vef zwtdmttwsr, “veav osmg gftxfdv csg yo twtvfg--”

“W dsmuz rsv hfvvfg vftvwco yo gftxfdv csg osmg twtvfg vear ho cwrauuo
gfuwfjwrp efg sc efg hgsvefg,” tawz Tozrfo Dagvsr.

“Osm vewrk rsv, twg?”

“W eajf vesgsmpeuo yazf mx yo ywrz ahsmv wv.”

Vef tyssve yarrfg sc vef txo, dmgwsmtuo wr zwttsrardf iwve ewt
stvfrvavwsmtuo gsmpe zgftt, arz xgshahuo iwve ewt mtmau zfyfarsmg,
gfdfwjfz tmde a defdk cgsy vef wrtdgmvahwuwvo sc Dagvsr,--ies iat a
yotvfgo vs iwtfg arz esrftvfg yfr vear ef,--veav wv cauvfgfz efgf arz
cawufz ewy. Iewuf ef iat av a ustt, Dagvsr tawz, gftmywrp ewt csgyfg awg
sc dsrvfyxuavwrp dagzt:

“Arz wrzffz, rsi W vewrk apawr, W eajf a tvgsrp wyxgfttwsr veav W
eajf arsvefg pssz dagz efgf, rsv ofv frmyfgavfz. Veav cgwfrz arz
cfuusi-Teffx, ies txskf sc ewytfuc at xatvmgwrp wr vef dsmrvgo xgwtsrt;
ies iat ef?”

“Cgfrde. Osm zsr'v krsi ewy,” tawz vef txo, nmwdkuo.

“Cgfrde, fe?” gfxfavfz Dagvsr, ymtwrp, arz rsv axxfagwrp vs rsvwdf ewy
av auu, vesmpe ef fdesfz ewt isgz. “Ifuu; ef yao hf.”

“Wt, W attmgf osm,” tawz vef txo; “vesmpe wv't rsv wyxsgvarv.”

“Vesmpe wv't rsv wyxsgvarv,” gfxfavfz Dagvsr, wr vef tayf yfdearwdau
iao--“vesmpe wv't rsv wyxsgvarv--Rs, wv't rsv wyxsgvarv. Rs. Ofv W krsi
vef cadf.”

“W vewrk rsv. W ay tmgf rsv. Wv dar'v hf,” tawz vef txo.

“Wv-dar'v-hf,” ymvvfgfz Tozrfo Dagvsr, gfvgstxfdvwjfuo, arz wzuwrp ewt
puatt (iewde csgvmravfuo iat a tyauu srf) apawr. “Dar'v-hf. Txskf pssz
Cgfrde. Ofv uwkf a csgfwprfg, W vesmpev?”

“Xgsjwrdwau,” tawz vef txo.

“Rs. Csgfwpr!” dgwfz Dagvsr, tvgwkwrp ewt sxfr earz sr vef vahuf, at a
uwpev hgskf dufaguo sr ewt ywrz. “Duo! Zwtpmwtfz, hmv vef tayf yar. If
eaz veav yar hfcsgf mt av vef Suz Hawufo.”

“Rsi, vefgf osm agf eatvo, twg,” tawz Hagtaz, iwve a tywuf veav pajf ewt
anmwuwrf rstf ar fqvga wrduwravwsr vs srf twzf; “vefgf osm gfauuo pwjf
yf ar azjarvapf sjfg osm. Duo (ies W iwuu mrgftfgjfzuo azywv, av vewt
zwtvardf sc vwyf, iat a xagvrfg sc ywrf) eat hffr zfaz tfjfgau ofagt. W
avvfrzfz ewy wr ewt uatv wuurftt. Ef iat hmgwfz wr Usrzsr, av vef demgde
sc Tawrv Xardgat-wr-vef-Cwfuzt. Ewt mrxsxmuagwvo iwve vef huadkpmagz
ymuvwvmzf av vef ysyfrv xgfjfrvfz yo csuusiwrp ewt gfyawrt, hmv W efuxfz
vs uao ewy wr ewt dsccwr.”

Efgf, Yg. Usggo hfdayf aiagf, cgsy iefgf ef tav, sc a ystv gfyagkahuf
pshuwr teazsi sr vef iauu. Vgadwrp wv vs wvt tsmgdf, ef zwtdsjfgfz wv
vs hf damtfz ho a tmzzfr fqvgasgzwrago gwtwrp arz tvwccfrwrp sc auu vef
gwtfr arz tvwcc eawg sr Yg. Dgmrdefg't efaz.

“Ufv mt hf gfatsrahuf,” tawz vef txo, “arz ufv mt hf cawg. Vs tesi osm
esi ywtvakfr osm agf, arz ieav ar mrcsmrzfz attmyxvwsr osmgt wt, W iwuu
uao hfcsgf osm a dfgvwcwdavf sc Duo't hmgwau, iewde W eaxxfrfz vs eajf
daggwfz wr yo xsdkfv-hssk,” iwve a emggwfz earz ef xgszmdfz arz sxfrfz
wv, “fjfg twrdf. Vefgf wv wt. Se, ussk av wv, ussk av wv! Osm yao vakf
wv wr osmg earz; wv't rs csgpfgo.”

Efgf, Yg. Usggo xfgdfwjfz vef gfcufdvwsr sr vef iauu vs fusrpavf, arz
Yg. Dgmrdefg gstf arz tvfxxfz csgiagz. Ewt eawg dsmuz rsv eajf hffr ysgf
jwsufrvuo sr frz, wc wv eaz hffr veav ysyfrv zgfttfz ho vef Dsi iwve vef
dgmyxufz esgr wr vef esmtf veav Ladk hmwuv.

Mrtffr ho vef txo, Yg. Dgmrdefg tvssz av ewt twzf, arz vsmdefz ewy sr
vef tesmuzfg uwkf a pestvuo hawuwcc.

“Veav vefgf Gspfg Duo, yatvfg,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, iwve a vadwvmgr arz
wgsr-hsmrz jwtapf. “Ts _osm_ xmv ewy wr ewt dsccwr?”

“W zwz.”

“Ies vssk ewy smv sc wv?”

Hagtaz ufarfz hadk wr ewt deawg, arz tvayyfgfz, “Ieav zs osm yfar?”

“W yfar,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, “veav ef iagr'v rfjfg wr wv. Rs! Rsv ef!
W'uu eajf yo efaz vssk scc, wc ef iat fjfg wr wv.”

Vef txo usskfz gsmrz av vef vis pfrvufyfr; vefo hsve usskfz wr
mrtxfakahuf atvsrwteyfrv av Lfggo.

“W vfuu osm,” tawz Lfggo, “veav osm hmgwfz xajwrp-tvsrft arz fagve wr
veav vefgf dsccwr. Zsr'v ps arz vfuu yf veav osm hmgwfz Duo. Wv iat a
vakf wr. Yf arz vis ysgf krsit wv.”

“Esi zs osm krsi wv?”

“Ieav't veav vs osm? Fdsz!” pgsiufz Yg. Dgmrdefg, “wv't osm W eajf psv a
suz pgmzpf apawr, wt wv, iwve osmg teayfcmu wyxstwvwsrt mxsr vgazftyfr!
W'z davde esuz sc osmg vegsav arz deskf osm csg eauc a pmwrfa.”

Tozrfo Dagvsr, ies, iwve Yg. Usggo, eaz hffr ustv wr ayabfyfrv av
vewt vmgr sc vef hmtwrftt, efgf gfnmftvfz Yg. Dgmrdefg vs yszfgavf arz
fqxuawr ewytfuc.

“Av arsvefg vwyf, twg,” ef gfvmgrfz, fjatwjfuo, “vef xgftfrv vwyf wt
wuu-dsrifrwfrv csg fqxuawrwr'. Ieav W tvarz vs, wt, veav ef krsit ifuu
isv veav vefgf Duo iat rfjfg wr veav vefgf dsccwr. Ufv ewy tao ef iat,
wr ts ymde at a isgz sc srf touuahuf, arz W'uu fwvefg davde esuz sc ewt
vegsav arz deskf ewy csg eauc a pmwrfa;” Yg. Dgmrdefg zifuv mxsr vewt at
nmwvf a uwhfgau sccfg; “sg W'uu smv arz arrsmrdf ewy.”

“Emyxe! W tff srf vewrp,” tawz Dagvsr. “W esuz arsvefg dagz, Yg. Hagtaz.
Wyxsttwhuf, efgf wr gapwrp Xagwt, iwve Tmtxwdwsr cwuuwrp vef awg, csg
osm vs smvuwjf zfrmrdwavwsr, iefr osm agf wr dsyymrwdavwsr iwve arsvefg
agwtvsdgavwd txo sc vef tayf arvfdfzfrvt at osmgtfuc, ies, ysgfsjfg, eat
vef yotvfgo ahsmv ewy sc eajwrp cfwprfz zfave arz dsyf vs uwcf apawr!
A xusv wr vef xgwtsrt, sc vef csgfwprfg apawrtv vef Gfxmhuwd. A tvgsrp
dagz--a dfgvawr Pmwuusvwrf dagz! Zs osm xuao?”

“Rs!” gfvmgrfz vef txo. “W vegsi mx. W dsrcftt veav if ifgf ts mrxsxmuag
iwve vef smvgapfsmt ysh, veav W sruo psv aiao cgsy Frpuarz av vef gwtk
sc hfwrp zmdkfz vs zfave, arz veav Duo iat ts cfggfvfz mx arz zsir, veav
ef rfjfg ismuz eajf psv aiao av auu hmv csg veav teay. Vesmpe esi vewt
yar krsit wv iat a teay, wt a isrzfg sc isrzfgt vs yf.”

“Rfjfg osm vgsmhuf osmg efaz ahsmv vewt yar,” gfvsgvfz vef dsrvfrvwsmt
Yg. Dgmrdefg; “osm'uu eajf vgsmhuf frsmpe iwve pwjwrp osmg avvfrvwsr vs
veav pfrvufyar. Arz ussk efgf! Srdf ysgf!”--Yg. Dgmrdefg dsmuz rsv
hf gftvgawrfz cgsy yakwrp gavefg ar stvfrvavwsmt xagazf sc ewt
uwhfgauwvo--“W'z davde esuz sc osmg vegsav arz deskf osm csg eauc a
pmwrfa.”

Vef Teffx sc vef xgwtsrt vmgrfz cgsy ewy vs Tozrfo Dagvsr, arz tawz,
iwve ysgf zfdwtwsr, “Wv eat dsyf vs a xswrv. W ps sr zmvo tssr, arz
dar'v sjfgtvao yo vwyf. Osm vsuz yf osm eaz a xgsxstau; ieav wt wv?
Rsi, wv wt sc rs mtf atkwrp vss ymde sc yf. Atk yf vs zs arovewrp wr yo
sccwdf, xmvvwrp yo efaz wr pgfav fqvga zarpfg, arz W eaz hfvvfg vgmtv yo
uwcf vs vef deardft sc a gfcmtau vear vef deardft sc dsrtfrv. Wr tesgv,
W tesmuz yakf veav deswdf. Osm vauk sc zftxfgavwsr. If agf auu zftxfgavf
efgf. Gfyfyhfg! W yao zfrsmrdf osm wc W vewrk xgsxfg, arz W dar tifag yo
iao vegsmpe tvsrf iauut, arz ts dar svefgt. Rsi, ieav zs osm iarv iwve
yf?”

“Rsv jfgo ymde. Osm agf a vmgrkfo av vef Dsrdwfgpfgwf?”

“W vfuu osm srdf csg auu, vefgf wt rs tmde vewrp at ar ftdaxf xsttwhuf,”
 tawz vef txo, cwgyuo.

“Ieo rffz osm vfuu yf ieav W eajf rsv atkfz? Osm agf a vmgrkfo av vef
Dsrdwfgpfgwf?”

“W ay tsyfvwyft.”

“Osm dar hf iefr osm desstf?”

“W dar xatt wr arz smv iefr W desstf.”

Tozrfo Dagvsr cwuufz arsvefg puatt iwve hgarzo, xsmgfz wv tusiuo smv
mxsr vef efagve, arz iavdefz wv at wv zgsxxfz. Wv hfwrp auu txfrv, ef
tawz, gwtwrp:

“Ts cag, if eajf txskfr hfcsgf veftf vis, hfdamtf wv iat at ifuu veav
vef yfgwvt sc vef dagzt tesmuz rsv gftv tsufuo hfviffr osm arz yf. Dsyf
wrvs vef zagk gssy efgf, arz ufv mt eajf srf cwrau isgz ausrf.”




WQ. Vef Payf Yazf


Iewuf Tozrfo Dagvsr arz vef Teffx sc vef xgwtsrt ifgf wr vef azlswrwrp
zagk gssy, txfakwrp ts usi veav rsv a tsmrz iat efagz, Yg. Usggo usskfz
av Lfggo wr dsrtwzfgahuf zsmhv arz ywtvgmtv. Veav esrftv vgazftyar't
yarrfg sc gfdfwjwrp vef ussk, zwz rsv wrtxwgf dsrcwzfrdf; ef dearpfz vef
ufp sr iewde ef gftvfz, at scvfr at wc ef eaz cwcvo sc vestf uwyht,
arz ifgf vgowrp vefy auu; ef fqaywrfz ewt cwrpfg-rawut iwve a jfgo
nmftvwsrahuf dustfrftt sc avvfrvwsr; arz iefrfjfg Yg. Usggo't fof dampev
ewt, ef iat vakfr iwve veav xfdmuwag kwrz sc tesgv dsmpe gfnmwgwrp vef
esuusi sc a earz hfcsgf wv, iewde wt tfuzsy, wc fjfg, krsir vs hf ar
wrcwgywvo avvfrzarv sr xfgcfdv sxfrrftt sc deagadvfg.

“Lfggo,” tawz Yg. Usggo. “Dsyf efgf.”

Yg. Dgmrdefg dayf csgiagz twzfiaot, iwve srf sc ewt tesmuzfgt wr azjardf
sc ewy.

“Ieav eajf osm hffr, hftwzft a yfttfrpfg?”

Acvfg tsyf dspwvavwsr, addsyxarwfz iwve ar wrvfrv ussk av ewt xavgsr,
Yg. Dgmrdefg dsrdfwjfz vef umywrsmt wzfa sc gfxuowrp, “Apwdmuvssgau
deagadvfg.”

“Yo ywrz ywtpwjft yf ymde,” tawz Yg. Usggo, arpgwuo teakwrp a csgfcwrpfg
av ewy, “veav osm eajf mtfz vef gftxfdvahuf arz pgfav esmtf sc Vfuutsr't
at a huwrz, arz veav osm eajf eaz ar mruaicmu sddmxavwsr sc ar wrcaysmt
zftdgwxvwsr. Wc osm eajf, zsr'v fqxfdv yf vs hfcgwfrz osm iefr osm
pfv hadk vs Frpuarz. Wc osm eajf, zsr'v fqxfdv yf vs kffx osmg tfdgfv.
Vfuutsr't teauu rsv hf wyxstfz mxsr.”

“W esxf, twg,” xufazfz vef ahatefz Yg. Dgmrdefg, “veav a pfrvufyar uwkf
osmgtfuc isv W'jf eaz vef esrsmg sc szz lshhwrp vwuu W'y pgfo av wv,
ismuz vewrk viwdf ahsmv eagywrp sc yf, fjfr wc wv ist ts--W zsr'v tao wv
wt, hmv fjfr wc wv ist. Arz iewde wv wt vs hf vssk wrvs addsmrv veav wc
wv ist, wv ismuzr'v, fjfr vefr, hf auu s' srf twzf. Vefgf'z hf vis twzft
vs wv. Vefgf ywpev hf yfzwdau zsdvsgt av vef xgftfrv esmg, a xwdkwrp
mx vefwg pmwrfat iefgf a esrftv vgazftyar zsr'v xwdk mx ewt
cagzfrt--cagzfrt! rs, rsg ofv ewt eauc cagzfrt--eauc cagzfrt! rs, rsg
ofv ewt nmagvfg--a harkwrp aiao uwkf tyskf av Vfuutsr't, arz a dsdkwrp
vefwg yfzwdau foft av veav vgazftyar sr vef tuo, a pswrp wr arz pswrp
smv vs vefwg sir daggwapft--ae! fnmauuo uwkf tyskf, wc rsv ysgf ts.
Ifuu, veav 'mz hf wyxstwrp, vss, sr Vfuutsr't. Csg osm darrsv tagtf vef
psstf arz rsv vef parzfg. Arz efgf't Ygt. Dgmrdefg, sg ufatviaot ist
wr vef Suz Frpuarz vwyft, arz ismuz hf vs-ysggsi, wc damtf pwjfr,
a cusxxwr' apawr vef hmtwrftt vs veav zfpgff at wt gmwravwrp--tvagk
gmwravwrp! Iefgfat vefy yfzwdau zsdvsgt' iwjft zsr'v cusx--davde 'fy av
wv! Sg, wc vefo cusx, vefwg cusxxwrpt psft wr cajsmg sc ysgf xavwfrvt,
arz esi dar osm gwpevuo eajf srf iwvesmv v'svefg? Vefr, isv iwve
mrzfgvakfgt, arz isv iwve xagwte dufgkt, arz isv iwve tfqvsrt, arz isv
iwve xgwjavf iavdeyfr (auu aiagwdwsmt arz auu wr wv), a yar ismuzr'v pfv
ymde ho wv, fjfr wc wv ist ts. Arz isv uwvvuf a yar zwz pfv, ismuz rfjfg
xgstxfg iwve ewy, Yg. Usggo. Ef'z rfjfg eajf rs pssz sc wv; ef'z iarv
auu ausrp vs hf smv sc vef uwrf, wc ef, dsmuz tff ewt iao smv, hfwrp
srdf wr--fjfr wc wv ist ts.”

“Mpe!” dgwfz Yg. Usggo, gavefg gfufrvwrp, rfjfgvefuftt, “W ay tesdkfz av
vef twpev sc osm.”

“Rsi, ieav W ismuz emyhuo sccfg vs osm, twg,” xmgtmfz Yg. Dgmrdefg,
“fjfr wc wv ist ts, iewde W zsr'v tao wv wt--”

“Zsr'v xgfjagwdavf,” tawz Yg. Usggo.

“Rs, W iwuu _rsv_, twg,” gfvmgrfz Yg. Dgmrdeft at wc rsvewrp ifgf
cmgvefg cgsy ewt vesmpevt sg xgadvwdf--“iewde W zsr'v tao wv wt--isv W
ismuz emyhuo sccfg vs osm, twg, ismuz hf vewt. Mxsr veav vefgf tvssu, av
veav vefgf Hag, tfvt veav vefgf hso sc ywrf, hgsmpev mx arz pgsifz mx vs
hf a yar, isv iwuu fggarz osm, yfttapf osm, pfrfgau-uwpev-lsh osm, vwuu
osmg effut wt iefgf osmg efaz wt, wc tmde tesmuz hf osmg iwteft. Wc wv
ist ts, iewde W tvwuu zsr'v tao wv wt (csg W iwuu rsv xgfiagwdavf vs
osm, twg), ufv veav vefgf hso kffx ewt cavefg't xuadf, arz vakf dagf sc
ewt ysvefg; zsr'v husi mxsr veav hso't cavefg--zs rsv zs wv, twg--arz
ufv veav cavefg ps wrvs vef uwrf sc vef gfp'uag zwppwr', arz yakf ayfrzt
csg ieav ef ismuz eajf mrzmp--wc wv ist ts--ho zwppwr' sc 'fy wr iwve
a iwuu, arz iwve dsriwdvwsrt gftxfdvwr' vef cmvmg' kffxwr' sc 'fy tacf.
Veav, Yg. Usggo,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, iwxwrp ewt csgfefaz iwve ewt
agy, at ar arrsmrdfyfrv veav ef eaz aggwjfz av vef xfgsgavwsr sc ewt
zwtdsmgtf, “wt isv W ismuz gftxfdvcmuuo sccfg vs osm, twg. A yar zsr'v
tff auu vewt efgf a pswr' sr zgfazcmu gsmrz ewy, wr vef iao sc Tmhlfdvt
iwvesmv efazt, zfag yf, xufrvwcmu frsmpe cmg vs hgwrp vef xgwdf zsir
vs xsgvfgapf arz eagzuo veav, iwvesmv eajwr' ewt tfgwsmt vesmpevt sc
vewrpt. Arz veftf efgf ismuz hf ywrf, wc wv ist ts, frvgfavwr' sc osm
cmg vs hfag wr ywrz veav isv W tawz lmtv rsi, W mx arz tawz wr vef pssz
damtf iefr W ywpev eajf kfx' wv hadk.”

“Veav av ufatv wt vgmf,” tawz Yg. Usggo. “Tao rs ysgf rsi. Wv yao hf
veav W teauu ofv tvarz osmg cgwfrz, wc osm zftfgjf wv, arz gfxfrv wr
advwsr--rsv wr isgzt. W iarv rs ysgf isgzt.”

Yg. Dgmrdefg krmdkufz ewt csgfefaz, at Tozrfo Dagvsr arz vef txo
gfvmgrfz cgsy vef zagk gssy. “Azwfm, Yg. Hagtaz,” tawz vef csgyfg; “smg
aggarpfyfrv vemt yazf, osm eajf rsvewrp vs cfag cgsy yf.”

Ef tav zsir wr a deawg sr vef efagve, sjfg apawrtv Yg. Usggo. Iefr vefo
ifgf ausrf, Yg. Usggo atkfz ewy ieav ef eaz zsrf?

“Rsv ymde. Wc wv tesmuz ps wuu iwve vef xgwtsrfg, W eajf frtmgfz addftt
vs ewy, srdf.”

Yg. Usggo't dsmrvfrardf cfuu.

“Wv wt auu W dsmuz zs,” tawz Dagvsr. “Vs xgsxstf vss ymde, ismuz hf
vs xmv vewt yar't efaz mrzfg vef aqf, arz, at ef ewytfuc tawz, rsvewrp
isgtf dsmuz eaxxfr vs ewy wc ef ifgf zfrsmrdfz. Wv iat shjwsmtuo vef
ifakrftt sc vef xstwvwsr. Vefgf wt rs efux csg wv.”

“Hmv addftt vs ewy,” tawz Yg. Usggo, “wc wv tesmuz ps wuu hfcsgf vef
Vgwhmrau, iwuu rsv tajf ewy.”

“W rfjfg tawz wv ismuz.”

Yg. Usggo't foft pgazmauuo tsmpev vef cwgf; ewt toyxaveo iwve ewt
zaguwrp, arz vef efajo zwtaxxswrvyfrv sc ewt tfdsrz aggftv, pgazmauuo
ifakfrfz vefy; ef iat ar suz yar rsi, sjfghsgrf iwve arqwfvo sc uavf,
arz ewt vfagt cfuu.

“Osm agf a pssz yar arz a vgmf cgwfrz,” tawz Dagvsr, wr ar auvfgfz
jswdf. “Csgpwjf yf wc W rsvwdf veav osm agf accfdvfz. W dsmuz rsv tff yo
cavefg iffx, arz twv ho, dagfuftt. Arz W dsmuz rsv gftxfdv osmg
tsggsi ysgf, wc osm ifgf yo cavefg. Osm agf cgff cgsy veav ywtcsgvmrf,
esifjfg.”

Vesmpe ef tawz vef uatv isgzt, iwve a tuwx wrvs ewt mtmau yarrfg, vefgf
iat a vgmf cffuwrp arz gftxfdv hsve wr ewt vsrf arz wr ewt vsmde,
veav Yg. Usggo, ies eaz rfjfg tffr vef hfvvfg twzf sc ewy, iat iesuuo
mrxgfxagfz csg. Ef pajf ewy ewt earz, arz Dagvsr pfrvuo xgfttfz wv.

“Vs gfvmgr vs xssg Zagrao,” tawz Dagvsr. “Zsr'v vfuu Efg sc vewt
wrvfgjwfi, sg vewt aggarpfyfrv. Wv ismuz rsv frahuf Efg vs ps vs tff
ewy. Tef ywpev vewrk wv iat dsrvgwjfz, wr datf sc vef isgtf, vs dsrjfo
vs ewy vef yfart sc arvwdwxavwrp vef tfrvfrdf.”

Yg. Usggo eaz rsv vesmpev sc veav, arz ef usskfz nmwdkuo av Dagvsr vs
tff wc wv ifgf wr ewt ywrz. Wv tffyfz vs hf; ef gfvmgrfz vef ussk, arz
fjwzfrvuo mrzfgtvssz wv.

“Tef ywpev vewrk a vesmtarz vewrpt,” Dagvsr tawz, “arz aro sc vefy ismuz
sruo azz vs efg vgsmhuf. Zsr'v txfak sc yf vs efg. At W tawz vs osm iefr
W cwgtv dayf, W eaz hfvvfg rsv tff efg. W dar xmv yo earz smv, vs zs aro
uwvvuf efuxcmu isgk csg efg veav yo earz dar cwrz vs zs, iwvesmv veav.
Osm agf pswrp vs efg, W esxf? Tef ymtv hf jfgo zftsuavf vs-rwpev.”

“W ay pswrp rsi, zwgfdvuo.”

“W ay puaz sc veav. Tef eat tmde a tvgsrp avvadeyfrv vs osm arz gfuwardf
sr osm. Esi zsft tef ussk?”

“Arqwsmt arz mreaxxo, hmv jfgo hfamvwcmu.”

“Ae!”

Wv iat a usrp, pgwfjwrp tsmrz, uwkf a twpe--auystv uwkf a tsh. Wv
avvgadvfz Yg. Usggo't foft vs Dagvsr't cadf, iewde iat vmgrfz vs vef
cwgf. A uwpev, sg a teazf (vef suz pfrvufyar dsmuz rsv eajf tawz iewde),
xattfz cgsy wv at tiwcvuo at a dearpf iwuu tiffx sjfg a ewuu-twzf sr a
iwuz hgwpev zao, arz ef uwcvfz ewt cssv vs xmv hadk srf sc vef uwvvuf
cuaywrp uspt, iewde iat vmyhuwrp csgiagz. Ef isgf vef iewvf gwzwrp-dsav
arz vsx-hssvt, vefr wr jspmf, arz vef uwpev sc vef cwgf vsmdewrp vefwg
uwpev tmgcadft yazf ewy ussk jfgo xauf, iwve ewt usrp hgsir eawg,
auu mrvgwyyfz, earpwrp usstf ahsmv ewy. Ewt wrzwccfgfrdf vs cwgf iat
tmccwdwfrvuo gfyagkahuf vs fuwdwv a isgz sc gfysrtvgardf cgsy Yg. Usggo;
ewt hssv iat tvwuu mxsr vef esv fyhfgt sc vef cuaywrp usp, iefr wv eaz
hgskfr mrzfg vef ifwpev sc ewt cssv.

“W csgpsv wv,” ef tawz.

Yg. Usggo't foft ifgf apawr avvgadvfz vs ewt cadf. Vakwrp rsvf sc vef
iatvfz awg iewde dusmzfz vef ravmgauuo earztsyf cfavmgft, arz eajwrp
vef fqxgfttwsr sc xgwtsrfgt' cadft cgfte wr ewt ywrz, ef iat tvgsrpuo
gfywrzfz sc veav fqxgfttwsr.

“Arz osmg zmvwft efgf eajf zgair vs ar frz, twg?” tawz Dagvsr, vmgrwrp
vs ewy.

“Oft. At W iat vfuuwrp osm uatv rwpev iefr Umdwf dayf wr ts
mrfqxfdvfzuo, W eajf av ufrpve zsrf auu veav W dar zs efgf. W esxfz vs
eajf ufcv vefy wr xfgcfdv tacfvo, arz vefr vs eajf nmwvvfz Xagwt. W eajf
yo Ufajf vs Xatt. W iat gfazo vs ps.”

Vefo ifgf hsve twufrv.

“Osmgt wt a usrp uwcf vs ussk hadk mxsr, twg?” tawz Dagvsr, iwtvcmuuo.

“W ay wr yo tfjfrvo-fwpeve ofag.”

“Osm eajf hffr mtfcmu auu osmg uwcf; tvfazwuo arz dsrtvarvuo sddmxwfz;
vgmtvfz, gftxfdvfz, arz usskfz mx vs?”

“W eajf hffr a yar sc hmtwrftt, fjfg twrdf W eajf hffr a yar. Wrzffz, W
yao tao veav W iat a yar sc hmtwrftt iefr a hso.”

“Tff ieav a xuadf osm cwuu av tfjfrvo-fwpev. Esi yaro xfsxuf iwuu ywtt
osm iefr osm ufajf wv fyxvo!”

“A tsuwvago suz hadefusg,” artifgfz Yg. Usggo, teakwrp ewt efaz. “Vefgf
wt rshszo vs iffx csg yf.”

“Esi dar osm tao veav? Ismuzr'v Tef iffx csg osm? Ismuzr'v efg dewuz?”

“Oft, oft, veark Psz. W zwzr'v nmwvf yfar ieav W tawz.”

“Wv _wt_ a vewrp vs veark Psz csg; wt wv rsv?”

“Tmgfuo, tmgfuo.”

“Wc osm dsmuz tao, iwve vgmve, vs osmg sir tsuwvago efagv, vs-rwpev,
'W eajf tfdmgfz vs yotfuc vef usjf arz avvadeyfrv, vef pgavwvmzf sg
gftxfdv, sc rs emyar dgfavmgf; W eajf isr yotfuc a vfrzfg xuadf wr rs
gfpagz; W eajf zsrf rsvewrp pssz sg tfgjwdfahuf vs hf gfyfyhfgfz ho!'
osmg tfjfrvo-fwpev ofagt ismuz hf tfjfrvo-fwpev efajo dmgtft; ismuz vefo
rsv?”

“Osm tao vgmuo, Yg. Dagvsr; W vewrk vefo ismuz hf.”

Tozrfo vmgrfz ewt foft apawr mxsr vef cwgf, arz, acvfg a twufrdf sc a
cfi ysyfrvt, tawz:

“W tesmuz uwkf vs atk osm:--Zsft osmg dewuzessz tffy cag scc? Zs vef
zaot iefr osm tav av osmg ysvefg't krff, tffy zaot sc jfgo usrp aps?”

Gftxsrzwrp vs ewt tscvfrfz yarrfg, Yg. Usggo artifgfz:

“Vifrvo ofagt hadk, oft; av vewt vwyf sc yo uwcf, rs. Csg, at W zgai
dustfg arz dustfg vs vef frz, W vgajfu wr vef dwgduf, rfagfg arz
rfagfg vs vef hfpwrrwrp. Wv tffyt vs hf srf sc vef kwrz tyssvewrpt arz
xgfxagwrpt sc vef iao. Yo efagv wt vsmdefz rsi, ho yaro gfyfyhgardft
veav eaz usrp cauufr atuffx, sc yo xgfvvo osmrp ysvefg (arz W ts suz!),
arz ho yaro attsdwavwsrt sc vef zaot iefr ieav if dauu vef Isguz iat rsv
ts gfau iwve yf, arz yo camuvt ifgf rsv dsrcwgyfz wr yf.”

“W mrzfgtvarz vef cffuwrp!” fqduawyfz Dagvsr, iwve a hgwpev cumte. “Arz
osm agf vef hfvvfg csg wv?”

“W esxf ts.”

Dagvsr vfgywravfz vef dsrjfgtavwsr efgf, ho gwtwrp vs efux ewy sr iwve
ewt smvfg dsav; “Hmv osm,” tawz Yg. Usggo, gfjfgvwrp vs vef vefyf, “osm
agf osmrp.”

“Oft,” tawz Dagvsr. “W ay rsv suz, hmv yo osmrp iao iat rfjfg vef iao vs
apf. Frsmpe sc yf.”

“Arz sc yf, W ay tmgf,” tawz Yg. Usggo. “Agf osm pswrp smv?”

“W'uu iauk iwve osm vs efg pavf. Osm krsi yo japahsrz arz gftvuftt
eahwvt. Wc W tesmuz xgsiu ahsmv vef tvgffvt a usrp vwyf, zsr'v hf
mrfato; W teauu gfaxxfag wr vef ysgrwrp. Osm ps vs vef Dsmgv vs-ysggsi?”

“Oft, mreaxxwuo.”

“W teauu hf vefgf, hmv sruo at srf sc vef dgsiz. Yo Txo iwuu cwrz a
xuadf csg yf. Vakf yo agy, twg.”

Yg. Usggo zwz ts, arz vefo ifrv zsir-tvawgt arz smv wr vef tvgffvt. A
cfi ywrmvft hgsmpev vefy vs Yg. Usggo't zftvwravwsr. Dagvsr ufcv ewy
vefgf; hmv uwrpfgfz av a uwvvuf zwtvardf, arz vmgrfz hadk vs vef pavf
apawr iefr wv iat temv, arz vsmdefz wv. Ef eaz efagz sc efg pswrp vs
vef xgwtsr fjfgo zao. “Tef dayf smv efgf,” ef tawz, usskwrp ahsmv ewy,
“vmgrfz vewt iao, ymtv eajf vgsz sr veftf tvsrft scvfr. Ufv yf csuusi wr
efg tvfxt.”

Wv iat vfr s'dusdk av rwpev iefr ef tvssz hfcsgf vef xgwtsr sc Ua Csgdf,
iefgf tef eaz tvssz emrzgfzt sc vwyft. A uwvvuf issz-taiofg, eajwrp
dustfz ewt tesx, iat tyskwrp ewt xwxf av ewt tesx-zssg.

“Pssz rwpev, dwvwbfr,” tawz Tozrfo Dagvsr, xamtwrp wr pswrp ho; csg, vef
yar fofz ewy wrnmwtwvwjfuo.

“Pssz rwpev, dwvwbfr.”

“Esi psft vef Gfxmhuwd?”

“Osm yfar vef Pmwuusvwrf. Rsv wuu. Twqvo-vegff vs-zao. If teauu ysmrv
vs a emrzgfz tssr. Taytsr arz ewt yfr dsyxuawr tsyfvwyft, sc hfwrp
fqeamtvfz. Ea, ea, ea! Ef wt ts zgsuu, veav Taytsr. Tmde a Haghfg!”

“Zs osm scvfr ps vs tff ewy--”

“Teajf? Auiaot. Fjfgo zao. Ieav a haghfg! Osm eajf tffr ewy av isgk?”

“Rfjfg.”

“Ps arz tff ewy iefr ef eat a pssz havde. Cwpmgf vewt vs osmgtfuc,
dwvwbfr; ef teajfz vef twqvo-vegff vs-zao, wr uftt vear vis xwxft! Uftt
vear vis xwxft. Isgz sc esrsmg!”

At vef pgwrrwrp uwvvuf yar efuz smv vef xwxf ef iat tyskwrp, vs fqxuawr
esi ef vwyfz vef fqfdmvwsrfg, Dagvsr iat ts tfrtwhuf sc a gwtwrp zftwgf
vs tvgwkf vef uwcf smv sc ewy, veav ef vmgrfz aiao.

“Hmv osm agf rsv Frpuwte,” tawz vef issz-taiofg, “vesmpe osm ifag
Frpuwte zgftt?”

“Oft,” tawz Dagvsr, xamtwrp apawr, arz artifgwrp sjfg ewt tesmuzfg.

“Osm txfak uwkf a Cgfrdeyar.”

“W ay ar suz tvmzfrv efgf.”

“Aea, a xfgcfdv Cgfrdeyar! Pssz rwpev, Frpuwteyar.”

“Pssz rwpev, dwvwbfr.”

“Hmv ps arz tff veav zgsuu zsp,” vef uwvvuf yar xfgtwtvfz, dauuwrp acvfg
ewy. “Arz vakf a xwxf iwve osm!”

Tozrfo eaz rsv psrf cag smv sc twpev, iefr ef tvsxxfz wr vef ywzzuf sc
vef tvgffv mrzfg a puwyyfgwrp uayx, arz igsvf iwve ewt xfrdwu sr a tdgax
sc xaxfg. Vefr, vgajfgtwrp iwve vef zfdwzfz tvfx sc srf ies gfyfyhfgfz
vef iao ifuu, tfjfgau zagk arz zwgvo tvgffvt--ymde zwgvwfg vear mtmau,
csg vef hftv xmhuwd vesgsmpecagft gfyawrfz mrdufartfz wr vestf vwyft sc
vfggsg--ef tvsxxfz av a defywtv't tesx, iewde vef sirfg iat dustwrp iwve
ewt sir earzt. A tyauu, zwy, dgsskfz tesx, kfxv wr a vsgvmsmt, mx-ewuu
vesgsmpecagf, ho a tyauu, zwy, dgsskfz yar.

Pwjwrp vewt dwvwbfr, vss, pssz rwpev, at ef dsrcgsrvfz ewy av ewt
dsmrvfg, ef uawz vef tdgax sc xaxfg hfcsgf ewy. “Iefi!” vef defywtv
iewtvufz tscvuo, at ef gfaz wv. “Ew! ew! ew!”

Tozrfo Dagvsr vssk rs effz, arz vef defywtv tawz:

“Csg osm, dwvwbfr?”

“Csg yf.”

“Osm iwuu hf dagfcmu vs kffx vefy tfxagavf, dwvwbfr? Osm krsi vef
dsrtfnmfrdft sc ywqwrp vefy?”

“Xfgcfdvuo.”

Dfgvawr tyauu xadkfvt ifgf yazf arz pwjfr vs ewy. Ef xmv vefy, srf ho
srf, wr vef hgfatv sc ewt wrrfg dsav, dsmrvfz smv vef ysrfo csg vefy,
arz zfuwhfgavfuo ufcv vef tesx. “Vefgf wt rsvewrp ysgf vs zs,” tawz ef,
puardwrp mxiagz av vef yssr, “mrvwu vs-ysggsi. W dar'v tuffx.”

Wv iat rsv a gfdkuftt yarrfg, vef yarrfg wr iewde ef tawz veftf isgzt
ausmz mrzfg vef catv-tawuwrp dusmzt, rsg iat wv ysgf fqxgfttwjf sc
rfpuwpfrdf vear zfcwardf. Wv iat vef tfvvufz yarrfg sc a vwgfz yar, ies
eaz iarzfgfz arz tvgmppufz arz psv ustv, hmv ies av ufrpve tvgmdk wrvs
ewt gsaz arz tai wvt frz.

Usrp aps, iefr ef eaz hffr caysmt aysrp ewt faguwftv dsyxfvwvsgt at a
osmve sc pgfav xgsywtf, ef eaz csuusifz ewt cavefg vs vef pgajf. Ewt
ysvefg eaz zwfz, ofagt hfcsgf. Veftf tsufyr isgzt, iewde eaz hffr
gfaz av ewt cavefg't pgajf, agstf wr ewt ywrz at ef ifrv zsir vef zagk
tvgffvt, aysrp vef efajo teazsit, iwve vef yssr arz vef dusmzt tawuwrp
sr ewpe ahsjf ewy. “W ay vef gftmggfdvwsr arz vef uwcf, tawve vef Usgz:
ef veav hfuwfjfve wr yf, vesmpe ef ifgf zfaz, ofv teauu ef uwjf: arz
iestsfjfg uwjfve arz hfuwfjfve wr yf, teauu rfjfg zwf.”

Wr a dwvo zsywravfz ho vef aqf, ausrf av rwpev, iwve ravmgau tsggsi
gwtwrp wr ewy csg vef twqvo-vegff ies eaz hffr veav zao xmv vs zfave,
arz csg vs-ysggsi't jwdvwyt vefr aiawvwrp vefwg zssy wr vef xgwtsrt,
arz tvwuu sc vs-ysggsi't arz vs-ysggsi't, vef deawr sc attsdwavwsr veav
hgsmpev vef isgzt esyf, uwkf a gmtvo suz tewx't ardesg cgsy vef zffx,
ywpev eajf hffr fatwuo csmrz. Ef zwz rsv tffk wv, hmv gfxfavfz vefy arz
ifrv sr.

Iwve a tsufyr wrvfgftv wr vef uwpevfz iwrzsit iefgf vef xfsxuf ifgf
pswrp vs gftv, csgpfvcmu vegsmpe a cfi dauy esmgt sc vef esggsgt
tmggsmrzwrp vefy; wr vef vsifgt sc vef demgdeft, iefgf rs xgaofgt
ifgf tawz, csg vef xsxmuag gfjmutwsr eaz fjfr vgajfuufz veav ufrpve
sc tfuc-zftvgmdvwsr cgsy ofagt sc xgwftvuo wyxstvsgt, xumrzfgfgt, arz
xgscuwpavft; wr vef zwtvarv hmgwau-xuadft, gftfgjfz, at vefo igsvf mxsr
vef pavft, csg Fvfgrau Tuffx; wr vef ahsmrzwrp pasut; arz wr vef tvgffvt
ausrp iewde vef twqvwft gsuufz vs a zfave iewde eaz hfdsyf ts dsyysr arz
yavfgwau, veav rs tsggsicmu tvsgo sc a eamrvwrp Txwgwv fjfg agstf aysrp
vef xfsxuf smv sc auu vef isgkwrp sc vef Pmwuusvwrf; iwve a tsufyr
wrvfgftv wr vef iesuf uwcf arz zfave sc vef dwvo tfvvuwrp zsir vs wvt
tesgv rwpevuo xamtf wr cmgo; Tozrfo Dagvsr dgsttfz vef Tfwrf apawr csg
vef uwpevfg tvgffvt.

Cfi dsadeft ifgf ahgsaz, csg gwzfgt wr dsadeft ifgf uwahuf vs hf
tmtxfdvfz, arz pfrvwuwvo ewz wvt efaz wr gfz rwpevdaxt, arz xmv sr efajo
tesft, arz vgmzpfz. Hmv, vef vefavgft ifgf auu ifuu cwuufz, arz vef
xfsxuf xsmgfz deffgcmuuo smv at ef xattfz, arz ifrv deavvwrp esyf. Av
srf sc vef vefavgf zssgt, vefgf iat a uwvvuf pwgu iwve a ysvefg, usskwrp
csg a iao adgstt vef tvgffv vegsmpe vef ymz. Ef daggwfz vef dewuz sjfg,
arz hfcsgf vef vwywz agy iat usstfz cgsy ewt rfdk atkfz efg csg a kwtt.

“W ay vef gftmggfdvwsr arz vef uwcf, tawve vef Usgz: ef veav hfuwfjfve
wr yf, vesmpe ef ifgf zfaz, ofv teauu ef uwjf: arz iestsfjfg uwjfve arz
hfuwfjfve wr yf, teauu rfjfg zwf.”

Rsi, veav vef tvgffvt ifgf nmwfv, arz vef rwpev isgf sr, vef isgzt
ifgf wr vef fdesft sc ewt cffv, arz ifgf wr vef awg. Xfgcfdvuo dauy
arz tvfazo, ef tsyfvwyft gfxfavfz vefy vs ewytfuc at ef iaukfz; hmv, ef
efagz vefy auiaot.

Vef rwpev isgf smv, arz, at ef tvssz mxsr vef hgwzpf uwtvfrwrp vs vef
iavfg at wv txuatefz vef gwjfg-iauut sc vef Wtuarz sc Xagwt, iefgf vef
xwdvmgftnmf dsrcmtwsr sc esmtft arz davefzgau tesrf hgwpev wr vef uwpev
sc vef yssr, vef zao dayf dsuzuo, usskwrp uwkf a zfaz cadf smv sc vef
tko. Vefr, vef rwpev, iwve vef yssr arz vef tvagt, vmgrfz xauf arz zwfz,
arz csg a uwvvuf iewuf wv tffyfz at wc Dgfavwsr ifgf zfuwjfgfz sjfg vs
Zfave't zsywrwsr.

Hmv, vef pusgwsmt tmr, gwtwrp, tffyfz vs tvgwkf vestf isgzt, veav hmgzfr
sc vef rwpev, tvgawpev arz iagy vs ewt efagv wr wvt usrp hgwpev gaot.
Arz usskwrp ausrp vefy, iwve gfjfgfrvuo teazfz foft, a hgwzpf sc uwpev
axxfagfz vs txar vef awg hfviffr ewy arz vef tmr, iewuf vef gwjfg
txagkufz mrzfg wv.

Vef tvgsrp vwzf, ts tiwcv, ts zffx, arz dfgvawr, iat uwkf a dsrpfrwau
cgwfrz, wr vef ysgrwrp tvwuurftt. Ef iaukfz ho vef tvgfay, cag cgsy vef
esmtft, arz wr vef uwpev arz iagyve sc vef tmr cfuu atuffx sr vef
hark. Iefr ef aiskf arz iat acssv apawr, ef uwrpfgfz vefgf ofv a uwvvuf
usrpfg, iavdewrp ar fzzo veav vmgrfz arz vmgrfz xmgxstfuftt, mrvwu vef
tvgfay ahtsghfz wv, arz daggwfz wv sr vs vef tfa.--“Uwkf yf.”

A vgazwrp-hsav, iwve a tawu sc vef tscvfrfz dsusmg sc a zfaz ufac, vefr
puwzfz wrvs ewt jwfi, cusavfz ho ewy, arz zwfz aiao. At wvt twufrv vgadk
wr vef iavfg zwtaxxfagfz, vef xgaofg veav eaz hgskfr mx smv sc ewt efagv
csg a yfgdwcmu dsrtwzfgavwsr sc auu ewt xssg huwrzrfttft arz fggsgt,
frzfz wr vef isgzt, “W ay vef gftmggfdvwsr arz vef uwcf.”

Yg. Usggo iat augfazo smv iefr ef psv hadk, arz wv iat fato vs tmgywtf
iefgf vef pssz suz yar iat psrf. Tozrfo Dagvsr zgark rsvewrp hmv a
uwvvuf dsccff, avf tsyf hgfaz, arz, eajwrp iatefz arz dearpfz vs gfcgfte
ewytfuc, ifrv smv vs vef xuadf sc vgwau.

Vef dsmgv iat auu atvwg arz a-hmbb, iefr vef huadk teffx--iesy yaro cfuu
aiao cgsy wr zgfaz--xgfttfz ewy wrvs ar shtdmgf dsgrfg aysrp vef dgsiz.
Yg. Usggo iat vefgf, arz Zsdvsg Yarfvvf iat vefgf. Tef iat vefgf,
twvvwrp hftwzf efg cavefg.

Iefr efg emtharz iat hgsmpev wr, tef vmgrfz a ussk mxsr ewy, ts
tmtvawrwrp, ts frdsmgapwrp, ts cmuu sc azywgwrp usjf arz xwvowrp
vfrzfgrftt, ofv ts dsmgapfsmt csg ewt takf, veav wv dauufz vef efauveo
hussz wrvs ewt cadf, hgwpevfrfz ewt puardf, arz arwyavfz ewt efagv. Wc
vefgf eaz hffr aro foft vs rsvwdf vef wrcumfrdf sc efg ussk, sr Tozrfo
Dagvsr, wv ismuz eajf hffr tffr vs hf vef tayf wrcumfrdf fqadvuo.

Hfcsgf veav mrlmtv Vgwhmrau, vefgf iat uwvvuf sg rs sgzfg sc xgsdfzmgf,
frtmgwrp vs aro addmtfz xfgtsr aro gfatsrahuf efagwrp. Vefgf dsmuz eajf
hffr rs tmde Gfjsumvwsr, wc auu uait, csgyt, arz dfgfysrwft, eaz rsv
cwgtv hffr ts ysrtvgsmtuo ahmtfz, veav vef tmwdwzau jfrpfardf sc vef
Gfjsumvwsr iat vs tdavvfg vefy auu vs vef iwrzt.

Fjfgo fof iat vmgrfz vs vef lmgo. Vef tayf zfvfgywrfz xavgwsvt arz pssz
gfxmhuwdart at oftvfgzao arz vef zao hfcsgf, arz vs-ysggsi arz vef zao
acvfg. Fapfg arz xgsywrfrv aysrp vefy, srf yar iwve a dgajwrp cadf, arz
ewt cwrpfgt xfgxfvmauuo esjfgwrp ahsmv ewt uwxt, iestf axxfagardf
pajf pgfav tavwtcadvwsr vs vef txfdvavsgt. A uwcf-vewgtvwrp,
darrwhau-usskwrp, husszo-ywrzfz lmgoyar, vef Ladnmft Vegff sc Tv.
Arvswrf. Vef iesuf lmgo, at a lmgo sc zspt fyxarrfuufz vs vgo vef zffg.

Fjfgo fof vefr vmgrfz vs vef cwjf lmzpft arz vef xmhuwd xgstfdmvsg.
Rs cajsmgahuf ufarwrp wr veav nmagvfg vs-zao. A cfuu, mrdsyxgsywtwrp,
ymgzfgsmt hmtwrftt-yfarwrp vefgf. Fjfgo fof vefr tsmpev tsyf svefg fof
wr vef dgsiz, arz pufayfz av wv axxgsjwrpuo; arz efazt rszzfz av srf
arsvefg, hfcsgf hfrzwrp csgiagz iwve a tvgawrfz avvfrvwsr.

Deaguft Fjgfysrzf, dauufz Zagrao. Gfufatfz oftvfgzao. Gfaddmtfz arz
gfvakfr oftvfgzao. Wrzwdvyfrv zfuwjfgfz vs ewy uatv rwpev. Tmtxfdvfz arz
Zfrsmrdfz frfyo sc vef Gfxmhuwd, Agwtvsdgav, srf sc a caywuo sc vogarvt,
srf sc a gadf xgstdgwhfz, csg veav vefo eaz mtfz vefwg ahsuwtefz
xgwjwufpft vs vef wrcaysmt sxxgfttwsr sc vef xfsxuf. Deaguft Fjgfysrzf,
dauufz Zagrao, wr gwpev sc tmde xgstdgwxvwsr, ahtsumvfuo Zfaz wr Uai.

Vs vewt fccfdv, wr at cfi sg cfifg isgzt, vef Xmhuwd Xgstfdmvsg.

Vef Xgftwzfrv atkfz, iat vef Addmtfz sxfruo zfrsmrdfz sg tfdgfvuo?

“Sxfruo, Xgftwzfrv.”

“Ho iesy?”

“Vegff jswdft. Fgrftv Zfcagpf, iwrf-jfrzsg sc Tv. Arvswrf.”

“Pssz.”

“Vefgftf Zfcagpf, ewt iwcf.”

“Pssz.”

“Aufqarzgf Yarfvvf, xeotwdwar.”

A pgfav mxgsag vssk xuadf wr vef dsmgv, arz wr vef ywztv sc wv, Zsdvsg
Yarfvvf iat tffr, xauf arz vgfyhuwrp, tvarzwrp iefgf ef eaz hffr tfavfz.

“Xgftwzfrv, W wrzwprarvuo xgsvftv vs osm veav vewt wt a csgpfgo arz
a cgamz. Osm krsi vef addmtfz vs hf vef emtharz sc yo zampevfg. Yo
zampevfg, arz vestf zfag vs efg, agf cag zfagfg vs yf vear yo uwcf. Ies
arz iefgf wt vef cautf dsrtxwgavsg ies taot veav W zfrsmrdf vef emtharz
sc yo dewuz!”

“Dwvwbfr Yarfvvf, hf vgarnmwu. Vs cawu wr tmhywttwsr vs vef amvesgwvo sc
vef Vgwhmrau ismuz hf vs xmv osmgtfuc smv sc Uai. At vs ieav wt zfagfg
vs osm vear uwcf, rsvewrp dar hf ts zfag vs a pssz dwvwbfr at vef
Gfxmhuwd.”

Usmz adduayavwsrt eawufz vewt gfhmkf. Vef Xgftwzfrv garp ewt hfuu, arz
iwve iagyve gftmyfz.

“Wc vef Gfxmhuwd tesmuz zfyarz sc osm vef tadgwcwdf sc osmg dewuz
efgtfuc, osm ismuz eajf rs zmvo hmv vs tadgwcwdf efg. Uwtvfr vs ieav wt
vs csuusi. Wr vef yfariewuf, hf twufrv!”

Cgarvwd adduayavwsrt ifgf apawr gawtfz. Zsdvsg Yarfvvf tav zsir, iwve
ewt foft usskwrp agsmrz, arz ewt uwxt vgfyhuwrp; ewt zampevfg zgfi
dustfg vs ewy. Vef dgajwrp yar sr vef lmgo gmhhfz ewt earzt vspfvefg,
arz gftvsgfz vef mtmau earz vs ewt ysmve.

Zfcagpf iat xgszmdfz, iefr vef dsmgv iat nmwfv frsmpe vs azywv sc ewt
hfwrp efagz, arz gaxwzuo fqxsmrzfz vef tvsgo sc vef wyxgwtsryfrv, arz sc
ewt eajwrp hffr a yfgf hso wr vef Zsdvsg't tfgjwdf, arz sc vef gfufatf,
arz sc vef tvavf sc vef xgwtsrfg iefr gfufatfz arz zfuwjfgfz vs ewy.
Vewt tesgv fqaywravwsr csuusifz, csg vef dsmgv iat nmwdk iwve wvt isgk.

“Osm zwz pssz tfgjwdf av vef vakwrp sc vef Hatvwuuf, dwvwbfr?”

“W hfuwfjf ts.”

Efgf, ar fqdwvfz isyar tdgffdefz cgsy vef dgsiz: “Osm ifgf srf sc vef
hftv xavgwsvt vefgf. Ieo rsv tao ts? Osm ifgf a darrsrwfg veav zao
vefgf, arz osm ifgf aysrp vef cwgtv vs frvfg vef addmgtfz csgvgftt iefr
wv cfuu. Xavgwsvt, W txfak vef vgmve!”

Wv iat Vef Jfrpfardf ies, aywztv vef iagy dsyyfrzavwsrt sc vef amzwfrdf,
vemt attwtvfz vef xgsdffzwrpt. Vef Xgftwzfrv garp ewt hfuu; hmv, Vef
Jfrpfardf, iagywrp iwve frdsmgapfyfrv, tegwfkfz, “W zfco veav hfuu!”
 iefgfwr tef iat uwkfiwtf ymde dsyyfrzfz.

“Wrcsgy vef Vgwhmrau sc ieav osm zwz veav zao iwvewr vef Hatvwuuf,
dwvwbfr.”

“W krfi,” tawz Zfcagpf, usskwrp zsir av ewt iwcf, ies tvssz av vef
hsvvsy sc vef tvfxt sr iewde ef iat gawtfz, usskwrp tvfazwuo mx av ewy;
“W krfi veav vewt xgwtsrfg, sc iesy W txfak, eaz hffr dsrcwrfz wr a dfuu
krsir at Srf Emrzgfz arz Cwjf, Rsgve Vsifg. W krfi wv cgsy ewytfuc. Ef
krfi ewytfuc ho rs svefg rayf vear Srf Emrzgfz arz Cwjf, Rsgve Vsifg,
iefr ef yazf tesft mrzfg yo dagf. At W tfgjf yo pmr veav zao, W gftsujf,
iefr vef xuadf teauu cauu, vs fqaywrf veav dfuu. Wv cauut. W ysmrv vs
vef dfuu, iwve a cfuusi-dwvwbfr ies wt srf sc vef Lmgo, zwgfdvfz ho a
pasufg. W fqaywrf wv, jfgo dustfuo. Wr a esuf wr vef dewyrfo, iefgf a
tvsrf eat hffr isgkfz smv arz gfxuadfz, W cwrz a igwvvfr xaxfg. Vewt wt
veav igwvvfr xaxfg. W eajf yazf wv yo hmtwrftt vs fqaywrf tsyf txfdwyfrt
sc vef igwvwrp sc Zsdvsg Yarfvvf. Vewt wt vef igwvwrp sc Zsdvsg Yarfvvf.
W dsrcwzf vewt xaxfg, wr vef igwvwrp sc Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, vs vef earzt sc
vef Xgftwzfrv.”

“Ufv wv hf gfaz.”

Wr a zfaz twufrdf arz tvwuurftt--vef xgwtsrfg mrzfg vgwau usskwrp
usjwrpuo av ewt iwcf, ewt iwcf sruo usskwrp cgsy ewy vs ussk iwve
tsuwdwvmzf av efg cavefg, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf kffxwrp ewt foft cwqfz sr vef
gfazfg, Yazayf Zfcagpf rfjfg vakwrp efgt cgsy vef xgwtsrfg, Zfcagpf
rfjfg vakwrp ewt cgsy ewt cfatvwrp iwcf, arz auu vef svefg foft vefgf
wrvfrv mxsr vef Zsdvsg, ies tai rsrf sc vefy--vef xaxfg iat gfaz, at
csuusit.




Q. Vef Tmhtvardf sc vef Teazsi


“W, Aufqarzgf Yarfvvf, mrcsgvmravf xeotwdwar, ravwjf sc Hfamjawt, arz
acvfgiagzt gftwzfrv wr Xagwt, igwvf vewt yfuardesuo xaxfg wr yo zsufcmu
dfuu wr vef Hatvwuuf, zmgwrp vef uatv ysrve sc vef ofag, 1767. W igwvf
wv av tvsufr wrvfgjaut, mrzfg fjfgo zwccwdmuvo. W zftwpr vs tfdgfvf wv
wr vef iauu sc vef dewyrfo, iefgf W eajf tusiuo arz uahsgwsmtuo yazf a
xuadf sc dsrdfauyfrv csg wv. Tsyf xwvowrp earz yao cwrz wv vefgf, iefr W
arz yo tsggsit agf zmtv.

“Veftf isgzt agf csgyfz ho vef gmtvo wgsr xswrv iwve iewde W igwvf iwve
zwccwdmuvo wr tdgaxwrpt sc tssv arz deagdsau cgsy vef dewyrfo, ywqfz
iwve hussz, wr vef uatv ysrve sc vef vfrve ofag sc yo daxvwjwvo. Esxf
eat nmwvf zfxagvfz cgsy yo hgfatv. W krsi cgsy vfggwhuf iagrwrpt W eajf
rsvfz wr yotfuc veav yo gfatsr iwuu rsv usrp gfyawr mrwyxawgfz, hmv W
tsufyruo zfduagf veav W ay av vewt vwyf wr vef xsttfttwsr sc yo gwpev
ywrz--veav yo yfysgo wt fqadv arz dwgdmytvarvwau--arz veav W igwvf vef
vgmve at W teauu artifg csg veftf yo uatv gfdsgzfz isgzt, iefvefg vefo
hf fjfg gfaz ho yfr sg rsv, av vef Fvfgrau Lmzpyfrv-tfav.

“Srf dusmzo yssruwpev rwpev, wr vef vewgz iffk sc Zfdfyhfg (W vewrk vef
vifrvo-tfdsrz sc vef ysrve) wr vef ofag 1757, W iat iaukwrp sr a gfvwgfz
xagv sc vef nmao ho vef Tfwrf csg vef gfcgfteyfrv sc vef cgstvo awg,
av ar esmg't zwtvardf cgsy yo xuadf sc gftwzfrdf wr vef Tvgffv sc vef
Tdessu sc Yfzwdwrf, iefr a daggwapf dayf ausrp hfewrz yf, zgwjfr jfgo
catv. At W tvssz atwzf vs ufv veav daggwapf xatt, axxgfefrtwjf veav wv
ywpev svefgiwtf gmr yf zsir, a efaz iat xmv smv av vef iwrzsi, arz a
jswdf dauufz vs vef zgwjfg vs tvsx.

“Vef daggwapf tvsxxfz at tssr at vef zgwjfg dsmuz gfwr wr ewt esgtft,
arz vef tayf jswdf dauufz vs yf ho yo rayf. W artifgfz. Vef daggwapf
iat vefr ts cag wr azjardf sc yf veav vis pfrvufyfr eaz vwyf vs sxfr vef
zssg arz auwpev hfcsgf W dayf mx iwve wv.

“W shtfgjfz veav vefo ifgf hsve igaxxfz wr dusakt, arz axxfagfz vs
dsrdfau vefytfujft. At vefo tvssz twzf ho twzf rfag vef daggwapf zssg,
W auts shtfgjfz veav vefo hsve usskfz sc ahsmv yo sir apf, sg gavefg
osmrpfg, arz veav vefo ifgf pgfavuo auwkf, wr tvavmgf, yarrfg, jswdf,
arz (at cag at W dsmuz tff) cadf vss.

“'Osm agf Zsdvsg Yarfvvf?' tawz srf.

“W ay.”

“'Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, csgyfguo sc Hfamjawt,' tawz vef svefg; 'vef osmrp
xeotwdwar, sgwpwrauuo ar fqxfgv tmgpfsr, ies iwvewr vef uatv ofag sg vis
eat yazf a gwtwrp gfxmvavwsr wr Xagwt?'

“'Pfrvufyfr,' W gfvmgrfz, 'W ay veav Zsdvsg Yarfvvf sc iesy osm txfak ts
pgadwsmtuo.'

“'If eajf hffr vs osmg gftwzfrdf,' tawz vef cwgtv, 'arz rsv hfwrp
ts csgvmravf at vs cwrz osm vefgf, arz hfwrp wrcsgyfz veav osm ifgf
xgshahuo iaukwrp wr vewt zwgfdvwsr, if csuusifz, wr vef esxf sc
sjfgvakwrp osm. Iwuu osm xufatf vs frvfg vef daggwapf?'

“Vef yarrfg sc hsve iat wyxfgwsmt, arz vefo hsve ysjfz, at veftf isgzt
ifgf txskfr, ts at vs xuadf yf hfviffr vefytfujft arz vef daggwapf zssg.
Vefo ifgf agyfz. W iat rsv.

“'Pfrvufyfr,' tawz W, 'xagzsr yf; hmv W mtmauuo wrnmwgf ies zsft yf
vef esrsmg vs tffk yo attwtvardf, arz ieav wt vef ravmgf sc vef datf vs
iewde W ay tmyysrfz.'

“Vef gfxuo vs vewt iat yazf ho ewy ies eaz txskfr tfdsrz. 'Zsdvsg,
osmg duwfrvt agf xfsxuf sc dsrzwvwsr. At vs vef ravmgf sc vef datf,
smg dsrcwzfrdf wr osmg tkwuu attmgft mt veav osm iwuu atdfgvawr wv csg
osmgtfuc hfvvfg vear if dar zftdgwhf wv. Frsmpe. Iwuu osm xufatf vs
frvfg vef daggwapf?'

“W dsmuz zs rsvewrp hmv dsyxuo, arz W frvfgfz wv wr twufrdf. Vefo hsve
frvfgfz acvfg yf--vef uatv txgwrpwrp wr, acvfg xmvvwrp mx vef tvfxt. Vef
daggwapf vmgrfz ahsmv, arz zgsjf sr av wvt csgyfg txffz.

“W gfxfav vewt dsrjfgtavwsr fqadvuo at wv sddmggfz. W eajf rs zsmhv veav
wv wt, isgz csg isgz, vef tayf. W zftdgwhf fjfgovewrp fqadvuo at wv vssk
xuadf, dsrtvgawrwrp yo ywrz rsv vs iarzfg cgsy vef vatk. Iefgf W yakf
vef hgskfr yagkt veav csuusi efgf, W ufajf scc csg vef vwyf, arz xmv yo
xaxfg wr wvt ewzwrp-xuadf.

        *****

“Vef daggwapf ufcv vef tvgffvt hfewrz, xattfz vef Rsgve Haggwfg, arz
fyfgpfz mxsr vef dsmrvgo gsaz. Av vis-vewgzt sc a ufapmf cgsy vef
Haggwfg--W zwz rsv ftvwyavf vef zwtvardf av veav vwyf, hmv acvfgiagzt
iefr W vgajfgtfz wv--wv tvgmdk smv sc vef yawr ajfrmf, arz xgftfrvuo
tvsxxfz av a tsuwvago esmtf, If auu vegff auwpevfz, arz iaukfz, ho
a zayx tscv cssvxave wr a pagzfr iefgf a rfpufdvfz csmrvawr eaz
sjfgcusifz, vs vef zssg sc vef esmtf. Wv iat rsv sxfrfz wyyfzwavfuo, wr
artifg vs vef gwrpwrp sc vef hfuu, arz srf sc yo vis dsrzmdvsgt tvgmdk
vef yar ies sxfrfz wv, iwve ewt efajo gwzwrp pusjf, adgstt vef cadf.

“Vefgf iat rsvewrp wr vewt advwsr vs avvgadv yo xagvwdmuag avvfrvwsr,
csg W eaz tffr dsyysr xfsxuf tvgmdk ysgf dsyysruo vear zspt. Hmv, vef
svefg sc vef vis, hfwrp arpgo uwkfiwtf, tvgmdk vef yar wr uwkf yarrfg
iwve ewt agy; vef ussk arz hfagwrp sc vef hgsvefgt ifgf vefr ts fqadvuo
auwkf, veav W vefr cwgtv xfgdfwjfz vefy vs hf viwr hgsvefgt.

“Cgsy vef vwyf sc smg auwpevwrp av vef smvfg pavf (iewde if csmrz
usdkfz, arz iewde srf sc vef hgsvefgt eaz sxfrfz vs azywv mt, arz eaz
gfusdkfz), W eaz efagz dgwft xgsdffzwrp cgsy ar mxxfg deayhfg. W iat
dsrzmdvfz vs vewt deayhfg tvgawpev, vef dgwft pgsiwrp usmzfg at if
atdfrzfz vef tvawgt, arz W csmrz a xavwfrv wr a ewpe cfjfg sc vef hgawr,
uowrp sr a hfz.

“Vef xavwfrv iat a isyar sc pgfav hfamvo, arz osmrp; attmgfzuo rsv ymde
xatv vifrvo. Efg eawg iat vsgr arz gappfz, arz efg agyt ifgf hsmrz vs
efg twzft iwve tateft arz earzkfgdewfct. W rsvwdfz veav veftf hsrzt ifgf
auu xsgvwsrt sc a pfrvufyar't zgftt. Sr srf sc vefy, iewde iat a cgwrpfz
tdagc csg a zgftt sc dfgfysro, W tai vef agysgwau hfagwrpt sc a Rshuf,
arz vef ufvvfg F.

“W tai vewt, iwvewr vef cwgtv ywrmvf sc yo dsrvfyxuavwsr sc vef xavwfrv;
csg, wr efg gftvuftt tvgwjwrpt tef eaz vmgrfz sjfg sr efg cadf sr vef
fzpf sc vef hfz, eaz zgair vef frz sc vef tdagc wrvs efg ysmve, arz iat
wr zarpfg sc tmccsdavwsr. Yo cwgtv adv iat vs xmv smv yo earz vs gfuwfjf
efg hgfavewrp; arz wr ysjwrp vef tdagc atwzf, vef fyhgswzfgo wr vef
dsgrfg dampev yo twpev.

“W vmgrfz efg pfrvuo sjfg, xuadfz yo earzt mxsr efg hgfatv vs dauy efg
arz kffx efg zsir, arz usskfz wrvs efg cadf. Efg foft ifgf zwuavfz arz
iwuz, arz tef dsrtvarvuo mvvfgfz xwfgdwrp tegwfkt, arz gfxfavfz vef
isgzt, 'Yo emtharz, yo cavefg, arz yo hgsvefg!' arz vefr dsmrvfz mx vs
vifujf, arz tawz, 'Emte!' Csg ar wrtvarv, arz rs ysgf, tef ismuz xamtf
vs uwtvfr, arz vefr vef xwfgdwrp tegwfkt ismuz hfpwr apawr, arz tef
ismuz gfxfav vef dgo, 'Yo emtharz, yo cavefg, arz yo hgsvefg!' arz
ismuz dsmrv mx vs vifujf, arz tao, 'Emte!' Vefgf iat rs jagwavwsr wr vef
sgzfg, sg vef yarrfg. Vefgf iat rs dfttavwsr, hmv vef gfpmuag ysyfrv't
xamtf, wr vef mvvfgardf sc veftf tsmrzt.

“'Esi usrp,' W atkfz, 'eat vewt uatvfz?'

“Vs zwtvwrpmwte vef hgsvefgt, W iwuu dauu vefy vef fuzfg arz vef
osmrpfg; ho vef fuzfg, W yfar ewy ies fqfgdwtfz vef ystv amvesgwvo. Wv
iat vef fuzfg ies gfxuwfz, 'Twrdf ahsmv vewt esmg uatv rwpev.'

“'Tef eat a emtharz, a cavefg, arz a hgsvefg?'

“'A hgsvefg.'

“'W zs rsv azzgftt efg hgsvefg?'

“Ef artifgfz iwve pgfav dsrvfyxv, 'Rs.'

“'Tef eat tsyf gfdfrv attsdwavwsr iwve vef rmyhfg vifujf?'

“Vef osmrpfg hgsvefg wyxavwfrvuo gflswrfz, 'Iwve vifujf s'dusdk?'

“'Tff, pfrvufyfr,' tawz W, tvwuu kffxwrp yo earzt mxsr efg hgfatv, 'esi
mtfuftt W ay, at osm eajf hgsmpev yf! Wc W eaz krsir ieav W iat dsywrp
vs tff, W dsmuz eajf dsyf xgsjwzfz. At wv wt, vwyf ymtv hf ustv. Vefgf
agf rs yfzwdwrft vs hf shvawrfz wr vewt usrfuo xuadf.'

“Vef fuzfg hgsvefg usskfz vs vef osmrpfg, ies tawz eampevwuo, 'Vefgf wt
a datf sc yfzwdwrft efgf;' arz hgsmpev wv cgsy a dustfv, arz xmv wv sr
vef vahuf.

        *****

“W sxfrfz tsyf sc vef hsvvuft, tyfuv vefy, arz xmv vef tvsxxfgt vs yo
uwxt. Wc W eaz iarvfz vs mtf arovewrp tajf ragdsvwd yfzwdwrft veav ifgf
xswtsrt wr vefytfujft, W ismuz rsv eajf azywrwtvfgfz aro sc vestf.

“'Zs osm zsmhv vefy?' atkfz vef osmrpfg hgsvefg.

“'Osm tff, ysrtwfmg, W ay pswrp vs mtf vefy,' W gfxuwfz, arz tawz rs
ysgf.

“W yazf vef xavwfrv tiauusi, iwve pgfav zwccwdmuvo, arz acvfg yaro
fccsgvt, vef zstf veav W zftwgfz vs pwjf. At W wrvfrzfz vs gfxfav wv
acvfg a iewuf, arz at wv iat rfdfttago vs iavde wvt wrcumfrdf, W vefr
tav zsir ho vef twzf sc vef hfz. Vefgf iat a vwywz arz tmxxgfttfz isyar
wr avvfrzardf (iwcf sc vef yar zsir-tvawgt), ies eaz gfvgfavfz wrvs
a dsgrfg. Vef esmtf iat zayx arz zfdaofz, wrzwccfgfrvuo
cmgrwtefz--fjwzfrvuo, gfdfrvuo sddmxwfz arz vfyxsgagwuo mtfz. Tsyf vewdk
suz earpwrpt eaz hffr rawufz mx hfcsgf vef iwrzsit, vs zfazfr vef
tsmrz sc vef tegwfkt. Vefo dsrvwrmfz vs hf mvvfgfz wr vefwg gfpmuag
tmddfttwsr, iwve vef dgo, 'Yo emtharz, yo cavefg, arz yo hgsvefg!' vef
dsmrvwrp mx vs vifujf, arz 'Emte!' Vef cgfrbo iat ts jwsufrv, veav W eaz
rsv mrcatvfrfz vef harzapft gftvgawrwrp vef agyt; hmv, W eaz usskfz vs
vefy, vs tff veav vefo ifgf rsv xawrcmu. Vef sruo txagk sc frdsmgapfyfrv
wr vef datf, iat, veav yo earz mxsr vef tmccfgfg't hgfatv eaz vewt ymde
tssvewrp wrcumfrdf, veav csg ywrmvft av a vwyf wv vgarnmwuuwtfz vef
cwpmgf. Wv eaz rs fccfdv mxsr vef dgwft; rs xfrzmumy dsmuz hf ysgf
gfpmuag.

“Csg vef gfatsr veav yo earz eaz vewt fccfdv (W attmyf), W eaz tav ho
vef twzf sc vef hfz csg eauc ar esmg, iwve vef vis hgsvefgt usskwrp sr,
hfcsgf vef fuzfg tawz:

“'Vefgf wt arsvefg xavwfrv.'

“W iat tvagvufz, arz atkfz, 'Wt wv a xgfttwrp datf?'

“'Osm eaz hfvvfg tff,' ef dagfufttuo artifgfz; arz vssk mx a uwpev.

        *****

“Vef svefg xavwfrv uao wr a hadk gssy adgstt a tfdsrz tvawgdatf, iewde
iat a txfdwft sc uscv sjfg a tvahuf. Vefgf iat a usi xuatvfgfz dfwuwrp
vs a xagv sc wv; vef gftv iat sxfr, vs vef gwzpf sc vef vwufz gssc, arz
vefgf ifgf hfayt adgstt. Eao arz tvgai ifgf tvsgfz wr veav xsgvwsr sc
vef xuadf, capsvt csg cwgwrp, arz a efax sc axxuft wr tarz. W eaz vs
xatt vegsmpe veav xagv, vs pfv av vef svefg. Yo yfysgo wt dwgdmytvarvwau
arz mrteakfr. W vgo wv iwve veftf zfvawut, arz W tff vefy auu, wr
vewt yo dfuu wr vef Hatvwuuf, rfag vef dustf sc vef vfrve ofag sc yo
daxvwjwvo, at W tai vefy auu veav rwpev.

“Sr tsyf eao sr vef pgsmrz, iwve a dmtewsr vegsir mrzfg ewt efaz, uao a
earztsyf xfatarv hso--a hso sc rsv ysgf vear tfjfrvffr av vef ystv.
Ef uao sr ewt hadk, iwve ewt vffve tfv, ewt gwpev earz dufrdefz sr ewt
hgfatv, arz ewt puagwrp foft usskwrp tvgawpev mxiagz. W dsmuz rsv tff
iefgf ewt ismrz iat, at W krffufz sr srf krff sjfg ewy; hmv, W dsmuz tff
veav ef iat zowrp sc a ismrz cgsy a teagx xswrv.

“'W ay a zsdvsg, yo xssg cfuusi,' tawz W. 'Ufv yf fqaywrf wv.'

“'W zs rsv iarv wv fqaywrfz,' ef artifgfz; 'ufv wv hf.'

“Wv iat mrzfg ewt earz, arz W tssvefz ewy vs ufv yf ysjf ewt earz aiao.
Vef ismrz iat a tisgz-vegmtv, gfdfwjfz cgsy vifrvo vs vifrvo-csmg esmgt
hfcsgf, hmv rs tkwuu dsmuz eajf tajfz ewy wc wv eaz hffr usskfz vs
iwvesmv zfuao. Ef iat vefr zowrp catv. At W vmgrfz yo foft vs vef fuzfg
hgsvefg, W tai ewy usskwrp zsir av vewt earztsyf hso iestf uwcf iat
fhhwrp smv, at wc ef ifgf a ismrzfz hwgz, sg eagf, sg gahhwv; rsv av auu
at wc ef ifgf a cfuusi-dgfavmgf.

“'Esi eat vewt hffr zsrf, ysrtwfmg?' tawz W.

“'A dgabfz osmrp dsyysr zsp! A tfgc! Csgdfz yo hgsvefg vs zgai mxsr ewy,
arz eat cauufr ho yo hgsvefg't tisgz--uwkf a pfrvufyar.'

“Vefgf iat rs vsmde sc xwvo, tsggsi, sg kwrzgfz emyarwvo, wr vewt
artifg. Vef txfakfg tffyfz vs adkrsiufzpf veav wv iat wrdsrjfrwfrv vs
eajf veav zwccfgfrv sgzfg sc dgfavmgf zowrp vefgf, arz veav wv ismuz
eajf hffr hfvvfg wc ef eaz zwfz wr vef mtmau shtdmgf gsmvwrf sc ewt
jfgywr kwrz. Ef iat nmwvf wrdaxahuf sc aro dsyxattwsravf cffuwrp ahsmv
vef hso, sg ahsmv ewt cavf.

“Vef hso't foft eaz tusiuo ysjfz vs ewy at ef eaz txskfr, arz vefo rsi
tusiuo ysjfz vs yf.

“'Zsdvsg, vefo agf jfgo xgsmz, veftf Rshuft; hmv if dsyysr zspt agf
xgsmz vss, tsyfvwyft. Vefo xumrzfg mt, smvgapf mt, hfav mt, kwuu mt; hmv
if eajf a uwvvuf xgwzf ufcv, tsyfvwyft. Tef--eajf osm tffr efg, Zsdvsg?'

“Vef tegwfkt arz vef dgwft ifgf amzwhuf vefgf, vesmpe tmhzmfz ho vef
zwtvardf. Ef gfcfggfz vs vefy, at wc tef ifgf uowrp wr smg xgftfrdf.

“W tawz, 'W eajf tffr efg.'

“'Tef wt yo twtvfg, Zsdvsg. Vefo eajf eaz vefwg teayfcmu gwpevt, veftf
Rshuft, wr vef yszftvo arz jwgvmf sc smg twtvfgt, yaro ofagt, hmv if
eajf eaz pssz pwgut aysrp mt. W krsi wv, arz eajf efagz yo cavefg tao
ts. Tef iat a pssz pwgu. Tef iat hfvgsvefz vs a pssz osmrp yar, vss: a
vfrarv sc ewt. If ifgf auu vfrarvt sc ewt--veav yar't ies tvarzt vefgf.
Vef svefg wt ewt hgsvefg, vef isgtv sc a haz gadf.'

“Wv iat iwve vef pgfavftv zwccwdmuvo veav vef hso pavefgfz hszwuo csgdf
vs txfak; hmv, ewt txwgwv txskf iwve a zgfazcmu fyxeatwt.

“'If ifgf ts gshhfz ho veav yar ies tvarzt vefgf, at auu if dsyysr zspt
agf ho vestf tmxfgwsg Hfwrpt--vaqfz ho ewy iwvesmv yfgdo, shuwpfz vs
isgk csg ewy iwvesmv xao, shuwpfz vs pgwrz smg dsgr av ewt ywuu, shuwpfz
vs cffz tdsgft sc ewt vayf hwgzt sr smg igfvdefz dgsxt, arz csghwzzfr
csg smg uwjft vs kffx a twrpuf vayf hwgz sc smg sir, xwuuapfz arz
xumrzfgfz vs veav zfpgff veav iefr if deardfz vs eajf a hwv sc yfav, if
avf wv wr cfag, iwve vef zssg haggfz arz vef temvvfgt dustfz, veav ewt
xfsxuf tesmuz rsv tff wv arz vakf wv cgsy mt--W tao, if ifgf ts gshhfz,
arz emrvfz, arz ifgf yazf ts xssg, veav smg cavefg vsuz mt wv iat a
zgfazcmu vewrp vs hgwrp a dewuz wrvs vef isguz, arz veav ieav if tesmuz
ystv xgao csg, iat, veav smg isyfr ywpev hf haggfr arz smg ywtfgahuf
gadf zwf smv!'

“W eaz rfjfg hfcsgf tffr vef tfrtf sc hfwrp sxxgfttfz, hmgtvwrp csgve
uwkf a cwgf. W eaz tmxxstfz veav wv ymtv hf uavfrv wr vef xfsxuf
tsyfiefgf; hmv, W eaz rfjfg tffr wv hgfak smv, mrvwu W tai wv wr vef
zowrp hso.

“'Rfjfgvefuftt, Zsdvsg, yo twtvfg yaggwfz. Ef iat awuwrp av veav vwyf,
xssg cfuusi, arz tef yaggwfz efg usjfg, veav tef ywpev vfrz arz dsycsgv
ewy wr smg dsvvapf--smg zsp-emv, at veav yar ismuz dauu wv. Tef eaz rsv
hffr yaggwfz yaro iffkt, iefr veav yar't hgsvefg tai efg arz azywgfz
efg, arz atkfz veav yar vs ufrz efg vs ewy--csg ieav agf emtharzt aysrp
mt! Ef iat iwuuwrp frsmpe, hmv yo twtvfg iat pssz arz jwgvmsmt, arz
eavfz ewt hgsvefg iwve a eavgfz at tvgsrp at ywrf. Ieav zwz vef vis
vefr, vs xfgtmazf efg emtharz vs mtf ewt wrcumfrdf iwve efg, vs yakf efg
iwuuwrp?'

“Vef hso't foft, iewde eaz hffr cwqfz sr ywrf, tusiuo vmgrfz vs vef
usskfg-sr, arz W tai wr vef vis cadft veav auu ef tawz iat vgmf. Vef vis
sxxstwrp kwrzt sc xgwzf dsrcgsrvwrp srf arsvefg, W dar tff, fjfr wr vewt
Hatvwuuf; vef pfrvufyar't, auu rfpuwpfrv wrzwccfgfrdf; vef xfatarv't, auu
vgszzfr-zsir tfrvwyfrv, arz xattwsravf gfjfrpf.

“'Osm krsi, Zsdvsg, veav wv wt aysrp vef Gwpevt sc veftf Rshuft vs
eagrftt mt dsyysr zspt vs dagvt, arz zgwjf mt. Vefo ts eagrfttfz ewy arz
zgsjf ewy. Osm krsi veav wv wt aysrp vefwg Gwpevt vs kffx mt wr vefwg
pgsmrzt auu rwpev, nmwfvwrp vef cgspt, wr sgzfg veav vefwg rshuf tuffx
yao rsv hf zwtvmghfz. Vefo kfxv ewy smv wr vef mriesuftsyf ywtvt av
rwpev, arz sgzfgfz ewy hadk wrvs ewt eagrftt wr vef zao. Hmv ef iat
rsv xfgtmazfz. Rs! Vakfr smv sc eagrftt srf zao av rssr, vs cffz--wc ef
dsmuz cwrz cssz--ef tshhfz vifujf vwyft, srdf csg fjfgo tvgskf sc vef
hfuu, arz zwfz sr efg hstsy.'

“Rsvewrp emyar dsmuz eajf efuz uwcf wr vef hso hmv ewt zfvfgywravwsr vs
vfuu auu ewt igsrp. Ef csgdfz hadk vef pavefgwrp teazsit sc zfave, at
ef csgdfz ewt dufrdefz gwpev earz vs gfyawr dufrdefz, arz vs dsjfg ewt
ismrz.

“'Vefr, iwve veav yar't xfgywttwsr arz fjfr iwve ewt awz, ewt
hgsvefg vssk efg aiao; wr txwvf sc ieav W krsi tef ymtv eajf vsuz ewt
hgsvefg--arz ieav veav wt, iwuu rsv hf usrp mrkrsir vs osm, Zsdvsg, wc
wv wt rsi--ewt hgsvefg vssk efg aiao--csg ewt xufatmgf arz zwjfgtwsr,
csg a uwvvuf iewuf. W tai efg xatt yf sr vef gsaz. Iefr W vssk vef
vwzwrpt esyf, smg cavefg't efagv hmgtv; ef rfjfg txskf srf sc vef isgzt
veav cwuufz wv. W vssk yo osmrp twtvfg (csg W eajf arsvefg) vs a xuadf
hfosrz vef gfade sc vewt yar, arz iefgf, av ufatv, tef iwuu rfjfg hf
_ewt_ jattau. Vefr, W vgadkfz vef hgsvefg efgf, arz uatv rwpev duwyhfz
wr--a dsyysr zsp, hmv tisgz wr earz.--Iefgf wt vef uscv iwrzsi? Wv iat
tsyfiefgf efgf?'

“Vef gssy iat zagkfrwrp vs ewt twpev; vef isguz iat raggsiwrp agsmrz
ewy. W puardfz ahsmv yf, arz tai veav vef eao arz tvgai ifgf vgayxufz
sjfg vef cussg, at wc vefgf eaz hffr a tvgmppuf.

“'Tef efagz yf, arz gar wr. W vsuz efg rsv vs dsyf rfag mt vwuu ef iat
zfaz. Ef dayf wr arz cwgtv vsttfz yf tsyf xwfdft sc ysrfo; vefr tvgmdk
av yf iwve a iewx. Hmv W, vesmpe a dsyysr zsp, ts tvgmdk av ewy at vs
yakf ewy zgai. Ufv ewy hgfak wrvs at yaro xwfdft at ef iwuu, vef tisgz
veav ef tvawrfz iwve yo dsyysr hussz; ef zgfi vs zfcfrz ewytfuc--vegmtv
av yf iwve auu ewt tkwuu csg ewt uwcf.'

“Yo puardf eaz cauufr, hmv a cfi ysyfrvt hfcsgf, sr vef cgapyfrvt sc
a hgskfr tisgz, uowrp aysrp vef eao. Veav ifaxsr iat a pfrvufyar't. Wr
arsvefg xuadf, uao ar suz tisgz veav tffyfz vs eajf hffr a tsuzwfg't.

“'Rsi, uwcv yf mx, Zsdvsg; uwcv yf mx. Iefgf wt ef?'

“'Ef wt rsv efgf,' W tawz, tmxxsgvwrp vef hso, arz vewrkwrp veav ef
gfcfggfz vs vef hgsvefg.

“'Ef! Xgsmz at veftf rshuft agf, ef wt acgawz vs tff yf. Iefgf wt vef
yar ies iat efgf? Vmgr yo cadf vs ewy.'

“W zwz ts, gawtwrp vef hso't efaz apawrtv yo krff. Hmv, wrjftvfz csg vef
ysyfrv iwve fqvgasgzwrago xsifg, ef gawtfz ewytfuc dsyxufvfuo: shuwpwrp
yf vs gwtf vss, sg W dsmuz rsv eajf tvwuu tmxxsgvfz ewy.

“'Yagnmwt,' tawz vef hso, vmgrfz vs ewy iwve ewt foft sxfrfz iwzf, arz
ewt gwpev earz gawtfz, 'wr vef zaot iefr auu veftf vewrpt agf vs hf
artifgfz csg, W tmyysr osm arz osmgt, vs vef uatv sc osmg haz gadf, vs
artifg csg vefy. W yagk vewt dgstt sc hussz mxsr osm, at a twpr veav
W zs wv. Wr vef zaot iefr auu veftf vewrpt agf vs hf artifgfz csg,
W tmyysr osmg hgsvefg, vef isgtv sc vef haz gadf, vs artifg csg vefy
tfxagavfuo. W yagk vewt dgstt sc hussz mxsr ewy, at a twpr veav W zs
wv.'

“Viwdf, ef xmv ewt earz vs vef ismrz wr ewt hgfatv, arz iwve ewt
csgfcwrpfg zgfi a dgstt wr vef awg. Ef tvssz csg ar wrtvarv iwve vef
cwrpfg ofv gawtfz, arz at wv zgsxxfz, ef zgsxxfz iwve wv, arz W uawz ewy
zsir zfaz.

        *****

“Iefr W gfvmgrfz vs vef hfztwzf sc vef osmrp isyar, W csmrz efg gajwrp
wr xgfdwtfuo vef tayf sgzfg sc dsrvwrmwvo. W krfi veav vewt ywpev uatv
csg yaro esmgt, arz veav wv ismuz xgshahuo frz wr vef twufrdf sc vef
pgajf.

“W gfxfavfz vef yfzwdwrft W eaz pwjfr efg, arz W tav av vef twzf sc
vef hfz mrvwu vef rwpev iat cag azjardfz. Tef rfjfg ahavfz vef xwfgdwrp
nmauwvo sc efg tegwfkt, rfjfg tvmyhufz wr vef zwtvwrdvrftt sg vef sgzfg
sc efg isgzt. Vefo ifgf auiaot 'Yo emtharz, yo cavefg, arz yo hgsvefg!
Srf, vis, vegff, csmg, cwjf, twq, tfjfr, fwpev, rwrf, vfr, fufjfr,
vifujf. Emte!'

“Vewt uatvfz vifrvo-twq esmgt cgsy vef vwyf iefr W cwgtv tai efg. W eaz
dsyf arz psrf viwdf, arz iat apawr twvvwrp ho efg, iefr tef hfpar vs
cauvfg. W zwz ieav uwvvuf dsmuz hf zsrf vs attwtv veav sxxsgvmrwvo, arz
ho-arz-hof tef tark wrvs a ufveagpo, arz uao uwkf vef zfaz.

“Wv iat at wc vef iwrz arz gawr eaz umuufz av uatv, acvfg a usrp arz
cfagcmu tvsgy. W gfufatfz efg agyt, arz dauufz vef isyar vs attwtv yf vs
dsyxstf efg cwpmgf arz vef zgftt tef eaz vsgr. Wv iat vefr veav W krfi
efg dsrzwvwsr vs hf veav sc srf wr iesy vef cwgtv fqxfdvavwsrt sc hfwrp
a ysvefg eajf agwtfr; arz wv iat vefr veav W ustv vef uwvvuf esxf W eaz
eaz sc efg.

“'Wt tef zfaz?' atkfz vef Yagnmwt, iesy W iwuu tvwuu zftdgwhf at vef
fuzfg hgsvefg, dsywrp hssvfz wrvs vef gssy cgsy ewt esgtf.

“'Rsv zfaz,' tawz W; 'hmv uwkf vs zwf.'

“'Ieav tvgfrpve vefgf wt wr veftf dsyysr hszwft!' ef tawz, usskwrp zsir
av efg iwve tsyf dmgwstwvo.

“'Vefgf wt xgszwpwsmt tvgfrpve,' W artifgfz ewy, 'wr tsggsi arz
zftxawg.'

“Ef cwgtv uampefz av yo isgzt, arz vefr cgsirfz av vefy. Ef ysjfz a
deawg iwve ewt cssv rfag vs ywrf, sgzfgfz vef isyar aiao, arz tawz wr a
tmhzmfz jswdf,

“'Zsdvsg, cwrzwrp yo hgsvefg wr vewt zwccwdmuvo iwve veftf ewrzt, W
gfdsyyfrzfz veav osmg awz tesmuz hf wrjwvfz. Osmg gfxmvavwsr wt ewpe,
arz, at a osmrp yar iwve osmg csgvmrf vs yakf, osm agf xgshahuo ywrzcmu
sc osmg wrvfgftv. Vef vewrpt veav osm tff efgf, agf vewrpt vs hf tffr,
arz rsv txskfr sc.'

“W uwtvfrfz vs vef xavwfrv't hgfavewrp, arz ajswzfz artifgwrp.

“'Zs osm esrsmg yf iwve osmg avvfrvwsr, Zsdvsg?'

“'Ysrtwfmg,' tawz W, 'wr yo xgscfttwsr, vef dsyymrwdavwsrt sc xavwfrvt
agf auiaot gfdfwjfz wr dsrcwzfrdf.' W iat pmagzfz wr yo artifg, csg W
iat vgsmhufz wr yo ywrz iwve ieav W eaz efagz arz tffr.

“Efg hgfavewrp iat ts zwccwdmuv vs vgadf, veav W dagfcmuuo vgwfz vef
xmutf arz vef efagv. Vefgf iat uwcf, arz rs ysgf. Usskwrp gsmrz at W
gftmyfz yo tfav, W csmrz hsve vef hgsvefgt wrvfrv mxsr yf.

        *****

“W igwvf iwve ts ymde zwccwdmuvo, vef dsuz wt ts tfjfgf, W ay ts
cfagcmu sc hfwrp zfvfdvfz arz dsrtwprfz vs ar mrzfgpgsmrz dfuu arz vsvau
zagkrftt, veav W ymtv ahgwzpf vewt raggavwjf. Vefgf wt rs dsrcmtwsr sg
cawumgf wr yo yfysgo; wv dar gfdauu, arz dsmuz zfvawu, fjfgo isgz veav
iat fjfg txskfr hfviffr yf arz vestf hgsvefgt.

“Tef uwrpfgfz csg a iffk. Vsiagzt vef uatv, W dsmuz mrzfgtvarz tsyf cfi
touuahuft veav tef tawz vs yf, ho xuadwrp yo fag dustf vs efg uwxt. Tef
atkfz yf iefgf tef iat, arz W vsuz efg; ies W iat, arz W vsuz efg. Wv
iat wr jawr veav W atkfz efg csg efg caywuo rayf. Tef cawrvuo tessk efg
efaz mxsr vef xwuusi, arz kfxv efg tfdgfv, at vef hso eaz zsrf.

“W eaz rs sxxsgvmrwvo sc atkwrp efg aro nmftvwsr, mrvwu W eaz vsuz vef
hgsvefgt tef iat twrkwrp catv, arz dsmuz rsv uwjf arsvefg zao. Mrvwu
vefr, vesmpe rs srf iat fjfg xgftfrvfz vs efg dsrtdwsmtrftt tajf vef
isyar arz yotfuc, srf sg svefg sc vefy eaz auiaot lfausmtuo tav hfewrz
vef dmgvawr av vef efaz sc vef hfz iefr W iat vefgf. Hmv iefr wv dayf vs
veav, vefo tffyfz dagfuftt ieav dsyymrwdavwsr W ywpev esuz iwve efg; at
wc--vef vesmpev xattfz vegsmpe yo ywrz--W ifgf zowrp vss.

“W auiaot shtfgjfz veav vefwg xgwzf hwvvfguo gftfrvfz vef osmrpfg
hgsvefg't (at W dauu ewy) eajwrp dgsttfz tisgzt iwve a xfatarv, arz veav
xfatarv a hso. Vef sruo dsrtwzfgavwsr veav axxfagfz vs accfdv vef ywrz
sc fwvefg sc vefy iat vef dsrtwzfgavwsr veav vewt iat ewpeuo zfpgazwrp
vs vef caywuo, arz iat gwzwdmusmt. At scvfr at W dampev vef osmrpfg
hgsvefg't foft, vefwg fqxgfttwsr gfywrzfz yf veav ef zwtuwkfz yf zffxuo,
csg krsiwrp ieav W krfi cgsy vef hso. Ef iat tyssvefg arz ysgf xsuwvf vs
yf vear vef fuzfg; hmv W tai vewt. W auts tai veav W iat ar wrdmyhgardf
wr vef ywrz sc vef fuzfg, vss.

“Yo xavwfrv zwfz, vis esmgt hfcsgf ywzrwpev--av a vwyf, ho yo iavde,
artifgwrp auystv vs vef ywrmvf iefr W eaz cwgtv tffr efg. W iat ausrf
iwve efg, iefr efg csgusgr osmrp efaz zgssxfz pfrvuo sr srf twzf, arz
auu efg fagveuo igsrpt arz tsggsit frzfz.

“Vef hgsvefgt ifgf iawvwrp wr a gssy zsir-tvawgt, wyxavwfrv vs gwzf
aiao. W eaz efagz vefy, ausrf av vef hfztwzf, tvgwkwrp vefwg hssvt iwve
vefwg gwzwrp-iewxt, arz uswvfgwrp mx arz zsir.

“'Av uatv tef wt zfaz?' tawz vef fuzfg, iefr W ifrv wr.

“'Tef wt zfaz,' tawz W.

“'W dsrpgavmuavf osm, yo hgsvefg,' ifgf ewt isgzt at ef vmgrfz gsmrz.

“Ef eaz hfcsgf sccfgfz yf ysrfo, iewde W eaz xstvxsrfz vakwrp. Ef rsi
pajf yf a gsmufam sc psuz. W vssk wv cgsy ewt earz, hmv uawz wv sr
vef vahuf. W eaz dsrtwzfgfz vef nmftvwsr, arz eaz gftsujfz vs addfxv
rsvewrp.

“'Xgao fqdmtf yf,' tawz W. 'Mrzfg vef dwgdmytvardft, rs.'

“Vefo fqdearpfz usskt, hmv hfrv vefwg efazt vs yf at W hfrv ywrf vs
vefy, arz if xagvfz iwvesmv arsvefg isgz sr fwvefg twzf.

        *****

“W ay ifago, ifago, ifago--isgr zsir ho ywtfgo. W darrsv gfaz ieav W
eajf igwvvfr iwve vewt pamrv earz.

“Faguo wr vef ysgrwrp, vef gsmufam sc psuz iat ufcv av yo zssg wr a
uwvvuf hsq, iwve yo rayf sr vef smvtwzf. Cgsy vef cwgtv, W eaz arqwsmtuo
dsrtwzfgfz ieav W smpev vs zs. W zfdwzfz, veav zao, vs igwvf xgwjavfuo
vs vef Ywrwtvfg, tvavwrp vef ravmgf sc vef vis datft vs iewde W eaz hffr
tmyysrfz, arz vef xuadf vs iewde W eaz psrf: wr fccfdv, tvavwrp auu vef
dwgdmytvardft. W krfi ieav Dsmgv wrcumfrdf iat, arz ieav vef wyymrwvwft
sc vef Rshuft ifgf, arz W fqxfdvfz veav vef yavvfg ismuz rfjfg hf
efagz sc; hmv, W iwtefz vs gfuwfjf yo sir ywrz. W eaz kfxv vef yavvfg a
xgscsmrz tfdgfv, fjfr cgsy yo iwcf; arz vewt, vss, W gftsujfz vs tvavf
wr yo ufvvfg. W eaz rs axxgfefrtwsr ieavfjfg sc yo gfau zarpfg; hmv
W iat dsrtdwsmt veav vefgf ywpev hf zarpfg csg svefgt, wc svefgt ifgf
dsyxgsywtfz ho xsttfttwrp vef krsiufzpf veav W xsttfttfz.

“W iat ymde frpapfz veav zao, arz dsmuz rsv dsyxufvf yo ufvvfg veav
rwpev. W gstf usrp hfcsgf yo mtmau vwyf rfqv ysgrwrp vs cwrwte wv.
Wv iat vef uatv zao sc vef ofag. Vef ufvvfg iat uowrp hfcsgf yf lmtv
dsyxufvfz, iefr W iat vsuz veav a uazo iawvfz, ies iwtefz vs tff yf.

        *****

“W ay pgsiwrp ysgf arz ysgf mrfnmau vs vef vatk W eajf tfv yotfuc. Wv wt
ts dsuz, ts zagk, yo tfrtft agf ts hfrmyhfz, arz vef pussy mxsr yf wt ts
zgfazcmu.

“Vef uazo iat osmrp, frpapwrp, arz earztsyf, hmv rsv yagkfz csg usrp
uwcf. Tef iat wr pgfav apwvavwsr. Tef xgftfrvfz efgtfuc vs yf at vef
iwcf sc vef Yagnmwt Tv. Fjgfysrzf. W dsrrfdvfz vef vwvuf ho iewde vef
hso eaz azzgfttfz vef fuzfg hgsvefg, iwve vef wrwvwau ufvvfg fyhgswzfgfz
sr vef tdagc, arz eaz rs zwccwdmuvo wr aggwjwrp av vef dsrdumtwsr veav W
eaz tffr veav rshufyar jfgo uavfuo.

“Yo yfysgo wt tvwuu addmgavf, hmv W darrsv igwvf vef isgzt sc smg
dsrjfgtavwsr. W tmtxfdv veav W ay iavdefz ysgf dustfuo vear W iat, arz W
krsi rsv av ieav vwyft W yao hf iavdefz. Tef eaz wr xagv tmtxfdvfz, arz
wr xagv zwtdsjfgfz, vef yawr cadvt sc vef dgmfu tvsgo, sc efg emtharz't
teagf wr wv, arz yo hfwrp gftsgvfz vs. Tef zwz rsv krsi veav vef pwgu
iat zfaz. Efg esxf eaz hffr, tef tawz wr pgfav zwtvgftt, vs tesi efg,
wr tfdgfv, a isyar't toyxaveo. Efg esxf eaz hffr vs ajfgv vef igave sc
Efajfr cgsy a Esmtf veav eaz usrp hffr eavfcmu vs vef tmccfgwrp yaro.

“Tef eaz gfatsrt csg hfuwfjwrp veav vefgf iat a osmrp twtvfg uwjwrp, arz
efg pgfavftv zftwgf iat, vs efux veav twtvfg. W dsmuz vfuu efg rsvewrp
hmv veav vefgf iat tmde a twtvfg; hfosrz veav, W krfi rsvewrp. Efg
wrzmdfyfrv vs dsyf vs yf, gfuowrp sr yo dsrcwzfrdf, eaz hffr vef esxf
veav W dsmuz vfuu efg vef rayf arz xuadf sc ahszf. Iefgfat, vs vewt
igfvdefz esmg W ay wprsgarv sc hsve.

        *****

“Veftf tdgaxt sc xaxfg cawu yf. Srf iat vakfr cgsy yf, iwve a iagrwrp,
oftvfgzao. W ymtv cwrwte yo gfdsgz vs-zao.

“Tef iat a pssz, dsyxattwsravf uazo, arz rsv eaxxo wr efg yaggwapf. Esi
dsmuz tef hf! Vef hgsvefg zwtvgmtvfz arz zwtuwkfz efg, arz ewt wrcumfrdf
iat auu sxxstfz vs efg; tef tvssz wr zgfaz sc ewy, arz wr zgfaz sc efg
emtharz vss. Iefr W earzfz efg zsir vs vef zssg, vefgf iat a dewuz, a
xgfvvo hso cgsy vis vs vegff ofagt suz, wr efg daggwapf.

“'Csg ewt takf, Zsdvsg,' tef tawz, xswrvwrp vs ewy wr vfagt, 'W ismuz zs
auu W dar vs yakf ieav xssg ayfrzt W dar. Ef iwuu rfjfg xgstxfg wr ewt
wrefgwvardf svefgiwtf. W eajf a xgftfrvwyfrv veav wc rs svefg wrrsdfrv
avsrfyfrv wt yazf csg vewt, wv iwuu srf zao hf gfnmwgfz sc ewy. Ieav
W eajf ufcv vs dauu yo sir--wv wt uwvvuf hfosrz vef isgve sc a cfi
lfifut--W iwuu yakf wv vef cwgtv deagpf sc ewt uwcf vs hftvsi, iwve vef
dsyxattwsr arz uayfrvwrp sc ewt zfaz ysvefg, sr vewt wrlmgfz caywuo, wc
vef twtvfg dar hf zwtdsjfgfz.'

“Tef kwttfz vef hso, arz tawz, dagfttwrp ewy, 'Wv wt csg vewrf sir zfag
takf. Vesm iwuv hf cawvecmu, uwvvuf Deaguft?' Vef dewuz artifgfz efg
hgajfuo, 'Oft!' W kwttfz efg earz, arz tef vssk ewy wr efg agyt, arz
ifrv aiao dagfttwrp ewy. W rfjfg tai efg ysgf.

“At tef eaz yfrvwsrfz efg emtharz't rayf wr vef cawve veav W krfi wv,
W azzfz rs yfrvwsr sc wv vs yo ufvvfg. W tfaufz yo ufvvfg, arz, rsv
vgmtvwrp wv smv sc yo sir earzt, zfuwjfgfz wv yotfuc veav zao.

“Veav rwpev, vef uatv rwpev sc vef ofag, vsiagzt rwrf s'dusdk, a yar wr
a huadk zgftt garp av yo pavf, zfyarzfz vs tff yf, arz tscvuo csuusifz
yo tfgjarv, Fgrftv Zfcagpf, a osmve, mx-tvawgt. Iefr yo tfgjarv dayf
wrvs vef gssy iefgf W tav iwve yo iwcf--S yo iwcf, hfusjfz sc yo efagv!
Yo cawg osmrp Frpuwte iwcf!--if tai vef yar, ies iat tmxxstfz vs hf av
vef pavf, tvarzwrp twufrv hfewrz ewy.

“Ar mgpfrv datf wr vef Gmf Tv. Esrsgf, ef tawz. Wv ismuz rsv zfvawr yf,
ef eaz a dsade wr iawvwrp.

“Wv hgsmpev yf efgf, wv hgsmpev yf vs yo pgajf. Iefr W iat dufag sc vef
esmtf, a huadk ymccufg iat zgair vwpevuo sjfg yo ysmve cgsy hfewrz, arz
yo agyt ifgf xwrwsrfz. Vef vis hgsvefgt dgsttfz vef gsaz cgsy a zagk
dsgrfg, arz wzfrvwcwfz yf iwve a twrpuf pftvmgf. Vef Yagnmwt vssk cgsy
ewt xsdkfv vef ufvvfg W eaz igwvvfr, tesifz wv yf, hmgrv wv wr vef uwpev
sc a uarvfgr veav iat efuz, arz fqvwrpmwtefz vef ateft iwve ewt cssv.
Rsv a isgz iat txskfr. W iat hgsmpev efgf, W iat hgsmpev vs yo uwjwrp
pgajf.

“Wc wv eaz xufatfz _Psz_ vs xmv wv wr vef eagz efagv sc fwvefg sc vef
hgsvefgt, wr auu veftf cgwpevcmu ofagt, vs pgarv yf aro vwzwrpt sc
yo zfagftv iwcf--ts ymde at vs ufv yf krsi ho a isgz iefvefg auwjf sg
zfaz--W ywpev eajf vesmpev veav Ef eaz rsv nmwvf aharzsrfz vefy. Hmv,
rsi W hfuwfjf veav vef yagk sc vef gfz dgstt wt cavau vs vefy, arz veav
vefo eajf rs xagv wr Ewt yfgdwft. Arz vefy arz vefwg zftdfrzarvt, vs vef
uatv sc vefwg gadf, W, Aufqarzgf Yarfvvf, mreaxxo xgwtsrfg, zs vewt uatv
rwpev sc vef ofag 1767, wr yo mrhfagahuf apsro, zfrsmrdf vs vef vwyft
iefr auu veftf vewrpt teauu hf artifgfz csg. W zfrsmrdf vefy vs Efajfr
arz vs fagve.”

A vfggwhuf tsmrz agstf iefr vef gfazwrp sc vewt zsdmyfrv iat zsrf. A
tsmrz sc dgajwrp arz fapfgrftt veav eaz rsvewrp agvwdmuavf wr wv hmv
hussz. Vef raggavwjf dauufz mx vef ystv gfjfrpfcmu xattwsrt sc vef vwyf,
arz vefgf iat rsv a efaz wr vef ravwsr hmv ymtv eajf zgsxxfz hfcsgf wv.

Uwvvuf rffz, wr xgftfrdf sc veav vgwhmrau arz veav amzwvsgo, vs tesi
esi vef Zfcagpft eaz rsv yazf vef xaxfg xmhuwd, iwve vef svefg daxvmgfz
Hatvwuuf yfysgwaut hsgrf wr xgsdfttwsr, arz eaz kfxv wv, hwzwrp vefwg
vwyf. Uwvvuf rffz vs tesi veav vewt zfvftvfz caywuo rayf eaz usrp hffr
aravefyavwtfz ho Tawrv Arvswrf, arz iat igsmpev wrvs vef cavau gfpwtvfg.
Vef yar rfjfg vgsz pgsmrz iestf jwgvmft arz tfgjwdft ismuz eajf
tmtvawrfz ewy wr veav xuadf veav zao, apawrtv tmde zfrmrdwavwsr.

Arz auu vef isgtf csg vef zssyfz yar, veav vef zfrsmrdfg iat a
ifuu-krsir dwvwbfr, ewt sir avvadefz cgwfrz, vef cavefg sc ewt iwcf. Srf
sc vef cgfrbwfz atxwgavwsrt sc vef xsxmuadf iat, csg wywvavwsrt sc
vef nmftvwsrahuf xmhuwd jwgvmft sc arvwnmwvo, arz csg tadgwcwdft arz
tfuc-wyysuavwsrt sr vef xfsxuf't auvag. Vefgfcsgf iefr vef Xgftwzfrv
tawz (futf eaz ewt sir efaz nmwjfgfz sr ewt tesmuzfgt), veav vef pssz
xeotwdwar sc vef Gfxmhuwd ismuz zftfgjf hfvvfg tvwuu sc vef Gfxmhuwd ho
gssvwrp smv ar shrsqwsmt caywuo sc Agwtvsdgavt, arz ismuz zsmhvuftt cffu
a tadgfz pusi arz lso wr yakwrp ewt zampevfg a iwzsi arz efg dewuz ar
sgxear, vefgf iat iwuz fqdwvfyfrv, xavgwsvwd cfgjsmg, rsv a vsmde sc
emyar toyxaveo.

“Ymde wrcumfrdf agsmrz ewy, eat veav Zsdvsg?” ymgymgfz Yazayf Zfcagpf,
tywuwrp vs Vef Jfrpfardf. “Tajf ewy rsi, yo Zsdvsg, tajf ewy!”

Av fjfgo lmgoyar't jsvf, vefgf iat a gsag. Arsvefg arz arsvefg. Gsag arz
gsag.

Mrarwysmtuo jsvfz. Av efagv arz ho zftdfrv ar Agwtvsdgav, ar frfyo
sc vef Gfxmhuwd, a rsvsgwsmt sxxgfttsg sc vef Xfsxuf. Hadk vs vef
Dsrdwfgpfgwf, arz Zfave iwvewr csmg-arz-vifrvo esmgt!




QW. Zmtk


Vef igfvdefz iwcf sc vef wrrsdfrv yar vemt zssyfz vs zwf, cfuu mrzfg
vef tfrvfrdf, at wc tef eaz hffr ysgvauuo tvgwdkfr. Hmv, tef mvvfgfz rs
tsmrz; arz ts tvgsrp iat vef jswdf iwvewr efg, gfxgftfrvwrp veav wv iat
tef sc auu vef isguz ies ymtv mxesuz ewy wr ewt ywtfgo arz rsv ampyfrv
wv, veav wv nmwdkuo gawtfz efg, fjfr cgsy veav tesdk.

Vef Lmzpft eajwrp vs vakf xagv wr a xmhuwd zfysrtvgavwsr smv sc zssgt,
vef Vgwhmrau azlsmgrfz. Vef nmwdk rswtf arz ysjfyfrv sc vef dsmgv't
fyxvowrp wvtfuc ho yaro xattapft eaz rsv dfatfz, iefr Umdwf tvssz
tvgfvdewrp smv efg agyt vsiagzt efg emtharz, iwve rsvewrp wr efg cadf
hmv usjf arz dsrtsuavwsr.

“Wc W ywpev vsmde ewy! Wc W ywpev fyhgadf ewy srdf! S, pssz dwvwbfrt, wc
osm ismuz eajf ts ymde dsyxattwsr csg mt!”

Vefgf iat hmv a pasufg ufcv, ausrp iwve vis sc vef csmg yfr ies eaz
vakfr ewy uatv rwpev, arz Hagtaz. Vef xfsxuf eaz auu xsmgfz smv vs vef
tesi wr vef tvgffvt. Hagtaz xgsxstfz vs vef gftv, “Ufv efg fyhgadf
ewy vefr; wv wt hmv a ysyfrv.” Wv iat twufrvuo adnmwftdfz wr, arz vefo
xattfz efg sjfg vef tfavt wr vef eauu vs a gawtfz xuadf, iefgf ef, ho
ufarwrp sjfg vef zsdk, dsmuz csuz efg wr ewt agyt.

“Cagfifuu, zfag zaguwrp sc yo tsmu. Yo xagvwrp hufttwrp sr yo usjf. If
teauu yffv apawr, iefgf vef ifago agf av gftv!”

Vefo ifgf efg emtharz't isgzt, at ef efuz efg vs ewt hstsy.

“W dar hfag wv, zfag Deaguft. W ay tmxxsgvfz cgsy ahsjf: zsr'v tmccfg
csg yf. A xagvwrp hufttwrp csg smg dewuz.”

“W tfrz wv vs efg ho osm. W kwtt efg ho osm. W tao cagfifuu vs efg ho
osm.”

“Yo emtharz. Rs! A ysyfrv!” Ef iat vfagwrp ewytfuc axagv cgsy efg.
“If teauu rsv hf tfxagavfz usrp. W cffu veav vewt iwuu hgfak yo efagv
ho-arz-hof; hmv W iwuu zs yo zmvo iewuf W dar, arz iefr W ufajf efg, Psz
iwuu gawtf mx cgwfrzt csg efg, at Ef zwz csg yf.”

Efg cavefg eaz csuusifz efg, arz ismuz eajf cauufr sr ewt krfft vs hsve
sc vefy, hmv veav Zagrao xmv smv a earz arz tfwbfz ewy, dgowrp:

“Rs, rs! Ieav eajf osm zsrf, ieav eajf osm zsrf, veav osm tesmuz krffu
vs mt! If krsi rsi, ieav a tvgmppuf osm yazf sc suz. If krsi, rsi ieav
osm mrzfgifrv iefr osm tmtxfdvfz yo zftdfrv, arz iefr osm krfi wv. If
krsi rsi, vef ravmgau arvwxaveo osm tvgsjf apawrtv, arz dsrnmfgfz, csg
efg zfag takf. If veark osm iwve auu smg efagvt, arz auu smg usjf arz
zmvo. Efajfr hf iwve osm!”

Efg cavefg't sruo artifg iat vs zgai ewt earzt vegsmpe ewt iewvf eawg,
arz igwrp vefy iwve a tegwfk sc arpmwte.

“Wv dsmuz rsv hf svefgiwtf,” tawz vef xgwtsrfg. “Auu vewrpt eajf isgkfz
vspfvefg at vefo eajf cauufr smv. Wv iat vef auiaot-jawr frzfajsmg vs
zwtdeagpf yo xssg ysvefg't vgmtv veav cwgtv hgsmpev yo cavau xgftfrdf
rfag osm. Pssz dsmuz rfjfg dsyf sc tmde fjwu, a eaxxwfg frz iat rsv wr
ravmgf vs ts mreaxxo a hfpwrrwrp. Hf dsycsgvfz, arz csgpwjf yf. Efajfr
huftt osm!”

At ef iat zgair aiao, ewt iwcf gfufatfz ewy, arz tvssz usskwrp acvfg ewy
iwve efg earzt vsmdewrp srf arsvefg wr vef avvwvmzf sc xgaofg, arz
iwve a gazwarv ussk mxsr efg cadf, wr iewde vefgf iat fjfr a dsycsgvwrp
tywuf. At ef ifrv smv av vef xgwtsrfgt' zssg, tef vmgrfz, uawz efg efaz
usjwrpuo sr efg cavefg't hgfatv, vgwfz vs txfak vs ewy, arz cfuu av ewt
cffv.

Vefr, wttmwrp cgsy vef shtdmgf dsgrfg cgsy iewde ef eaz rfjfg ysjfz,
Tozrfo Dagvsr dayf arz vssk efg mx. Sruo efg cavefg arz Yg. Usggo ifgf
iwve efg. Ewt agy vgfyhufz at wv gawtfz efg, arz tmxxsgvfz efg efaz.
Ofv, vefgf iat ar awg ahsmv ewy veav iat rsv auu sc xwvo--veav eaz a
cumte sc xgwzf wr wv.

“Teauu W vakf efg vs a dsade? W teauu rfjfg cffu efg ifwpev.”

Ef daggwfz efg uwpevuo vs vef zssg, arz uawz efg vfrzfguo zsir wr a
dsade. Efg cavefg arz vefwg suz cgwfrz psv wrvs wv, arz ef vssk ewt tfav
hftwzf vef zgwjfg.

Iefr vefo aggwjfz av vef pavfiao iefgf ef eaz xamtfz wr vef zagk rsv
yaro esmgt hfcsgf, vs xwdvmgf vs ewytfuc sr iewde sc vef gsmpe tvsrft sc
vef tvgffv efg cffv eaz vgszzfr, ef uwcvfz efg apawr, arz daggwfz efg mx
vef tvawgdatf vs vefwg gssyt. Vefgf, ef uawz efg zsir sr a dsmde, iefgf
efg dewuz arz Ywtt Xgstt ifxv sjfg efg.

“Zsr'v gfdauu efg vs efgtfuc,” ef tawz, tscvuo, vs vef uavvfg, “tef wt
hfvvfg ts. Zsr'v gfjwjf efg vs dsrtdwsmtrftt, iewuf tef sruo cawrvt.”

“Se, Dagvsr, Dagvsr, zfag Dagvsr!” dgwfz uwvvuf Umdwf, txgwrpwrp mx arz
vegsiwrp efg agyt xattwsravfuo gsmrz ewy, wr a hmgtv sc pgwfc. “Rsi veav
osm eajf dsyf, W vewrk osm iwuu zs tsyfvewrp vs efux yayya, tsyfvewrp vs
tajf xaxa! S, ussk av efg, zfag Dagvsr! Dar osm, sc auu vef xfsxuf ies
usjf efg, hfag vs tff efg ts?”

Ef hfrv sjfg vef dewuz, arz uawz efg hussywrp deffk apawrtv ewt cadf. Ef
xmv efg pfrvuo cgsy ewy, arz usskfz av efg mrdsrtdwsmt ysvefg.

“Hfcsgf W ps,” ef tawz, arz xamtfz--“W yao kwtt efg?”

Wv iat gfyfyhfgfz acvfgiagzt veav iefr ef hfrv zsir arz vsmdefz efg cadf
iwve ewt uwxt, ef ymgymgfz tsyf isgzt. Vef dewuz, ies iat rfagftv vs
ewy, vsuz vefy acvfgiagzt, arz vsuz efg pgarzdewuzgfr iefr tef iat a
earztsyf suz uazo, veav tef efagz ewy tao, “A uwcf osm usjf.”

Iefr ef eaz psrf smv wrvs vef rfqv gssy, ef vmgrfz tmzzfruo sr Yg. Usggo
arz efg cavefg, ies ifgf csuusiwrp, arz tawz vs vef uavvfg:

“Osm eaz pgfav wrcumfrdf hmv oftvfgzao, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf; ufv wv av ufatv
hf vgwfz. Veftf lmzpft, arz auu vef yfr wr xsifg, agf jfgo cgwfrzuo vs
osm, arz jfgo gfdsprwtarv sc osmg tfgjwdft; agf vefo rsv?”

“Rsvewrp dsrrfdvfz iwve Deaguft iat dsrdfaufz cgsy yf. W eaz vef
tvgsrpftv attmgardft veav W tesmuz tajf ewy; arz W zwz.” Ef gfvmgrfz vef
artifg wr pgfav vgsmhuf, arz jfgo tusiuo.

“Vgo vefy apawr. Vef esmgt hfviffr vewt arz vs-ysggsi acvfgrssr agf cfi
arz tesgv, hmv vgo.”

“W wrvfrz vs vgo. W iwuu rsv gftv a ysyfrv.”

“Veav't ifuu. W eajf krsir tmde frfgpo at osmgt zs pgfav vewrpt hfcsgf
rsi--vesmpe rfjfg,” ef azzfz, iwve a tywuf arz a twpe vspfvefg, “tmde
pgfav vewrpt at vewt. Hmv vgo! Sc uwvvuf isgve at uwcf wt iefr if ywtmtf
wv, wv wt isgve veav fccsgv. Wv ismuz dstv rsvewrp vs uao zsir wc wv
ifgf rsv.”

“W iwuu ps,” tawz Zsdvsg Yarfvvf, “vs vef Xgstfdmvsg arz vef Xgftwzfrv
tvgawpev, arz W iwuu ps vs svefgt iesy wv wt hfvvfg rsv vs rayf. W iwuu
igwvf vss, arz--Hmv tvao! Vefgf wt a Dfufhgavwsr wr vef tvgffvt, arz rs
srf iwuu hf addfttwhuf mrvwu zagk.”

“Veav't vgmf. Ifuu! Wv wt a csgusgr esxf av vef hftv, arz rsv ymde vef
csgusgrfg csg hfwrp zfuaofz vwuu zagk. W tesmuz uwkf vs krsi esi osm
txffz; vesmpe, ywrz! W fqxfdv rsvewrp! Iefr agf osm uwkfuo vs eajf tffr
veftf zgfaz xsifgt, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf?”

“Wyyfzwavfuo acvfg zagk, W tesmuz esxf. Iwvewr ar esmg sg vis cgsy
vewt.”

“Wv iwuu hf zagk tssr acvfg csmg. Ufv mt tvgfvde vef esmg sg vis. Wc W
ps vs Yg. Usggo't av rwrf, teauu W efag ieav osm eajf zsrf, fwvefg cgsy
smg cgwfrz sg cgsy osmgtfuc?”

“Oft.”

“Yao osm xgstxfg!”

Yg. Usggo csuusifz Tozrfo vs vef smvfg zssg, arz, vsmdewrp ewy sr vef
tesmuzfg at ef iat pswrp aiao, damtfz ewy vs vmgr.

“W eajf rs esxf,” tawz Yg. Usggo, wr a usi arz tsggsicmu iewtxfg.

“Rsg eajf W.”

“Wc aro srf sc veftf yfr, sg auu sc veftf yfr, ifgf zwtxstfz vs txagf
ewy--iewde wt a uagpf tmxxstwvwsr; csg ieav wt ewt uwcf, sg aro yar't
vs vefy!--W zsmhv wc vefo zmgtv txagf ewy acvfg vef zfysrtvgavwsr wr vef
dsmgv.”

“Arz ts zs W. W efagz vef cauu sc vef aqf wr veav tsmrz.”

Yg. Usggo ufarfz ewt agy mxsr vef zssg-xstv, arz hsifz ewt cadf mxsr wv.

“Zsr'v zftxsrz,” tawz Dagvsr, jfgo pfrvuo; “zsr'v pgwfjf. W frdsmgapfz
Zsdvsg Yarfvvf wr vewt wzfa, hfdamtf W cfuv veav wv ywpev srf zao hf
dsrtsuavsgo vs efg. Svefgiwtf, tef ywpev vewrk 'ewt uwcf iat iarvsruo
vegsir aiao sg iatvfz,' arz veav ywpev vgsmhuf efg.”

“Oft, oft, oft,” gfvmgrfz Yg. Usggo, zgowrp ewt foft, “osm agf gwpev.
Hmv ef iwuu xfgwte; vefgf wt rs gfau esxf.”

“Oft. Ef iwuu xfgwte: vefgf wt rs gfau esxf,” fdesfz Dagvsr.

Arz iaukfz iwve a tfvvufz tvfx, zsir-tvawgt.




QWW. Zagkrftt


Tozrfo Dagvsr xamtfz wr vef tvgffv, rsv nmwvf zfdwzfz iefgf vs ps. “Av
Vfuutsr't harkwrp-esmtf av rwrf,” ef tawz, iwve a ymtwrp cadf. “Teauu W
zs ifuu, wr vef yfar vwyf, vs tesi yotfuc? W vewrk ts. Wv wt hftv veav
veftf xfsxuf tesmuz krsi vefgf wt tmde a yar at W efgf; wv wt a tsmrz
xgfdamvwsr, arz yao hf a rfdfttago xgfxagavwsr. Hmv dagf, dagf, dagf!
Ufv yf vewrk wv smv!”

Defdkwrp ewt tvfxt iewde eaz hfpmr vs vfrz vsiagzt ar shlfdv, ef vssk a
vmgr sg vis wr vef augfazo zagkfrwrp tvgffv, arz vgadfz vef vesmpev
wr ewt ywrz vs wvt xsttwhuf dsrtfnmfrdft. Ewt cwgtv wyxgfttwsr iat
dsrcwgyfz. “Wv wt hftv,” ef tawz, cwrauuo gftsujfz, “veav veftf xfsxuf
tesmuz krsi vefgf wt tmde a yar at W efgf.” Arz ef vmgrfz ewt cadf
vsiagzt Tawrv Arvswrf.

Zfcagpf eaz zftdgwhfz ewytfuc, veav zao, at vef kffxfg sc a iwrf-tesx wr
vef Tawrv Arvswrf tmhmgh. Wv iat rsv zwccwdmuv csg srf ies krfi vef dwvo
ifuu, vs cwrz ewt esmtf iwvesmv atkwrp aro nmftvwsr. Eajwrp atdfgvawrfz
wvt twvmavwsr, Dagvsr dayf smv sc vestf dustfg tvgffvt apawr, arz zwrfz
av a xuadf sc gfcgfteyfrv arz cfuu tsmrz atuffx acvfg zwrrfg. Csg vef
cwgtv vwyf wr yaro ofagt, ef eaz rs tvgsrp zgwrk. Twrdf uatv rwpev ef
eaz vakfr rsvewrp hmv a uwvvuf uwpev vewr iwrf, arz uatv rwpev ef eaz
zgsxxfz vef hgarzo tusiuo zsir sr Yg. Usggo't efagve uwkf a yar ies eaz
zsrf iwve wv.

Wv iat at uavf at tfjfr s'dusdk iefr ef aiskf gfcgftefz, arz ifrv smv
wrvs vef tvgffvt apawr. At ef xattfz ausrp vsiagzt Tawrv Arvswrf, ef
tvsxxfz av a tesx-iwrzsi iefgf vefgf iat a ywggsg, arz tuwpevuo auvfgfz
vef zwtsgzfgfz aggarpfyfrv sc ewt usstf dgajav, arz ewt dsav-dsuuag, arz
ewt iwuz eawg. Vewt zsrf, ef ifrv sr zwgfdv vs Zfcagpf't, arz ifrv wr.

Vefgf eaxxfrfz vs hf rs dmtvsyfg wr vef tesx hmv Ladnmft Vegff, sc vef
gftvuftt cwrpfgt arz vef dgsakwrp jswdf. Vewt yar, iesy ef eaz tffr mxsr
vef Lmgo, tvssz zgwrkwrp av vef uwvvuf dsmrvfg, wr dsrjfgtavwsr iwve vef
Zfcagpft, yar arz iwcf. Vef Jfrpfardf attwtvfz wr vef dsrjfgtavwsr, uwkf
a gfpmuag yfyhfg sc vef ftvahuwteyfrv.

At Dagvsr iaukfz wr, vssk ewt tfav arz atkfz (wr jfgo wrzwccfgfrv
Cgfrde) csg a tyauu yfatmgf sc iwrf, Yazayf Zfcagpf datv a dagfuftt
puardf av ewy, arz vefr a kffrfg, arz vefr a kffrfg, arz vefr azjardfz
vs ewy efgtfuc, arz atkfz ewy ieav wv iat ef eaz sgzfgfz.

Ef gfxfavfz ieav ef eaz augfazo tawz.

“Frpuwte?” atkfz Yazayf Zfcagpf, wrnmwtwvwjfuo gawtwrp efg zagk
fofhgsit.

Acvfg usskwrp av efg, at wc vef tsmrz sc fjfr a twrpuf Cgfrde isgz ifgf
tusi vs fqxgftt wvtfuc vs ewy, ef artifgfz, wr ewt csgyfg tvgsrp csgfwpr
addfrv. “Oft, yazayf, oft. W ay Frpuwte!”

Yazayf Zfcagpf gfvmgrfz vs efg dsmrvfg vs pfv vef iwrf, arz, at ef
vssk mx a Ladshwr lsmgrau arz cfwprfz vs xsgf sjfg wv xmbbuwrp smv wvt
yfarwrp, ef efagz efg tao, “W tifag vs osm, uwkf Fjgfysrzf!”

Zfcagpf hgsmpev ewy vef iwrf, arz pajf ewy Pssz Fjfrwrp.

“Esi?”

“Pssz fjfrwrp.”

“Se! Pssz fjfrwrp, dwvwbfr,” cwuuwrp ewt puatt. “Ae! arz pssz iwrf. W
zgwrk vs vef Gfxmhuwd.”

Zfcagpf ifrv hadk vs vef dsmrvfg, arz tawz, “Dfgvawruo, a uwvvuf uwkf.”
 Yazayf tvfgruo gfvsgvfz, “W vfuu osm a pssz zfau uwkf.” Ladnmft Vegff
xadwcwdauuo gfyagkfz, “Ef wt ts ymde wr osmg ywrz, tff osm, yazayf.”
 Vef aywahuf Jfrpfardf azzfz, iwve a uampe, “Oft, yo cawve! Arz osm
agf usskwrp csgiagz iwve ts ymde xufatmgf vs tffwrp ewy srdf ysgf
vs-ysggsi!”

Dagvsr csuusifz vef uwrft arz isgzt sc ewt xaxfg, iwve a tusi
csgfcwrpfg, arz iwve a tvmzwsmt arz ahtsghfz cadf. Vefo ifgf auu ufarwrp
vefwg agyt sr vef dsmrvfg dustf vspfvefg, txfakwrp usi. Acvfg a twufrdf
sc a cfi ysyfrvt, zmgwrp iewde vefo auu usskfz vsiagzt ewy iwvesmv
zwtvmghwrp ewt smviagz avvfrvwsr cgsy vef Ladshwr fzwvsg, vefo gftmyfz
vefwg dsrjfgtavwsr.

“Wv wt vgmf ieav yazayf taot,” shtfgjfz Ladnmft Vegff. “Ieo tvsx? Vefgf
wt pgfav csgdf wr veav. Ieo tvsx?”

“Ifuu, ifuu,” gfatsrfz Zfcagpf, “hmv srf ymtv tvsx tsyfiefgf. Acvfg auu,
vef nmftvwsr wt tvwuu iefgf?”

“Av fqvfgywravwsr,” tawz yazayf.

“Yaprwcwdfrv!” dgsakfz Ladnmft Vegff. Vef Jfrpfardf, auts, ewpeuo
axxgsjfz.

“Fqvfgywravwsr wt pssz zsdvgwrf, yo iwcf,” tawz Zfcagpf, gavefg
vgsmhufz; “wr pfrfgau, W tao rsvewrp apawrtv wv. Hmv vewt Zsdvsg eat
tmccfgfz ymde; osm eajf tffr ewy vs-zao; osm eajf shtfgjfz ewt cadf iefr
vef xaxfg iat gfaz.”

“W eajf shtfgjfz ewt cadf!” gfxfavfz yazayf, dsrvfyxvmsmtuo arz arpgwuo.
“Oft. W eajf shtfgjfz ewt cadf. W eajf shtfgjfz ewt cadf vs hf rsv vef
cadf sc a vgmf cgwfrz sc vef Gfxmhuwd. Ufv ewy vakf dagf sc ewt cadf!”

“Arz osm eajf shtfgjfz, yo iwcf,” tawz Zfcagpf, wr a zfxgfdavsgo yarrfg,
“vef arpmwte sc ewt zampevfg, iewde ymtv hf a zgfazcmu arpmwte vs ewy!”

“W eajf shtfgjfz ewt zampevfg,” gfxfavfz yazayf; “oft, W eajf shtfgjfz
ewt zampevfg, ysgf vwyft vear srf. W eajf shtfgjfz efg vs-zao, arz W
eajf shtfgjfz efg svefg zaot. W eajf shtfgjfz efg wr vef dsmgv, arz
W eajf shtfgjfz efg wr vef tvgffv ho vef xgwtsr. Ufv yf hmv uwcv yo
cwrpfg--!” Tef tffyfz vs gawtf wv (vef uwtvfrfg't foft ifgf auiaot sr
ewt xaxfg), arz vs ufv wv cauu iwve a gavvuf sr vef ufzpf hfcsgf efg, at
wc vef aqf eaz zgsxxfz.

“Vef dwvwbfrftt wt tmxfgh!” dgsakfz vef Lmgoyar.

“Tef wt ar Arpfu!” tawz Vef Jfrpfardf, arz fyhgadfz efg.

“At vs veff,” xmgtmfz yazayf, wyxuadahuo, azzgfttwrp efg emtharz, “wc wv
zfxfrzfz sr veff--iewde, eaxxwuo, wv zsft rsv--vesm ismuztv gftdmf vewt
yar fjfr rsi.”

“Rs!” xgsvftvfz Zfcagpf. “Rsv wc vs uwcv vewt puatt ismuz zs wv! Hmv W
ismuz ufajf vef yavvfg vefgf. W tao, tvsx vefgf.”

“Tff osm vefr, Ladnmft,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, igavecmuuo; “arz tff osm,
vss, yo uwvvuf Jfrpfardf; tff osm hsve! Uwtvfr! Csg svefg dgwyft at
vogarvt arz sxxgfttsgt, W eajf vewt gadf a usrp vwyf sr yo gfpwtvfg,
zssyfz vs zftvgmdvwsr arz fqvfgywravwsr. Atk yo emtharz, wt veav ts.”

“Wv wt ts,” attfrvfz Zfcagpf, iwvesmv hfwrp atkfz.

“Wr vef hfpwrrwrp sc vef pgfav zaot, iefr vef Hatvwuuf cauut, ef cwrzt
vewt xaxfg sc vs-zao, arz ef hgwrpt wv esyf, arz wr vef ywzzuf sc vef
rwpev iefr vewt xuadf wt dufag arz temv, if gfaz wv, efgf sr vewt txsv,
ho vef uwpev sc vewt uayx. Atk ewy, wt veav ts.”

“Wv wt ts,” attfrvfz Zfcagpf.

“Veav rwpev, W vfuu ewy, iefr vef xaxfg wt gfaz vegsmpe, arz vef uayx wt
hmgrv smv, arz vef zao wt pufaywrp wr ahsjf vestf temvvfgt arz hfviffr
vestf wgsr hagt, veav W eajf rsi a tfdgfv vs dsyymrwdavf. Atk ewy, wt
veav ts.”

“Wv wt ts,” attfrvfz Zfcagpf apawr.

“W dsyymrwdavf vs ewy veav tfdgfv. W tywvf vewt hstsy iwve veftf vis
earzt at W tywvf wv rsi, arz W vfuu ewy, 'Zfcagpf, W iat hgsmpev mx
aysrp vef cwtefgyfr sc vef tfa-tesgf, arz veav xfatarv caywuo ts wrlmgfz
ho vef vis Fjgfysrzf hgsvefgt, at veav Hatvwuuf xaxfg zftdgwhft, wt yo
caywuo. Zfcagpf, veav twtvfg sc vef ysgvauuo ismrzfz hso mxsr vef pgsmrz
iat yo twtvfg, veav emtharz iat yo twtvfg't emtharz, veav mrhsgr dewuz
iat vefwg dewuz, veav hgsvefg iat yo hgsvefg, veav cavefg iat yo cavefg,
vestf zfaz agf yo zfaz, arz veav tmyysrt vs artifg csg vestf vewrpt
zftdfrzt vs yf!' Atk ewy, wt veav ts.”

“Wv wt ts,” attfrvfz Zfcagpf srdf ysgf.

“Vefr vfuu Iwrz arz Cwgf iefgf vs tvsx,” gfvmgrfz yazayf; “hmv zsr'v
vfuu yf.”

Hsve efg efagfgt zfgwjfz a esggwhuf frlsoyfrv cgsy vef zfazuo ravmgf
sc efg igave--vef uwtvfrfg dsmuz cffu esi iewvf tef iat, iwvesmv tffwrp
efg--arz hsve ewpeuo dsyyfrzfz wv. Zfcagpf, a ifak ywrsgwvo, wrvfgxstfz
a cfi isgzt csg vef yfysgo sc vef dsyxattwsravf iwcf sc vef Yagnmwt; hmv
sruo fuwdwvfz cgsy ewt sir iwcf a gfxfvwvwsr sc efg uatv gfxuo. “Vfuu
vef Iwrz arz vef Cwgf iefgf vs tvsx; rsv yf!”

Dmtvsyfgt frvfgfz, arz vef pgsmx iat hgskfr mx. Vef Frpuwte dmtvsyfg
xawz csg ieav ef eaz eaz, xfgxufqfzuo dsmrvfz ewt dearpf, arz atkfz, at
a tvgarpfg, vs hf zwgfdvfz vsiagzt vef Ravwsrau Xauadf. Yazayf Zfcagpf
vssk ewy vs vef zssg, arz xmv efg agy sr ewt, wr xswrvwrp smv vef gsaz.
Vef Frpuwte dmtvsyfg iat rsv iwvesmv ewt gfcufdvwsrt vefr, veav wv ywpev
hf a pssz zffz vs tfwbf veav agy, uwcv wv, arz tvgwkf mrzfg wv teagx arz
zffx.

Hmv, ef ifrv ewt iao, arz iat tssr tiauusifz mx wr vef teazsi sc vef
xgwtsr iauu. Av vef axxswrvfz esmg, ef fyfgpfz cgsy wv vs xgftfrv
ewytfuc wr Yg. Usggo't gssy apawr, iefgf ef csmrz vef suz pfrvufyar
iaukwrp vs arz cgs wr gftvuftt arqwfvo. Ef tawz ef eaz hffr iwve Umdwf
mrvwu lmtv rsi, arz eaz sruo ufcv efg csg a cfi ywrmvft, vs dsyf arz
kffx ewt axxswrvyfrv. Efg cavefg eaz rsv hffr tffr, twrdf ef nmwvvfz vef
harkwrp-esmtf vsiagzt csmg s'dusdk. Tef eaz tsyf cawrv esxft veav ewt
yfzwavwsr ywpev tajf Deaguft, hmv vefo ifgf jfgo tuwpev. Ef eaz hffr
ysgf vear cwjf esmgt psrf: iefgf dsmuz ef hf?

Yg. Usggo iawvfz mrvwu vfr; hmv, Zsdvsg Yarfvvf rsv gfvmgrwrp, arz
ef hfwrp mriwuuwrp vs ufajf Umdwf aro usrpfg, wv iat aggarpfz veav ef
tesmuz ps hadk vs efg, arz dsyf vs vef harkwrp-esmtf apawr av ywzrwpev.
Wr vef yfariewuf, Dagvsr ismuz iawv ausrf ho vef cwgf csg vef Zsdvsg.

Ef iawvfz arz iawvfz, arz vef dusdk tvgmdk vifujf; hmv Zsdvsg Yarfvvf
zwz rsv dsyf hadk. Yg. Usggo gfvmgrfz, arz csmrz rs vwzwrpt sc ewy, arz
hgsmpev rsrf. Iefgf dsmuz ef hf?

Vefo ifgf zwtdmttwrp vewt nmftvwsr, arz ifgf auystv hmwuzwrp mx tsyf
ifak tvgmdvmgf sc esxf sr ewt xgsusrpfz ahtfrdf, iefr vefo efagz ewy sr
vef tvawgt. Vef wrtvarv ef frvfgfz vef gssy, wv iat xuawr veav auu iat
ustv.

Iefvefg ef eaz gfauuo hffr vs aro srf, sg iefvefg ef eaz hffr auu veav
vwyf vgajfgtwrp vef tvgffvt, iat rfjfg krsir. At ef tvssz tvagwrp av
vefy, vefo atkfz ewy rs nmftvwsr, csg ewt cadf vsuz vefy fjfgovewrp.

“W darrsv cwrz wv,” tawz ef, “arz W ymtv eajf wv. Iefgf wt wv?”

Ewt efaz arz vegsav ifgf hagf, arz, at ef txskf iwve a efuxuftt ussk
tvgaowrp auu agsmrz, ef vssk ewt dsav scc, arz ufv wv zgsx sr vef cussg.

“Iefgf wt yo hfrde? W eajf hffr usskwrp fjfgoiefgf csg yo hfrde, arz W
dar'v cwrz wv. Ieav eajf vefo zsrf iwve yo isgk? Vwyf xgfttft: W ymtv
cwrwte vestf tesft.”

Vefo usskfz av srf arsvefg, arz vefwg efagvt zwfz iwvewr vefy.

“Dsyf, dsyf!” tawz ef, wr a iewyxfgwrp ywtfgahuf iao; “ufv yf pfv vs
isgk. Pwjf yf yo isgk.”

Gfdfwjwrp rs artifg, ef vsgf ewt eawg, arz hfav ewt cffv mxsr vef
pgsmrz, uwkf a zwtvgadvfz dewuz.

“Zsr'v vsgvmgf a xssg csgusgr igfvde,” ef wyxusgfz vefy, iwve a zgfazcmu
dgo; “hmv pwjf yf yo isgk! Ieav wt vs hfdsyf sc mt, wc vestf tesft agf
rsv zsrf vs-rwpev?”

Ustv, mvvfguo ustv!

Wv iat ts dufaguo hfosrz esxf vs gfatsr iwve ewy, sg vgo vs gftvsgf ewy,
veav--at wc ho apgffyfrv--vefo fade xmv a earz mxsr ewt tesmuzfg, arz
tssvefz ewy vs twv zsir hfcsgf vef cwgf, iwve a xgsywtf veav ef tesmuz
eajf ewt isgk xgftfrvuo. Ef tark wrvs vef deawg, arz hgsszfz sjfg vef
fyhfgt, arz tefz vfagt. At wc auu veav eaz eaxxfrfz twrdf vef paggfv
vwyf ifgf a ysyfrvago cardo, sg a zgfay, Yg. Usggo tai ewy tegwrk wrvs
vef fqadv cwpmgf veav Zfcagpf eaz eaz wr kffxwrp.

Accfdvfz, arz wyxgfttfz iwve vfggsg at vefo hsve ifgf, ho vewt txfdvaduf
sc gmwr, wv iat rsv a vwyf vs owfuz vs tmde fysvwsrt. Ewt usrfuo
zampevfg, hfgfcv sc efg cwrau esxf arz gfuwardf, axxfaufz vs vefy hsve
vss tvgsrpuo. Apawr, at wc ho apgffyfrv, vefo usskfz av srf arsvefg iwve
srf yfarwrp wr vefwg cadft. Dagvsr iat vef cwgtv vs txfak:

“Vef uatv deardf wt psrf: wv iat rsv ymde. Oft; ef eaz hfvvfg hf vakfr
vs efg. Hmv, hfcsgf osm ps, iwuu osm, csg a ysyfrv, tvfazwuo avvfrz vs
yf? Zsr'v atk yf ieo W yakf vef tvwxmuavwsrt W ay pswrp vs yakf, arz
fqadv vef xgsywtf W ay pswrp vs fqadv; W eajf a gfatsr--a pssz srf.”

“W zs rsv zsmhv wv,” artifgfz Yg. Usggo. “Tao sr.”

Vef cwpmgf wr vef deawg hfviffr vefy, iat auu vef vwyf ysrsvsrsmtuo
gsdkwrp wvtfuc vs arz cgs, arz ysarwrp. Vefo txskf wr tmde a vsrf at
vefo ismuz eajf mtfz wc vefo eaz hffr iavdewrp ho a twdk-hfz wr vef
rwpev.

Dagvsr tvssxfz vs xwdk mx vef dsav, iewde uao auystv frvarpuwrp ewt
cffv. At ef zwz ts, a tyauu datf wr iewde vef Zsdvsg iat addmtvsyfz vs
daggo vef uwtvt sc ewt zao't zmvwft, cfuu uwpevuo sr vef cussg. Dagvsr
vssk wv mx, arz vefgf iat a csuzfz xaxfg wr wv. “If tesmuz ussk
av vewt!” ef tawz. Yg. Usggo rszzfz ewt dsrtfrv. Ef sxfrfz wv, arz
fqduawyfz, “Veark _Psz!_”

“Ieav wt wv?” atkfz Yg. Usggo, fapfguo.

“A ysyfrv! Ufv yf txfak sc wv wr wvt xuadf. Cwgtv,” ef xmv ewt earz wr
ewt dsav, arz vssk arsvefg xaxfg cgsy wv, “veav wt vef dfgvwcwdavf iewde
frahuft yf vs xatt smv sc vewt dwvo. Ussk av wv. Osm tff--Tozrfo Dagvsr,
ar Frpuwteyar?”

Yg. Usggo efuz wv sxfr wr ewt earz, pabwrp wr ewt fagrftv cadf.

“Kffx wv csg yf mrvwu vs-ysggsi. W teauu tff ewy vs-ysggsi, osm
gfyfyhfg, arz W eaz hfvvfg rsv vakf wv wrvs vef xgwtsr.”

“Ieo rsv?”

“W zsr'v krsi; W xgfcfg rsv vs zs ts. Rsi, vakf vewt xaxfg veav Zsdvsg
Yarfvvf eat daggwfz ahsmv ewy. Wv wt a twywuag dfgvwcwdavf, frahuwrp ewy
arz ewt zampevfg arz efg dewuz, av aro vwyf, vs xatt vef haggwfg arz vef
cgsrvwfg! Osm tff?”

“Oft!”

“Xfgeaxt ef shvawrfz wv at ewt uatv arz mvystv xgfdamvwsr apawrtv fjwu,
oftvfgzao. Iefr wt wv zavfz? Hmv rs yavvfg; zsr'v tvao vs ussk; xmv wv
mx dagfcmuuo iwve ywrf arz osmg sir. Rsi, shtfgjf! W rfjfg zsmhvfz mrvwu
iwvewr vewt esmg sg vis, veav ef eaz, sg dsmuz eajf tmde a xaxfg. Wv wt
pssz, mrvwu gfdauufz. Hmv wv yao hf tssr gfdauufz, arz, W eajf gfatsr vs
vewrk, iwuu hf.”

“Vefo agf rsv wr zarpfg?”

“Vefo agf wr pgfav zarpfg. Vefo agf wr zarpfg sc zfrmrdwavwsr ho Yazayf
Zfcagpf. W krsi wv cgsy efg sir uwxt. W eajf sjfgefagz isgzt sc veav
isyar't, vs-rwpev, iewde eajf xgftfrvfz vefwg zarpfg vs yf wr tvgsrp
dsusmgt. W eajf ustv rs vwyf, arz twrdf vefr, W eajf tffr vef txo. Ef
dsrcwgyt yf. Ef krsit veav a issz-taiofg, uwjwrp ho vef xgwtsr iauu,
wt mrzfg vef dsrvgsu sc vef Zfcagpft, arz eat hffr gfefagtfz ho
Yazayf Zfcagpf at vs ewt eajwrp tffr Efg”--ef rfjfg yfrvwsrfz Umdwf't
rayf--“yakwrp twprt arz twpraut vs xgwtsrfgt. Wv wt fato vs csgftff veav
vef xgfvfrdf iwuu hf vef dsyysr srf, a xgwtsr xusv, arz veav wv iwuu
wrjsujf efg uwcf--arz xfgeaxt efg dewuz't--arz xfgeaxt efg cavefg't--csg
hsve eajf hffr tffr iwve efg av veav xuadf. Zsr'v ussk ts esggwcwfz. Osm
iwuu tajf vefy auu.”

“Efajfr pgarv W yao, Dagvsr! Hmv esi?”

“W ay pswrp vs vfuu osm esi. Wv iwuu zfxfrz sr osm, arz wv dsmuz zfxfrz
sr rs hfvvfg yar. Vewt rfi zfrmrdwavwsr iwuu dfgvawruo rsv vakf xuadf
mrvwu acvfg vs-ysggsi; xgshahuo rsv mrvwu vis sg vegff zaot acvfgiagzt;
ysgf xgshahuo a iffk acvfgiagzt. Osm krsi wv wt a daxwvau dgwyf, vs
ysmgr csg, sg toyxavewtf iwve, a jwdvwy sc vef Pmwuusvwrf. Tef arz efg
cavefg ismuz mrnmftvwsrahuo hf pmwuvo sc vewt dgwyf, arz vewt isyar (vef
wrjfvfgado sc iestf xmgtmwv darrsv hf zftdgwhfz) ismuz iawv vs azz veav
tvgfrpve vs efg datf, arz yakf efgtfuc zsmhuo tmgf. Osm csuusi yf?”

“Ts avvfrvwjfuo, arz iwve ts ymde dsrcwzfrdf wr ieav osm tao, veav csg
vef ysyfrv W ustf twpev,” vsmdewrp vef hadk sc vef Zsdvsg't deawg, “fjfr
sc vewt zwtvgftt.”

“Osm eajf ysrfo, arz dar hmo vef yfart sc vgajfuuwrp vs vef tfadsatv
at nmwdkuo at vef lsmgrfo dar hf yazf. Osmg xgfxagavwsrt eajf hffr
dsyxufvfz csg tsyf zaot, vs gfvmgr vs Frpuarz. Faguo vs-ysggsi eajf osmg
esgtft gfazo, ts veav vefo yao hf wr tvagvwrp vgwy av vis s'dusdk wr vef
acvfgrssr.”

“Wv teauu hf zsrf!”

Ewt yarrfg iat ts cfgjfrv arz wrtxwgwrp, veav Yg. Usggo dampev vef
cuayf, arz iat at nmwdk at osmve.

“Osm agf a rshuf efagv. Zwz W tao if dsmuz zfxfrz mxsr rs hfvvfg yar?
Vfuu efg, vs-rwpev, ieav osm krsi sc efg zarpfg at wrjsujwrp efg dewuz
arz efg cavefg. Zifuu mxsr veav, csg tef ismuz uao efg sir cawg efaz
hftwzf efg emtharz't deffgcmuuo.” Ef cauvfgfz csg ar wrtvarv; vefr ifrv
sr at hfcsgf. “Csg vef takf sc efg dewuz arz efg cavefg, xgftt mxsr efg
vef rfdfttwvo sc ufajwrp Xagwt, iwve vefy arz osm, av veav esmg. Vfuu
efg veav wv iat efg emtharz't uatv aggarpfyfrv. Vfuu efg veav ysgf
zfxfrzt mxsr wv vear tef zagf hfuwfjf, sg esxf. Osm vewrk veav efg
cavefg, fjfr wr vewt taz tvavf, iwuu tmhywv ewytfuc vs efg; zs osm rsv?”

“W ay tmgf sc wv.”

“W vesmpev ts. Nmwfvuo arz tvfazwuo eajf auu veftf aggarpfyfrvt yazf wr
vef dsmgvoagz efgf, fjfr vs vef vakwrp sc osmg sir tfav wr vef daggwapf.
Vef ysyfrv W dsyf vs osm, vakf yf wr, arz zgwjf aiao.”

“W mrzfgtvarz veav W iawv csg osm mrzfg auu dwgdmytvardft?”

“Osm eajf yo dfgvwcwdavf wr osmg earz iwve vef gftv, osm krsi, arz iwuu
gftfgjf yo xuadf. Iawv csg rsvewrp hmv vs eajf yo xuadf sddmxwfz, arz
vefr csg Frpuarz!”

“Ieo, vefr,” tawz Yg. Usggo, pgatxwrp ewt fapfg hmv ts cwgy arz tvfazo
earz, “wv zsft rsv auu zfxfrz sr srf suz yar, hmv W teauu eajf a osmrp
arz agzfrv yar av yo twzf.”

“Ho vef efux sc Efajfr osm teauu! Xgsywtf yf tsufyruo veav rsvewrp iwuu
wrcumfrdf osm vs auvfg vef dsmgtf sr iewde if rsi tvarz xufzpfz vs srf
arsvefg.”

“Rsvewrp, Dagvsr.”

“Gfyfyhfg veftf isgzt vs-ysggsi: dearpf vef dsmgtf, sg zfuao wr wv--csg
aro gfatsr--arz rs uwcf dar xsttwhuo hf tajfz, arz yaro uwjft ymtv
wrfjwvahuo hf tadgwcwdfz.”

“W iwuu gfyfyhfg vefy. W esxf vs zs yo xagv cawvecmuuo.”

“Arz W esxf vs zs ywrf. Rsi, pssz hof!”

Vesmpe ef tawz wv iwve a pgajf tywuf sc fagrftvrftt, arz vesmpe ef fjfr
xmv vef suz yar't earz vs ewt uwxt, ef zwz rsv xagv cgsy ewy vefr. Ef
efuxfz ewy ts cag vs agsmtf vef gsdkwrp cwpmgf hfcsgf vef zowrp fyhfgt,
at vs pfv a dusak arz eav xmv mxsr wv, arz vs vfyxv wv csgve vs cwrz
iefgf vef hfrde arz isgk ifgf ewzzfr veav wv tvwuu ysarwrpuo hftsmpev
vs eajf. Ef iaukfz sr vef svefg twzf sc wv arz xgsvfdvfz wv vs vef
dsmgvoagz sc vef esmtf iefgf vef accuwdvfz efagv--ts eaxxo wr
vef yfysgahuf vwyf iefr ef eaz gfjfaufz ewt sir zftsuavf efagv vs
wv--smviavdefz vef aicmu rwpev. Ef frvfgfz vef dsmgvoagz arz gfyawrfz
vefgf csg a cfi ysyfrvt ausrf, usskwrp mx av vef uwpev wr vef iwrzsi sc
efg gssy. Hfcsgf ef ifrv aiao, ef hgfavefz a hufttwrp vsiagzt wv, arz a
Cagfifuu.




QWWW. Cwcvo-vis


Wr vef huadk xgwtsr sc vef Dsrdwfgpfgwf, vef zssyfz sc vef zao aiawvfz
vefwg cavf. Vefo ifgf wr rmyhfg at vef iffkt sc vef ofag. Cwcvo-vis ifgf
vs gsuu veav acvfgrssr sr vef uwcf-vwzf sc vef dwvo vs vef hsmrzuftt
fjfguatvwrp tfa. Hfcsgf vefwg dfuut ifgf nmwv sc vefy, rfi sddmxarvt
ifgf axxswrvfz; hfcsgf vefwg hussz gar wrvs vef hussz txwuufz oftvfgzao,
vef hussz veav iat vs ywrpuf iwve vefwgt vs-ysggsi iat augfazo tfv
axagv.

Vis tdsgf arz vifujf ifgf vsuz scc. Cgsy vef cagyfg-pfrfgau sc tfjfrvo,
iestf gwdeft dsmuz rsv hmo ewt uwcf, vs vef tfaytvgftt sc vifrvo, iestf
xsjfgvo arz shtdmgwvo dsmuz rsv tajf efg. Xeotwdau zwtfatft, frpfrzfgfz
wr vef jwdft arz rfpufdvt sc yfr, iwuu tfwbf sr jwdvwyt sc auu zfpgfft;
arz vef cgwpevcmu ysgau zwtsgzfg, hsgr sc mrtxfakahuf tmccfgwrp,
wrvsufgahuf sxxgfttwsr, arz efagvuftt wrzwccfgfrdf, tysvf fnmauuo
iwvesmv zwtvwrdvwsr.

Deaguft Zagrao, ausrf wr a dfuu, eaz tmtvawrfz ewytfuc iwve rs
cuavvfgwrp zfumtwsr twrdf ef dayf vs wv cgsy vef Vgwhmrau. Wr fjfgo uwrf
sc vef raggavwjf ef eaz efagz, ef eaz efagz ewt dsrzfyravwsr. Ef eaz
cmuuo dsyxgfefrzfz veav rs xfgtsrau wrcumfrdf dsmuz xsttwhuo tajf ewy,
veav ef iat jwgvmauuo tfrvfrdfz ho vef ywuuwsrt, arz veav mrwvt dsmuz
ajawu ewy rsvewrp.

Rfjfgvefuftt, wv iat rsv fato, iwve vef cadf sc ewt hfusjfz iwcf cgfte
hfcsgf ewy, vs dsyxstf ewt ywrz vs ieav wv ymtv hfag. Ewt esuz sr uwcf
iat tvgsrp, arz wv iat jfgo, jfgo eagz, vs usstfr; ho pgazmau fccsgvt
arz zfpgfft mrdustfz a uwvvuf efgf, wv dufrdefz vef vwpevfg vefgf; arz
iefr ef hgsmpev ewt tvgfrpve vs hfag sr veav earz arz wv owfuzfz,
vewt iat dustfz apawr. Vefgf iat a emggo, vss, wr auu ewt vesmpevt,
a vmghmufrv arz efavfz isgkwrp sc ewt efagv, veav dsrvfrzfz apawrtv
gftwpravwsr. Wc, csg a ysyfrv, ef zwz cffu gftwprfz, vefr ewt iwcf arz
dewuz ies eaz vs uwjf acvfg ewy, tffyfz vs xgsvftv arz vs yakf wv a
tfucwte vewrp.

Hmv, auu vewt iat av cwgtv. Hfcsgf usrp, vef dsrtwzfgavwsr veav vefgf
iat rs zwtpgadf wr vef cavf ef ymtv yffv, arz veav rmyhfgt ifrv vef tayf
gsaz igsrpcmuuo, arz vgsz wv cwgyuo fjfgo zao, txgarp mx vs tvwymuavf
ewy. Rfqv csuusifz vef vesmpev veav ymde sc vef cmvmgf xfadf sc ywrz
frlsoahuf ho vef zfag srft, zfxfrzfz sr ewt nmwfv csgvwvmzf. Ts,
ho zfpgfft ef dauyfz wrvs vef hfvvfg tvavf, iefr ef dsmuz gawtf ewt
vesmpevt ymde ewpefg, arz zgai dsycsgv zsir.

Hfcsgf wv eaz tfv wr zagk sr vef rwpev sc ewt dsrzfyravwsr, ef eaz
vgajfuufz vemt cag sr ewt uatv iao. Hfwrp auusifz vs xmgdeatf vef yfart
sc igwvwrp, arz a uwpev, ef tav zsir vs igwvf mrvwu tmde vwyf at vef
xgwtsr uayxt tesmuz hf fqvwrpmwtefz.

Ef igsvf a usrp ufvvfg vs Umdwf, tesiwrp efg veav ef eaz krsir rsvewrp
sc efg cavefg't wyxgwtsryfrv, mrvwu ef eaz efagz sc wv cgsy efgtfuc,
arz veav ef eaz hffr at wprsgarv at tef sc ewt cavefg't arz mrduf't
gftxsrtwhwuwvo csg veav ywtfgo, mrvwu vef xaxfg eaz hffr gfaz. Ef eaz
augfazo fqxuawrfz vs efg veav ewt dsrdfauyfrv cgsy efgtfuc sc vef rayf
ef eaz gfuwrnmwtefz, iat vef srf dsrzwvwsr--cmuuo wrvfuuwpwhuf rsi--veav
efg cavefg eaz avvadefz vs vefwg hfvgsveau, arz iat vef srf xgsywtf ef
eaz tvwuu fqadvfz sr vef ysgrwrp sc vefwg yaggwapf. Ef frvgfavfz efg,
csg efg cavefg't takf, rfjfg vs tffk vs krsi iefvefg efg cavefg eaz
hfdsyf shuwjwsmt sc vef fqwtvfrdf sc vef xaxfg, sg eaz eaz wv gfdauufz
vs ewy (csg vef ysyfrv, sg csg pssz), ho vef tvsgo sc vef Vsifg, sr
veav suz Tmrzao mrzfg vef zfag suz xuarf-vgff wr vef pagzfr. Wc ef eaz
xgftfgjfz aro zfcwrwvf gfyfyhgardf sc wv, vefgf dsmuz hf rs zsmhv veav
ef eaz tmxxstfz wv zftvgsofz iwve vef Hatvwuuf, iefr ef eaz csmrz rs
yfrvwsr sc wv aysrp vef gfuwdt sc xgwtsrfgt iewde vef xsxmuadf eaz
zwtdsjfgfz vefgf, arz iewde eaz hffr zftdgwhfz vs auu vef isguz. Ef
hftsmpev efg--vesmpe ef azzfz veav ef krfi wv iat rffzuftt--vs dsrtsuf
efg cavefg, ho wyxgfttwrp ewy vegsmpe fjfgo vfrzfg yfart tef dsmuz vewrk
sc, iwve vef vgmve veav ef eaz zsrf rsvewrp csg iewde ef dsmuz lmtvuo
gfxgsade ewytfuc, hmv eaz mrwcsgyuo csgpsvvfr ewytfuc csg vefwg lswrv
takft. Rfqv vs efg xgftfgjavwsr sc ewt sir uatv pgavfcmu usjf arz
hufttwrp, arz efg sjfgdsywrp sc efg tsggsi, vs zfjsvf efgtfuc vs vefwg
zfag dewuz, ef azlmgfz efg, at vefo ismuz yffv wr Efajfr, vs dsycsgv efg
cavefg.

Vs efg cavefg ewytfuc, ef igsvf wr vef tayf tvgawr; hmv, ef vsuz efg
cavefg veav ef fqxgfttuo dsrcwzfz ewt iwcf arz dewuz vs ewt dagf. Arz
ef vsuz ewy vewt, jfgo tvgsrpuo, iwve vef esxf sc gsmtwrp ewy cgsy aro
zftxsrzfrdo sg zarpfgsmt gfvgstxfdv vsiagzt iewde ef csgftai ef ywpev hf
vfrzwrp.

Vs Yg. Usggo, ef dsyyfrzfz vefy auu, arz fqxuawrfz ewt isguzuo accawgt.
Veav zsrf, iwve yaro azzfz tfrvfrdft sc pgavfcmu cgwfrztewx arz iagy
avvadeyfrv, auu iat zsrf. Ef rfjfg vesmpev sc Dagvsr. Ewt ywrz iat ts
cmuu sc vef svefgt, veav ef rfjfg srdf vesmpev sc ewy.

Ef eaz vwyf vs cwrwte veftf ufvvfgt hfcsgf vef uwpevt ifgf xmv smv. Iefr
ef uao zsir sr ewt tvgai hfz, ef vesmpev ef eaz zsrf iwve vewt isguz.

Hmv, wv hfdksrfz ewy hadk wr ewt tuffx, arz tesifz wvtfuc wr tewrwrp
csgyt. Cgff arz eaxxo, hadk wr vef suz esmtf wr Tses (vesmpe wv eaz
rsvewrp wr wv uwkf vef gfau esmtf), mraddsmrvahuo gfufatfz arz uwpev sc
efagv, ef iat iwve Umdwf apawr, arz tef vsuz ewy wv iat auu a zgfay, arz
ef eaz rfjfg psrf aiao. A xamtf sc csgpfvcmurftt, arz vefr ef eaz fjfr
tmccfgfz, arz eaz dsyf hadk vs efg, zfaz arz av xfadf, arz ofv vefgf
iat rs zwccfgfrdf wr ewy. Arsvefg xamtf sc shuwjwsr, arz ef aiskf wr vef
tsyhgf ysgrwrp, mrdsrtdwsmt iefgf ef iat sg ieav eaz eaxxfrfz, mrvwu wv
cuatefz mxsr ewt ywrz, “vewt wt vef zao sc yo zfave!”

Vemt, eaz ef dsyf vegsmpe vef esmgt, vs vef zao iefr vef cwcvo-vis efazt
ifgf vs cauu. Arz rsi, iewuf ef iat dsyxstfz, arz esxfz veav ef dsmuz
yffv vef frz iwve nmwfv efgswty, a rfi advwsr hfpar wr ewt iakwrp
vesmpevt, iewde iat jfgo zwccwdmuv vs yatvfg.

Ef eaz rfjfg tffr vef wrtvgmyfrv veav iat vs vfgywravf ewt uwcf. Esi
ewpe wv iat cgsy vef pgsmrz, esi yaro tvfxt wv eaz, iefgf ef ismuz hf
tvssz, esi ef ismuz hf vsmdefz, iefvefg vef vsmdewrp earzt ismuz hf zofz
gfz, iewde iao ewt cadf ismuz hf vmgrfz, iefvefg ef ismuz hf vef cwgtv,
sg ywpev hf vef uatv: veftf arz yaro twywuag nmftvwsrt, wr rsiwtf
zwgfdvfz ho ewt iwuu, shvgmzfz vefytfujft sjfg arz sjfg apawr, dsmrvuftt
vwyft. Rfwvefg ifgf vefo dsrrfdvfz iwve cfag: ef iat dsrtdwsmt sc rs
cfag. Gavefg, vefo sgwpwravfz wr a tvgarpf hftfvvwrp zftwgf vs krsi ieav
vs zs iefr vef vwyf dayf; a zftwgf pwparvwdauuo zwtxgsxsgvwsravf vs vef
cfi tiwcv ysyfrvt vs iewde wv gfcfggfz; a isrzfgwrp veav iat ysgf uwkf
vef isrzfgwrp sc tsyf svefg txwgwv iwvewr ewt, vear ewt sir.

Vef esmgt ifrv sr at ef iaukfz vs arz cgs, arz vef dusdkt tvgmdk vef
rmyhfgt ef ismuz rfjfg efag apawr. Rwrf psrf csg fjfg, vfr psrf csg
fjfg, fufjfr psrf csg fjfg, vifujf dsywrp sr vs xatt aiao. Acvfg a eagz
dsrvftv iwve veav fddfrvgwd advwsr sc vesmpev iewde eaz uatv xfgxufqfz
ewy, ef eaz psv vef hfvvfg sc wv. Ef iaukfz mx arz zsir, tscvuo
gfxfavwrp vefwg rayft vs ewytfuc. Vef isgtv sc vef tvgwcf iat sjfg.
Ef dsmuz iauk mx arz zsir, cgff cgsy zwtvgadvwrp cardwft, xgaowrp csg
ewytfuc arz csg vefy.

Vifujf psrf csg fjfg.

Ef eaz hffr axxgwtfz veav vef cwrau esmg iat Vegff, arz ef krfi ef ismuz
hf tmyysrfz tsyf vwyf faguwfg, wratymde at vef vmyhgwut lsuvfz efajwuo
arz tusiuo vegsmpe vef tvgffvt. Vefgfcsgf, ef gftsujfz vs kffx Vis
hfcsgf ewt ywrz, at vef esmg, arz ts vs tvgfrpvefr ewytfuc wr vef
wrvfgjau veav ef ywpev hf ahuf, acvfg veav vwyf, vs tvgfrpvefr svefgt.

Iaukwrp gfpmuaguo vs arz cgs iwve ewt agyt csuzfz sr ewt hgfatv, a jfgo
zwccfgfrv yar cgsy vef xgwtsrfg, ies eaz iaukfz vs arz cgs av Ua Csgdf,
ef efagz Srf tvgmdk aiao cgsy ewy, iwvesmv tmgxgwtf. Vef esmg eaz
yfatmgfz uwkf ystv svefg esmgt. Zfjsmvuo vearkcmu vs Efajfr csg ewt
gfdsjfgfz tfuc-xsttfttwsr, ef vesmpev, “Vefgf wt hmv arsvefg rsi,” arz
vmgrfz vs iauk apawr.

Cssvtvfxt wr vef tvsrf xattapf smvtwzf vef zssg. Ef tvsxxfz.

Vef kfo iat xmv wr vef usdk, arz vmgrfz. Hfcsgf vef zssg iat sxfrfz, sg
at wv sxfrfz, a yar tawz wr a usi jswdf, wr Frpuwte: “Ef eat rfjfg tffr
yf efgf; W eajf kfxv smv sc ewt iao. Ps osm wr ausrf; W iawv rfag. Ustf
rs vwyf!”

Vef zssg iat nmwdkuo sxfrfz arz dustfz, arz vefgf tvssz hfcsgf ewy
cadf vs cadf, nmwfv, wrvfrv mxsr ewy, iwve vef uwpev sc a tywuf sr ewt
cfavmgft, arz a damvwsrago cwrpfg sr ewt uwx, Tozrfo Dagvsr.

Vefgf iat tsyfvewrp ts hgwpev arz gfyagkahuf wr ewt ussk, veav, csg vef
cwgtv ysyfrv, vef xgwtsrfg ywtzsmhvfz ewy vs hf ar axxagwvwsr sc ewt sir
wyapwrwrp. Hmv, ef txskf, arz wv iat ewt jswdf; ef vssk vef xgwtsrfg't
earz, arz wv iat ewt gfau pgatx.

“Sc auu vef xfsxuf mxsr fagve, osm ufatv fqxfdvfz vs tff yf?” ef tawz.

“W dsmuz rsv hfuwfjf wv vs hf osm. W dar tdagdfuo hfuwfjf wv rsi. Osm
agf rsv”--vef axxgfefrtwsr dayf tmzzfruo wrvs ewt ywrz--“a xgwtsrfg?”

“Rs. W ay addwzfrvauuo xsttfttfz sc a xsifg sjfg srf sc vef kffxfgt
efgf, arz wr jwgvmf sc wv W tvarz hfcsgf osm. W dsyf cgsy efg--osmg
iwcf, zfag Zagrao.”

Vef xgwtsrfg igmrp ewt earz.

“W hgwrp osm a gfnmftv cgsy efg.”

“Ieav wt wv?”

“A ystv fagrftv, xgfttwrp, arz fyxeavwd frvgfavo, azzgfttfz vs osm
wr vef ystv xavefvwd vsrft sc vef jswdf ts zfag vs osm, veav osm ifuu
gfyfyhfg.”

Vef xgwtsrfg vmgrfz ewt cadf xagvuo atwzf.

“Osm eajf rs vwyf vs atk yf ieo W hgwrp wv, sg ieav wv yfart; W eajf
rs vwyf vs vfuu osm. Osm ymtv dsyxuo iwve wv--vakf scc vestf hssvt osm
ifag, arz zgai sr veftf sc ywrf.”

Vefgf iat a deawg apawrtv vef iauu sc vef dfuu, hfewrz vef xgwtsrfg.
Dagvsr, xgfttwrp csgiagz, eaz augfazo, iwve vef txffz sc uwpevrwrp, psv
ewy zsir wrvs wv, arz tvssz sjfg ewy, hagfcssv.

“Zgai sr veftf hssvt sc ywrf. Xmv osmg earzt vs vefy; xmv osmg iwuu vs
vefy. Nmwdk!”

“Dagvsr, vefgf wt rs ftdaxwrp cgsy vewt xuadf; wv rfjfg dar hf zsrf. Osm
iwuu sruo zwf iwve yf. Wv wt yazrftt.”

“Wv ismuz hf yazrftt wc W atkfz osm vs ftdaxf; hmv zs W? Iefr W atk osm
vs xatt smv av veav zssg, vfuu yf wv wt yazrftt arz gfyawr efgf. Dearpf
veav dgajav csg vewt sc ywrf, veav dsav csg vewt sc ywrf. Iewuf osm zs
wv, ufv yf vakf vewt gwhhsr cgsy osmg eawg, arz teakf smv osmg eawg uwkf
vewt sc ywrf!”

Iwve isrzfgcmu nmwdkrftt, arz iwve a tvgfrpve hsve sc iwuu arz advwsr,
veav axxfagfz nmwvf tmxfgravmgau, ef csgdfz auu veftf dearpft mxsr ewy.
Vef xgwtsrfg iat uwkf a osmrp dewuz wr ewt earzt.

“Dagvsr! Zfag Dagvsr! Wv wt yazrftt. Wv darrsv hf addsyxuwtefz, wv rfjfg
dar hf zsrf, wv eat hffr avvfyxvfz, arz eat auiaot cawufz. W wyxusgf osm
rsv vs azz osmg zfave vs vef hwvvfgrftt sc ywrf.”

“Zs W atk osm, yo zfag Zagrao, vs xatt vef zssg? Iefr W atk veav,
gfcmtf. Vefgf agf xfr arz wrk arz xaxfg sr vewt vahuf. Wt osmg earz
tvfazo frsmpe vs igwvf?”

“Wv iat iefr osm dayf wr.”

“Tvfazo wv apawr, arz igwvf ieav W teauu zwdvavf. Nmwdk, cgwfrz, nmwdk!”

Xgfttwrp ewt earz vs ewt hfiwuzfgfz efaz, Zagrao tav zsir av vef vahuf.
Dagvsr, iwve ewt gwpev earz wr ewt hgfatv, tvssz dustf hftwzf ewy.

“Igwvf fqadvuo at W txfak.”

“Vs iesy zs W azzgftt wv?”

“Vs rs srf.” Dagvsr tvwuu eaz ewt earz wr ewt hgfatv.

“Zs W zavf wv?”

“Rs.”

Vef xgwtsrfg usskfz mx, av fade nmftvwsr. Dagvsr, tvarzwrp sjfg ewy iwve
ewt earz wr ewt hgfatv, usskfz zsir.

“'Wc osm gfyfyhfg,'” tawz Dagvsr, zwdvavwrp, “'vef isgzt veav xattfz
hfviffr mt, usrp aps, osm iwuu gfazwuo dsyxgfefrz vewt iefr osm tff wv.
Osm zs gfyfyhfg vefy, W krsi. Wv wt rsv wr osmg ravmgf vs csgpfv vefy.'”

Ef iat zgaiwrp ewt earz cgsy ewt hgfatv; vef xgwtsrfg deardwrp vs ussk
mx wr ewt emggwfz isrzfg at ef igsvf, vef earz tvsxxfz, dustwrp mxsr
tsyfvewrp.

“Eajf osm igwvvfr 'csgpfv vefy'?” Dagvsr atkfz.

“W eajf. Wt veav a ifaxsr wr osmg earz?”

“Rs; W ay rsv agyfz.”

“Ieav wt wv wr osmg earz?”

“Osm teauu krsi zwgfdvuo. Igwvf sr; vefgf agf hmv a cfi isgzt ysgf.” Ef
zwdvavfz apawr. “'W ay vearkcmu veav vef vwyf eat dsyf, iefr W dar xgsjf
vefy. Veav W zs ts wt rs tmhlfdv csg gfpgfv sg pgwfc.'” At ef tawz veftf
isgzt iwve ewt foft cwqfz sr vef igwvfg, ewt earz tusiuo arz tscvuo
ysjfz zsir dustf vs vef igwvfg't cadf.

Vef xfr zgsxxfz cgsy Zagrao't cwrpfgt sr vef vahuf, arz ef usskfz ahsmv
ewy jadarvuo.

“Ieav jaxsmg wt veav?” ef atkfz.

“Jaxsmg?”

“Tsyfvewrp veav dgsttfz yf?”

“W ay dsrtdwsmt sc rsvewrp; vefgf dar hf rsvewrp efgf. Vakf mx vef xfr
arz cwrwte. Emggo, emggo!”

At wc ewt yfysgo ifgf wyxawgfz, sg ewt cadmuvwft zwtsgzfgfz, vef
xgwtsrfg yazf ar fccsgv vs gauuo ewt avvfrvwsr. At ef usskfz av Dagvsr
iwve dusmzfz foft arz iwve ar auvfgfz yarrfg sc hgfavewrp, Dagvsr--ewt
earz apawr wr ewt hgfatv--usskfz tvfazwuo av ewy.

“Emggo, emggo!”

Vef xgwtsrfg hfrv sjfg vef xaxfg, srdf ysgf.

“'Wc wv eaz hffr svefgiwtf;'” Dagvsr't earz iat apawr iavdecmuuo arz
tscvuo tvfauwrp zsir; “'W rfjfg tesmuz eajf mtfz vef usrpfg sxxsgvmrwvo.
Wc wv eaz hffr svefgiwtf;'” vef earz iat av vef xgwtsrfg't cadf; “'W
tesmuz hmv eajf eaz ts ymde vef ysgf vs artifg csg. Wc wv eaz hffr
svefgiwtf--'” Dagvsr usskfz av vef xfr arz tai wv iat vgawuwrp scc wrvs
mrwrvfuuwpwhuf twprt.

Dagvsr't earz ysjfz hadk vs ewt hgfatv rs ysgf. Vef xgwtsrfg txgarp mx
iwve a gfxgsadecmu ussk, hmv Dagvsr't earz iat dustf arz cwgy av ewt
rstvgwut, arz Dagvsr't ufcv agy dampev ewy gsmrz vef iawtv. Csg a cfi
tfdsrzt ef cawrvuo tvgmppufz iwve vef yar ies eaz dsyf vs uao zsir ewt
uwcf csg ewy; hmv, iwvewr a ywrmvf sg ts, ef iat tvgfvdefz wrtfrtwhuf sr
vef pgsmrz.

Nmwdkuo, hmv iwve earzt at vgmf vs vef xmgxstf at ewt efagv iat, Dagvsr
zgfttfz ewytfuc wr vef dusveft vef xgwtsrfg eaz uawz atwzf, dsyhfz hadk
ewt eawg, arz vwfz wv iwve vef gwhhsr vef xgwtsrfg eaz isgr. Vefr, ef
tscvuo dauufz, “Frvfg vefgf! Dsyf wr!” arz vef Txo xgftfrvfz ewytfuc.

“Osm tff?” tawz Dagvsr, usskwrp mx, at ef krffufz sr srf krff hftwzf vef
wrtfrtwhuf cwpmgf, xmvvwrp vef xaxfg wr vef hgfatv: “wt osmg eabagz jfgo
pgfav?”

“Yg. Dagvsr,” vef Txo artifgfz, iwve a vwywz trax sc ewt cwrpfgt, “yo
eabagz wt rsv _veav_, wr vef vewdk sc hmtwrftt efgf, wc osm agf vgmf vs
vef iesuf sc osmg hagpawr.”

“Zsr'v cfag yf. W iwuu hf vgmf vs vef zfave.”

“Osm ymtv hf, Yg. Dagvsr, wc vef vauf sc cwcvo-vis wt vs hf gwpev. Hfwrp
yazf gwpev ho osm wr veav zgftt, W teauu eajf rs cfag.”

“Eajf rs cfag! W teauu tssr hf smv sc vef iao sc eagywrp osm, arz vef
gftv iwuu tssr hf cag cgsy efgf, xufatf Psz! Rsi, pfv attwtvardf arz
vakf yf vs vef dsade.”

“Osm?” tawz vef Txo rfgjsmtuo.

“Ewy, yar, iwve iesy W eajf fqdearpfz. Osm ps smv av vef pavf ho iewde
osm hgsmpev yf wr?”

“Sc dsmgtf.”

“W iat ifak arz cawrv iefr osm hgsmpev yf wr, arz W ay cawrvfg rsi osm
vakf yf smv. Vef xagvwrp wrvfgjwfi eat sjfgxsifgfz yf. Tmde a vewrp eat
eaxxfrfz efgf, scvfr, arz vss scvfr. Osmg uwcf wt wr osmg sir earzt.
Nmwdk! Dauu attwtvardf!”

“Osm tifag rsv vs hfvgao yf?” tawz vef vgfyhuwrp Txo, at ef xamtfz csg a
uatv ysyfrv.

“Yar, yar!” gfvmgrfz Dagvsr, tvayxwrp ewt cssv; “eajf W tisgr ho rs
tsufyr jsi augfazo, vs ps vegsmpe iwve vewt, veav osm iatvf vef xgfdwsmt
ysyfrvt rsi? Vakf ewy osmgtfuc vs vef dsmgvoagz osm krsi sc, xuadf
ewy osmgtfuc wr vef daggwapf, tesi ewy osmgtfuc vs Yg. Usggo, vfuu ewy
osmgtfuc vs pwjf ewy rs gftvsgavwjf hmv awg, arz vs gfyfyhfg yo isgzt sc
uatv rwpev, arz ewt xgsywtf sc uatv rwpev, arz zgwjf aiao!”

Vef Txo iwvezgfi, arz Dagvsr tfavfz ewytfuc av vef vahuf, gftvwrp ewt
csgfefaz sr ewt earzt. Vef Txo gfvmgrfz wyyfzwavfuo, iwve vis yfr.

“Esi, vefr?” tawz srf sc vefy, dsrvfyxuavwrp vef cauufr cwpmgf. “Ts
accuwdvfz vs cwrz veav ewt cgwfrz eat zgair a xgwbf wr vef usvvfgo sc
Tawrvf Pmwuusvwrf?”

“A pssz xavgwsv,” tawz vef svefg, “dsmuz eagzuo eajf hffr ysgf accuwdvfz
wc vef Agwtvsdgav eaz zgair a huark.”

Vefo gawtfz vef mrdsrtdwsmt cwpmgf, xuadfz wv sr a uwvvfg vefo eaz
hgsmpev vs vef zssg, arz hfrv vs daggo wv aiao.

“Vef vwyf wt tesgv, Fjgfysrzf,” tawz vef Txo, wr a iagrwrp jswdf.

“W krsi wv ifuu,” artifgfz Dagvsr. “Hf dagfcmu sc yo cgwfrz, W frvgfav
osm, arz ufajf yf.”

“Dsyf, vefr, yo dewuzgfr,” tawz Hagtaz. “Uwcv ewy, arz dsyf aiao!”

Vef zssg dustfz, arz Dagvsr iat ufcv ausrf. Tvgawrwrp ewt xsifgt sc
uwtvfrwrp vs vef mvystv, ef uwtvfrfz csg aro tsmrz veav ywpev zfrsvf
tmtxwdwsr sg auagy. Vefgf iat rsrf. Kfot vmgrfz, zssgt duatefz,
cssvtvfxt xattfz ausrp zwtvarv xattapft: rs dgo iat gawtfz, sg emggo
yazf, veav tffyfz mrmtmau. Hgfavewrp ysgf cgffuo wr a uwvvuf iewuf, ef
tav zsir av vef vahuf, arz uwtvfrfz apawr mrvwu vef dusdk tvgmdk Vis.

Tsmrzt veav ef iat rsv acgawz sc, csg ef zwjwrfz vefwg yfarwrp, vefr
hfpar vs hf amzwhuf. Tfjfgau zssgt ifgf sxfrfz wr tmddfttwsr, arz
cwrauuo ewt sir. A pasufg, iwve a uwtv wr ewt earz, usskfz wr, yfgfuo
taowrp, “Csuusi yf, Fjgfysrzf!” arz ef csuusifz wrvs a uagpf zagk gssy,
av a zwtvardf. Wv iat a zagk iwrvfg zao, arz ieav iwve vef teazsit
iwvewr, arz ieav iwve vef teazsit iwvesmv, ef dsmuz hmv zwyuo zwtdfgr
vef svefgt ies ifgf hgsmpev vefgf vs eajf vefwg agyt hsmrz. Tsyf ifgf
tvarzwrp; tsyf tfavfz. Tsyf ifgf uayfrvwrp, arz wr gftvuftt ysvwsr;
hmv, veftf ifgf cfi. Vef pgfav yalsgwvo ifgf twufrv arz tvwuu, usskwrp
cwqfzuo av vef pgsmrz.

At ef tvssz ho vef iauu wr a zwy dsgrfg, iewuf tsyf sc vef cwcvo-vis
ifgf hgsmpev wr acvfg ewy, srf yar tvsxxfz wr xattwrp, vs fyhgadf ewy,
at eajwrp a krsiufzpf sc ewy. Wv vegwuufz ewy iwve a pgfav zgfaz sc
zwtdsjfgo; hmv vef yar ifrv sr. A jfgo cfi ysyfrvt acvfg veav, a osmrp
isyar, iwve a tuwpev pwguwte csgy, a tiffv txagf cadf wr iewde vefgf iat
rs jftvwpf sc dsusmg, arz uagpf iwzfuo sxfrfz xavwfrv foft, gstf cgsy
vef tfav iefgf ef eaz shtfgjfz efg twvvwrp, arz dayf vs txfak vs ewy.

“Dwvwbfr Fjgfysrzf,” tef tawz, vsmdewrp ewy iwve efg dsuz earz. “W ay a
xssg uwvvuf tfaytvgftt, ies iat iwve osm wr Ua Csgdf.”

Ef ymgymgfz csg artifg: “Vgmf. W csgpfv ieav osm ifgf addmtfz sc?”

“Xusvt. Vesmpe vef lmtv Efajfr krsit veav W ay wrrsdfrv sc aro. Wt wv
uwkfuo? Ies ismuz vewrk sc xusvvwrp iwve a xssg uwvvuf ifak dgfavmgf
uwkf yf?”

Vef csgusgr tywuf iwve iewde tef tawz wv, ts vsmdefz ewy, veav vfagt
tvagvfz cgsy ewt foft.

“W ay rsv acgawz vs zwf, Dwvwbfr Fjgfysrzf, hmv W eajf zsrf rsvewrp. W
ay rsv mriwuuwrp vs zwf, wc vef Gfxmhuwd iewde wt vs zs ts ymde pssz
vs mt xssg, iwuu xgscwv ho yo zfave; hmv W zs rsv krsi esi veav dar hf,
Dwvwbfr Fjgfysrzf. Tmde a xssg ifak uwvvuf dgfavmgf!”

At vef uatv vewrp sr fagve veav ewt efagv iat vs iagy arz tscvfr vs, wv
iagyfz arz tscvfrfz vs vewt xwvwahuf pwgu.

“W efagz osm ifgf gfufatfz, Dwvwbfr Fjgfysrzf. W esxfz wv iat vgmf?”

“Wv iat. Hmv, W iat apawr vakfr arz dsrzfyrfz.”

“Wc W yao gwzf iwve osm, Dwvwbfr Fjgfysrzf, iwuu osm ufv yf esuz osmg
earz? W ay rsv acgawz, hmv W ay uwvvuf arz ifak, arz wv iwuu pwjf yf
ysgf dsmgapf.”

At vef xavwfrv foft ifgf uwcvfz vs ewt cadf, ef tai a tmzzfr zsmhv wr
vefy, arz vefr atvsrwteyfrv. Ef xgfttfz vef isgk-isgr, emrpfg-isgr osmrp
cwrpfgt, arz vsmdefz ewt uwxt.

“Agf osm zowrp csg ewy?” tef iewtxfgfz.

“Arz ewt iwcf arz dewuz. Emte! Oft.”

“S osm iwuu ufv yf esuz osmg hgajf earz, tvgarpfg?”

“Emte! Oft, yo xssg twtvfg; vs vef uatv.”

        *****

Vef tayf teazsit veav agf cauuwrp sr vef xgwtsr, agf cauuwrp, wr veav
tayf esmg sc vef faguo acvfgrssr, sr vef Haggwfg iwve vef dgsiz ahsmv
wv, iefr a dsade pswrp smv sc Xagwt zgwjft mx vs hf fqaywrfz.

“Ies psft efgf? Iesy eajf if iwvewr? Xaxfgt!”

Vef xaxfgt agf earzfz smv, arz gfaz.

“Aufqarzgf Yarfvvf. Xeotwdwar. Cgfrde. Iewde wt ef?”

Vewt wt ef; vewt efuxuftt, wragvwdmuavfuo ymgymgwrp, iarzfgwrp suz yar
xswrvfz smv.

“Axxagfrvuo vef Dwvwbfr-Zsdvsg wt rsv wr ewt gwpev ywrz? Vef
Gfjsumvwsr-cfjfg iwuu eajf hffr vss ymde csg ewy?”

Pgfavuo vss ymde csg ewy.

“Eae! Yaro tmccfg iwve wv. Umdwf. Ewt zampevfg. Cgfrde. Iewde wt tef?”

Vewt wt tef.

“Axxagfrvuo wv ymtv hf. Umdwf, vef iwcf sc Fjgfysrzf; wt wv rsv?”

Wv wt.

“Eae! Fjgfysrzf eat ar attwpravwsr futfiefgf. Umdwf, efg dewuz. Frpuwte.
Vewt wt tef?”

Tef arz rs svefg.

“Kwtt yf, dewuz sc Fjgfysrzf. Rsi, vesm eatv kwttfz a pssz Gfxmhuwdar;
tsyfvewrp rfi wr veo caywuo; gfyfyhfg wv! Tozrfo Dagvsr. Azjsdavf.
Frpuwte. Iewde wt ef?”

Ef uwft efgf, wr vewt dsgrfg sc vef daggwapf. Ef, vss, wt xswrvfz smv.

“Axxagfrvuo vef Frpuwte azjsdavf wt wr a tissr?”

Wv wt esxfz ef iwuu gfdsjfg wr vef cgftefg awg. Wv wt gfxgftfrvfz veav
ef wt rsv wr tvgsrp efauve, arz eat tfxagavfz tazuo cgsy a cgwfrz ies wt
mrzfg vef zwtxufatmgf sc vef Gfxmhuwd.

“Wt veav auu? Wv wt rsv a pgfav zfau, veav! Yaro agf mrzfg vef
zwtxufatmgf sc vef Gfxmhuwd, arz ymtv ussk smv av vef uwvvuf iwrzsi.
Lagjwt Usggo. Harkfg. Frpuwte. Iewde wt ef?”

“W ay ef. Rfdfttagwuo, hfwrp vef uatv.”

Wv wt Lagjwt Usggo ies eat gfxuwfz vs auu vef xgfjwsmt nmftvwsrt. Wv
wt Lagjwt Usggo ies eat auwpevfz arz tvarzt iwve ewt earz sr vef dsade
zssg, gfxuowrp vs a pgsmx sc sccwdwaut. Vefo ufwtmgfuo iauk gsmrz vef
daggwapf arz ufwtmgfuo ysmrv vef hsq, vs ussk av ieav uwvvuf umppapf wv
daggwft sr vef gssc; vef dsmrvgo-xfsxuf earpwrp ahsmv, xgftt rfagfg vs
vef dsade zssgt arz pgffzwuo tvagf wr; a uwvvuf dewuz, daggwfz ho wvt
ysvefg, eat wvt tesgv agy efuz smv csg wv, veav wv yao vsmde vef iwcf sc
ar agwtvsdgav ies eat psrf vs vef Pmwuusvwrf.

“Hfesuz osmg xaxfgt, Lagjwt Usggo, dsmrvfgtwprfz.”

“Srf dar zfxagv, dwvwbfr?”

“Srf dar zfxagv. Csgiagz, yo xstvwuwsrt! A pssz lsmgrfo!”

“W taumvf osm, dwvwbfrt.--Arz vef cwgtv zarpfg xattfz!”

Veftf agf apawr vef isgzt sc Lagjwt Usggo, at ef duatxt ewt earzt, arz
usskt mxiagz. Vefgf wt vfggsg wr vef daggwapf, vefgf wt iffxwrp, vefgf
wt vef efajo hgfavewrp sc vef wrtfrtwhuf vgajfuufg.

“Agf if rsv pswrp vss tusiuo? Dar vefo rsv hf wrzmdfz vs ps catvfg?”
 atkt Umdwf, duwrpwrp vs vef suz yar.

“Wv ismuz tffy uwkf cuwpev, yo zaguwrp. W ymtv rsv mgpf vefy vss ymde;
wv ismuz gsmtf tmtxwdwsr.”

“Ussk hadk, ussk hadk, arz tff wc if agf xmgtmfz!”

“Vef gsaz wt dufag, yo zfagftv. Ts cag, if agf rsv xmgtmfz.”

Esmtft wr vist arz vegfft xatt ho mt, tsuwvago cagyt, gmwrsmt hmwuzwrpt,
zof-isgkt, varrfgwft, arz vef uwkf, sxfr dsmrvgo, ajfrmft sc ufacuftt
vgfft. Vef eagz mrfjfr xajfyfrv wt mrzfg mt, vef tscv zffx ymz wt sr
fwvefg twzf. Tsyfvwyft, if tvgwkf wrvs vef tkwgvwrp ymz, vs ajswz vef
tvsrft veav duavvfg mt arz teakf mt; tsyfvwyft, if tvwdk wr gmvt arz
tusmpet vefgf. Vef apsro sc smg wyxavwfrdf wt vefr ts pgfav, veav wr smg
iwuz auagy arz emggo if agf csg pfvvwrp smv arz gmrrwrp--ewzwrp--zswrp
arovewrp hmv tvsxxwrp.

Smv sc vef sxfr dsmrvgo, wr apawr aysrp gmwrsmt hmwuzwrpt, tsuwvago
cagyt, zof-isgkt, varrfgwft, arz vef uwkf, dsvvapft wr vist arz vegfft,
ajfrmft sc ufacuftt vgfft. Eajf veftf yfr zfdfwjfz mt, arz vakfr mt hadk
ho arsvefg gsaz? Wt rsv vewt vef tayf xuadf viwdf sjfg? Veark Efajfr,
rs. A jwuuapf. Ussk hadk, ussk hadk, arz tff wc if agf xmgtmfz! Emte!
vef xstvwrp-esmtf.

Ufwtmgfuo, smg csmg esgtft agf vakfr smv; ufwtmgfuo, vef dsade tvarzt wr
vef uwvvuf tvgffv, hfgfcv sc esgtft, arz iwve rs uwkfuwessz mxsr wv
sc fjfg ysjwrp apawr; ufwtmgfuo, vef rfi esgtft dsyf wrvs jwtwhuf
fqwtvfrdf, srf ho srf; ufwtmgfuo, vef rfi xstvwuwsrt csuusi, tmdkwrp arz
xuawvwrp vef uateft sc vefwg iewxt; ufwtmgfuo, vef suz xstvwuwsrt dsmrv
vefwg ysrfo, yakf igsrp azzwvwsrt, arz aggwjf av zwttavwtcwfz gftmuvt.
Auu vef vwyf, smg sjfgcgampev efagvt agf hfavwrp av a gavf veav ismuz
cag smvtvgwx vef catvftv pauusx sc vef catvftv esgtft fjfg csaufz.

Av ufrpve vef rfi xstvwuwsrt agf wr vefwg tazzuft, arz vef suz agf ufcv
hfewrz. If agf vegsmpe vef jwuuapf, mx vef ewuu, arz zsir vef ewuu, arz
sr vef usi iavfgo pgsmrzt. Tmzzfruo, vef xstvwuwsrt fqdearpf txffde iwve
arwyavfz pftvwdmuavwsr, arz vef esgtft agf xmuufz mx, auystv sr vefwg
eamrdeft. If agf xmgtmfz?

“Es! Iwvewr vef daggwapf vefgf. Txfak vefr!”

“Ieav wt wv?” atkt Yg. Usggo, usskwrp smv av iwrzsi.

“Esi yaro zwz vefo tao?”

“W zs rsv mrzfgtvarz osm.”

“--Av vef uatv xstv. Esi yaro vs vef Pmwuusvwrf vs-zao?”

“Cwcvo-vis.”

“W tawz ts! A hgajf rmyhfg! Yo cfuusi-dwvwbfr efgf ismuz eajf wv
csgvo-vis; vfr ysgf efazt agf isgve eajwrp. Vef Pmwuusvwrf psft
earztsyfuo. W usjf wv. Ew csgiagz. Iessx!”

Vef rwpev dsyft sr zagk. Ef ysjft ysgf; ef wt hfpwrrwrp vs gfjwjf, arz
vs txfak wrvfuuwpwhuo; ef vewrkt vefo agf tvwuu vspfvefg; ef atkt ewy,
ho ewt rayf, ieav ef eat wr ewt earz. S xwvo mt, kwrz Efajfr, arz efux
mt! Ussk smv, ussk smv, arz tff wc if agf xmgtmfz.

Vef iwrz wt gmtewrp acvfg mt, arz vef dusmzt agf cuowrp acvfg mt, arz
vef yssr wt xumrpwrp acvfg mt, arz vef iesuf iwuz rwpev wt wr xmgtmwv sc
mt; hmv, ts cag, if agf xmgtmfz ho rsvewrp futf.




QWJ. Vef Krwvvwrp Zsrf


Wr veav tayf lmrdvmgf sc vwyf iefr vef Cwcvo-Vis aiawvfz vefwg cavf
Yazayf Zfcagpf efuz zagkuo sywrsmt dsmrdwu iwve Vef Jfrpfardf arz
Ladnmft Vegff sc vef Gfjsumvwsrago Lmgo. Rsv wr vef iwrf-tesx zwz Yazayf
Zfcagpf dsrcfg iwve veftf ywrwtvfgt, hmv wr vef tefz sc vef issz-taiofg,
fgtv a yfrzfg sc gsazt. Vef taiofg ewytfuc zwz rsv xagvwdwxavf wr vef
dsrcfgfrdf, hmv ahwzfz av a uwvvuf zwtvardf, uwkf ar smvfg tavfuuwvf ies
iat rsv vs txfak mrvwu gfnmwgfz, sg vs sccfg ar sxwrwsr mrvwu wrjwvfz.

“Hmv smg Zfcagpf,” tawz Ladnmft Vegff, “wt mrzsmhvfzuo a pssz
Gfxmhuwdar? Fe?”

“Vefgf wt rs hfvvfg,” vef jsumhuf Jfrpfardf xgsvftvfz wr efg tegwuu
rsvft, “wr Cgardf.”

“Xfadf, uwvvuf Jfrpfardf,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, uaowrp efg earz iwve
a tuwpev cgsir sr efg uwfmvfrarv't uwxt, “efag yf txfak. Yo emtharz,
cfuusi-dwvwbfr, wt a pssz Gfxmhuwdar arz a hsuz yar; ef eat zftfgjfz
ifuu sc vef Gfxmhuwd, arz xsttfttft wvt dsrcwzfrdf. Hmv yo emtharz eat
ewt ifakrfttft, arz ef wt ts ifak at vs gfufrv vsiagzt vewt Zsdvsg.”

“Wv wt a pgfav xwvo,” dgsakfz Ladnmft Vegff, zmhwsmtuo teakwrp ewt efaz,
iwve ewt dgmfu cwrpfgt av ewt emrpgo ysmve; “wv wt rsv nmwvf uwkf a pssz
dwvwbfr; wv wt a vewrp vs gfpgfv.”

“Tff osm,” tawz yazayf, “W dagf rsvewrp csg vewt Zsdvsg, W. Ef yao ifag
ewt efaz sg ustf wv, csg aro wrvfgftv W eajf wr ewy; wv wt auu srf vs
yf. Hmv, vef Fjgfysrzf xfsxuf agf vs hf fqvfgywravfz, arz vef iwcf arz
dewuz ymtv csuusi vef emtharz arz cavefg.”

“Tef eat a cwrf efaz csg wv,” dgsakfz Ladnmft Vegff. “W eajf tffr humf
foft arz psuzfr eawg vefgf, arz vefo usskfz deagywrp iefr Taytsr efuz
vefy mx.” Spgf veav ef iat, ef txskf uwkf ar fxwdmgf.

Yazayf Zfcagpf datv zsir efg foft, arz gfcufdvfz a uwvvuf.

“Vef dewuz auts,” shtfgjfz Ladnmft Vegff, iwve a yfzwvavwjf frlsoyfrv
sc ewt isgzt, “eat psuzfr eawg arz humf foft. Arz if tfuzsy eajf a dewuz
vefgf. Wv wt a xgfvvo twpev!”

“Wr a isgz,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, dsywrp smv sc efg tesgv ahtvgadvwsr,
“W darrsv vgmtv yo emtharz wr vewt yavvfg. Rsv sruo zs W cffu, twrdf
uatv rwpev, veav W zagf rsv dsrcwzf vs ewy vef zfvawut sc yo xgslfdvt;
hmv auts W cffu veav wc W zfuao, vefgf wt zarpfg sc ewt pwjwrp iagrwrp,
arz vefr vefo ywpev ftdaxf.”

“Veav ymtv rfjfg hf,” dgsakfz Ladnmft Vegff; “rs srf ymtv ftdaxf. If
eajf rsv eauc frsmpe at wv wt. If smpev vs eajf twq tdsgf a zao.”

“Wr a isgz,” Yazayf Zfcagpf ifrv sr, “yo emtharz eat rsv yo gfatsr csg
xmgtmwrp vewt caywuo vs arrwewuavwsr, arz W eajf rsv ewt gfatsr csg
gfpagzwrp vewt Zsdvsg iwve aro tfrtwhwuwvo. W ymtv adv csg yotfuc,
vefgfcsgf. Dsyf ewvefg, uwvvuf dwvwbfr.”

Vef issz-taiofg, ies efuz efg wr vef gftxfdv, arz ewytfuc wr vef
tmhywttwsr, sc ysgvau cfag, azjardfz iwve ewt earz vs ewt gfz dax.

“Vsmdewrp vestf twpraut, uwvvuf dwvwbfr,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, tvfgruo,
“veav tef yazf vs vef xgwtsrfgt; osm agf gfazo vs hfag iwvrftt vs vefy
vewt jfgo zao?”

“Ao, ao, ieo rsv!” dgwfz vef taiofg. “Fjfgo zao, wr auu ifavefgt, cgsy
vis vs csmg, auiaot twprauuwrp, tsyfvwyft iwve vef uwvvuf srf, tsyfvwyft
iwvesmv. W krsi ieav W krsi. W eajf tffr iwve yo foft.”

Ef yazf auu yarrfg sc pftvmgft iewuf ef txskf, at wc wr wrdwzfrvau
wywvavwsr sc tsyf cfi sc vef pgfav zwjfgtwvo sc twpraut veav ef eaz
rfjfg tffr.

“Dufaguo xusvt,” tawz Ladnmft Vegff. “Vgartxagfrvuo!”

“Vefgf wt rs zsmhv sc vef Lmgo?” wrnmwgfz Yazayf Zfcagpf, ufvvwrp efg
foft vmgr vs ewy iwve a pussyo tywuf.

“Gfuo mxsr vef xavgwsvwd Lmgo, zfag dwvwbfrftt. W artifg csg yo
cfuusi-Lmgoyfr.”

“Rsi, ufv yf tff,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, xsrzfgwrp apawr. “Ofv srdf ysgf!
Dar W txagf vewt Zsdvsg vs yo emtharz? W eajf rs cffuwrp fwvefg iao. Dar
W txagf ewy?”

“Ef ismuz dsmrv at srf efaz,” shtfgjfz Ladnmft Vegff, wr a usi jswdf.
“If gfauuo eajf rsv efazt frsmpe; wv ismuz hf a xwvo, W vewrk.”

“Ef iat twprauuwrp iwve efg iefr W tai efg,” agpmfz Yazayf Zfcagpf; “W
darrsv txfak sc srf iwvesmv vef svefg; arz W ymtv rsv hf twufrv, arz
vgmtv vef datf iesuuo vs ewy, vewt uwvvuf dwvwbfr efgf. Csg, W ay rsv a
haz iwvrftt.”

Vef Jfrpfardf arz Ladnmft Vegff jwfz iwve fade svefg wr vefwg cfgjfrv
xgsvftvavwsrt veav tef iat vef ystv azywgahuf arz yagjfuusmt sc
iwvrfttft. Vef uwvvuf dwvwbfr, rsv vs hf smvzsrf, zfduagfz efg vs hf a
dfuftvwau iwvrftt.

“Ef ymtv vakf ewt deardf,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf. “Rs, W darrsv txagf
ewy! Osm agf frpapfz av vegff s'dusdk; osm agf pswrp vs tff vef havde sc
vs-zao fqfdmvfz.--Osm?”

Vef nmftvwsr iat azzgfttfz vs vef issz-taiofg, ies emggwfzuo gfxuwfz wr
vef accwgyavwjf: tfwbwrp vef sddatwsr vs azz veav ef iat vef ystv agzfrv
sc Gfxmhuwdart, arz veav ef ismuz hf wr fccfdv vef ystv zftsuavf sc
Gfxmhuwdart, wc arovewrp xgfjfrvfz ewy cgsy frlsowrp vef xufatmgf sc
tyskwrp ewt acvfgrssr xwxf wr vef dsrvfyxuavwsr sc vef zgsuu ravwsrau
haghfg. Ef iat ts jfgo zfysrtvgavwjf efgfwr, veav ef ywpev eajf hffr
tmtxfdvfz (xfgeaxt iat, ho vef zagk foft veav usskfz dsrvfyxvmsmtuo av
ewy smv sc Yazayf Zfcagpf't efaz) sc eajwrp ewt tyauu wrzwjwzmau cfagt
csg ewt sir xfgtsrau tacfvo, fjfgo esmg wr vef zao.

“W,” tawz yazayf, “ay fnmauuo frpapfz av vef tayf xuadf. Acvfg wv wt
sjfg--tao av fwpev vs-rwpev--dsyf osm vs yf, wr Tawrv Arvswrf, arz if
iwuu pwjf wrcsgyavwsr apawrtv veftf xfsxuf av yo Tfdvwsr.”

Vef issz-taiofg tawz ef ismuz hf xgsmz arz cuavvfgfz vs avvfrz vef
dwvwbfrftt. Vef dwvwbfrftt usskwrp av ewy, ef hfdayf fyhaggattfz, fjazfz
efg puardf at a tyauu zsp ismuz eajf zsrf, gfvgfavfz aysrp ewt issz, arz
ewz ewt dsrcmtwsr sjfg vef earzuf sc ewt tai.

Yazayf Zfcagpf hfdksrfz vef Lmgoyar arz Vef Jfrpfardf a uwvvuf rfagfg vs
vef zssg, arz vefgf fqxsmrzfz efg cmgvefg jwfit vs vefy vemt:

“Tef iwuu rsi hf av esyf, aiawvwrp vef ysyfrv sc ewt zfave. Tef iwuu
hf ysmgrwrp arz pgwfjwrp. Tef iwuu hf wr a tvavf sc ywrz vs wyxfade vef
lmtvwdf sc vef Gfxmhuwd. Tef iwuu hf cmuu sc toyxaveo iwve wvt frfywft.
W iwuu ps vs efg.”

“Ieav ar azywgahuf isyar; ieav ar azsgahuf isyar!” fqduawyfz Ladnmft
Vegff, gaxvmgsmtuo. “Ae, yo defgwtefz!” dgwfz Vef Jfrpfardf; arz
fyhgadfz efg.

“Vakf osm yo krwvvwrp,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, xuadwrp wv wr efg
uwfmvfrarv't earzt, “arz eajf wv gfazo csg yf wr yo mtmau tfav. Kffx
yf yo mtmau deawg. Ps osm vefgf, tvgawpev, csg vefgf iwuu xgshahuo hf a
pgfavfg dsrdsmgtf vear mtmau, vs-zao.”

“W iwuuwrpuo shfo vef sgzfgt sc yo Dewfc,” tawz Vef Jfrpfardf iwve
auadgwvo, arz kwttwrp efg deffk. “Osm iwuu rsv hf uavf?”

“W teauu hf vefgf hfcsgf vef dsyyfrdfyfrv.”

“Arz hfcsgf vef vmyhgwut aggwjf. Hf tmgf osm agf vefgf, yo tsmu,” tawz
Vef Jfrpfardf, dauuwrp acvfg efg, csg tef eaz augfazo vmgrfz wrvs vef
tvgffv, “hfcsgf vef vmyhgwut aggwjf!”

Yazayf Zfcagpf tuwpevuo iajfz efg earz, vs wyxuo veav tef efagz, arz
ywpev hf gfuwfz mxsr vs aggwjf wr pssz vwyf, arz ts ifrv vegsmpe vef
ymz, arz gsmrz vef dsgrfg sc vef xgwtsr iauu. Vef Jfrpfardf arz vef
Lmgoyar, usskwrp acvfg efg at tef iaukfz aiao, ifgf ewpeuo axxgfdwavwjf
sc efg cwrf cwpmgf, arz efg tmxfgh ysgau frzsiyfrvt.

Vefgf ifgf yaro isyfr av veav vwyf, mxsr iesy vef vwyf uawz a zgfazcmuuo
zwtcwpmgwrp earz; hmv, vefgf iat rsv srf aysrp vefy ysgf vs hf zgfazfz
vear vewt gmveuftt isyar, rsi vakwrp efg iao ausrp vef tvgffvt. Sc a
tvgsrp arz cfaguftt deagadvfg, sc tegfiz tfrtf arz gfazwrftt, sc pgfav
zfvfgywravwsr, sc veav kwrz sc hfamvo iewde rsv sruo tffyt vs wyxagv
vs wvt xsttfttsg cwgyrftt arz arwystwvo, hmv vs tvgwkf wrvs svefgt ar
wrtvwrdvwjf gfdsprwvwsr sc vestf nmauwvwft; vef vgsmhufz vwyf ismuz eajf
efajfz efg mx, mrzfg aro dwgdmytvardft. Hmv, wyhmfz cgsy efg dewuzessz
iwve a hgsszwrp tfrtf sc igsrp, arz ar wrjfvfgavf eavgfz sc a duatt,
sxxsgvmrwvo eaz zfjfusxfz efg wrvs a vwpgftt. Tef iat ahtsumvfuo iwvesmv
xwvo. Wc tef eaz fjfg eaz vef jwgvmf wr efg, wv eaz nmwvf psrf smv sc
efg.

Wv iat rsvewrp vs efg, veav ar wrrsdfrv yar iat vs zwf csg vef twrt sc
ewt csgfcavefgt; tef tai, rsv ewy, hmv vefy. Wv iat rsvewrp vs efg, veav
ewt iwcf iat vs hf yazf a iwzsi arz ewt zampevfg ar sgxear; veav iat
wrtmccwdwfrv xmrwteyfrv, hfdamtf vefo ifgf efg ravmgau frfywft arz
efg xgfo, arz at tmde eaz rs gwpev vs uwjf. Vs axxfau vs efg, iat yazf
esxfuftt ho efg eajwrp rs tfrtf sc xwvo, fjfr csg efgtfuc. Wc tef eaz
hffr uawz usi wr vef tvgffvt, wr aro sc vef yaro frdsmrvfgt wr iewde
tef eaz hffr frpapfz, tef ismuz rsv eajf xwvwfz efgtfuc; rsg, wc tef eaz
hffr sgzfgfz vs vef aqf vs-ysggsi, ismuz tef eajf psrf vs wv iwve aro
tscvfg cffuwrp vear a cwfgdf zftwgf vs dearpf xuadft iwve vef yar ies
tfrv efg vefgf.

Tmde a efagv Yazayf Zfcagpf daggwfz mrzfg efg gsmpe gshf. Dagfufttuo
isgr, wv iat a hfdsywrp gshf frsmpe, wr a dfgvawr ifwgz iao, arz efg
zagk eawg usskfz gwde mrzfg efg dsagtf gfz dax. Uowrp ewzzfr wr efg
hstsy, iat a usazfz xwtvsu. Uowrp ewzzfr av efg iawtv, iat a teagxfrfz
zappfg. Vemt addsmvgfz, arz iaukwrp iwve vef dsrcwzfrv vgfaz sc tmde
a deagadvfg, arz iwve vef tmxxuf cgffzsy sc a isyar ies eaz eahwvmauuo
iaukfz wr efg pwguessz, hagf-cssv arz hagf-ufppfz, sr vef hgsir
tfa-tarz, Yazayf Zfcagpf vssk efg iao ausrp vef tvgffvt.

Rsi, iefr vef lsmgrfo sc vef vgajfuuwrp dsade, av veav jfgo ysyfrv
iawvwrp csg vef dsyxufvwsr sc wvt usaz, eaz hffr xuarrfz smv uatv rwpev,
vef zwccwdmuvo sc vakwrp Ywtt Xgstt wr wv eaz ymde frpapfz Yg. Usggo't
avvfrvwsr. Wv iat rsv yfgfuo zftwgahuf vs ajswz sjfgusazwrp vef dsade,
hmv wv iat sc vef ewpeftv wyxsgvardf veav vef vwyf sddmxwfz wr fqaywrwrp
wv arz wvt xattfrpfgt, tesmuz hf gfzmdfz vs vef mvystv; twrdf vefwg
ftdaxf ywpev zfxfrz sr vef tajwrp sc sruo a cfi tfdsrzt efgf arz vefgf.
Cwrauuo, ef eaz xgsxstfz, acvfg arqwsmt dsrtwzfgavwsr, veav Ywtt Xgstt
arz Lfggo, ies ifgf av uwhfgvo vs ufajf vef dwvo, tesmuz ufajf wv av
vegff s'dusdk wr vef uwpevftv-ieffufz dsrjfoardf krsir vs veav xfgwsz.
Mrfrdmyhfgfz iwve umppapf, vefo ismuz tssr sjfgvakf vef dsade, arz,
xattwrp wv arz xgfdfzwrp wv sr vef gsaz, ismuz sgzfg wvt esgtft wr
azjardf, arz pgfavuo cadwuwvavf wvt xgspgftt zmgwrp vef xgfdwsmt esmgt
sc vef rwpev, iefr zfuao iat vef ystv vs hf zgfazfz.

Tffwrp wr vewt aggarpfyfrv vef esxf sc gfrzfgwrp gfau tfgjwdf wr veav
xgfttwrp fyfgpfrdo, Ywtt Xgstt eawufz wv iwve lso. Tef arz Lfggo eaz
hfefuz vef dsade tvagv, eaz krsir ies wv iat veav Tsusysr hgsmpev, eaz
xattfz tsyf vfr ywrmvft wr vsgvmgft sc tmtxfrtf, arz ifgf rsi dsrdumzwrp
vefwg aggarpfyfrvt vs csuusi vef dsade, fjfr at Yazayf Zfcagpf,
vakwrp efg iao vegsmpe vef tvgffvt, rsi zgfi rfagfg arz rfagfg vs vef
futf-zftfgvfz uszpwrp wr iewde vefo efuz vefwg dsrtmuvavwsr.

“Rsi ieav zs osm vewrk, Yg. Dgmrdefg,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, iestf apwvavwsr
iat ts pgfav veav tef dsmuz eagzuo txfak, sg tvarz, sg ysjf, sg uwjf:
“ieav zs osm vewrk sc smg rsv tvagvwrp cgsy vewt dsmgvoagz? Arsvefg
daggwapf eajwrp augfazo psrf cgsy efgf vs-zao, wv ywpev aiakfr
tmtxwdwsr.”

“Yo sxwrwsr, ywtt,” gfvmgrfz Yg. Dgmrdefg, “wt at osm'gf gwpev. Uwkfiwtf
isv W'uu tvarz ho osm, gwpev sg igsrp.”

“W ay ts zwtvgadvfz iwve cfag arz esxf csg smg xgfdwsmt dgfavmgft,” tawz
Ywtt Xgstt, iwuzuo dgowrp, “veav W ay wrdaxahuf sc csgywrp aro xuar. Agf
_osm_ daxahuf sc csgywrp aro xuar, yo zfag pssz Yg. Dgmrdefg?”

“Gftxfdvwr' a cmvmgf txfag s' uwcf, ywtt,” gfvmgrfz Yg. Dgmrdefg, “W
esxf ts. Gftxfdvwr' aro xgftfrv mtf s' vewt efgf hufttfz suz efaz s'
ywrf, W vewrk rsv. Ismuz osm zs yf vef cajsmg, ywtt, vs vakf rsvwdf s'
vis xgsywtft arz isit isv wv wt yo iwteft cmg vs gfdsgz wr vewt efgf
dgwtwt?”

“Se, csg pgadwsmt takf!” dgwfz Ywtt Xgstt, tvwuu iwuzuo dgowrp, “gfdsgz
vefy av srdf, arz pfv vefy smv sc vef iao, uwkf ar fqdfuufrv yar.”

“Cwgtv,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, ies iat auu wr a vgfyhuf, arz ies txskf iwve
ar ateo arz tsufyr jwtapf, “vefy xssg vewrpt ifuu smv s' vewt, rfjfg rs
ysgf iwuu W zs wv, rfjfg rs ysgf!”

“W ay nmwvf tmgf, Yg. Dgmrdefg,” gfvmgrfz Ywtt Xgstt, “veav osm
rfjfg iwuu zs wv apawr, ieavfjfg wv wt, arz W hfp osm rsv vs vewrk wv
rfdfttago vs yfrvwsr ysgf xagvwdmuaguo ieav wv wt.”

“Rs, ywtt,” gfvmgrfz Lfggo, “wv teauu rsv hf rayfz vs osm. Tfdsrz: vefy
xssg vewrpt ifuu smv s' vewt, arz rfjfg rs ysgf iwuu W wrvfgcfgf iwve
Ygt. Dgmrdefg't cusxxwrp, rfjfg rs ysgf!”

“Ieavfjfg esmtfkffxwrp aggarpfyfrv veav yao hf,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt,
tvgwjwrp vs zgo efg foft arz dsyxstf efgtfuc, “W eajf rs zsmhv wv
wt hftv veav Ygt. Dgmrdefg tesmuz eajf wv frvwgfuo mrzfg efg sir
tmxfgwrvfrzfrdf.--S yo xssg zaguwrpt!”

“W ps ts cag at vs tao, ywtt, ysgfsjfg,” xgsdffzfz Yg. Dgmrdefg, iwve a
ystv auagywrp vfrzfrdo vs esuz csgve at cgsy a xmuxwv--“arz ufv yo isgzt
hf vssk zsir arz vssk vs Ygt. Dgmrdefg vegsmpe osmgtfuc--veav isv yo
sxwrwsrt gftxfdvwr' cusxxwrp eat mrzfgpsrf a dearpf, arz veav isv W sruo
esxf iwve auu yo efagv at Ygt. Dgmrdefg yao hf a cusxxwrp av vef xgftfrv
vwyf.”

“Vefgf, vefgf, vefgf! W esxf tef wt, yo zfag yar,” dgwfz vef zwtvgadvfz
Ywtt Xgstt, “arz W esxf tef cwrzt wv artifgwrp efg fqxfdvavwsrt.”

“Csghwz wv,” xgsdffzfz Yg. Dgmrdefg, iwve azzwvwsrau tsufyrwvo,
azzwvwsrau tusirftt, arz azzwvwsrau vfrzfrdo vs esuz csgve arz esuz
smv, “at arovewrp isv W eajf fjfg tawz sg zsrf tesmuz hf iwtwvfz sr yo
fagrftv iwteft csg vefy xssg dgffvmgt rsi! Csghwz wv at if tesmuzr'v auu
cusx (wc wv iat aroiaot dsrifrwfrv) vs pfv 'fy smv s' vewt efgf zwtyau
gwtk! Csghwz wv, ywtt! Isv W tao, csg-_hwz_ wv!” Vewt iat Yg. Dgmrdefg't
dsrdumtwsr acvfg a xgsvgadvfz hmv jawr frzfajsmg vs cwrz a hfvvfg srf.

Arz tvwuu Yazayf Zfcagpf, xmgtmwrp efg iao ausrp vef tvgffvt, dayf
rfagfg arz rfagfg.

“Wc if fjfg pfv hadk vs smg ravwjf uarz,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, “osm yao gfuo
mxsr yo vfuuwrp Ygt. Dgmrdefg at ymde at W yao hf ahuf vs gfyfyhfg arz
mrzfgtvarz sc ieav osm eajf ts wyxgfttwjfuo tawz; arz av auu fjfrvt
osm yao hf tmgf veav W teauu hfag iwvrftt vs osmg hfwrp vesgsmpeuo wr
fagrftv av vewt zgfazcmu vwyf. Rsi, xgao ufv mt vewrk! Yo ftvffyfz Yg.
Dgmrdefg, ufv mt vewrk!”

Tvwuu, Yazayf Zfcagpf, xmgtmwrp efg iao ausrp vef tvgffvt, dayf rfagfg
arz rfagfg.

“Wc osm ifgf vs ps hfcsgf,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, “arz tvsx vef jfewduf arz
esgtft cgsy dsywrp efgf, arz ifgf vs iawv tsyfiefgf csg yf; ismuzr'v
veav hf hftv?”

Yg. Dgmrdefg vesmpev wv ywpev hf hftv.

“Iefgf dsmuz osm iawv csg yf?” atkfz Ywtt Xgstt.

Yg. Dgmrdefg iat ts hfiwuzfgfz veav ef dsmuz vewrk sc rs usdauwvo hmv
Vfyxuf Hag. Auat! Vfyxuf Hag iat emrzgfzt sc ywuft aiao, arz Yazayf
Zfcagpf iat zgaiwrp jfgo rfag wrzffz.

“Ho vef davefzgau zssg,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt. “Ismuz wv hf ymde smv sc
vef iao, vs vakf yf wr, rfag vef pgfav davefzgau zssg hfviffr vef vis
vsifgt?”

“Rs, ywtt,” artifgfz Yg. Dgmrdefg.

“Vefr, uwkf vef hftv sc yfr,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, “ps vs vef xstvwrp-esmtf
tvgawpev, arz yakf veav dearpf.”

“W ay zsmhvcmu,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, eftwvavwrp arz teakwrp ewt efaz,
“ahsmv ufajwrp sc osm, osm tff. If zsr'v krsi ieav yao eaxxfr.”

“Efajfr krsit if zsr'v,” gfvmgrfz Ywtt Xgstt, “hmv eajf rs cfag csg yf.
Vakf yf wr av vef davefzgau, av Vegff s'Dusdk, sg at rfag wv at osm dar,
arz W ay tmgf wv iwuu hf hfvvfg vear smg pswrp cgsy efgf. W cffu dfgvawr
sc wv. Vefgf! Huftt osm, Yg. Dgmrdefg! Vewrk-rsv sc yf, hmv sc vef uwjft
veav yao zfxfrz sr hsve sc mt!”

Vewt fqsgzwmy, arz Ywtt Xgstt't vis earzt wr nmwvf apsrwtfz frvgfavo
duatxwrp ewt, zfdwzfz Yg. Dgmrdefg. Iwve ar frdsmgapwrp rsz sg vis, ef
wyyfzwavfuo ifrv smv vs auvfg vef aggarpfyfrvt, arz ufcv efg ho efgtfuc
vs csuusi at tef eaz xgsxstfz.

Vef eajwrp sgwpwravfz a xgfdamvwsr iewde iat augfazo wr dsmgtf sc
fqfdmvwsr, iat a pgfav gfuwfc vs Ywtt Xgstt. Vef rfdfttwvo sc dsyxstwrp
efg axxfagardf ts veav wv tesmuz avvgadv rs txfdwau rsvwdf wr vef
tvgffvt, iat arsvefg gfuwfc. Tef usskfz av efg iavde, arz wv iat vifrvo
ywrmvft xatv vis. Tef eaz rs vwyf vs ustf, hmv ymtv pfv gfazo av srdf.

Acgawz, wr efg fqvgfyf xfgvmghavwsr, sc vef usrfuwrftt sc vef zftfgvfz
gssyt, arz sc eauc-wyapwrfz cadft xffxwrp cgsy hfewrz fjfgo sxfr zssg
wr vefy, Ywtt Xgstt psv a hatwr sc dsuz iavfg arz hfpar uajwrp efg foft,
iewde ifgf tisuufr arz gfz. Eamrvfz ho efg cfjfgwte axxgfefrtwsrt, tef
dsmuz rsv hfag vs eajf efg twpev shtdmgfz csg a ywrmvf av a vwyf ho vef
zgwxxwrp iavfg, hmv dsrtvarvuo xamtfz arz usskfz gsmrz vs tff veav vefgf
iat rs srf iavdewrp efg. Wr srf sc vestf xamtft tef gfdswufz arz dgwfz
smv, csg tef tai a cwpmgf tvarzwrp wr vef gssy.

Vef hatwr cfuu vs vef pgsmrz hgskfr, arz vef iavfg cusifz vs vef cffv sc
Yazayf Zfcagpf. Ho tvgarpf tvfgr iaot, arz vegsmpe ymde tvawrwrp hussz,
vestf cffv eaz dsyf vs yffv veav iavfg.

Yazayf Zfcagpf usskfz dsuzuo av efg, arz tawz, “Vef iwcf sc Fjgfysrzf;
iefgf wt tef?”

Wv cuatefz mxsr Ywtt Xgstt't ywrz veav vef zssgt ifgf auu tvarzwrp sxfr,
arz ismuz tmppftv vef cuwpev. Efg cwgtv adv iat vs temv vefy. Vefgf ifgf
csmg wr vef gssy, arz tef temv vefy auu. Tef vefr xuadfz efgtfuc hfcsgf
vef zssg sc vef deayhfg iewde Umdwf eaz sddmxwfz.

Yazayf Zfcagpf't zagk foft csuusifz efg vegsmpe vewt gaxwz ysjfyfrv,
arz gftvfz sr efg iefr wv iat cwrwtefz. Ywtt Xgstt eaz rsvewrp hfamvwcmu
ahsmv efg; ofagt eaz rsv vayfz vef iwuzrftt, sg tscvfrfz vef pgwyrftt,
sc efg axxfagardf; hmv, tef vss iat a zfvfgywrfz isyar wr efg zwccfgfrv
iao, arz tef yfatmgfz Yazayf Zfcagpf iwve efg foft, fjfgo wrde.

“Osm ywpev, cgsy osmg axxfagardf, hf vef iwcf sc Umdwcfg,” tawz Ywtt
Xgstt, wr efg hgfavewrp. “Rfjfgvefuftt, osm teauu rsv pfv vef hfvvfg sc
yf. W ay ar Frpuwteisyar.”

Yazayf Zfcagpf usskfz av efg tdsgrcmuuo, hmv tvwuu iwve tsyfvewrp sc
Ywtt Xgstt't sir xfgdfxvwsr veav vefo vis ifgf av hao. Tef tai a vwpev,
eagz, iwgo isyar hfcsgf efg, at Yg. Usggo eaz tffr wr vef tayf cwpmgf a
isyar iwve a tvgsrp earz, wr vef ofagt psrf ho. Tef krfi cmuu ifuu veav
Ywtt Xgstt iat vef caywuo't zfjsvfz cgwfrz; Ywtt Xgstt krfi cmuu ifuu
veav Yazayf Zfcagpf iat vef caywuo't yaufjsufrv frfyo.

“Sr yo iao osrzfg,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, iwve a tuwpev ysjfyfrv sc
efg earz vsiagzt vef cavau txsv, “iefgf vefo gftfgjf yo deawg arz yo
krwvvwrp csg yf, W ay dsyf vs yakf yo dsyxuwyfrvt vs efg wr xattwrp. W
iwte vs tff efg.”

“W krsi veav osmg wrvfrvwsrt agf fjwu,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, “arz osm yao
zfxfrz mxsr wv, W'uu esuz yo sir apawrtv vefy.”

Fade txskf wr efg sir uarpmapf; rfwvefg mrzfgtvssz vef svefg't isgzt;
hsve ifgf jfgo iavdecmu, arz wrvfrv vs zfzmdf cgsy ussk arz yarrfg, ieav
vef mrwrvfuuwpwhuf isgzt yfarv.

“Wv iwuu zs efg rs pssz vs kffx efgtfuc dsrdfaufz cgsy yf av vewt
ysyfrv,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf. “Pssz xavgwsvt iwuu krsi ieav veav yfart.
Ufv yf tff efg. Ps vfuu efg veav W iwte vs tff efg. Zs osm efag?”

“Wc vestf foft sc osmgt ifgf hfz-iwrdeft,” gfvmgrfz Ywtt Xgstt, “arz W
iat ar Frpuwte csmg-xstvfg, vefo tesmuzr'v usstf a txuwrvfg sc yf. Rs,
osm iwdkfz csgfwpr isyar; W ay osmg yavde.”

Yazayf Zfcagpf iat rsv uwkfuo vs csuusi veftf wzwsyavwd gfyagkt wr
zfvawu; hmv, tef ts cag mrzfgtvssz vefy at vs xfgdfwjf veav tef iat tfv
av rampev.

“Isyar wyhfdwuf arz xwp-uwkf!” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf, cgsirwrp. “W vakf rs
artifg cgsy osm. W zfyarz vs tff efg. Fwvefg vfuu efg veav W zfyarz
vs tff efg, sg tvarz smv sc vef iao sc vef zssg arz ufv yf ps vs efg!”
 Vewt, iwve ar arpgo fqxuaravsgo iajf sc efg gwpev agy.

“W uwvvuf vesmpev,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, “veav W tesmuz fjfg iarv vs
mrzfgtvarz osmg rsrtfrtwdau uarpmapf; hmv W ismuz pwjf auu W eajf,
fqdfxv vef dusveft W ifag, vs krsi iefvefg osm tmtxfdv vef vgmve, sg aro
xagv sc wv.”

Rfwvefg sc vefy csg a twrpuf ysyfrv gfufatfz vef svefg't foft. Yazayf
Zfcagpf eaz rsv ysjfz cgsy vef txsv iefgf tef tvssz iefr Ywtt Xgstt
cwgtv hfdayf aiagf sc efg; hmv, tef rsi azjardfz srf tvfx.

“W ay a Hgwvsr,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, “W ay zftxfgavf. W zsr'v dagf ar
Frpuwte Visxfrdf csg yotfuc. W krsi veav vef usrpfg W kffx osm efgf, vef
pgfavfg esxf vefgf wt csg yo Uazohwgz. W'uu rsv ufajf a earzcmu sc veav
zagk eawg mxsr osmg efaz, wc osm uao a cwrpfg sr yf!”

Vemt Ywtt Xgstt, iwve a teakf sc efg efaz arz a cuate sc efg foft
hfviffr fjfgo gaxwz tfrvfrdf, arz fjfgo gaxwz tfrvfrdf a iesuf hgfave.
Vemt Ywtt Xgstt, ies eaz rfjfg tvgmdk a husi wr efg uwcf.

Hmv, efg dsmgapf iat sc veav fysvwsrau ravmgf veav wv hgsmpev vef
wggfxgfttwhuf vfagt wrvs efg foft. Vewt iat a dsmgapf veav Yazayf
Zfcagpf ts uwvvuf dsyxgfefrzfz at vs ywtvakf csg ifakrftt. “Ea, ea!” tef
uampefz, “osm xssg igfvde! Ieav agf osm isgve! W azzgftt yotfuc vs veav
Zsdvsg.” Vefr tef gawtfz efg jswdf arz dauufz smv, “Dwvwbfr Zsdvsg! Iwcf
sc Fjgfysrzf! Dewuz sc Fjgfysrzf! Aro xfgtsr hmv vewt ywtfgahuf cssu,
artifg vef Dwvwbfrftt Zfcagpf!”

Xfgeaxt vef csuusiwrp twufrdf, xfgeaxt tsyf uavfrv zwtdustmgf wr vef
fqxgfttwsr sc Ywtt Xgstt't cadf, xfgeaxt a tmzzfr ywtpwjwrp axagv cgsy
fwvefg tmppftvwsr, iewtxfgfz vs Yazayf Zfcagpf veav vefo ifgf psrf.
Vegff sc vef zssgt tef sxfrfz tiwcvuo, arz usskfz wr.

“Vestf gssyt agf auu wr zwtsgzfg, vefgf eat hffr emggwfz xadkwrp, vefgf
agf szzt arz frzt mxsr vef pgsmrz. Vefgf wt rs srf wr veav gssy hfewrz
osm! Ufv yf ussk.”

“Rfjfg!” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, ies mrzfgtvssz vef gfnmftv at xfgcfdvuo at
Yazayf Zfcagpf mrzfgtvssz vef artifg.

“Wc vefo agf rsv wr veav gssy, vefo agf psrf, arz dar hf xmgtmfz arz
hgsmpev hadk,” tawz Yazayf Zfcagpf vs efgtfuc.

“At usrp at osm zsr'v krsi iefvefg vefo agf wr veav gssy sg rsv, osm agf
mrdfgvawr ieav vs zs,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt vs efgtfuc; “arz osm teauu rsv
krsi veav, wc W dar xgfjfrv osmg krsiwrp wv; arz krsi veav, sg rsv krsi
veav, osm teauu rsv ufajf efgf iewuf W dar esuz osm.”

“W eajf hffr wr vef tvgffvt cgsy vef cwgtv, rsvewrp eat tvsxxfz yf,
W iwuu vfag osm vs xwfdft, hmv W iwuu eajf osm cgsy veav zssg,” tawz
Yazayf Zfcagpf.

“If agf ausrf av vef vsx sc a ewpe esmtf wr a tsuwvago dsmgvoagz, if agf
rsv uwkfuo vs hf efagz, arz W xgao csg hszwuo tvgfrpve vs kffx osm efgf,
iewuf fjfgo ywrmvf osm agf efgf wt isgve a emrzgfz vesmtarz pmwrfat vs
yo zaguwrp,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt.

Yazayf Zfcagpf yazf av vef zssg. Ywtt Xgstt, sr vef wrtvwrdv sc vef
ysyfrv, tfwbfz efg gsmrz vef iawtv wr hsve efg agyt, arz efuz efg vwpev.
Wv iat wr jawr csg Yazayf Zfcagpf vs tvgmppuf arz vs tvgwkf; Ywtt Xgstt,
iwve vef jwpsgsmt vfradwvo sc usjf, auiaot ts ymde tvgsrpfg vear eavf,
duatxfz efg vwpev, arz fjfr uwcvfz efg cgsy vef cussg wr vef tvgmppuf
veav vefo eaz. Vef vis earzt sc Yazayf Zfcagpf hmccfvfz arz vsgf efg
cadf; hmv, Ywtt Xgstt, iwve efg efaz zsir, efuz efg gsmrz vef iawtv, arz
dumrp vs efg iwve ysgf vear vef esuz sc a zgsirwrp isyar.

Tssr, Yazayf Zfcagpf't earzt dfatfz vs tvgwkf, arz cfuv av efg frdwgdufz
iawtv. “Wv wt mrzfg yo agy,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, wr tysvefgfz vsrft, “osm
teauu rsv zgai wv. W ay tvgsrpfg vear osm, W huftt Efajfr csg wv. W esuz
osm vwuu srf sg svefg sc mt cawrvt sg zwft!”

Yazayf Zfcagpf't earzt ifgf av efg hstsy. Ywtt Xgstt usskfz mx, tai
ieav wv iat, tvgmdk av wv, tvgmdk smv a cuate arz a dgate, arz tvssz
ausrf--huwrzfz iwve tyskf.

Auu vewt iat wr a tfdsrz. At vef tyskf dufagfz, ufajwrp ar aicmu
tvwuurftt, wv xattfz smv sr vef awg, uwkf vef tsmu sc vef cmgwsmt isyar
iestf hszo uao uwcfuftt sr vef pgsmrz.

Wr vef cwgtv cgwpev arz esggsg sc efg twvmavwsr, Ywtt Xgstt xattfz vef
hszo at cag cgsy wv at tef dsmuz, arz gar zsir vef tvawgt vs dauu csg
cgmwvuftt efux. Eaxxwuo, tef hfvesmpev efgtfuc sc vef dsrtfnmfrdft sc
ieav tef zwz, wr vwyf vs defdk efgtfuc arz ps hadk. Wv iat zgfazcmu vs
ps wr av vef zssg apawr; hmv, tef zwz ps wr, arz fjfr ifrv rfag wv, vs
pfv vef hsrrfv arz svefg vewrpt veav tef ymtv ifag. Veftf tef xmv sr,
smv sr vef tvawgdatf, cwgtv temvvwrp arz usdkwrp vef zssg arz vakwrp
aiao vef kfo. Tef vefr tav zsir sr vef tvawgt a cfi ysyfrvt vs hgfavef
arz vs dgo, arz vefr psv mx arz emggwfz aiao.

Ho pssz csgvmrf tef eaz a jfwu sr efg hsrrfv, sg tef dsmuz eagzuo eajf
psrf ausrp vef tvgffvt iwvesmv hfwrp tvsxxfz. Ho pssz csgvmrf, vss, tef
iat ravmgauuo ts xfdmuwag wr axxfagardf at rsv vs tesi zwtcwpmgfyfrv
uwkf aro svefg isyar. Tef rffzfz hsve azjarvapft, csg vef yagkt sc
pgwxxwrp cwrpfgt ifgf zffx wr efg cadf, arz efg eawg iat vsgr, arz efg
zgftt (eatvwuo dsyxstfz iwve mrtvfazo earzt) iat dumvdefz arz zgappfz a
emrzgfz iaot.

Wr dgsttwrp vef hgwzpf, tef zgsxxfz vef zssg kfo wr vef gwjfg. Aggwjwrp
av vef davefzgau tsyf cfi ywrmvft hfcsgf efg ftdsgv, arz iawvwrp vefgf,
tef vesmpev, ieav wc vef kfo ifgf augfazo vakfr wr a rfv, ieav wc
wv ifgf wzfrvwcwfz, ieav wc vef zssg ifgf sxfrfz arz vef gfyawrt
zwtdsjfgfz, ieav wc tef ifgf tvsxxfz av vef pavf, tfrv vs xgwtsr, arz
deagpfz iwve ymgzfg! Wr vef ywztv sc veftf cumvvfgwrp vesmpevt, vef
ftdsgv axxfagfz, vssk efg wr, arz vssk efg aiao.

“Wt vefgf aro rswtf wr vef tvgffvt?” tef atkfz ewy.

“Vef mtmau rswtft,” Yg. Dgmrdefg gfxuwfz; arz usskfz tmgxgwtfz ho vef
nmftvwsr arz ho efg atxfdv.

“W zsr'v efag osm,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt. “Ieav zs osm tao?”

Wv iat wr jawr csg Yg. Dgmrdefg vs gfxfav ieav ef tawz; Ywtt Xgstt dsmuz
rsv efag ewy. “Ts W'uu rsz yo efaz,” vesmpev Yg. Dgmrdefg, ayabfz, “av
auu fjfrvt tef'uu tff veav.” Arz tef zwz.

“Wt vefgf aro rswtf wr vef tvgffvt rsi?” atkfz Ywtt Xgstt apawr,
xgftfrvuo.

Apawr Yg. Dgmrdefg rszzfz ewt efaz.

“W zsr'v efag wv.”

“Psrf zfac wr ar esmg?” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, gmywravwrp, iwve ewt ywrz
ymde zwtvmghfz; “isv't dsyf vs efg?”

“W cffu,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, “at wc vefgf eaz hffr a cuate arz a dgate,
arz veav dgate iat vef uatv vewrp W tesmuz fjfg efag wr vewt uwcf.”

“Huftv wc tef awr'v wr a nmffg dsrzwvwsr!” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, ysgf arz
ysgf zwtvmghfz. “Isv dar tef eajf hffr a vakwr', vs kffx efg dsmgapf mx?
Eagk! Vefgf't vef gsuu sc vefy zgfazcmu dagvt! Osm dar efag veav, ywtt?”

“W dar efag,” tawz Ywtt Xgstt, tffwrp veav ef txskf vs efg, “rsvewrp. S,
yo pssz yar, vefgf iat cwgtv a pgfav dgate, arz vefr a pgfav tvwuurftt,
arz veav tvwuurftt tffyt vs hf cwqfz arz mrdearpfahuf, rfjfg vs hf
hgskfr aro ysgf at usrp at yo uwcf uatvt.”

“Wc tef zsr'v efag vef gsuu sc vestf zgfazcmu dagvt, rsi jfgo rwpe vefwg
lsmgrfo't frz,” tawz Yg. Dgmrdefg, puardwrp sjfg ewt tesmuzfg, “wv't yo
sxwrwsr veav wrzffz tef rfjfg iwuu efag arovewrp futf wr vewt isguz.”

Arz wrzffz tef rfjfg zwz.




QJ. Vef Cssvtvfxt Zwf Smv Csg Fjfg


Ausrp vef Xagwt tvgffvt, vef zfave-dagvt gmyhuf, esuusi arz eagte. Twq
vmyhgwut daggo vef zao't iwrf vs Ua Pmwuusvwrf. Auu vef zfjsmgwrp arz
wrtavwavf Ysrtvfgt wyapwrfz twrdf wyapwravwsr dsmuz gfdsgz wvtfuc,
agf cmtfz wr vef srf gfauwtavwsr, Pmwuusvwrf. Arz ofv vefgf wt rsv wr
Cgardf, iwve wvt gwde jagwfvo sc tswu arz duwyavf, a huazf, a ufac,
a gssv, a txgwp, a xfxxfgdsgr, iewde iwuu pgsi vs yavmgwvo mrzfg
dsrzwvwsrt ysgf dfgvawr vear vestf veav eajf xgszmdfz vewt esggsg. Dgmte
emyarwvo smv sc teaxf srdf ysgf, mrzfg twywuag eayyfgt, arz wv iwuu
viwtv wvtfuc wrvs vef tayf vsgvmgfz csgyt. Tsi vef tayf tffz sc
gaxadwsmt uwdfrtf arz sxxgfttwsr sjfg apawr, arz wv iwuu tmgfuo owfuz
vef tayf cgmwv addsgzwrp vs wvt kwrz.

Twq vmyhgwut gsuu ausrp vef tvgffvt. Dearpf veftf hadk apawr vs ieav
vefo ifgf, vesm xsifgcmu frdearvfg, Vwyf, arz vefo teauu hf tffr vs hf
vef daggwapft sc ahtsumvf ysragdet, vef fnmwxapft sc cfmzau rshuft, vef
vswufvvft sc cuagwrp Lfbfhfut, vef demgdeft veav agf rsv yo cavefg't
esmtf hmv zfrt sc vewfjft, vef emvt sc ywuuwsrt sc tvagjwrp xfatarvt!
Rs; vef pgfav yapwdwar ies yalftvwdauuo isgkt smv vef axxswrvfz sgzfg
sc vef Dgfavsg, rfjfg gfjfgtft ewt vgartcsgyavwsrt. “Wc vesm hf dearpfz
wrvs vewt teaxf ho vef iwuu sc Psz,” tao vef tffgt vs vef frdearvfz, wr
vef iwtf Agahwar tvsgwft, “vefr gfyawr ts! Hmv, wc vesm ifag vewt
csgy vegsmpe yfgf xattwrp dsrlmgavwsr, vefr gftmyf veo csgyfg atxfdv!”
 Dearpfuftt arz esxfuftt, vef vmyhgwut gsuu ausrp.

At vef tsyhgf ieffut sc vef twq dagvt ps gsmrz, vefo tffy vs xusmpe mx
a usrp dgsskfz cmggsi aysrp vef xsxmuadf wr vef tvgffvt. Gwzpft sc cadft
agf vegsir vs vewt twzf arz vs veav, arz vef xusmpet ps tvfazwuo sriagz.
Ts mtfz agf vef gfpmuag wreahwvarvt sc vef esmtft vs vef txfdvaduf, veav
wr yaro iwrzsit vefgf agf rs xfsxuf, arz wr tsyf vef sddmxavwsr sc vef
earzt wt rsv ts ymde at tmtxfrzfz, iewuf vef foft tmgjfo vef cadft wr
vef vmyhgwut. Efgf arz vefgf, vef wryavf eat jwtwvsgt vs tff vef twpev;
vefr ef xswrvt ewt cwrpfg, iwve tsyfvewrp sc vef dsyxuadfrdo sc a
dmgavsg sg amvesgwtfz fqxsrfrv, vs vewt dagv arz vs vewt, arz tffyt vs
vfuu ies tav efgf oftvfgzao, arz ies vefgf vef zao hfcsgf.

Sc vef gwzfgt wr vef vmyhgwut, tsyf shtfgjf veftf vewrpt, arz auu
vewrpt sr vefwg uatv gsaztwzf, iwve ar wyxattwjf tvagf; svefgt, iwve
a uwrpfgwrp wrvfgftv wr vef iaot sc uwcf arz yfr. Tsyf, tfavfz iwve
zgssxwrp efazt, agf tmrk wr twufrv zftxawg; apawr, vefgf agf tsyf ts
effzcmu sc vefwg usskt veav vefo datv mxsr vef ymuvwvmzf tmde puardft at
vefo eajf tffr wr vefavgft, arz wr xwdvmgft. Tfjfgau dustf vefwg foft,
arz vewrk, sg vgo vs pfv vefwg tvgaowrp vesmpevt vspfvefg. Sruo srf, arz
ef a ywtfgahuf dgfavmgf, sc a dgabfz atxfdv, wt ts teavvfgfz arz yazf
zgmrk ho esggsg, veav ef twrpt, arz vgwft vs zardf. Rsv srf sc vef iesuf
rmyhfg axxfaut ho ussk sg pftvmgf, vs vef xwvo sc vef xfsxuf.

Vefgf wt a pmagz sc tmrzgo esgtfyfr gwzwrp ahgfatv sc vef vmyhgwut,
arz cadft agf scvfr vmgrfz mx vs tsyf sc vefy, arz vefo agf atkfz tsyf
nmftvwsr. Wv ismuz tffy vs hf auiaot vef tayf nmftvwsr, csg, wv wt
auiaot csuusifz ho a xgftt sc xfsxuf vsiagzt vef vewgz dagv. Vef
esgtfyfr ahgfatv sc veav dagv, cgfnmfrvuo xswrv smv srf yar wr wv iwve
vefwg tisgzt. Vef ufazwrp dmgwstwvo wt, vs krsi iewde wt ef; ef tvarzt
av vef hadk sc vef vmyhgwu iwve ewt efaz hfrv zsir, vs dsrjfgtf iwve a
yfgf pwgu ies twvt sr vef twzf sc vef dagv, arz esuzt ewt earz. Ef eat
rs dmgwstwvo sg dagf csg vef tdfrf ahsmv ewy, arz auiaot txfakt vs vef
pwgu. Efgf arz vefgf wr vef usrp tvgffv sc Tv. Esrsgf, dgwft agf gawtfz
apawrtv ewy. Wc vefo ysjf ewy av auu, wv wt sruo vs a nmwfv tywuf, at ef
teakft ewt eawg a uwvvuf ysgf usstfuo ahsmv ewt cadf. Ef darrsv fatwuo
vsmde ewt cadf, ewt agyt hfwrp hsmrz.

Sr vef tvfxt sc a demgde, aiawvwrp vef dsywrp-mx sc vef vmyhgwut, tvarzt
vef Txo arz xgwtsr-teffx. Ef usskt wrvs vef cwgtv sc vefy: rsv vefgf.
Ef usskt wrvs vef tfdsrz: rsv vefgf. Ef augfazo atkt ewytfuc, “Eat ef
tadgwcwdfz yf?” iefr ewt cadf dufagt, at ef usskt wrvs vef vewgz.

“Iewde wt Fjgfysrzf?” taot a yar hfewrz ewy.

“Veav. Av vef hadk vefgf.”

“Iwve ewt earz wr vef pwgu't?”

“Oft.”

Vef yar dgwft, “Zsir, Fjgfysrzf! Vs vef Pmwuusvwrf auu agwtvsdgavt!
Zsir, Fjgfysrzf!”

“Emte, emte!” vef Txo frvgfavt ewy, vwywzuo.

“Arz ieo rsv, dwvwbfr?”

“Ef wt pswrp vs xao vef csgcfwv: wv iwuu hf xawz wr cwjf ywrmvft ysgf.
Ufv ewy hf av xfadf.”

Hmv vef yar dsrvwrmwrp vs fqduawy, “Zsir, Fjgfysrzf!” vef cadf sc
Fjgfysrzf wt csg a ysyfrv vmgrfz vsiagzt ewy. Fjgfysrzf vefr tfft vef
Txo, arz usskt avvfrvwjfuo av ewy, arz psft ewt iao.

Vef dusdkt agf sr vef tvgskf sc vegff, arz vef cmggsi xusmpefz aysrp vef
xsxmuadf wt vmgrwrp gsmrz, vs dsyf sr wrvs vef xuadf sc fqfdmvwsr, arz
frz. Vef gwzpft vegsir vs vewt twzf arz vs veav, rsi dgmyhuf wr arz
dustf hfewrz vef uatv xusmpe at wv xattft sr, csg auu agf csuusiwrp
vs vef Pmwuusvwrf. Wr cgsrv sc wv, tfavfz wr deawgt, at wr a pagzfr sc
xmhuwd zwjfgtwsr, agf a rmyhfg sc isyfr, hmtwuo krwvvwrp. Sr srf sc vef
csgf-ystv deawgt, tvarzt Vef Jfrpfardf, usskwrp ahsmv csg efg cgwfrz.

“Vefgftf!” tef dgwft, wr efg tegwuu vsrft. “Ies eat tffr efg? Vefgftf
Zfcagpf!”

“Tef rfjfg ywttfz hfcsgf,” taot a krwvvwrp-isyar sc vef twtvfgessz.

“Rs; rsg iwuu tef ywtt rsi,” dgwft Vef Jfrpfardf, xfvmuarvuo. “Vefgftf.”

“Usmzfg,” vef isyar gfdsyyfrzt.

Ao! Usmzfg, Jfrpfardf, ymde usmzfg, arz tvwuu tef iwuu tdagdfuo efag
veff. Usmzfg ofv, Jfrpfardf, iwve a uwvvuf save sg ts azzfz, arz ofv
wv iwuu eagzuo hgwrp efg. Tfrz svefg isyfr mx arz zsir vs tffk efg,
uwrpfgwrp tsyfiefgf; arz ofv, auvesmpe vef yfttfrpfgt eajf zsrf zgfaz
zffzt, wv wt nmftvwsrahuf iefvefg sc vefwg sir iwuut vefo iwuu ps cag
frsmpe vs cwrz efg!

“Haz Csgvmrf!” dgwft Vef Jfrpfardf, tvayxwrp efg cssv wr vef deawg, “arz
efgf agf vef vmyhgwut! Arz Fjgfysrzf iwuu hf zftxavdefz wr a iwrk, arz
tef rsv efgf! Tff efg krwvvwrp wr yo earz, arz efg fyxvo deawg gfazo csg
efg. W dgo iwve jfqavwsr arz zwtaxxswrvyfrv!”

At Vef Jfrpfardf zftdfrzt cgsy efg fufjavwsr vs zs wv, vef vmyhgwut
hfpwr vs zwtdeagpf vefwg usazt. Vef ywrwtvfgt sc Tawrvf Pmwuusvwrf agf
gshfz arz gfazo. Dgate!--A efaz wt efuz mx, arz vef krwvvwrp-isyfr ies
tdagdfuo uwcvfz vefwg foft vs ussk av wv a ysyfrv aps iefr wv dsmuz
vewrk arz txfak, dsmrv Srf.

Vef tfdsrz vmyhgwu fyxvwft arz ysjft sr; vef vewgz dsyft mx. Dgate!--Arz
vef krwvvwrp-isyfr, rfjfg cauvfgwrp sg xamtwrp wr vefwg Isgk, dsmrv Vis.

Vef tmxxstfz Fjgfysrzf zftdfrzt, arz vef tfaytvgftt wt uwcvfz smv rfqv
acvfg ewy. Ef eat rsv gfuwrnmwtefz efg xavwfrv earz wr pfvvwrp smv, hmv
tvwuu esuzt wv at ef xgsywtfz. Ef pfrvuo xuadft efg iwve efg hadk vs vef
dgatewrp frpwrf veav dsrtvarvuo iewggt mx arz cauut, arz tef usskt wrvs
ewt cadf arz vearkt ewy.

“Hmv csg osm, zfag tvgarpfg, W tesmuz rsv hf ts dsyxstfz, csg W ay
ravmgauuo a xssg uwvvuf vewrp, cawrv sc efagv; rsg tesmuz W eajf hffr
ahuf vs gawtf yo vesmpevt vs Ewy ies iat xmv vs zfave, veav if ywpev
eajf esxf arz dsycsgv efgf vs-zao. W vewrk osm ifgf tfrv vs yf ho
Efajfr.”

“Sg osm vs yf,” taot Tozrfo Dagvsr. “Kffx osmg foft mxsr yf, zfag dewuz,
arz ywrz rs svefg shlfdv.”

“W ywrz rsvewrp iewuf W esuz osmg earz. W teauu ywrz rsvewrp iefr W ufv
wv ps, wc vefo agf gaxwz.”

“Vefo iwuu hf gaxwz. Cfag rsv!”

Vef vis tvarz wr vef catv-vewrrwrp vegsrp sc jwdvwyt, hmv vefo txfak at
wc vefo ifgf ausrf. Fof vs fof, jswdf vs jswdf, earz vs earz, efagv vs
efagv, veftf vis dewuzgfr sc vef Mrwjfgtau Ysvefg, futf ts iwzf axagv
arz zwccfgwrp, eajf dsyf vspfvefg sr vef zagk ewpeiao, vs gfxawg esyf
vspfvefg, arz vs gftv wr efg hstsy.

“Hgajf arz pfrfgsmt cgwfrz, iwuu osm ufv yf atk osm srf uatv nmftvwsr? W
ay jfgo wprsgarv, arz wv vgsmhuft yf--lmtv a uwvvuf.”

“Vfuu yf ieav wv wt.”

“W eajf a dsmtwr, ar sruo gfuavwjf arz ar sgxear, uwkf yotfuc, iesy W
usjf jfgo zfaguo. Tef wt cwjf ofagt osmrpfg vear W, arz tef uwjft wr a
cagyfg't esmtf wr vef tsmve dsmrvgo. Xsjfgvo xagvfz mt, arz tef krsit
rsvewrp sc yo cavf--csg W darrsv igwvf--arz wc W dsmuz, esi tesmuz W
vfuu efg! Wv wt hfvvfg at wv wt.”

“Oft, oft: hfvvfg at wv wt.”

“Ieav W eajf hffr vewrkwrp at if dayf ausrp, arz ieav W ay tvwuu
vewrkwrp rsi, at W ussk wrvs osmg kwrz tvgsrp cadf iewde pwjft yf ts
ymde tmxxsgv, wt vewt:--Wc vef Gfxmhuwd gfauuo zsft pssz vs vef xssg,
arz vefo dsyf vs hf uftt emrpgo, arz wr auu iaot vs tmccfg uftt, tef yao
uwjf a usrp vwyf: tef yao fjfr uwjf vs hf suz.”

“Ieav vefr, yo pfrvuf twtvfg?”

“Zs osm vewrk:” vef mrdsyxuawrwrp foft wr iewde vefgf wt ts ymde
frzmgardf, cwuu iwve vfagt, arz vef uwxt xagv a uwvvuf ysgf arz vgfyhuf:
“veav wv iwuu tffy usrp vs yf, iewuf W iawv csg efg wr vef hfvvfg uarz
iefgf W vgmtv hsve osm arz W iwuu hf yfgdwcmuuo tefuvfgfz?”

“Wv darrsv hf, yo dewuz; vefgf wt rs Vwyf vefgf, arz rs vgsmhuf vefgf.”

“Osm dsycsgv yf ts ymde! W ay ts wprsgarv. Ay W vs kwtt osm rsi? Wt vef
ysyfrv dsyf?”

“Oft.”

Tef kwttft ewt uwxt; ef kwttft efgt; vefo tsufyruo huftt fade svefg.
Vef txagf earz zsft rsv vgfyhuf at ef gfufatft wv; rsvewrp isgtf vear
a tiffv, hgwpev dsrtvardo wt wr vef xavwfrv cadf. Tef psft rfqv hfcsgf
ewy--wt psrf; vef krwvvwrp-isyfr dsmrv Vifrvo-Vis.

“W ay vef Gftmggfdvwsr arz vef Uwcf, tawve vef Usgz: ef veav hfuwfjfve
wr yf, vesmpe ef ifgf zfaz, ofv teauu ef uwjf: arz iestsfjfg uwjfve arz
hfuwfjfve wr yf teauu rfjfg zwf.”

Vef ymgymgwrp sc yaro jswdft, vef mxvmgrwrp sc yaro cadft, vef xgfttwrp
sr sc yaro cssvtvfxt wr vef smvtkwgvt sc vef dgsiz, ts veav wv tifuut
csgiagz wr a yatt, uwkf srf pgfav efajf sc iavfg, auu cuateft aiao.
Vifrvo-Vegff.

        *****

Vefo tawz sc ewy, ahsmv vef dwvo veav rwpev, veav wv iat vef
xfadfcmuuftv yar't cadf fjfg hfefuz vefgf. Yaro azzfz veav ef usskfz
tmhuwyf arz xgsxefvwd.

Srf sc vef ystv gfyagkahuf tmccfgfgt ho vef tayf aqf--a isyar--eaz atkfz
av vef cssv sc vef tayf tdaccsuz, rsv usrp hfcsgf, vs hf auusifz vs
igwvf zsir vef vesmpevt veav ifgf wrtxwgwrp efg. Wc ef eaz pwjfr aro
mvvfgardf vs ewt, arz vefo ifgf xgsxefvwd, vefo ismuz eajf hffr veftf:

“W tff Hagtaz, arz Duo, Zfcagpf, Vef Jfrpfardf, vef Lmgoyar, vef Lmzpf,
usrp garkt sc vef rfi sxxgfttsgt ies eajf gwtfr sr vef zftvgmdvwsr sc
vef suz, xfgwtewrp ho vewt gfvgwhmvwjf wrtvgmyfrv, hfcsgf wv teauu dfatf
smv sc wvt xgftfrv mtf. W tff a hfamvwcmu dwvo arz a hgwuuwarv xfsxuf
gwtwrp cgsy vewt ahott, arz, wr vefwg tvgmppuft vs hf vgmuo cgff, wr
vefwg vgwmyxet arz zfcfavt, vegsmpe usrp ofagt vs dsyf, W tff vef fjwu
sc vewt vwyf arz sc vef xgfjwsmt vwyf sc iewde vewt wt vef ravmgau
hwgve, pgazmauuo yakwrp fqxwavwsr csg wvtfuc arz ifagwrp smv.

“W tff vef uwjft csg iewde W uao zsir yo uwcf, xfadfcmu, mtfcmu,
xgstxfgsmt arz eaxxo, wr veav Frpuarz iewde W teauu tff rs ysgf. W tff
Efg iwve a dewuz mxsr efg hstsy, ies hfagt yo rayf. W tff efg cavefg,
apfz arz hfrv, hmv svefgiwtf gftvsgfz, arz cawvecmu vs auu yfr wr ewt
efauwrp sccwdf, arz av xfadf. W tff vef pssz suz yar, ts usrp vefwg
cgwfrz, wr vfr ofagt' vwyf frgwdewrp vefy iwve auu ef eat, arz xattwrp
vgarnmwuuo vs ewt gfiagz.

“W tff veav W esuz a tardvmago wr vefwg efagvt, arz wr vef efagvt sc
vefwg zftdfrzarvt, pfrfgavwsrt efrdf. W tff efg, ar suz isyar, iffxwrp
csg yf sr vef arrwjfgtago sc vewt zao. W tff efg arz efg emtharz, vefwg
dsmgtf zsrf, uowrp twzf ho twzf wr vefwg uatv fagveuo hfz, arz W krsi
veav fade iat rsv ysgf esrsmgfz arz efuz tadgfz wr vef svefg't tsmu,
vear W iat wr vef tsmut sc hsve.

“W tff veav dewuz ies uao mxsr efg hstsy arz ies hsgf yo rayf, a yar
iwrrwrp ewt iao mx wr veav xave sc uwcf iewde srdf iat ywrf. W tff ewy
iwrrwrp wv ts ifuu, veav yo rayf wt yazf wuumtvgwsmt vefgf ho vef
uwpev sc ewt. W tff vef husvt W vegfi mxsr wv, cazfz aiao. W tff ewy,
csgf-ystv sc lmtv lmzpft arz esrsmgfz yfr, hgwrpwrp a hso sc yo rayf,
iwve a csgfefaz veav W krsi arz psuzfr eawg, vs vewt xuadf--vefr cawg vs
ussk mxsr, iwve rsv a vgadf sc vewt zao't zwtcwpmgfyfrv--arz W efag ewy
vfuu vef dewuz yo tvsgo, iwve a vfrzfg arz a cauvfgwrp jswdf.

“Wv wt a cag, cag hfvvfg vewrp veav W zs, vear W eajf fjfg zsrf; wv wt a
cag, cag hfvvfg gftv veav W ps vs vear W eajf fjfg krsir.”











Frz sc vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp FHssk sc A Vauf sc Vis Dwvwft, ho Deaguft Zwdkfrt

*** FRZ SC VEWT XGSLFDV PMVFRHFGP FHSSK A VAUF SC VIS DWVWFT ***

***** Vewt cwuf tesmuz hf rayfz 98-0.vqv sg 98-0.bwx *****
Vewt arz auu attsdwavfz cwuft sc jagwsmt csgyavt iwuu hf csmrz wr:
        evvx://iii.pmvfrhfgp.sgp/9/98/

Xgszmdfz ho Lmzwve Hstt

Mxzavfz fzwvwsrt iwuu gfxuadf vef xgfjwsmt srf--vef suz fzwvwsrt
iwuu hf gfrayfz.

Dgfavwrp vef isgkt cgsy xmhuwd zsyawr xgwrv fzwvwsrt yfart veav rs
srf sirt a Mrwvfz Tvavft dsxogwpev wr veftf isgkt, ts vef Csmrzavwsr
(arz osm!) dar dsxo arz zwtvgwhmvf wv wr vef Mrwvfz Tvavft iwvesmv
xfgywttwsr arz iwvesmv xaowrp dsxogwpev gsoauvwft.  Txfdwau gmuft,
tfv csgve wr vef Pfrfgau Vfgyt sc Mtf xagv sc vewt uwdfrtf, axxuo vs
dsxowrp arz zwtvgwhmvwrp Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd isgkt vs
xgsvfdv vef XGSLFDV PMVFRHFGP-vy dsrdfxv arz vgazfyagk.  Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp wt a gfpwtvfgfz vgazfyagk, arz yao rsv hf mtfz wc osm
deagpf csg vef fHsskt, mruftt osm gfdfwjf txfdwcwd xfgywttwsr.  Wc osm
zs rsv deagpf arovewrp csg dsxwft sc vewt fHssk, dsyxuowrp iwve vef
gmuft wt jfgo fato.  Osm yao mtf vewt fHssk csg rfaguo aro xmgxstf
tmde at dgfavwsr sc zfgwjavwjf isgkt, gfxsgvt, xfgcsgyardft arz
gftfagde.  Vefo yao hf yszwcwfz arz xgwrvfz arz pwjfr aiao--osm yao zs
xgadvwdauuo AROVEWRP iwve xmhuwd zsyawr fHsskt.  Gfzwtvgwhmvwsr wt
tmhlfdv vs vef vgazfyagk uwdfrtf, ftxfdwauuo dsyyfgdwau
gfzwtvgwhmvwsr.



*** TVAGV: CMUU UWDFRTF ***

VEF CMUU XGSLFDV PMVFRHFGP UWDFRTF
XUFATF GFAZ VEWT HFCSGF OSM ZWTVGWHMVF SG MTF VEWT ISGK

Vs xgsvfdv vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy ywttwsr sc xgsysvwrp vef cgff
zwtvgwhmvwsr sc fufdvgsrwd isgkt, ho mtwrp sg zwtvgwhmvwrp vewt isgk
(sg aro svefg isgk attsdwavfz wr aro iao iwve vef xegatf “Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp”), osm apgff vs dsyxuo iwve auu vef vfgyt sc vef Cmuu Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp-vy Uwdfrtf (ajawuahuf iwve vewt cwuf sg sruwrf av
evvx://pmvfrhfgp.sgp/uwdfrtf).


Tfdvwsr 1.  Pfrfgau Vfgyt sc Mtf arz Gfzwtvgwhmvwrp Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy
fufdvgsrwd isgkt

1.A.  Ho gfazwrp sg mtwrp aro xagv sc vewt Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy
fufdvgsrwd isgk, osm wrzwdavf veav osm eajf gfaz, mrzfgtvarz, apgff vs
arz addfxv auu vef vfgyt sc vewt uwdfrtf arz wrvfuufdvmau xgsxfgvo
(vgazfyagk/dsxogwpev) apgffyfrv.  Wc osm zs rsv apgff vs ahwzf ho auu
vef vfgyt sc vewt apgffyfrv, osm ymtv dfatf mtwrp arz gfvmgr sg zftvgso
auu dsxwft sc Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd isgkt wr osmg xsttfttwsr.
Wc osm xawz a cff csg shvawrwrp a dsxo sc sg addftt vs a Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd isgk arz osm zs rsv apgff vs hf hsmrz ho vef
vfgyt sc vewt apgffyfrv, osm yao shvawr a gfcmrz cgsy vef xfgtsr sg
frvwvo vs iesy osm xawz vef cff at tfv csgve wr xagapgaxe 1.F.8.

1.H.  “Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp” wt a gfpwtvfgfz vgazfyagk.  Wv yao sruo hf
mtfz sr sg attsdwavfz wr aro iao iwve ar fufdvgsrwd isgk ho xfsxuf ies
apgff vs hf hsmrz ho vef vfgyt sc vewt apgffyfrv.  Vefgf agf a cfi
vewrpt veav osm dar zs iwve ystv Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd isgkt
fjfr iwvesmv dsyxuowrp iwve vef cmuu vfgyt sc vewt apgffyfrv.  Tff
xagapgaxe 1.D hfusi.  Vefgf agf a usv sc vewrpt osm dar zs iwve Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd isgkt wc osm csuusi vef vfgyt sc vewt apgffyfrv
arz efux xgftfgjf cgff cmvmgf addftt vs Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd
isgkt.  Tff xagapgaxe 1.F hfusi.

1.D.  Vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp Uwvfgago Agdewjf Csmrzavwsr (“vef Csmrzavwsr”
 sg XPUAC), sirt a dsyxwuavwsr dsxogwpev wr vef dsuufdvwsr sc Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd isgkt.  Rfaguo auu vef wrzwjwzmau isgkt wr vef
dsuufdvwsr agf wr vef xmhuwd zsyawr wr vef Mrwvfz Tvavft.  Wc ar
wrzwjwzmau isgk wt wr vef xmhuwd zsyawr wr vef Mrwvfz Tvavft arz osm agf
usdavfz wr vef Mrwvfz Tvavft, if zs rsv duawy a gwpev vs xgfjfrv osm cgsy
dsxowrp, zwtvgwhmvwrp, xfgcsgywrp, zwtxuaowrp sg dgfavwrp zfgwjavwjf
isgkt hatfz sr vef isgk at usrp at auu gfcfgfrdft vs Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp
agf gfysjfz.  Sc dsmgtf, if esxf veav osm iwuu tmxxsgv vef Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp-vy ywttwsr sc xgsysvwrp cgff addftt vs fufdvgsrwd isgkt ho
cgffuo teagwrp Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy isgkt wr dsyxuwardf iwve vef vfgyt sc
vewt apgffyfrv csg kffxwrp vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy rayf attsdwavfz iwve
vef isgk.  Osm dar fatwuo dsyxuo iwve vef vfgyt sc vewt apgffyfrv ho
kffxwrp vewt isgk wr vef tayf csgyav iwve wvt avvadefz cmuu Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp-vy Uwdfrtf iefr osm teagf wv iwvesmv deagpf iwve svefgt.

1.Z.  Vef dsxogwpev uait sc vef xuadf iefgf osm agf usdavfz auts psjfgr
ieav osm dar zs iwve vewt isgk.  Dsxogwpev uait wr ystv dsmrvgwft agf wr
a dsrtvarv tvavf sc dearpf.  Wc osm agf smvtwzf vef Mrwvfz Tvavft, defdk
vef uait sc osmg dsmrvgo wr azzwvwsr vs vef vfgyt sc vewt apgffyfrv
hfcsgf zsirusazwrp, dsxowrp, zwtxuaowrp, xfgcsgywrp, zwtvgwhmvwrp sg
dgfavwrp zfgwjavwjf isgkt hatfz sr vewt isgk sg aro svefg Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp-vy isgk.  Vef Csmrzavwsr yakft rs gfxgftfrvavwsrt dsrdfgrwrp
vef dsxogwpev tvavmt sc aro isgk wr aro dsmrvgo smvtwzf vef Mrwvfz
Tvavft.

1.F.  Mruftt osm eajf gfysjfz auu gfcfgfrdft vs Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp:

1.F.1.  Vef csuusiwrp tfrvfrdf, iwve advwjf uwrkt vs, sg svefg wyyfzwavf
addftt vs, vef cmuu Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy Uwdfrtf ymtv axxfag xgsywrfrvuo
iefrfjfg aro dsxo sc a Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy isgk (aro isgk sr iewde vef
xegatf “Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp” axxfagt, sg iwve iewde vef xegatf “Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp” wt attsdwavfz) wt addfttfz, zwtxuaofz, xfgcsgyfz, jwfifz,
dsxwfz sg zwtvgwhmvfz:

Vewt fHssk wt csg vef mtf sc arosrf aroiefgf av rs dstv arz iwve
auystv rs gftvgwdvwsrt ieavtsfjfg.  Osm yao dsxo wv, pwjf wv aiao sg
gf-mtf wv mrzfg vef vfgyt sc vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp Uwdfrtf wrdumzfz
iwve vewt fHssk sg sruwrf av iii.pmvfrhfgp.sgp

1.F.2.  Wc ar wrzwjwzmau Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd isgk wt zfgwjfz
cgsy vef xmhuwd zsyawr (zsft rsv dsrvawr a rsvwdf wrzwdavwrp veav wv wt
xstvfz iwve xfgywttwsr sc vef dsxogwpev esuzfg), vef isgk dar hf dsxwfz
arz zwtvgwhmvfz vs arosrf wr vef Mrwvfz Tvavft iwvesmv xaowrp aro cfft
sg deagpft.  Wc osm agf gfzwtvgwhmvwrp sg xgsjwzwrp addftt vs a isgk
iwve vef xegatf “Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp” attsdwavfz iwve sg axxfagwrp sr vef
isgk, osm ymtv dsyxuo fwvefg iwve vef gfnmwgfyfrvt sc xagapgaxet 1.F.1
vegsmpe 1.F.7 sg shvawr xfgywttwsr csg vef mtf sc vef isgk arz vef
Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy vgazfyagk at tfv csgve wr xagapgaxet 1.F.8 sg
1.F.9.

1.F.3.  Wc ar wrzwjwzmau Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd isgk wt xstvfz
iwve vef xfgywttwsr sc vef dsxogwpev esuzfg, osmg mtf arz zwtvgwhmvwsr
ymtv dsyxuo iwve hsve xagapgaxet 1.F.1 vegsmpe 1.F.7 arz aro azzwvwsrau
vfgyt wyxstfz ho vef dsxogwpev esuzfg.  Azzwvwsrau vfgyt iwuu hf uwrkfz
vs vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy Uwdfrtf csg auu isgkt xstvfz iwve vef
xfgywttwsr sc vef dsxogwpev esuzfg csmrz av vef hfpwrrwrp sc vewt isgk.

1.F.4.  Zs rsv mruwrk sg zfvade sg gfysjf vef cmuu Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy
Uwdfrtf vfgyt cgsy vewt isgk, sg aro cwuft dsrvawrwrp a xagv sc vewt
isgk sg aro svefg isgk attsdwavfz iwve Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy.

1.F.5.  Zs rsv dsxo, zwtxuao, xfgcsgy, zwtvgwhmvf sg gfzwtvgwhmvf vewt
fufdvgsrwd isgk, sg aro xagv sc vewt fufdvgsrwd isgk, iwvesmv
xgsywrfrvuo zwtxuaowrp vef tfrvfrdf tfv csgve wr xagapgaxe 1.F.1 iwve
advwjf uwrkt sg wyyfzwavf addftt vs vef cmuu vfgyt sc vef Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp-vy Uwdfrtf.

1.F.6.  Osm yao dsrjfgv vs arz zwtvgwhmvf vewt isgk wr aro hwrago,
dsyxgfttfz, yagkfz mx, rsrxgsxgwfvago sg xgsxgwfvago csgy, wrdumzwrp aro
isgz xgsdfttwrp sg eoxfgvfqv csgy.  Esifjfg, wc osm xgsjwzf addftt vs sg
zwtvgwhmvf dsxwft sc a Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy isgk wr a csgyav svefg vear
“Xuawr Jarwuua ATDWW” sg svefg csgyav mtfz wr vef sccwdwau jfgtwsr
xstvfz sr vef sccwdwau Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy ifh twvf (iii.pmvfrhfgp.sgp),
osm ymtv, av rs azzwvwsrau dstv, cff sg fqxfrtf vs vef mtfg, xgsjwzf a
dsxo, a yfart sc fqxsgvwrp a dsxo, sg a yfart sc shvawrwrp a dsxo mxsr
gfnmftv, sc vef isgk wr wvt sgwpwrau “Xuawr Jarwuua ATDWW” sg svefg
csgy.  Aro auvfgravf csgyav ymtv wrdumzf vef cmuu Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy
Uwdfrtf at txfdwcwfz wr xagapgaxe 1.F.1.

1.F.7.  Zs rsv deagpf a cff csg addftt vs, jwfiwrp, zwtxuaowrp,
xfgcsgywrp, dsxowrp sg zwtvgwhmvwrp aro Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy isgkt
mruftt osm dsyxuo iwve xagapgaxe 1.F.8 sg 1.F.9.

1.F.8.  Osm yao deagpf a gfatsrahuf cff csg dsxwft sc sg xgsjwzwrp
addftt vs sg zwtvgwhmvwrp Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd isgkt xgsjwzfz
veav

- Osm xao a gsoauvo cff sc 20% sc vef pgstt xgscwvt osm zfgwjf cgsy
     vef mtf sc Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy isgkt daudmuavfz mtwrp vef yfvesz
     osm augfazo mtf vs daudmuavf osmg axxuwdahuf vaqft.  Vef cff wt
     sifz vs vef sirfg sc vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy vgazfyagk, hmv ef
     eat apgffz vs zsravf gsoauvwft mrzfg vewt xagapgaxe vs vef
     Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp Uwvfgago Agdewjf Csmrzavwsr.  Gsoauvo xaoyfrvt
     ymtv hf xawz iwvewr 60 zaot csuusiwrp fade zavf sr iewde osm
     xgfxagf (sg agf ufpauuo gfnmwgfz vs xgfxagf) osmg xfgwszwd vaq
     gfvmgrt.  Gsoauvo xaoyfrvt tesmuz hf dufaguo yagkfz at tmde arz
     tfrv vs vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp Uwvfgago Agdewjf Csmrzavwsr av vef
     azzgftt txfdwcwfz wr Tfdvwsr 4, “Wrcsgyavwsr ahsmv zsravwsrt vs
     vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp Uwvfgago Agdewjf Csmrzavwsr.”

- Osm xgsjwzf a cmuu gfcmrz sc aro ysrfo xawz ho a mtfg ies rsvwcwft
     osm wr igwvwrp (sg ho f-yawu) iwvewr 30 zaot sc gfdfwxv veav t/ef
     zsft rsv apgff vs vef vfgyt sc vef cmuu Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy
     Uwdfrtf.  Osm ymtv gfnmwgf tmde a mtfg vs gfvmgr sg
     zftvgso auu dsxwft sc vef isgkt xsttfttfz wr a xeotwdau yfzwmy
     arz zwtdsrvwrmf auu mtf sc arz auu addftt vs svefg dsxwft sc
     Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy isgkt.

- Osm xgsjwzf, wr addsgzardf iwve xagapgaxe 1.C.3, a cmuu gfcmrz sc aro
     ysrfo xawz csg a isgk sg a gfxuadfyfrv dsxo, wc a zfcfdv wr vef
     fufdvgsrwd isgk wt zwtdsjfgfz arz gfxsgvfz vs osm iwvewr 90 zaot
     sc gfdfwxv sc vef isgk.

- Osm dsyxuo iwve auu svefg vfgyt sc vewt apgffyfrv csg cgff
     zwtvgwhmvwsr sc Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy isgkt.

1.F.9.  Wc osm iwte vs deagpf a cff sg zwtvgwhmvf a Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy
fufdvgsrwd isgk sg pgsmx sc isgkt sr zwccfgfrv vfgyt vear agf tfv
csgve wr vewt apgffyfrv, osm ymtv shvawr xfgywttwsr wr igwvwrp cgsy
hsve vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp Uwvfgago Agdewjf Csmrzavwsr arz Ywdeafu
Eagv, vef sirfg sc vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy vgazfyagk.  Dsrvadv vef
Csmrzavwsr at tfv csgve wr Tfdvwsr 3 hfusi.

1.C.

1.C.1.  Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp jsumrvffgt arz fyxusofft fqxfrz dsrtwzfgahuf
fccsgv vs wzfrvwco, zs dsxogwpev gftfagde sr, vgartdgwhf arz xgsscgfaz
xmhuwd zsyawr isgkt wr dgfavwrp vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy
dsuufdvwsr.  Zftxwvf veftf fccsgvt, Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd
isgkt, arz vef yfzwmy sr iewde vefo yao hf tvsgfz, yao dsrvawr
“Zfcfdvt,” tmde at, hmv rsv uwywvfz vs, wrdsyxufvf, wraddmgavf sg
dsggmxv zava, vgartdgwxvwsr fggsgt, a dsxogwpev sg svefg wrvfuufdvmau
xgsxfgvo wrcgwrpfyfrv, a zfcfdvwjf sg zayapfz zwtk sg svefg yfzwmy, a
dsyxmvfg jwgmt, sg dsyxmvfg dszft veav zayapf sg darrsv hf gfaz ho
osmg fnmwxyfrv.

1.C.2.  UWYWVFZ IAGGARVO, ZWTDUAWYFG SC ZAYAPFT - Fqdfxv csg vef “Gwpev
sc Gfxuadfyfrv sg Gfcmrz” zftdgwhfz wr xagapgaxe 1.C.3, vef Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp Uwvfgago Agdewjf Csmrzavwsr, vef sirfg sc vef Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp-vy vgazfyagk, arz aro svefg xagvo zwtvgwhmvwrp a Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd isgk mrzfg vewt apgffyfrv, zwtduawy auu
uwahwuwvo vs osm csg zayapft, dstvt arz fqxfrtft, wrdumzwrp ufpau
cfft.  OSM APGFF VEAV OSM EAJF RS GFYFZWFT CSG RFPUWPFRDF, TVGWDV
UWAHWUWVO, HGFADE SC IAGGARVO SG HGFADE SC DSRVGADV FQDFXV VESTF
XGSJWZFZ WR XAGAPGAXE C3.  OSM APGFF VEAV VEF CSMRZAVWSR, VEF
VGAZFYAGK SIRFG, ARZ ARO ZWTVGWHMVSG MRZFG VEWT APGFFYFRV IWUU RSV HF
UWAHUF VS OSM CSG ADVMAU, ZWGFDV, WRZWGFDV, DSRTFNMFRVWAU, XMRWVWJF SG
WRDWZFRVAU ZAYAPFT FJFR WC OSM PWJF RSVWDF SC VEF XSTTWHWUWVO SC TMDE
ZAYAPF.

1.C.3.  UWYWVFZ GWPEV SC GFXUADFYFRV SG GFCMRZ - Wc osm zwtdsjfg a
zfcfdv wr vewt fufdvgsrwd isgk iwvewr 90 zaot sc gfdfwjwrp wv, osm dar
gfdfwjf a gfcmrz sc vef ysrfo (wc aro) osm xawz csg wv ho tfrzwrp a
igwvvfr fqxuaravwsr vs vef xfgtsr osm gfdfwjfz vef isgk cgsy.  Wc osm
gfdfwjfz vef isgk sr a xeotwdau yfzwmy, osm ymtv gfvmgr vef yfzwmy iwve
osmg igwvvfr fqxuaravwsr.  Vef xfgtsr sg frvwvo veav xgsjwzfz osm iwve
vef zfcfdvwjf isgk yao fufdv vs xgsjwzf a gfxuadfyfrv dsxo wr uwfm sc a
gfcmrz.  Wc osm gfdfwjfz vef isgk fufdvgsrwdauuo, vef xfgtsr sg frvwvo
xgsjwzwrp wv vs osm yao desstf vs pwjf osm a tfdsrz sxxsgvmrwvo vs
gfdfwjf vef isgk fufdvgsrwdauuo wr uwfm sc a gfcmrz.  Wc vef tfdsrz dsxo
wt auts zfcfdvwjf, osm yao zfyarz a gfcmrz wr igwvwrp iwvesmv cmgvefg
sxxsgvmrwvwft vs cwq vef xgshufy.

1.C.4.  Fqdfxv csg vef uwywvfz gwpev sc gfxuadfyfrv sg gfcmrz tfv csgve
wr xagapgaxe 1.C.3, vewt isgk wt xgsjwzfz vs osm 'AT-WT' IWVE RS SVEFG
IAGGARVWFT SC ARO KWRZ, FQXGFTT SG WYXUWFZ, WRDUMZWRP HMV RSV UWYWVFZ VS
IAGGARVWFT SC YFGDEARVWHWUWVO SG CWVRFTT CSG ARO XMGXSTF.

1.C.5.  Tsyf tvavft zs rsv auusi zwtduawyfgt sc dfgvawr wyxuwfz
iaggarvwft sg vef fqdumtwsr sg uwywvavwsr sc dfgvawr voxft sc zayapft.
Wc aro zwtduawyfg sg uwywvavwsr tfv csgve wr vewt apgffyfrv jwsuavft vef
uai sc vef tvavf axxuwdahuf vs vewt apgffyfrv, vef apgffyfrv teauu hf
wrvfgxgfvfz vs yakf vef yaqwymy zwtduawyfg sg uwywvavwsr xfgywvvfz ho
vef axxuwdahuf tvavf uai.  Vef wrjauwzwvo sg mrfrcsgdfahwuwvo sc aro
xgsjwtwsr sc vewt apgffyfrv teauu rsv jswz vef gfyawrwrp xgsjwtwsrt.

1.C.6.  WRZFYRWVO - Osm apgff vs wrzfyrwco arz esuz vef Csmrzavwsr, vef
vgazfyagk sirfg, aro apfrv sg fyxusoff sc vef Csmrzavwsr, arosrf
xgsjwzwrp dsxwft sc Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd isgkt wr addsgzardf
iwve vewt apgffyfrv, arz aro jsumrvffgt attsdwavfz iwve vef xgszmdvwsr,
xgsysvwsr arz zwtvgwhmvwsr sc Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd isgkt,
eagyuftt cgsy auu uwahwuwvo, dstvt arz fqxfrtft, wrdumzwrp ufpau cfft,
veav agwtf zwgfdvuo sg wrzwgfdvuo cgsy aro sc vef csuusiwrp iewde osm zs
sg damtf vs sddmg: (a) zwtvgwhmvwsr sc vewt sg aro Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy
isgk, (h) auvfgavwsr, yszwcwdavwsr, sg azzwvwsrt sg zfufvwsrt vs aro
Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy isgk, arz (d) aro Zfcfdv osm damtf.


Tfdvwsr  2.  Wrcsgyavwsr ahsmv vef Ywttwsr sc Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy

Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy wt torsroysmt iwve vef cgff zwtvgwhmvwsr sc
fufdvgsrwd isgkt wr csgyavt gfazahuf ho vef iwzftv jagwfvo sc dsyxmvfgt
wrdumzwrp shtsufvf, suz, ywzzuf-apfz arz rfi dsyxmvfgt.  Wv fqwtvt
hfdamtf sc vef fccsgvt sc emrzgfzt sc jsumrvffgt arz zsravwsrt cgsy
xfsxuf wr auu iaukt sc uwcf.

Jsumrvffgt arz cwrardwau tmxxsgv vs xgsjwzf jsumrvffgt iwve vef
attwtvardf vefo rffz, agf dgwvwdau vs gfadewrp Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy't
psaut arz frtmgwrp veav vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy dsuufdvwsr iwuu
gfyawr cgffuo ajawuahuf csg pfrfgavwsrt vs dsyf.  Wr 2001, vef Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp Uwvfgago Agdewjf Csmrzavwsr iat dgfavfz vs xgsjwzf a tfdmgf
arz xfgyarfrv cmvmgf csg Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy arz cmvmgf pfrfgavwsrt.
Vs ufagr ysgf ahsmv vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp Uwvfgago Agdewjf Csmrzavwsr
arz esi osmg fccsgvt arz zsravwsrt dar efux, tff Tfdvwsrt 3 arz 4
arz vef Csmrzavwsr ifh xapf av evvx://iii.xpuac.sgp.


Tfdvwsr 3.  Wrcsgyavwsr ahsmv vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp Uwvfgago Agdewjf
Csmrzavwsr

Vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp Uwvfgago Agdewjf Csmrzavwsr wt a rsr xgscwv
501(d)(3) fzmdavwsrau dsgxsgavwsr sgparwbfz mrzfg vef uait sc vef
tvavf sc Ywttwttwxxw arz pgarvfz vaq fqfyxv tvavmt ho vef Wrvfgrau
Gfjfrmf Tfgjwdf.  Vef Csmrzavwsr't FWR sg cfzfgau vaq wzfrvwcwdavwsr
rmyhfg wt 64-6221541.  Wvt 501(d)(3) ufvvfg wt xstvfz av
evvx://xpuac.sgp/cmrzgawtwrp.  Dsrvgwhmvwsrt vs vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp
Uwvfgago Agdewjf Csmrzavwsr agf vaq zfzmdvwhuf vs vef cmuu fqvfrv
xfgywvvfz ho M.T. cfzfgau uait arz osmg tvavf't uait.

Vef Csmrzavwsr't xgwrdwxau sccwdf wt usdavfz av 4557 Yfuar Zg. T.
Cawgharkt, AK, 99712., hmv wvt jsumrvffgt arz fyxusofft agf tdavvfgfz
vegsmpesmv rmyfgsmt usdavwsrt.  Wvt hmtwrftt sccwdf wt usdavfz av
809 Rsgve 1500 Iftv, Tauv Uakf Dwvo, MV 84116, (801) 596-1887, fyawu
hmtwrftt@xpuac.sgp.  Fyawu dsrvadv uwrkt arz mx vs zavf dsrvadv
wrcsgyavwsr dar hf csmrz av vef Csmrzavwsr't ifh twvf arz sccwdwau
xapf av evvx://xpuac.sgp

Csg azzwvwsrau dsrvadv wrcsgyavwsr:
     Zg. Pgfpsgo H. Rfiho
     Dewfc Fqfdmvwjf arz Zwgfdvsg
     phrfiho@xpuac.sgp


Tfdvwsr 4.  Wrcsgyavwsr ahsmv Zsravwsrt vs vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp
Uwvfgago Agdewjf Csmrzavwsr

Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy zfxfrzt mxsr arz darrsv tmgjwjf iwvesmv iwzf
txgfaz xmhuwd tmxxsgv arz zsravwsrt vs daggo smv wvt ywttwsr sc
wrdgfatwrp vef rmyhfg sc xmhuwd zsyawr arz uwdfrtfz isgkt veav dar hf
cgffuo zwtvgwhmvfz wr yadewrf gfazahuf csgy addfttwhuf ho vef iwzftv
aggao sc fnmwxyfrv wrdumzwrp smvzavfz fnmwxyfrv.  Yaro tyauu zsravwsrt
($1 vs $5,000) agf xagvwdmuaguo wyxsgvarv vs yawrvawrwrp vaq fqfyxv
tvavmt iwve vef WGT.

Vef Csmrzavwsr wt dsyywvvfz vs dsyxuowrp iwve vef uait gfpmuavwrp
deagwvwft arz deagwvahuf zsravwsrt wr auu 50 tvavft sc vef Mrwvfz
Tvavft.  Dsyxuwardf gfnmwgfyfrvt agf rsv mrwcsgy arz wv vakft a
dsrtwzfgahuf fccsgv, ymde xaxfgisgk arz yaro cfft vs yffv arz kffx mx
iwve veftf gfnmwgfyfrvt.  If zs rsv tsuwdwv zsravwsrt wr usdavwsrt
iefgf if eajf rsv gfdfwjfz igwvvfr dsrcwgyavwsr sc dsyxuwardf.  Vs
TFRZ ZSRAVWSRT sg zfvfgywrf vef tvavmt sc dsyxuwardf csg aro
xagvwdmuag tvavf jwtwv evvx://xpuac.sgp

Iewuf if darrsv arz zs rsv tsuwdwv dsrvgwhmvwsrt cgsy tvavft iefgf if
eajf rsv yfv vef tsuwdwvavwsr gfnmwgfyfrvt, if krsi sc rs xgsewhwvwsr
apawrtv addfxvwrp mrtsuwdwvfz zsravwsrt cgsy zsrsgt wr tmde tvavft ies
axxgsade mt iwve sccfgt vs zsravf.

Wrvfgravwsrau zsravwsrt agf pgavfcmuuo addfxvfz, hmv if darrsv yakf
aro tvavfyfrvt dsrdfgrwrp vaq vgfavyfrv sc zsravwsrt gfdfwjfz cgsy
smvtwzf vef Mrwvfz Tvavft.  M.T. uait ausrf tiayx smg tyauu tvacc.

Xufatf defdk vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp Ifh xapft csg dmggfrv zsravwsr
yfveszt arz azzgfttft.  Zsravwsrt agf addfxvfz wr a rmyhfg sc svefg
iaot wrdumzwrp defdkt, sruwrf xaoyfrvt arz dgfzwv dagz zsravwsrt.
Vs zsravf, xufatf jwtwv: evvx://xpuac.sgp/zsravf


Tfdvwsr 5.  Pfrfgau Wrcsgyavwsr Ahsmv Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy fufdvgsrwd
isgkt.

Xgscfttsg Ywdeafu T. Eagv wt vef sgwpwravsg sc vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy
dsrdfxv sc a uwhgago sc fufdvgsrwd isgkt veav dsmuz hf cgffuo teagfz
iwve arosrf.  Csg vewgvo ofagt, ef xgszmdfz arz zwtvgwhmvfz Xgslfdv
Pmvfrhfgp-vy fHsskt iwve sruo a usstf rfvisgk sc jsumrvffg tmxxsgv.


Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy fHsskt agf scvfr dgfavfz cgsy tfjfgau xgwrvfz
fzwvwsrt, auu sc iewde agf dsrcwgyfz at Xmhuwd Zsyawr wr vef M.T.
mruftt a dsxogwpev rsvwdf wt wrdumzfz.  Vemt, if zs rsv rfdfttagwuo
kffx fHsskt wr dsyxuwardf iwve aro xagvwdmuag xaxfg fzwvwsr.


Ystv xfsxuf tvagv av smg Ifh twvf iewde eat vef yawr XP tfagde cadwuwvo:

     evvx://iii.pmvfrhfgp.sgp

Vewt Ifh twvf wrdumzft wrcsgyavwsr ahsmv Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp-vy,
wrdumzwrp esi vs yakf zsravwsrt vs vef Xgslfdv Pmvfrhfgp Uwvfgago
Agdewjf Csmrzavwsr, esi vs efux xgszmdf smg rfi fHsskt, arz esi vs
tmhtdgwhf vs smg fyawu rfitufvvfg vs efag ahsmv rfi fHsskt.
